<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20020814121912.txt.gz
TIME:20020814121912
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report: August 14, 2002 (Date of earliest event reported: August 14, 2002) BRUNSWICK CORPORATION (Exact name of Registrant as Specified in Its Charter) Delaware 001-01043 36-0848180 (State or Other Jurisdiction of (Commission File (I.R.S. Employer Incorporation or Organization) Number) Identification Number) 1 N. Field Court, Lake Forest, Illinois 60045-4811 (Address of Principal Executive Offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700 (Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report): Not Applicable
ITEM 9. REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE. On August 14, 2002, each of the Principal Executive Officer, George W. Buckley, and Principal Financial Officer, Victoria J. Reich, of Brunswick Corporation submitted to the SEC sworn statements pursuant to Securities and Exchange Commission Order No. 4-460. A copy of each of these statements is attached hereto as an Exhibit (99.1 and 99.2). BRUNSWICK CORPORATION By: /s/ Victoria J. Reich ---------------------------- Victoria J. Reich Chief Financial Officer Date: August 14, 2002 --------------------
EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit Number Description of Exhibit - ------ ---------------------- *99.1 Statement Under Oath of Principal Executive Officer dated August 14, 2002 *99.2 Statement Under Oath of Principal Financial Officer dated August 14, 2002 - ------------------- * Filed herewith.

STATEMENT UNDER OATH OF PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER AND PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL OFFICER REGARDING FACTS AND CIRCUMSTANCES RELATING TO EXCHANGE ACT FILINGS I, George W. Buckley, Chief Executive Officer of Brunswick Corporation, state and attest that: (1) To the best of my knowledge, based upon a review of the covered reports of Brunswick Corporation, and, except as corrected or supplemented in a subsequent covered report: - - no covered report contained an untrue statement of a material fact as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed); and - - no covered report omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements in the covered report, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed). (2) I have reviewed the contents of this statement with the Audit Committee of Brunswick Corporation's Board of Directors. (3) In this statement under oath, each of the following, if filed on or before the date of this statement, is a "covered report": - - Brunswick Corporation's Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Commission for the period ending December 31, 2001; - - all reports on Form 10-Q, all reports on Form 8-K and all definitive proxy materials of Brunswick Corporation filed with the Commission subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K identified above; and - - any amendments to any of the foregoing. /s/ George W. Buckley --------------------- George W. Buckley Date: August 14, 2002 Subscribed and sworn to before me this 14th day of August, 2002 /S/ Nancy Ann Hartman [Official Notary Seal] - --------------------------- Notary Public My Commission Expires: March 4, 2006

STATEMENT UNDER OATH OF PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER AND PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL OFFICER REGARDING FACTS AND CIRCUMSTANCES RELATING TO EXCHANGE ACT FILINGS I, Victoria J. Reich, Chief Financial Officer of Brunswick Corporation, state and attest that: (1) To the best of my knowledge, based upon a review of the covered reports of Brunswick Corporation, and, except as corrected or supplemented in a subsequent covered report: - - no covered report contained an untrue statement of a material fact as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed); and - - no covered report omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements in the covered report, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed). (2) I have reviewed the contents of this statement with the Audit Committee of Brunswick Corporation's Board of Directors. (3) In this statement under oath, each of the following, if filed on or before the date of this statement, is a "covered report": - - Brunswick Corporation's Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Commission for the period ending December 31, 2001; - - all reports on Form 10-Q, all reports on Form 8-K and all definitive proxy materials of Brunswick Corporation filed with the Commission subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K identified above; and - - any amendments to any of the foregoing. /s/ Victoria J. Reich --------------------- Victoria J. Reich Date: August 14, 2002 Subscribed and sworn to before me this 14th day of August, 2002 /S/ Nancy Ann Hartman [Official Notary Seal] - --------------------------- Notary Public My Commission Expires: March 4, 2006


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20030429163249.txt.gz
TIME:20030429163249
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
================================================================================ SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 -------------------- FORM 8-K Current Report Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): APRIL 24, 2003 -------------------- BRUNSWICK CORPORATION (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) DELAWARE 001-01043 36-0848180 (State or other jurisdiction of (Commission File (IRS Employer incorporation or organization) Number) Identification No.) 1 N. FIELD COURT LAKE FOREST, IL 60045-4811 (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700 N/A (Former name or former address, if changed since last report) -------------------- ================================================================================
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS. (c) Exhibits. EXHIBIT NUMBER DESCRIPTION OF EXHIBIT 99.1 Press Release, dated April 24, 2003, of Brunswick Corporation, announcing its first quarter 2003 earnings. 99.2 Transcript of Audio Webcast, held April 24, 2003, of Brunswick Corporation, discussing its first quarter 2003 earnings. ITEM 9. REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE (INFORMATION IS BEING PROVIDED UNDER ITEM 12). On April 24, 2003, Brunswick Corporation issued a Press Release announcing its first quarter 2003 earnings. The Press Release is incorporated herein by reference, and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K. The Press Release contains non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a "non-GAAP financial measure" is a numerical measure of a registrant's historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of the definition, GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States. Pursuant to the requirements of Regulation G, Brunswick Corporation has included, as a part of the press release, a reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure. Brunswick Corporation has used the financial measures that are included in the Press Release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Management believes that these measures -- including those that are "non-GAAP financial measures" -- and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswick Corporation's performance using the same tools that Management uses and to gauge progress in achieving its stated goals. Management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "Free Cash Flow" is also useful to investors because it is an indication of amounts of cash flow that may be available for further investment in future growth initiatives. Also on April 24, 2003, Brunswick Corporation held an Audio Webcast discussing its first quarter 2003 earnings. A transcript of the Audio Teleconference is incorporated herein by reference, and is included as Exhibit 99.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K. A tape of the Audio Webcast and the related questions and answers session is available on Brunswick's web-site at www.Brunswick.com. The information furnished under "Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure" is intended to be furnished under "Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition" in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-8216. The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibits attached hereto shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing. Page - 1
SIGNATURE Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. Dated: April 28, 2003 Brunswick Corporation By: /s/ Victoria J. Reich ------------------------------- Victoria J. Reich Chief Financial Officer Page - 2
INDEX TO EXHIBITS 99.1 Press Release, dated April 24, 2003, of Brunswick Corporation, announcing its first quarter 2003 earnings. 99.2 Transcript of Audio Webcast, held April 24, 2003, of Brunswick Corporation, discussing its first quarter 2003 earnings. Page - 3

EXHIBIT 99.1 [BRUNSWICK LOGO] NEWS RELEASE Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Court Lake Forest, IL 60045 Telephone 847.735.4700 Facsimile 847.735.4750 www.brunswick.com Release: IMMEDIATE Contact: Kathryn Chieger Vice President -- Corporate and Investor Relations Phone: (847) 735-4612 BRUNSWICK REPORTS EPS OF $0.22 IN FIRST QUARTER LAKE FOREST, ILL., APRIL 24, 2003 -- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today a 47 percent increase in diluted earnings per share in the first quarter of 2003 to $0.22, in line with previously announced expectations. This compares with $0.15 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2002, before the cumulative effect of an accounting change. "We are very pleased with our first quarter performance," commented Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley. "Sales advanced in our marine engine, pleasure boat and fitness equipment businesses, where we are seeing the results of our efforts to develop and introduce new products and technologies take hold. Recent acquisitions also contributed to the sales gain. The growth in marine and fitness sales more than offset a decline in our bowling and billiards sales for the quarter." The company reported a 50 percent improvement in net earnings on an 8 percent sales gain and a 25 percent increase in operating earnings in the first quarter of 2003. "Our good performance was notable given the challenging geopolitical, economic and market environment," Buckley added. "We also continued to maintain excellent liquidity by keeping our eye on the fundamentals, including efficient inventory management, and we are in a solid position to act on emerging opportunities." (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION APRIL 24, 2003 PAGE 2 OF 11 FIRST-QUARTER RESULTS For the quarter ended March 31, 2003, the company had net sales of $934.5 million, up 8 percent from $866.7 million a year earlier. Operating earnings rose to $38.0 million, up 25 percent from $30.3 million, and operating margins reached 4.1 percent versus 3.5 percent a year ago. For the first quarter of 2003, net earnings totaled $19.8 million, or $0.22 per diluted share. In the year-ago first quarter, the company had net earnings of $13.2 million, or $0.15 per diluted share, before the cumulative effect of the adoption of Financial Accounting Standards Board SFAS No. 142, "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets." Adoption of this accounting standard resulted in a non-cash, after-tax charge of $25.1 million, or $0.28 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2002. The first quarter of 2003 also benefited from higher joint venture and interest income compared with the year-ago quarter. MARINE ENGINE SEGMENT The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group and Brunswick New Technologies (BNT), reported net sales of $412.8 million in the first quarter of 2003, an 11 percent increase compared with $370.4 million in the year-ago quarter. The favorable currency effects of a weakened dollar, and the full effect of recent acquisitions, most notably from BNT, largely drove the sales increase for the segment. Excluding these factors, sales were up slightly versus the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings in the quarter declined to $19.3 million versus $24.7 million a year ago. Operating margins were 4.7 percent compared with 6.7 percent in the first quarter of 2002. "More than half of the margin decline was attributed to higher pension, health care and insurance costs," Buckley explained. "Engine segment operating margins also were adversely affected by a shift in mix from classic two-stroke engines to lower-margin four-stroke engines, poor weather during the quarter that led to lower sales of (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION APRIL 24, 2003 PAGE 3 OF 11 higher-margin parts and accessories, and unabsorbed costs due to production slowdowns to keep inventories at appropriate levels." "While our initial expectations were that marine retail would be relatively flat for the year," Buckley said, "the retail markets have gotten off to a slower-than-anticipated start. This was due to the timing of the war in Iraq and the resulting low consumer confidence coming just as the boating season was beginning. Further, competition in the marine engine segment, has also intensified during the quarter with some manufacturers offering deep discounts," Buckley said. "With the widest array of engines among all manufacturers, nearly 65 years of uninterrupted service to our dealers and customers, and continuing investments in new products and technologies, Mercury is well poised for the future," Buckley said. "We believe initiatives such as Project `X', our game-changing, high-horsepower four-stroke outboard engine due to arrive in time for next year's boating season, and new integrated marine electronics products will further extend our leadership." BOAT SEGMENT The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and includes the Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Sealine, Hatteras, Boston Whaler, Meridian, Trophy, Baja and Princecraft boat brands. The Boat segment reported net sales for the first quarter of $378.6 million, up 7 percent compared with $353.9 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings for the quarter rose to $14.1 million, up from $3.3 million recorded during the corresponding period last year. Operating margins in the quarter showed good progress, coming in at 3.7 percent versus 0.9 percent for the year-ago period. "The improvement in operating margins is a testament to our Boat Group continuing to do a better job of leveraging top-line growth through operating efficiencies and other improvements," Buckley said. "As for sales, we saw good gains at Sea Ray, which experienced more normal wholesale activity this year compared with the year-ago quarter when pipeline inventories were being adjusted. We are particularly (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION APRIL 24, 2003 PAGE 4 OF 11 encouraged by the warm acceptance of our many new products and innovations across all 10 of our premier boat brands." "Sales of small boats such as runabouts, deck boats and cruisers have improved, led by the Bayliner 175 that we introduced last year. This boat has helped re-establish Bayliner as the leader in family boating. An entry-level boat, the Bayliner 175 offers an engine and trailer package with a suggested retail price of $9,995," Buckley said. "The market still remains challenging for larger boats." FITNESS SEGMENT The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment, and operates Omni Fitness retail stores. Segment sales in the first quarter of 2003 totaled $119.2 million, up 14 percent from $105.0 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings rose 40 percent to $12.5 million from $8.9 million, and operating margins were 10.5 percent and 8.5 percent in the first quarters of 2003 and 2002, respectively. "Life Fitness' sales growth continued to outpace the industry as we enjoyed strong results in all market segments, including commercial, consumer and international, where we continue to gain market share," Buckley noted. "We expect this momentum to continue, fueled by some 50 new products that Life Fitness intends to roll out this year." "Many of these products boast a new and exciting contemporary design and colors along with enhanced software programming to improve user comfort and workout effectiveness," Buckley explained. "Several products have already been introduced and embraced by the marketplace, such as our new commercial treadmills, our new commercial strength systems and the new gym systems for home use." (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION APRIL 24, 2003 PAGE 5 OF 11 "Increasing market share and growth opportunities in Europe also have led to a joint venture agreement with a leading Hungarian manufacturer to begin making certain Life Fitness products in that country as we continue to seek better ways to serve local markets," Buckley said. Life Fitness also strives to be the best-cost producer of fitness equipment. Consequently, in an effort to improve operating efficiencies and rationalize its existing capacity, Life Fitness will close its Paso Robles, Calif., plant by year end and consolidate its strength equipment manufacturing into its Ramsey, Minn., facility. "This action will better leverage existing manufacturing capacity and the advanced technology of the Ramsey facility and make Life Fitness more competitive in the global fitness marketplace," Buckley explained. "This move underscores Life Fitness' focus on continued manufacturing and operating efficiencies as the global fitness market continues to expand." BOWLING & BILLIARDS SEGMENT The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers, and bowling and billiards products. Segment sales in the first quarter of 2003 totaled $85.1 million, down 6 percent compared with $90.2 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings were $8.4 million in the quarter compared with $8.5 million in the year-ago quarter. Despite the drop in sales, segment operating margins improved to 9.9 percent in the first quarter of 2003, up from 9.4 percent in the first quarter a year ago. "Although consumer economic weakness had an adverse effect, particularly on our billiards sales, operating margins for the segment improved due to continuing good work to improve efficiencies throughout those businesses," Buckley said. (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION APRIL 24, 2003 PAGE 6 OF 11 LOOKING AHEAD Buckley noted that the uncertain economy, the situation in the Middle East and SARS continue to cloud the outlook for the remainder of the year. "Though we had overall good results in the first quarter, we must nevertheless remain guarded and vigilant as to how our markets will react to the economic and geopolitical picture," Buckley explained. "Indeed, the war with Iraq, and its subsequent effects on consumers and retail activity, came at a difficult time for the marine industry, which is traditionally the most active in the second quarter. It remains to be seen how markets will react as the war winds down. Given that, we believe our earnings per share for the year will be in the range of $1.40 to $1.50, compared with the $1.14 reported for 2002. This would indicate EPS for the second quarter of 2003 of between $0.50 and $0.55, compared with $0.51 a year ago." "Absent any foreseeable relief from the economy and other factors, we will continue to concentrate on the things we can control to keep our performance on track, sticking with what we know and an approach to the market that has proved successful in the face of adversity," Buckley added. "We will execute our strategic plan: reduce costs to improve our competitive position, introduce a steady stream of innovative products, enhance our marketing and brand building efforts, improve our distribution channels, focus on our customers' needs, and develop our people to strengthen our entire organization." FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this release. These risks include, but are not limited to, the impact of the war in Iraq and SARS on the global economy; the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION APRIL 24, 2003 PAGE 7 OF 11 and bowling products; the impact of interest rates, fuel prices and weather conditions on demand for marine products; the ability to maintain effective distribution; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the financial strength of dealers and independent boat builders; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; adverse foreign economic conditions; shifts in currency exchange rates; the effect of weak financial markets on pension expense and funding levels; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the success of global sourcing and supply chain management initiatives; the company's ability to develop and produce new products; new and competing technologies; and imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors. Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2002. Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation is a manufacturer and marketer of leading consumer brands including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian and Sealine pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Princecraft fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; and Brunswick billiards tables. (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION APRIL 24, 2003 PAGE 8 OF 11 BRUNSWICK CORPORATION COMPARATIVE CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME (in millions, except per share data) (unaudited) (1) The Company adopted SFAS No. 142, effective Jan. 1, 2002 NM = Not Meaningful (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION APRIL 24, 2003 PAGE 9 OF 11 BRUNSWICK CORPORATION SELECTED FINANCIAL INFORMATION (in millions) (unaudited) SEGMENT INFORMATION NM = Not Meaningful (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION APRIL 24, 2003 PAGE 10 OF 11 BRUNSWICK CORPORATION COMPARATIVE CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS (in millions) (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION APRIL 24, 2003 PAGE 11 OF 11 BRUNSWICK CORPORATION COMPARATIVE CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS (in millions) (unaudited) Free cash flow is defined as cash flow from operating and investing activities, excluding acquisition and financing activities. # # #

EXHIBIT 99.2 April 24, 2003 First Quarter 2003 Conference Call Kathryn Chieger Good morning everyone and thanks for joining us. With me are George Buckley, our Chairman and CEO, and Vicki Reich, our CFO. First, let me remind everyone that during this call, our comments will include certain forward-looking statements about our future results. Keep in mind that our actual results could differ materially from expectations as of today. For the details on the factors to consider, take a look at our 10-K for 2002 and our earnings press release issued this morning, both of which are available upon request or by going to our Web site at brunswick.com. We're still in the midst of earnings season and you're all very busy, so we will try to wrap things up in 45 minutes. First, we'll hear from Vicki then a wrap-up from George. VICKI REICH Good morning. This morning we announced earnings per share for Q1 of $.22, up from $.15 a year ago. This 47% increase in EPS came on an 8% sales increase, and 60 basis point operating margin improvement. We achieved the margin improvement despite $9 million of higher pension, healthcare and insurance costs - which set us back almost 1 full point in operating margin, as well as higher R&D spending for new products and higher marketing costs to drive growth in this sluggish economy. In addition to the margin gains, we had good contributions from Joint Ventures including our Cummins Mercruiser diesel engine JV. Overall, we're very pleased with our results, especially in light of a turbulent world environment marked by an untimely war for the marine season, poor equity market returns that boost pension and insurance costs, a sputtering economy, SARS, and just to keep life interesting, severe weather conditions that affected some of our key markets. Despite all of that, we remain 100% focused on executing our strategy. And while this external environment means it will likely be a bumpy ride for a while, we're pleased that our strategies are showing up in our financials in the form of sales and earnings growth, margin improvement, a strong cash position, and improving returns on invested capital. I'll walk through each of our 4 business segments and give you some color behind our operating results for the quarter, and then I'll close with some comments on the balance sheet and cash flow. Starting with the Engine Segment, which comprises Mercury Marine and Brunswick New Technologies, or BNT. Sales were up 11% or $42 million in the quarter. We benefited from our strong global market position at Mercury and (finally!) a weaker dollar versus a year ago. Acquisitions in BNT and Mercury, including Northstar, IDS, and Teignbridge, also boosted
sales. Absent the effects of currency and acquisitions, engine segment sales were up a couple percent. The modest growth in wholesale shipments reflects our continued success in Europe and Asia and more normal stocking patterns at dealers and boatbuilders compared with last year when they were reducing inventories. These factors offset a reduction in U.S. parts and accessories sales as war, weather and fears about the economy took their toll on the consumer. Engine pipeline inventories at dealers and boatbuilders remain in great shape, despite a slow start to the retail boating season. Inventories are at about 28 weeks supply based on a very depressed trailing 12-months of retail sales, and about flat with this time last year. At this time in the season, this level of inventory is quite low. Turning to margins in the Engine Segment, and speaking of bumpy rides, several factors conspired to depress margins by 200 basis points in the quarter. First, is the continued shift to low-emission outboards, which represented 50% of Q1 sales compared with 42% last year. As we have said, it will take some time to cost reduce these more complex low-emission engines. Second, the reduction in high margin P&A sales in the quarter, primarily related to poor weather in key markets. Third, manufacturing cost inefficiencies resulting from production rate reductions during the quarter as we adjusted for a slow start to the season. Labor inefficiencies, lower overhead absorption and higher utility costs all dampened margins. And fourth, Mercury bears about half of the company's $9 million increase in pension, healthcare and insurance costs. These factors more than offset the positive effects of currency and slightly higher wholesale engine sales. While some of these margin pressures should be short term, we've got our work cut out for us to overcome the shift to low-emission outboard engines, as well as higher pension and healthcare costs. Our prescription includes: - Variable cost adjustments as rapidly as possible as the economy goes through its fits and starts. For example, we recently announced layoffs affecting 200 hourly positions at Mercury. - Permanent cost structure improvements focused on global sourcing and lower cost manufacturing. George will expand more on these critical initiatives. - Introduction of new, game-changing products and technologies including our Project X 4-strokes and Smart Craft electronics. - And, while not in our control, at some point we do expect the economy to improve. To give you a sense for where we are in the cycle, production volumes at Mercury in Q1 were 25-30% lower than the volumes in Q1 2000. 2
Moving to the Boat Segment, where sales were up 7% in the quarter. Similar to engines, we saw a slow start at retail. We estimate that US retail boat markets were down 15-20% in Q1. Wholesale shipments benefited from some terrific new products which dealers were anxious to stock, as well as a more normal stocking pattern compared with last year when dealers were reducing inventories. Results for our new products in virtually every brand confirm our belief that products with great styling, performance, ease of use, and attractive pricing will bring in the buyers even in a tough economy. Pipeline inventories of boats at our dealers remain at low levels and of excellent quality. We had an average of 27 weeks on hand, based on trailing 12 months sales, compared with 30 a year ago. At least as important, clean inventories are helping us maintain pricing discipline and position us well for an upturn in sales once retail activity improves. Margins in the Boat Segment improved 280 basis points (almost quadrupling), showing excellent operating leverage. Higher production rates, especially at Sea Ray, and lower sales discounts both contributed to the margin improvement. US Marine made good progress in the quarter on the road to recovery with much improved manufacturing cost efficiencies and continued success of the new Bayliner 175 and our new Meridian yacht models. Please keep in mind that, like our engine business, our boat businesses are still operating at production rates that range from 20 to 40 % lower than the cyclical peak in 2000. So further improvements in our margins will come as the economy picks up and we press forward with our cost reduction initiatives including global sourcing and manufacturing. Also in the first quarter, we made good progress in our efforts to envelope our dealers with the best products and services to help them win in their markets. Brunswick Acceptance Company, our jv with Transamerica, began operations in January and is actively working with our dealers to ensure long-term, cost-effective access to floor plan financing. Moving now to the Fitness segment, where we continue to reap the benefits of a continuous flow of new products as well as our diverse global customer base. Sales grew 14% in the quarter and were up double digits in our domestic and international commercial channels and our consumer channel. We continue to gain share in the club, military and vertical markets (which includes hotels and schools). There was plenty of excitement at the recent IHRSA trade show around our new products, including the variable stride crosstrainer, and our I-lab display of future product concepts. In addition to the growth, we were pleased with the operating leverage in this segment. Operating margins of 10.5% were up a full 200 basis points versus last year. Sales growth, cost reduction programs and a weaker U.S. dollar all contributed to the margin gains. 3
In our Bowling and Billiards segment, sales were down 6% in the quarter as concerns about war and the economy dampened sales, especially in our Billiards business. Bowling retail sales were up modestly in the quarter, which was good performance considering the weather challenges in the Northeast and Denver markets. Our refurbished Brunswick Zone bowling centers continue to attract crowds of bowlers, and this summer we'll be Zoning 13 more centers. Cost management continues to pay dividends for us in Bowling, where margins improved 50 basis points despite the lower sales. The Bowling team has done an outstanding job driving cost reductions throughout the organization, including global sourcing. Shifting over to the balance sheet and cash flow. Free cash flow for the quarter was $74 million cash usage, reflecting a return to normal seasonal working capital patterns. We are on track with our target for $150 million of free cash flow for the year, which also anticipates capital spending of $150 million. Working capital efficiency continues to improve. Working capital turns were 4.3 in the first quarter, an 8% efficiency gain compared with 4.0 turns last year. We're seeing nice progress in our supply chain and inventory management programs, as well as good discipline in receivables and payables. Our balance sheet and liquidity remain strong. Cash on hand was $280 million, nearly double the year ago level, and debt to capital is on target at 35.6%. With that quick tour of the financials I would like to turn the call over to George. Good morning everyone and thank you Vicki for the overview of the financials. Given the stubbornly weak economic and geopolitical situation we find ourselves in, I hope that you will agree that the first quarter for us was tremendously good news, as Vicki reported. For the most part, this level of performance is much more a reflection of what is happening inside our company than outside, though I will tell you that we still have much to do there, and we are not at all satisfied with where we are yet. In reality, I suppose we never will be satisfied. To set the scene for you, I'll speak first about what will probably interest you most, that is, what we are seeing in the market from an overall business perspective, and then I'll speak about our outlook for the remainder of the year. The war in Iraq obviously caused a lot of uncertainty and distraction. While none of us can calculate the precise effect it caused, we have to be realistic and say that it's still too soon to tell how long lasting the effects might be. So before we get too optimistic after such a good quarter, we must remember that consumer psychology is a key factor here in boat purchases and it may take some time for that to recover. There are always lots of moving parts in a company like ours, but I think for obvious reasons there seemed to be even more moving parts here than normal this past quarter. So I'd like to tell you a few of the dynamics that affected our business in Q1 and, to some degree, we have to assume that they will probably affect our business for some time to come. Let me first deal with the negative factors we saw during the quarter, then I'll deal with the counterbalancing positives. 4
NEGATIVES 1. While it always seems like a lame duck excuse when I hear it, ... the unusually bad weather in this quarter across much of the northern United States impacted sales and earnings for us. In particular, we felt the sales and margin impact in lower marine parts and accessories sales, ... plus the bad weather and a late Easter holiday delayed the pick-up in those sales that we normally see at this time of year. The P&A piece affects Mercury more than any other unit and tight sales in this very high-margin business were responsible for some of the margin erosion we saw at Mercury. 2. In nearly all our segments, depending on the business, we saw retail activity .... as against wholesale activity, which I'll speak about in a minute .... drop by between 15% and 20% in the year-over-year quarter. This is similar to the pattern seen by retailers in most segments of the economy, though we tend to be extreme examples in both directions, ... up and down. We saw weak retail affect us as far apart as our billiards business and our Omni Fitness retail chain and across all almost all of our marine businesses. The sole exception was at US Marine, which saw strong retail sales increases year-over-year ... and I'll talk about why in a minute. So, given the sputtering economy, we are bound to still be a little cautious about near-term retail market performance, but we also believe this level of retail decline is most likely a short-term blip driven by global political events, poor weather and by SARS. Specifically, we think this level of retail falloff is unlikely to be maintained through the season and some pieces of it ... such as P&A for example ... may even catch up as the weather improves. But, in contrast, we also have to hope that the current range of negative events has not so frozen the ultimate retail consumer that we just destroyed the market for another year. 3. Overall, Mercury's results were the ones where we saw the greatest pressure this past quarter. Margin erosion at Mercury has been a challenge for us in Q1, but we need to put it in perspective. It is only our domestic US outboard business that has been impacted. At this stage, we have no reason to believe that lower P&A sales is anything other than a temporary weather and late Easter related phenomenon. Domestic Sterndrive sales were very robust in Q1 and unit volume increased by about 3% over last year. Moreover, international sales for Mercury were also good in all product segments, with sales up 17%. Domestic wholesale outboard sales fell 2% in unit terms in the year over year quarter. So our challenge here is purely a domestic outboard business related one. So what is happening here? As many of you know, so far it has been impossible for us to recover investments and higher costs in the outboard segment of our business as we shift 5
our mix from classic carbureted two-strokes to low emission direct-injected two-strokes and four-strokes. This mix shift has caused us more than a full point of margin loss. In summary, a combination of lower P&A sales, the mix shift we just mentioned, lower overall volumes, strong international growth .. which mixes us down a little, .. slower sales in the largest engines and perversely, growth in those areas where we share manufacturing with Yamaha and Tohatsu, all conspired to lower outboard margins. But we do expect it to abate somewhat when Mercury launches its new four-stroke products. These new engines will be the Ferraris and Porsches of the marine business and we expect they will trade for a premium for quite some time, benefiting not just us, but our dealers as well. Finally, beginning in the late summer of last year we also saw a flood of Japanese-made outboard engines that were brought into this country prior to the West Coast longshoremen's strike that are now flooding the market at this low point in the seasonal cycle. Moreover, we also saw a US manufacturer being forced to do similar things, ... trying very hard to sell outboard engines, ... but sometimes at huge discounts. We think that this will bleed out of the system in the next quarter or so, .... and we have corrective actions being worked on .... which I'm not going to telegraph those to the competition ...., but it certainly didn't help matters as far as our sales of outboard engines were concerned ... and we lost some domestic wholesale share along with it. To complete the picture, Brunswick New Technologies' numbers, also included in the Marine engine segment, lower margins as we absorb the start-up costs associated with new initiatives in marine electronics and engine controls, among others. We expect to be in positive territory at BNT by the end of the year. I think it is fair to say that we are unlikely to see real relief from this kind of pressure in the domestic outboard business until several things happen: - Firstly, that the economy recovers somewhat and volumes improve, - Secondly that our new four stroke product is released, and - Thirdly, that we can complete the fundamental restructuring of the cost side of this business, which Pat Mackey and his people are working on very hard as we speak. 4. Like all businesses today, we have been burdened by rapidly increasing pension, health care and insurance costs .... and it is not stopping. We estimate those factors cost us $9M in the year-over-year quarter comparisons, essentially a full point of margin. And by the way, Mercury's share alone is more than half of that cost, as Vicki said. Now for some of the counterbalancing positives that we've also seen in the market. 6
POSITIVES 1. In our boat businesses, we saw a 7% year-over-year sales increase at wholesale. While off a low base, our boat operating margins roughly quadrupled year over year from 1% to 4% and we expect that upward margin trend to continue now as the year unfolds. The good news is that, while wholesale sales, on average, are up over last year, we are still seeing wholesale sales that are slightly less than those at retail, as the last small pipeline corrections take place, here and there. We expect retail and wholesale activity to be in balance soon. Again, what is selling well are the newly styled and innovative products, especially at Sea Ray, whose sales rose 9%. And when we see a return to a more normal retail sales levels pattern, sales will grow as the pipeline fills again rapidly to respond to higher retail demand. Forecasting precisely when that will happen, however, is more difficult. 2. I am pleased to announce that in May, Mercury will release its new 3-cylinder Direct Injected OptiMax outboard engines. These are beautiful new engines sized in the 75 to 115 hp range, with fuel economy and performance even better than comparable four strokes, ours or anyone else's included. They are also lighter in weight and have better torque. They will add power in our line up to this important size segment that is growing the fastest. They will be especially important internationally where fuel costs are much higher than domestically and in off shore applications where cruising range is important. 3. Sales growth in Life Fitness continued to well outstrip the market overall, with sales up 14%. This is extremely good performance in this economy ... leading to excellent market share gains. Innovative new products are leading all this sales growth. So in toto, margin and sales increases were both in double-digit percentages, even with all the political and economic distractions we've seen in the last three months. 4. While sales in our Bowling and Billiards business fell overall by 6%, led by a decline of 8% in our bowling equipment sales, overall operating margins improved by 50 bps to a very nice 9.9%. The decline in bowling equipment sales is primarily due to construction project timing and not something we are concerned about long term. Even with everyone watching 24 hour war TV, sales in bowling retail still grew about 1%, showing great stability in these unusual times. So overall our bowling business did well. We were especially pleased to see continued operations improvements in the bowling products piece of this business, due to the ongoing efforts of Peter Hamilton and his team. 5. There was also good news at US Marine, where sales were up 4%. Wholesale unit volume was up 34% in the year over year quarters. It is no surprise that what is selling best are the small Bayliner 175 boat and the new Meridian yachts. We have already sold about 4,000 of this Bayliner entry-level model and we expect it to remain popular throughout the coming season. To us, it proves again that innovation works. 7
I can also confirm that a second slightly larger Bayliner boat in this low cost, high margin series, will be released in June, to add to the production volume in Reynosa. It is our goal to have not less than five units in this low cost high margin series by the end of 2004, which will require the building of a second new boat plant in Mexico sometime next year. Please remember that this project is not only about making and selling boats, but consider that with each one of these boats we sell an engine also. Our dealers also make lots of money on these boats. Moreover, now that we have passed break-even volume, the margins on these boats are significantly better than the ones we traditionally have made in the USA, so overall they are mixing us up in boat margins. We believe that by the end of the calendar year we will have a run rate of about 8,200 boats coming out of this one plant. 6. Currency is also finally helping us in some overseas markets, partly through translation benefits, but also by making us more price competitive here and there. Over time, that will help us drive increased volume. 7. I can also confirm that we have been able to hold the engine market share we gained overseas and that the profitability of our international operations has generally improved. The quest for us is clear; it is to continue to improve margins in an environment where we are getting absolutely no help from the economy ..... and not likely to get it for some time to come. Looking at our margins, 78% of our costs are above the gross margin line. 8
This quest for cost-led improved margins comes in three primary forms: - Firstly, in supply chain management, particularly in global procurement - Secondly, improvement in labor costs, and - Lastly, from improvements in overall productivity. We have spoken a lot about supply chain initiatives, which are now effectively controlling inflation. And there is still real inflation, in engine blocks, in energy, in resins and in steel, all of which we use lots of. But, let me say something now about manufacturing. We continue to make good progress in changing our manufacturing footprint to one that will result in progressively lower costs for our company over time. I have already mentioned the continued expansion in Mexico. Here are some others. On engine manufacturing, we are also committed to move the manufacturing of small commodity engines to Asia where we have been building capability and sourcing components for some time. We expect to have sizeable pieces of this completed in the next 12 to 18 months. In our view, we have no choice but to do this if we are to remain competitive in the small engine business. Also with regard to manufacturing, I am pleased to announce that we have signed a joint venture agreement with a new partner in Hungary to manufacture strength equipment for Life Fitness in Eastern Europe. We will be in production at a new facility there in the fall. You can imagine, because of the large cube and weight of strength equipment, that it is vital we manufacture products like this close to market. In a second move in Fitness, it is our plan to also begin manufacturing cardio-vascular equipment for the European market in Hungary later in the year. Current plans have this product being manufactured in a facility adjacent to our bowling equipment plant. Our existing bowling equipment management team will manage this new plant, thus leveraging capabilities across our divisions Turning to our marine business, we have spoken to you from time to time about growth initiatives we are planning in the boat parts and accessories business. Strategically, this fills a couple of roles. First, it is key to our goal of enveloping our dealers with products and services that will help them .... and us ... succeed. Vicki mentioned earlier another component of this strategy, Brunswick Acceptance Company, our financial services arm. Secondly, a new boat P&A business provides sales growth as well as margins that are overall accretive to our boat margins. We are currently working on two deals in this area and you should expect to hear more about them as this quarter unfolds ... so watch this space. We also continue to make great progress on the closed mold manufacturing of boats. We have now made about 1,200 boats with this process, and we have finished development and proving of our pre-form blanket process and it is now the standard method for manufacturing 9
these boats. I think you know we believe this kind of zero emissions manufacturing to be the longer-term future of boating. I'd like to say something now about the second quarter and the year as a whole. Accurate predictions about the direction of the economy remain difficult. We've even seen that kind of statement from the Federal Reserve Board, and we do not profess to have wisdom about this situation that they don't. Overall, the US economy appears to be going sideways to us. So while ever this uncertainty remains, we are going to be cautious about both our spending and our sales for a while. However, we are not expecting a meltdown of the US economy or, for that matter, of the recreational boating market either. We may not see much growth in 2003, but we are not expecting Armageddon either. On the positive side, the war in Iraq is essentially over, interest rates remain low, and may yet go lower, and the trend in fuel price is now down. All these factors will help. But world events have still clouded the picture in the near term and we think it will take some time before it clears and the positive factors I mentioned have chance to gain momentum. Confidence is the key. Until the consumer becomes more confident and increases demand for goods and services, capacity will remain underutilized and the capital spending that creates real jobs will remain depressed. Low interest rates don't help capital investment when you have excess capacity. So here is what we think we can say. Given our best assessment of the future impact of current events, we believe our EPS for the year will be in the range of $1.40 to $1.50. For the second quarter, we expect earnings will be somewhere in the band of 50 to 55 cents. To bring some more visibility to our assumptions, our financial plan always had an earnings pickup in the second half of the year. But it was not on an Alice in Wonderland "jam tomorrow" basis. Much of it was detailed cost planning led. We expected that Life Fitness would continue its good sales and earnings growth path, .... and you will recall that their big quarter is always the fourth. As we have mentioned before, we have lots of new products being released at Life Fitness this year that should help drive good sales and earnings growth. Moreover, the operational improvements at US Marine continue to gather positive momentum and again, their financial plan shows continued improvements throughout the year, with the pace picking up towards the third and fourth quarters. New model releases will help build that momentum. We intend to continue our focus on operational excellence programs and innovation. As Mercury releases its big new four-strokes in high volume next year, we believe their sales and margins will then benefit from innovation just as our other units have done. We remain focused on the things we can control and steering our ship in a way that balances short-term needs as well as long-term goals. 10
Overall though, we are expecting a reasonable year, but with lots still to do to improve our company further. Thank you for listening everyone. Now we'd like to turn the call over for questions. BRUNSWICK FIRST QUARTER 2003 CONFERENCE CALL - 4/24/03 QUESTION AND ANSWER SESSION OPERATOR: Thank you. At this time we will begin our question and answer session. If you have a question, please press star, one on your touch-tone phone. If you are using speaker equipment, you may need to lift your handset prior to pressing star, one. Should you wish to cancel your question or if your question has already been answered simply press star, two. Once again, if you have a question, please press star, one and star, two to cancel. One moment while the questions register. Our first question comes from Jill Krutick of Salomon Smith Barney. JILL KRUTICK: Thanks very much, good-morning. Could you, George, perhaps talk to us a little about Bombardier and their plan to get out of the recreation business and how that might influence your business? Secondly, I'm curious how you guys are contingency planning for SARS and what kind of steps you're taking and what you're seeing so far having an influence on your business. And finally, related to some of the P&A moves in terms of the acquisitions it seems that you're getting into some really high-tech areas like with Northstar and things of that nature. Does that put pressure on you to maintain really high-tech type products? Does that sort of put you in a different ballgame in terms of competition? Thanks a lot. GEORGE BUCKLEY: Thanks a lot, Jill. Just a few words on Bombardier. You know, obviously, the collection of markets that they participate in have been really tough for those folks up there, but it's pretty much in every segment of that business; in transportation, in airlines, and in the recreational business. You know, at one level it's sad that they have decided to exit that business. On the other hand, if you were in their dealer's shoes, you're bound to be wondering whether this was just another tempest or a typhoon or what you ought to do about it. So, I think the reality, Jill, is that there are some share gain opportunities there, properly seized and properly managed in a professional way that you can well understand that we intend to try to take advantage of. On SARS, we haven't seen a tremendous impact of SARS on our business at this moment in time. We have seen some longer-range softening in orders but only in small segments of our business. And, of course, what we hope is that the medical profession will get control of SARS. We don't know, for example if it's weather-related, is it seasonal, and if it might abate naturally or what. But clearly in the area of the Asian economy, if it goes on for much longer I think it's going to cause some bumpiness for all businesses. In the parts and accessories business we're actually very enthused about what we're doing there, and the parts and accessories business and the high-tech stuff are really a little bit different. The P&A stuff really relates to after-market service of the dealer body and our belief that it's vital for us to sort of get next-day service to these guys when a boat is out of the water, get a part 11
there quickly, or an engine is out of the water, to get a part there quickly. So that's about, it's about a service model in the after market. The moves into marine electronics, Jill, are much more about a belief that we have that the product is, the boat product is going to increasingly over time become more like cars. And so, we see ourselves and have begun to do this now designing boats that look and feel and fit together in a seamless integrated fashion, not like some sort of gigantic kit car. And so, the move toward these high-technology segments, we think, brings great added value, great competency to our company, and completes a product lineup that facilitates making a much more better product for our customers. JILL KRUTICK: Great, thanks a lot, George. GEORGE BUCKLEY: Thanks a lot, Jill. OPERATOR: Thank you. Our next question comes from Bill Lerner of Prudential Securities. BILL LERNER: Thanks, guys. Let's see, two for Vicki. One, Vicki, could you talk about what that other income of $3.6 million represents in Q1? And then number two, what do you expect to be the amount of the charge of the California Life Fitness plant closing in Q2, and is that included in your Q2 guidance? Thanks. VICKI REICH: Okay, first on the other income, that's principally joint venture income, which includes Cummins MerCruiser as well as some joint ventures in the bowling area. We're seeing some nice results there and a little bit of interest income as well with the higher cash balances. BILL LERNER: There's nothing extraordinary is, I guess, what I'm getting at? VICKI REICH: No, there's nothing extraordinary in there. BILL LERNER: Okay. VICKI REICH: And on the Paso charge, yes, it is anticipated in our estimates for the next quarter and the year. For the year it's four to five million dollars of charges that will flow through the operating earnings to complete that closure, and about a million and a half of that will come in the second quarter. BILL LERNER: Okay, thanks. OPERATOR: Thank you. Our next question comes from Joe Hovorka from Raymond James. JOE HOVORKA: Thank you. Actually, a couple quick questions. One is when do you expect the low-engine margins will get to the two-stroke margins, if ever? Secondly, the healthcare, pension cost, is that going to -- one, I think you gave a $22 million number for the 12
full-year in our last conference call. Is that still a good number and if so, would that indicate that the impact will be less for the remaining three quarters of the year than it was in the first quarter? VICKI REICH: Joe, I'll take care the healthcare, pension piece first. What we said is that pension alone, the incremental cost would be about $22 million for the year. Adding in healthcare and insurance we estimated 30 for the year. Given the first quarter experience it could be modestly more than that but, you know, its gonna be in the low 30s all combined for those three factors. GEORGE BUCKLEY: On two-strokes, Joe, I think it really is very, very hard to identify whenever, if ever, four-stroke margins are gonna get to two-stroke margins. The reality is there's a lot more cost in these products and I suspect that we've got a few counter-balancing things which are going on, Joe, as the cost-reduction efforts mature over time. We talked a little bit about this in the past. That will help lift margins. As we even build volumes in that segment it will help lift margins because we'll be able to buy better -- and leverage manufacturing better. There are even other factors, which are going on which are in a sense behind the scenes and below the water line, which are about designing all of these products in families. For example, the new Project `X' that we talked about is actually six engines in a family with 95% common parts. All of these are pieces of a puzzle that help to drive production efficiency and because of their performance they help drive pricing and margin. But I think there's -- it would be too bold to suggest that we expect those products to return to the very high margins of two-strokes. This month -- this juncture, Joe, is too soon to be able to make that kind of optimistic prediction. JOE HOVORKA: Okay, thank you. OPERATOR: Thank you. Our next question comes from Dean Gianoukos from JP Morgan. DEAN GIANOUKOS: Hi, just a couple of questions. First, can you give us the loss in US Marine and what it was at the same time last year? Can you also tell us what the overall impact of foreign exchange was? And then can you tell us what your pricing trends were like in the quarter for your boats? And then finally, can you give us a sense of what the cost-savings are on the plant you closed and given that you keep cutting costs where do you think you are, you know, versus the end game? Thanks. GEORGE BUCKLEY: You want to take any of those, Vicki? VICKI REICH: Sure, on the -- GEORGE BUCKLEY: Got foreign exchange -- VICKI REICH: Yeah, foreign exchange impact of that overall was about three, four cents on the quarter. We saw -- on the top line it was about 20 million. So, and we absorbed a lot of pain on currency in the last few years and we were glad to see it going the other way. It was actually pretty consistent with our expectations there because most of the movements occurred in the back half of last year. 13
And let me take Paso as well, on the closure there. Savings there will be about five million dollars on an annual basis so it's a very quick pay back. GEORGE BUCKLEY: Let me take the other points, if I can, Joe. Dean I mean, sorry. On pricing, in general we have not seen the kind of tough pricing that we've seen in the automotive business with one exception. We are seeing it in the outboard business, and probably likely to go on for some time. We tried to play a delicate balance of not following the pricing aggressively because when that happens, you'll never buy another outboard unless its got some big promotion on it. These sorts of programs are a little bit like ratchets. If you follow them down rapidly you could never get 'em back up. So, we always try to play a balancing act of share versus price, and recognizing if you condition the market to price promotions it's gonna be like sort of waiting for the next sale at Sears so we try to avoid that as best as we possibly can. On US Marine, the quarter-over-quarter numbers last year and this year are actually very similar. But actually what happened is we changed some methodology in our accounting. We, for example, are expensing more of the variations that we had traditionally in the past capitalized. And so, the quality of that loss is somewhat better than it was last year. DEAN GIANOUKOS: Can you just give us a number please? GEORGE BUCKLEY: Well, it's about five -- VICKI REICH: Five million dollars. DEAN GIANOUKOS: Okay, great. Thanks a lot. GEORGE BUCKLEY: Thanks. OPERATOR: Thank you. Our next question comes from Tim Conder of AG Edwards. TIM CONDER: Yes, just a couple. Vicki, could you maybe just give us your updated outlook as far as year-over-year gains in sales for boats, engines, Life Fitness, and bowling? And then, George, with Project `X', will that be introduced at the end of this season, i.e. in calendar '03? And then are you seeing any share loss in outboards due to the delay in Project `X' coming out? And then finally, and there's a follow on to the previous question with US Marine, where do you anticipate that loss for the full year being? GEORGE BUCKLEY: Good question, Tim. The full year loss is about half, in fact a little less than half what it was last year. But actually, the underlying numbers are even better than that because we re-established variable compensation this year at US Marine. So that's the US Marine situation. TIM CONDER: Somewhere around the 12 million or so, George, would be fair. GEORGE BUCKLEY: Yeah, you'll be very close to the number. On the issue of Project `X', you'll see this summer Project `X' engines in the market in low volumes. But really, where 14
they'll be Tim, is with the customer testing them to the last final refinements of the product to make sure it's absolutely bulletproof. I mean we are determined that when is engine is released it is gonna have the best quality of any engine in the world. And in answer to your question about how we see some share loss in the consequence of the delay, the answer to that question is yes in outboards domestic. And we probably will continue to see some pressure there until that engine is released in high volume in the next year. VICKI REICH: And Tim, to your question on the outlook for the year and sales by segments, no changes to our outlook for the bowling and fitness businesses. So, in bowling still expecting low single-digit, top-line growth. Fitness, high-single digits, maybe 10% and good margin improvement will continue in both of those segments. On the marine side we're somewhat more cautious than we were initially just given the slow start at retail. At this stage of the game, what we'd say is that, sales growth would be in the lower-mid-single-digit range, and the key there is going to be retail activity in the pivotal second quarter, and also as we head into the second half, dealer confidence around stocking for the 2004 boating season. TIM CONDER: So, just to clarify Vicki, for both boats and engines, each in the low single digits? VICKI REICH: Yes. TIM CONDER: Okay, thank you. OPERATOR: Thank you. Our next question comes from Joe Yurman of Bear Stearns. JOE YURMAN: Hey, guys. GEORGE BUCKLEY: Morning, Joe. JOE YURMAN: A couple here this morning, getting back to the question that was raised about margin in the engine business. Is this a short-term phenomenon, George, or do you think that the days of mid-double digit op margins in the engine business are gone and we should start to think about this, given more the investment in electronics as well as maybe heightened regulation is bringing margins in this segment of your business down to, let's say, below double-digit? That's my first question. Second, curious which models you're currently manufacturing with the MIT technology, and I would imagine the volumes are still too low to see the benefit of that beginning to show up in the operating margin. But if you could just comment on that. And then maybe lastly just talking about the guidance and how you've tightened the top end of the range that you offered for the full-year by about ten cents. And I'm just wondering if this is solely a function of kind of just being more conservative based upon your ability to sell in here in the high season, or are there dial-back plans on selling in Project `X' given some of the uncertainties in the outboard market demand too because of what's going on at Bombardier as well as some of the other Japanese competitors? 15
VICKI REICH: Let's see, starting with the outlook on the year, it's really a function of the economy and what we saw in the first quarter more than anything that's causing us to take our guidance stance at the lower-end of the range. You know, first quarter retail and marine isn't all that critical but, on the other hand, it's setting a trend here going into the second quarter that gives us pause, and frankly, causes us to spend more on marketing and promotions and being more aggressive in a tougher marketplace. So, our outlook just reflects that kind of difficult market conditions in the marine segment. GEORGE BUCKLEY: On your question, Joe, on the MIT technology, it's in the early 20s, 23, 24-foot Sea Ray boats is where it is being used at this moment. On your question on engine margin -- (PAUSE) OPERATOR: Please stand by. (PAUSE) OPERATOR: Okay, Mr. Yurman is disconnected. Our next question from Burke Koonce of Merrill Lynch. VICKI REICH: Hi, Burke. BURKE KOONCE: Great, thanks. Most of my questions have been answered. I'll go over maintenance stuff. What was cap ex for the quarter? And then, if you could just talk about what, I guess my typical question - plant production capacity levels. VICKI REICH: Capital spending in the quarter was 20 million and in terms of capacity utilization we're still running pretty low, Burke, we're still in the mid 70s. BURKE KOONCE: Okay. All right, I appreciate it, thank you. KATHRYN CHIEGER: I think we've come to the end of our time limit here. I want to thank everybody for participating in our call, and if you have any follow-up questions please give us a call. Thank you very much. OPERATOR: Thank you for participating in today's call, and have a good day. 16


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20030515090859.txt.gz
TIME:20030515090859
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
================================================================================ SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 -------------------- FORM 8-K Current Report Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): MAY 15, 2003 -------------------- BRUNSWICK CORPORATION (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) DELAWARE 001-01043 36-0848180 (State or other jurisdiction of (Commission File (IRS Employer incorporation or organization) Number) Identification No.) 1 N. FIELD COURT LAKE FOREST, IL 60045-4811 (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700 N/A (Former name or former address, if changed since last report) -------------------- ================================================================================
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS. (c) Exhibits. EXHIBIT NUMBER DESCRIPTION OF EXHIBIT -------------- ---------------------- 99.1 Press Release, dated May 15, 2003, of Brunswick Corporation, announcing patent suit negotiations ITEM 9. REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE (INFORMATION IS BEING PROVIDED UNDER ITEM 12). On May 15, 2003, Brunswick Corporation issued a Press Release announcing the establishment by the Company of a $25 million litigation reserve in connection with ongoing negotiations regarding a patent suit. The Press Release is incorporated herein by reference, and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K. The information furnished under "Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure" is intended to be furnished under "Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition" in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-8216. The information in this Form 8-K and the exhibits attached hereto shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
SIGNATURE Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. Dated: May 15, 2003 Brunswick Corporation By: /s/ Victoria J. Reich ------------------------------------ Victoria J. Reich Chief Financial Officer
INDEX TO EXHIBITS 99.1 Press Release, dated May 15, 2003, of Brunswick Corporation, announcing patent suit negotiations

[BRUNSWICK LETTERHEAD] NEWS RELEASE Release: IMMEDIATE Contact: Kathryn Chieger Vice President - Corporate and Investor Relations Phone: (847) 735-4612 LIFE FITNESS IN NEGOTIATIONS TO RESOLVE PATENT SUIT LAKE FOREST, ILL., MAY 15, 2003 -- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that its Life Fitness Division has been in negotiations regarding a potential settlement of a lawsuit with Precor, a manufacturer of fitness equipment. The lawsuit involves a dispute over patent rights held by Precor relating to the design of a cross trainer. Although the parties have not reached a final settlement of the lawsuit, in light of developments in connection with the negotiations, the company decided in May 2003 to establish a $25 million reserve related to the potential resolution of the litigation. The provision related to this reserve will be included in the financial statements to be issued with the company's quarterly report on Form 10-Q to be filed today. As a result of this reserve, the company will report 2003 first quarter net earnings of $3.8 million, or $0.04 per diluted share. Previously, the company had reported net earnings of $19.8 million, or $0.22 per diluted share, for the first quarter. Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation is a manufacturer and marketer of leading consumer brands including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian and Sealine pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Princecraft fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; and Brunswick billiards tables. (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION COMPARATIVE CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME (in millions, except per share data) (unaudited) (1) Operating earnings in the first quarter of 2003 include a $25.0 million litigation charge in connection with a patent infringement lawsuit relating to the design of a cross-trainer. (2) The Company adopted SFAS No. 142, effective Jan. 1, 2002 NM = Not Meaningful (more)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION SELECTED FINANCIAL INFORMATION (in millions) (unaudited) SEGMENT INFORMATION (1) Fitness segment operating earnings include a $25.0 million litigation charge in the quarter ended March 31, 2003, in connection with a patent infringement lawsuit relating to the design of a cross-trainer. NM = Not Meaningful (more)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION COMPARATIVE CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS (in millions) (MORE)
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION COMPARATIVE CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS (in millions) (unaudited) # # #


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20030723172534.txt.gz
TIME:20030723172534
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
Table of Contents
Item 7.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Table of Contents
(c)  Exhibits.
Item 9.  Regulation FD Disclosure (Information is Being Provided Under Item 12).
On July 23, 2003, Brunswick Corporation announced its second quarter 2003 earnings. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference, and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a "non-GAAP financial measure" is a numerical measure of a registrant's historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of the definition, GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States. Pursuant to the requirements of Regulation G, Brunswick has included, as a part of the news release, a reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswick's management believes that these measures  including those that are "non-GAAP financial measures"  and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswick's performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswick's ongoing business performance. Brunswick's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "Free Cash Flow" is also useful to investors because it is an indication of amounts of cash flow that may be available for further investment in future growth initiatives. In addition, Brunswick's management believes that presentation of 2003 operating earnings and earnings per share excluding a first quarter 2003 litigation charge provides a more meaningful comparison to prior period results.
The information furnished under "Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure" is intended to be furnished under "Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition" in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-8216. The exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: July 23, 2003
Table of Contents

 
      Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today a 16 percent increase in net earnings on a 5 percent sales gain and a 12 percent increase in operating earnings in the second quarter of 2003. Diluted earnings per share rose to $0.59 compared with $0.51 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2002.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 23, 2003
     Commenting on the announcement, Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley said, "Overall we had a very good second quarter with strong sales from the Brunswick Boat Group, which were up 12 percent, leading the way. We also achieved higher sales of marine engines in international markets, domestic commercial fitness equipment and from our retail bowling centers. The sales gain also reflects the impact of a weaker U.S. dollar. The benefit of higher boat sales, coupled with our ongoing cost reduction efforts across all of our business units, is evident in the 12 percent increase in operating earnings in the quarter. These factors helped offset the higher pension expense and health care costs we continue to experience. Operating margins improved to 8.1 percent from 7.7 percent a year ago."
     "During the quarter we completed three acquisitions that are significant to our growth strategy," Buckley noted. "The purchase of Valley-Dynamo, the leading manufacturer of coin-operated pool, table hockey and foosball tables, will give us a line of new products and a strong position in a new distribution channel. Valley-Dynamo is also the leader in home table hockey and foosball tables, which are sold through
 
Brunswick Corporation July 23, 2003 Page 2 of 12
specialty retailers, as are Brunswick's billiards tables. The Brunswick Boat Group's goal of building a dedicated boat parts and accessories (P&A) business will be aided by the acquisition of Land N' Sea, the largest distributor of marine P&A in North America. We also purchased 70 percent of Navman, the New Zealand-based maker of global positioning system-based products, which will further support our efforts to more fully integrate marine electronics into our boats. These companies will benefit from Brunswick's financial and market strengths, as well as our industry expertise. They, in turn, will help fuel our growth across the board."
Second-Quarter Results
     For the quarter ended June 30, 2003, the company reported net sales of $1,071.0 million, up 5 percent from $1,017.2 million a year earlier. Operating earnings rose to $87.2 million, up 12 percent from $77.9 million, and operating margins reached 8.1 percent versus 7.7 percent a year ago. Net earnings totaled $53.6 million, or $0.59 per diluted share, up 16 percent from $46.2 million, or $0.51 per diluted share, in the year-ago second quarter.
     During the second quarter, the company made a $62 million payment (approximately $50 million after tax) to the Internal Revenue Service relating to a tax case that is currently under appeal. The company elected to make the payment to avoid accruing future interest costs. Consequently, the company lowered its effective tax rate to 35 percent from 36 percent.
Six-Month Results
     For the six months ended June 30, 2003, the company had net sales of $2,005.5 million, up 6 percent from $1,883.9 million for the first half of 2002. Operating earnings reached $100.2 million for the first half of 2003, which includes a $25 million litigation charge recorded in the first quarter of 2003. Excluding the litigation charge, operating earnings were up 16 percent to $125.2 million in the first half of 2003 from $108.2 million for the same period a year ago. Net earnings for the first six months of 2003 reached $57.4 million, or $0.63 per diluted share, including the aforementioned litigation charge, which is equivalent to $0.18 per diluted share. Excluding the litigation
 
Brunswick Corporation July 23, 2003 Page 3 of 12
charge, earnings for the first half of 2003 totaled $0.81 per diluted share. Net earnings for the year-ago period totaled $34.3 million, or $0.38 per diluted share. Included in the 2002 results is the cumulative effect of adoption of Financial Accounting Standards Board SFAS No. 142, "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets." Adoption of this accounting standard resulted in a non-cash, after-tax charge of $25.1 million, or $0.28 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2002.
Marine Engine Segment
     The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group and Brunswick New Technologies (BNT), reported net sales of $521.9 million in the second quarter of 2003, up 3 percent from $505.8 million in the year-ago second quarter. Strong international sales and recent acquisitions offset the decline in domestic sales. Operating earnings in the second quarter were $64.2 million versus $77.8 million a year ago. Operating margins were 12.3 percent compared with 15.4 percent in the second quarter of 2002.
     "Sales benefited from a strong performance in international markets, which were up 22 percent in the quarter," Buckley noted. "By contrast, the U.S. outboard market remains challenging as many of our competitors continue to offer deep discounts. We lowered production to keep inventories in balance and ended the quarter with 19 weeks of supply of engines in the pipeline, the same as last year. The lower production volumes and shifts in product mix to low-emission outboards, along with higher pension and health care costs and investments in BNT, are the primary drivers behind the margin decline. We are beginning to see the impact of cost reduction actions taken in the second quarter, which will be even more evident in the second half of the year."
     "We continue to focus on new product development, and the technology transition from traditional carbureted two-stroke outboard engines to low-emission direct fuel injected (DFI) two-stroke and four-stroke products," Buckley added. "We recently introduced a new 115-horsepower OptiMax DFI two-stroke and our Project "X" high-horsepower four-stroke outboard is on track for a spring 2004 launch. These products will further enhance our position in this important segment."
 
Brunswick Corporation July 23, 2003 Page 4 of 12
Boat Segment
     The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and includes the Sea Ray, Bayliner, Meridian, Maxum, Sealine, Hatteras, Boston Whaler, Trophy, Baja and Princecraft boat brands. The Boat segment reported sales for the second quarter of $418.9 million, up 12 percent compared with $373.3 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings rose to $32.3 million, nearly triple the $11.0 million reported for the corresponding period last year. Operating margins in the second quarter improved to 7.7 percent from 2.9 percent a year ago.
     "Nearly all of our boat brands posted strong sales growth in the quarter, with new products doing particularly well," Buckley commented. "Retail markets remain challenging, especially in the larger boat segments; however, we continue to see good demand for our entry-level Bayliner 175 runabout, and new models from Sea Ray, Sealine and Boston Whaler. Higher volumes and global sourcing efforts, along with significant improvements at our US Marine division, are driving improvement in operating earnings and operating margins."
     "As we enter the 2004 model year, field inventories remain in excellent shape at 22 weeks of supply compared with 23 weeks a year ago. This is right where we want to be going into the seasonally-slower second half of the year," Buckley explained.
Fitness Segment
     The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness division, which manufacturers and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment, and operates Omni Fitness retail stores. Segment sales in the second quarter of 2003 totaled $105.1 million, up 1 percent from $103.6 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings rose 33 percent to $5.3 million from $4.0 million, and operating margins were 5.0 percent, up from 3.9 percent in the second quarter of 2002.
     "Life Fitness sales in the domestic commercial segment were up double digits in the second quarter with increases coming primarily from the regional health club and military markets," Buckley said. "This strong performance helped offset weakness in international markets, as well as lower retail sales. We are beginning to see some
 
Brunswick Corporation July 23, 2003 Page 5 of 12
signs of improvement in Asian markets, where SARS had virtually shut down health clubs and delayed expansion plans among clubs and hotel chains. Life Fitness continues to improve on its market-leading position with an onslaught of new product introductions, many of which include integrated electronics and features to enhance the users' experience. We are poised to fully benefit as the negative effects of these market conditions eventually subside."
Bowling & Billiards Segment
     The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, table hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the second quarter of 2003 totaled $94.1 million, down 2 percent compared with $95.7 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings were $1.9 million in the quarter versus an operating loss of $1.7 million in the comparable quarter in 2002. Segment operating margins improved to 2.0 percent in the second quarter compared with a negative 1.8 percent in the second quarter a year ago. Margins are historically low in the second and third quarters due to lower seasonal activity in retail bowling.
     "Our retail bowling business recorded improved sales demonstrating the stability and resiliency of this business even during challenging economic times," Buckley said. "Sales of bowling and billiards products were down quarter-over-quarter, as proprietors and distributors continued to take a wait-and-see attitude toward the economy. Cost reduction efforts and supply chain initiatives implemented over the past two years throughout this segment were major contributors to the improvement in operating earnings in the quarter."
Looking Ahead
     Commenting on the current year, Buckley said, "We remain on track to meet our earnings expectations for 2003. While the outlook remains mixed, consumers appear to believe the economy is stabilizing. We're not predicting an upturn, but we're not expecting conditions to worsen. When we look at current marine market conditions, the low pipeline inventories, new products scheduled for launch, along with a few cents
 
Brunswick Corporation July 23, 2003 Page 6 of 12
contributed from recent acquisitions and a lower effective tax rate, we are more comfortable that we can hit the higher end of our previously indicated range of $1.40 to $1.50 per diluted share for 2003, excluding the $0.18 per share litigation charge taken in the first quarter. Therefore, we are narrowing our EPS estimate to $1.45 to $1.50, compared with $1.14 reported for 2002. This would indicate earnings for the third quarter of between $0.35 and $0.40 per diluted share versus $0.26 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2002."
Forward-Looking Statements
     Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this release. These risks include, but are not limited to, the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus on demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling products; the impact of interest rates, fuel prices and weather conditions on demand for marine products; the ability to maintain effective distribution; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the financial strength of dealers and independent boat builders; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; adverse foreign economic conditions; shifts in currency exchange rates; the effect of weak financial markets on pension expense and funding levels; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the success of global sourcing and supply chain management initiatives; the company's ability to develop and produce new products; new and competing technologies; and imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors. Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2002 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003.
 
Brunswick Corporation July 23, 2003 Page 7 of 12
About Brunswick
     Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian and Sealine pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Princecraft fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Land N' Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, table hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.
 
Brunswick Corporation July 23, 2003 Page 8 of 12
(in millions, except per share data) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
 
Brunswick Corporation July 23, 2003 Page 9 of 12
(in millions, except per share data) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
 
Brunswick Corporation July 23, 2003 Page 10 of 12
(in millions) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Selected Financial Information
Segment Information
NM = Not Meaningful
 
Brunswick Corporation July 23, 2003 Page 11 of 12
(in millions)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
Brunswick Corporation July 23, 2003 Page 12 of 12
(in millions) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
Free cash flow is defined as cash flow from operating and investing activities, excluding acquisition and financing activities.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20030818171244.txt.gz
TIME:20030818171244
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
Item 5. Other Events
     On August 18, 2003, Brunswick Corporation announced the formation of a new operating unit, Brunswick Europe, and the election by Brunswick's Board of Directors of Ms. Victoria J. Reich to the position of President, Brunswick Europe, from Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Peter G. Leemputte has been promoted to Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer from Vice President and Controller. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing the promotions is incorporated herein by reference, and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
     (c)  Exhibits.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
     Dated: August 18, 2003
 

 
      Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that Victoria J. Reich has been elected president of Brunswick Europe, a new operating unit. She most recently was senior vice president and chief financial officer for Brunswick. Peter G. Leemputte, the company's vice president and controller, has been promoted to senior vice president and chief financial officer, replacing Reich. The promotions are effective immediately and both Reich and Leemputte will report to Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, George W. Buckley.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Aug. 18, 2003
     "Brunswick's international business continues to expand at a healthy pace, with annual sales in continental Europe and the United Kingdom alone now exceeding $550 million," Buckley explained. "Vicki will initially focus on developing a strategy to grow our various European marine businesses, shared services initiatives, support for the European investor community and pursuing merger and acquisition opportunities across all businesses. An experienced and accomplished executive, Vicki will bring her estimable skills to bear on this challenge. Her solid track record of performance and improvement speaks for itself and is a harbinger of what lies ahead for Brunswick's fortunes in Europe."
     Reich was elected senior vice president and chief financial officer in February 2000 after joining Brunswick in December 1996 as vice president and controller. Previously, she had held a variety of financial leadership positions during her 17-year
 
Brunswick Corporation August 18, 2003 Page 2 of 3
career with the General Electric Company. Reich, 45, earned a bachelor of science degree in applied mathematics and economics from Brown University.
     At Brunswick, Reich has vigorously upgraded the finance function to enhance controllership, resource allocation, talent development, capital structure/financing and financial communications. She has provided financial leadership to strategic initiatives, including shared services, financial services, numerous acquisitions, divestitures and business restructuring actions. She also is responsible for introducing Brunswick Value Added as the measurement system used by the company to help make investment decisions and set variable compensation targets.
Leemputte to Chief Financial Officer
     Succeeding Reich as senior vice president and chief financial officer is Peter G. Leemputte. Since joining Brunswick as vice president and controller in January 2001, he has expanded the company's capabilities in the financial planning, analysis and audit functions, and enhanced the acquisitions and financial review processes.
     "Pete has strengthened the rigor and diligence of the control function while providing excellent analysis and insights to improve the operations of the business," Buckley said. "Under his leadership, Pete has ensured stringent financial discipline is instilled in all of our processes company-wide. His broad-based financial experience in both the domestic and international markets makes him ideally suited to lead the control, treasury, tax, audit, communications and financial services functions.
     Prior to joining Brunswick, Leemputte was executive vice president and chief financial officer for Chicago Title Corporation, a publicly traded national service provider offering residential and commercial title insurance and real estate-related products. Before joining Chicago Title in 1998, Leemputte was a vice president with Mercer Management Consulting in Chicago where he was a partner in the firm's global practice covering strategy and operational studies within process industries. His career also includes domestic and international financial assignments with Armco Inc., FMC
 
Brunswick Corporation August 18, 2003 Page 3 of 3
Corporation and BP Amoco. He also served as a product development engineer with the Proctor & Gamble Company.
     Leemputte, 46, holds an MBA from the University of Chicago Graduate School of Business. He received his bachelor of science degree in chemical engineering from Washington University in St. Louis, Mo.
About Brunswick
     Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Navman GPS-based products; Northstar marine electronics; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian and Sealine pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Princecraft fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Land N' Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, table hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20031024060120.txt.gz
TIME:20031024060120
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits.
Item 12. Regulation FD Disclosure.
On October 24, 2003, Brunswick Corporation announced its third quarter 2003 financial results. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a "non-GAAP financial measure" is a numerical measure of a registrant's historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of the definition, GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States. Pursuant to the requirements of Regulation G, Brunswick has included, as a part of the news release, a reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswick's management believes that these measures  including those that are "non-GAAP financial measures"  and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswick's performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswick's ongoing business performance. Brunswick's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "free cash flow" is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. In addition, Brunswick's management believes that presentation of 2003 operating earnings and earnings per share excluding a first quarter 2003 litigation charge provides a more meaningful comparison to prior results. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. This quarter, in order to indicate more precisely the cash flow available to fund investment in future growth initiatives, the company has changed its definition of free cash flow to exclude the impact of investments.
The information in this Current Report on Form 8-K is furnished under "Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition" in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-8216. The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in
Table of Contents
any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: October 24, 2003
Table of Contents

 
      Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today a 58 percent increase in diluted earnings per share on a 15 percent sales gain and a 32 percent increase in operating earnings in the third quarter of 2003. Diluted earnings per share rose to $0.41 compared with $0.26 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2002.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Oct. 24, 2003
     "Our results in the quarter reflect the success of our efforts to solidify the operating performance of our core businesses and leverage the capabilities in our marine units as well as the benefit of recent acquisitions," said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley. "Improved marine market conditions were also a plus. Due in part to a more stable economy, the pickup in retail demand for boats that began toward the end of the second quarter continued into the third, leading to higher wholesale shipments. While wholesale shipments increased, pipeline inventories remain in very good shape and are unchanged from a year ago at 16 weeks of supply for engines and 21 weeks of supply for boats. Acquisitions also played a significant role in the 15 percent sales gain in the quarter. Contributions from recent purchases, primarily Land N' Sea and Navman NZ Limited, accounted for just over half of the increase in sales."
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 24, 2003 Page 2 of 12
     "Meanwhile, overall operating margins improved by 70 basis points to 6.0 percent, benefiting from higher boat sales, and our efforts to relentlessly reduce costs across all of our business units," Buckley added. "Our strong results for the quarter are also reflected in our balance sheet, which shows debt-to-total capital at 33.3 percent at the end of the third quarter compared with 35.9 percent at the end of 2002. Through the first three quarters of 2003, we generated $214.8 million of free cash flow after capital expenditures of $93.7 million."
Third-Quarter Results
     For the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2003, the company reported net sales of $1,036.3 million, up 15 percent from $900.0 million a year earlier. Operating earnings rose to $62.5 million, up 32 percent from $47.3 million, and operating margins reached 6.0 percent versus 5.3 percent a year ago. In addition to the higher sales, the company said that effective cost management throughout the organization is reflected in the improved operating leverage and helped offset a $7 million increase in pension, health care and insurance costs compared with the third quarter a year ago. Further, the company said that joint venture and interest income added approximately $6 million to pre-tax earnings in the third quarter. Net earnings totaled $37.9 million, or $0.41 per diluted share, up from $23.6 million, or $0.26 per diluted share, in the year-ago third quarter.
Nine-Month Results
     For the nine months ended Sept. 30, 2003, the company had net sales of $3,041.8 million, up 9 percent from $2,783.9 million for the first nine months of 2002. Operating earnings reached $162.7 million for the first three quarters of 2003, which includes a $25 million litigation charge recorded in the first quarter of this year. Excluding the litigation charge, operating earnings were up nearly 21 percent to $187.7 million in the first nine months of 2003 from $155.5 million for the same period a year ago. Net earnings for the first three quarters of 2003 were $95.3 million, or $1.04 per diluted share, which includes the aforementioned litigation charge ($0.18 per diluted share). Excluding the litigation charge, earnings for the first nine months of
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 24, 2003 Page 3 of 12
2003 totaled $1.22 per diluted share. Net earnings for the year-ago period totaled $57.9 million, or $0.64 per diluted share. The cumulative effect of adoption of Financial Accounting Standards Board SFAS No. 142, "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets" is included in the 2002 results. Adoption of this accounting standard resulted in a non-cash, after-tax charge of $25.1 million, or $0.28 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2002.
Marine Engine Segment
     The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group and Brunswick New Technologies (BNT), reported net sales of $500.8 million in the third quarter of 2003, up 18 percent from $426.2 million in the year-ago third quarter. Segment sales growth in the quarter was driven by acquisitions completed for BNT and continued strong performance in Mercury's international markets. Excluding incremental sales from acquisitions, segment sales in the quarter increased 11 percent. Segment operating earnings in the third quarter increased 18 percent to $60.9 million, and operating margins improved slightly to 12.2 percent compared with 12.1 percent in the third quarter of 2002.
     "Mercury's international sales were up sharply in Europe and Asia, reflecting higher shipments of sterndrive engines and parts and accessories as well as the benefit from the weaker U.S. dollar," Buckley noted. "On the domestic front, Mercury's sales increased 4 percent in the quarter, driven by higher sales of sterndrive engines and an improving trend for outboard engines, which were up slightly versus the year-ago quarter. We also saw a rebound in sales of parts and accessories in the third quarter compared with the first half of the year when cold weather delayed the start of the boating season in the United States and P&A sales dropped 10 percent."
     "The slight uptick in operating margins in the quarter demonstrates the benefit of cost-cutting measures taken in the first half of this year, which are offsetting shifts in product mix, higher pension, health care and insurance costs and recent investments in BNT," Buckley added.
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 24, 2003 Page 4 of 12
Boat Segment
     The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and includes the Sea Ray, Bayliner, Meridian, Maxum, Sealine, Hatteras, Boston Whaler, Trophy, Baja and Princecraft boat brands. The Boat segment reported sales for the third quarter of $404.5 million, up 21 percent compared with $333.9 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings rose to $8.2 million from $0.2 million reported for the corresponding period last year. Operating margins in the third quarter improved to 2.0 percent from 0.1 percent a year ago.
     "Our boat brands had a very good quarter, producing 10 percent sales growth with improvements reported by nearly all of our product lines. Sales of Bayliner runabouts and Sea Ray sport boats were especially strong. In particular, we are very encouraged by the success of our Bayliner 175, which is driving significant share gains in the runabout category," Buckley said. "Incremental sales from the recently acquired Land N' Sea and Attwood marine parts and accessories businesses accounted for the balance of the Boat segment's healthy sales gain."
     "US Marine, manufacturer of our Bayliner, Meridian, Maxum and Trophy brands, had a solid quarter reducing losses in the division to half of what they were a year ago and making good progress toward returning to profitability, which we expect to occur next year," Buckley added. "Improvements at US Marine, cost management efforts across the Boat Group, higher boat sales along with contributions from the acquisitions resulted in the increase in operating margins in the quarter."
Fitness Segment
     The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment, and operates Omni Fitness retail stores. Segment sales in the third quarter of 2003 totaled $105.1 million, down 3 percent from $108.7 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings declined 10 percent to $8.7 million from $9.7 million, and operating margins were 8.3 percent, down from 8.9 percent in the third quarter of 2002.
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 24, 2003 Page 5 of 12
     "Life Fitness' equipment sales in the quarter were up 4 percent in the United States and up double digits in most international markets. These gains, however, were more than offset by lower sales in Europe," Buckley said. "This was primarily due to a slowdown in equipment purchases by many of the larger health club chains that are undergoing financial restructurings following a period of rapid expansion. While this has reduced our expected growth rates in the near term, we believe the European market will return to more normal growth patterns toward the end of next year. In the quarter, we made an important investment in a Hungarian strength equipment manufacturer that will not only allow us to reduce costs, but also significantly reduce delivery times, which should help improve sales in the long run. Producing equipment closer to our European customers will result in shorter lead times, lower freight costs and the ability to respond more quickly to changes in the marketplace."
     "New products coming out this year, including our new Signature Strength Series, have been very well received by our customers," Buckley noted. "Meeting this high demand has proved challenging for our Ramsey, Minn., plant as it ramps up production of the new strength product lines. With consolidation of strength equipment manufacturing in Ramsey, we plan to close our Paso Robles, Calif., plant by next March. In the meantime, costs associated with closing the plant and production inefficiencies during the consolidation are impacting operating margins."
Bowling & Billiards Segment
     The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, air hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the third quarter of 2003 totaled $97.5 million, up 10 percent compared with $88.7 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings were $0.1 million in the quarter versus break-even performance in the comparable quarter in 2002.
     "The sales gain for the segment was primarily driven by the recent acquisition of Valley-Dynamo, which is performing right on plan, as well as higher sales from retail bowling centers," Buckley said.
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 24, 2003 Page 6 of 12
     "During the third quarter, which is the slowest season for our retail bowling centers, we invested in upgrading our time and labor management system and in training our center managers on its application. The cost of these activities and other efforts to enhance the productivity of our retail operations, along with higher pension expense in the bowling products unit, affected segment operating earnings and margins in the quarter. In addition to the contribution from Valley-Dynamo, operating earnings benefited from ongoing efficiency gains in bowling products," Buckley explained.
Looking Ahead
     "Our results for 2003 continue to track with our expectations," Buckley said. "When we look at the fourth quarter and consider marine market conditions, the low level of marine pipeline inventories, our dealers' purchase commitments, the couple of cents we'll get from recent acquisitions and a lower effective tax rate, we estimate earnings between $0.28 and $0.33 per diluted share in the quarter versus $0.22 last year. Excluding the $0.18 per share litigation charge taken in the first quarter, this would bring diluted EPS for the year to $1.50 to $1.55, slightly above our previously indicated range of $1.45 to $1.50 and compared with $1.14 reported for 2002."
Forward-Looking Statements
     Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this release. These risks include, but are not limited to, the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus on demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; the impact of interest rates, fuel prices and weather conditions on demand for marine products; the ability to develop and produce new products and technologies; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the ability to maintain effective distribution; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the success of
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 24, 2003 Page 7 of 12
marketing and cost management programs; the ability to maintain or increase market share; the financial strength of dealers and independent boat builders; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; adverse foreign economic conditions; shifts in currency exchange rates; the effect of weak financial markets on pension expense and funding levels; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the success of global sourcing and supply chain management initiatives; the ability to maintain good relationships with its labor unions; competition from new technologies; possible increases in tariffs on the company's boat and bowling equipment sales into Europe; and imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors. Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2002 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2003.
About Brunswick
     
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian and Sealine pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Princecraft fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, air hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 24, 2003 Page 8 of 12
(in millions, except per share data) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 24, 2003 Page 9 of 12
 
(in millions, except per share data) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 24, 2003 Page 10 of 12
 
(in millions) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Selected Financial Information
Segment Information
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 24, 2003 Page 11 of 12
 
(in millions)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 24, 2003 Page 12 of 12
 
(in millions) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Cash Flow


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20040115161751.txt.gz
TIME:20040115161751
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On January 15, 2004, Brunswick Corporation announced new earnings estimates for the fourth quarter of 2003 and the full year. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing these estimated earnings is incorporated herein by reference, and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
      Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today it will report earnings estimated to be between $0.40 and $0.43 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2003 and between $1.62 and $1.65 per diluted share for the year. Previously, the company had estimated diluted earnings per share in the range of $0.28 to $0.33 for the fourth quarter and $1.50 to $1.55 for the year. The full-year estimates exclude an $0.18 per diluted share litigation charge taken in the first quarter of 2003.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Jan. 15, 2004
     The company said that continued strong sales and earnings growth from its Marine Engine, Boat, Fitness and Bowling & Billiards segments, along with the foreign exchange impact of the weakening U.S. dollar and a lower effective tax rate, were the primary drivers behind the better-than-expected results for the quarter.
     Brunswick will release its fourth quarter 2003 financial earnings results on Thursday, Jan. 29, 2004, before the market opens. The company will hold a conference call at 10 a.m. CST that same day, which will be hosted by George W. Buckley, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter G. Leemputte, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Kathryn J. Chieger, vice president - corporate and investor relations.
     The call also will be broadcast over the Internet and can be accessed at www.brunswick.com. To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 15, 2004 Page 2 of 2
     Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (888) 283-3870 and ask to be connected to the Brunswick call. Callers outside of North America should call 1 (773) 756-4631 to be connected. These numbers can be accessed as early as 25 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call. A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CST Friday, Feb. 6, 2004, by calling (800) 839-2380. The replay will also be available at www.brunswick.com.
About Brunswick
      
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian and Sealine pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Princecraft fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, air hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
TM
www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20040129084843.txt.gz
TIME:20040129084843
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c)  Exhibits.
Item 12. Results of Operation and Financial Condition.
On January 29, 2004, Brunswick Corporation announced its fourth quarter and 2003 financial results. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a "non-GAAP financial measure" is a numerical measure of a registrant's historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of the definition, GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States. Pursuant to the requirements of Regulation G, Brunswick has included, as a part of the news release, a reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswick's management believes that these measures  including those that are "non-GAAP financial measures"  and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswick's performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswick's ongoing business performance. Brunswick's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "free cash flow" is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswick's management believes that presentation of 2003 operating earnings, operating margins and earnings per share excluding a first quarter 2003 litigation charge, and presentation of 2003 sales excluding acquisitions, provides a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: January 29, 2004
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
      Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today net earnings of $39.9 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2003, nearly double net earnings of $20.5 million, or $0.22 per diluted share, for the year-ago quarter. The company said the 95 percent increase in net earnings came on a 17 percent increase in sales and a 43 percent improvement in operating earnings.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Jan. 29, 2004
     Commenting on the quarter, Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley said, "We reported an excellent fourth quarter, and we are very pleased with the performance of all of our business units. Each of our operating segments  Marine Engine, Boat, Fitness and Bowling & Billiards  reported double-digit sales growth for the quarter. These results reflect the success of our strategy to develop and introduce new products and technologies that inspire and excite our customers, as well as the benefit of acquisitions and the impact of a weaker U.S. dollar. Excluding acquisitions, net sales for the quarter were up 10 percent. Ongoing effective cost management efforts contributed to the increase in operating earnings and a 100 basis point improvement in operating margins to 5.4 percent."
     "We enter 2004 with our balance sheet in excellent shape, largely due to our ability to generate significant free cash flow. Good working capital management combined with the increase in earnings resulted in $240 million of free cash flow for the year after capital expenditures of $160 million. Debt-to-total capital at year end was 31.5 percent compared with 35.9 percent a year earlier, providing us the financial
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 2 of 14
flexibility to seek out opportunities to continue to improve and grow our business," Buckley said.
Fourth Quarter Results
     For the quarter ended Dec. 31, 2003, the company reported that net sales increased 17 percent to $1,086.9 million, up from $928.0 million a year earlier. Sales in the fourth quarter of 2003 benefited from higher volumes, improved performance at the company's US Marine division, the impact of a weaker U.S. dollar and incremental sales from acquisitions that were not in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings rose to $58.7 million compared with $41.1 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins improved to 5.4 percent from 4.4 percent. In addition to the higher sales, the company said that effective cost management throughout the organization led to the improved operating leverage and helped offset a $7 million increase in pension and health-care costs compared with the year-ago fourth quarter. Other income, consisting primarily of earnings from joint ventures and equity investments as well as interest income, contributed $5.9 million of pre-tax earnings in the fourth quarter of 2003 versus $1.8 million in the fourth quarter a year ago.
     Net earnings totaled $39.9 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, up from $20.5 million, or $0.22 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2002. Net earnings in the fourth quarter of 2003 also benefited from a lower effective tax rate. The company said its effective tax rate for the year was reduced to 32.75 percent from 35 percent through the first three quarters of 2003. To make the cumulative adjustment for the year, the effective tax rate in the fourth quarter was 26.7 percent compared with 36.1 percent in the year-ago quarter. The company was able to reduce its effective tax rate in large part due to the prepayment of taxes related to an outstanding IRS case and higher international earnings that were taxed at rates lower than domestic rates.
2003 Results
     For the year ended Dec. 31, 2003, the company had net sales of $4,128.7 million, up 11 percent from $3,711.9 million in 2002. All business segments contributed
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 3 of 14
to the company's good performance for the year, along with the benefit of acquisitions. Excluding acquisitions, net sales were up 8 percent. Operating earnings reached $221.4 million for the year, which includes a $25 million litigation charge recorded in the first quarter, and operating margins were 5.4 percent. Excluding the litigation charge, operating earnings rose 25 percent to $246.4 million, up from $196.6 million for 2002, and operating margins improved to 6.0 percent from 5.3 percent a year ago. Further, the company said that earnings from joint ventures and equity investments plus interest income contributed $20.7 million to pre-tax earnings in 2003, compared with $8.3 million a year ago.
     Net earnings for 2003 were $135.2 million, or $1.47 per diluted share, which includes the aforementioned litigation charge ($0.18 per diluted share). Excluding the litigation charge, earnings per diluted share totaled $1.65 for the year. Net earnings for 2002 totaled $78.4 million, or $0.86 per diluted share. The cumulative effect of adoption of Financial Accounting Standards Board SFAS No. 142, "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets" is included in the 2002 results. Adoption of this accounting standard resulted in a non-cash, after-tax charge of $25.1 million, or $0.28 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2002. Excluding the effect of the accounting change, net earnings for 2002 totaled $103.5 million, or $1.14 per diluted share.
Marine Engine Segment
     The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group and Brunswick New Technologies, reported sales of $473.4 million in the fourth quarter of 2003, up 18 percent from $402.8 million in the year-ago fourth quarter. Operating earnings in the fourth quarter were up 60 percent to $26.7 million versus $16.7 million, and operating margins increased to 5.6 percent compared with 4.1 percent for the same quarter in 2002.
     For the full year, Marine Engine segment sales rose 12 percent to $1,908.9 million, and operating earnings were $171.1 million versus $170.9 million a year ago. Operating margins for the year declined to 9.0 percent versus 10.0 percent in 2002.
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 4 of 14
     "Mercury Marine's international unit had an excellent 2003 with sales increasing 22 percent, driven by share gains as well as the impact of the weaker U.S. dollar," Buckley said. "Higher sales in the domestic market during the latter part of the year helped offset a slow start in the first half resulting in relatively flat year-over-year domestic sales. Pipeline engine inventories continue to be in excellent shape at 22 weeks of supply at the end of 2003 as compared with 23 weeks of supply a year ago."
     "Brunswick New Technologies also contributed to the sales gain for the Marine Engine segment, primarily due to the acquisition of Navman NZ Limited, which was completed in the second quarter," Buckley added. "The addition of this producer of global positioning system-based products further enhances our ability to manufacture boats with integrated marine electronics."
     "The Marine Engine segment posted a significant improvement in operating margins in the second half of the year, despite higher R&D spending in support of Brunswick New Technologies, increased pension and health-care expense and margin pressure from a shift in our outboard product mix to low-emission engines that have lower margins," Buckley said. "The investments in BNT and new engine technologies are an important part of our strategy to enhance our capabilities and product offerings for the long term."
     "During the year, we completed the development of Project "X", our high horsepower four-stroke outboard engine. This game-changing engine will be formally launched at the Miami International Boat Show in a couple of weeks, with shipments scheduled to begin in April," Buckley noted.
Boat Segment
     The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and includes the Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Sealine, Meridian, Boston Whaler, Trophy, Baja and Princecraft boat brands and the Land N' Sea and Attwood marine parts and accessories distribution and manufacturing businesses. The Boat segment reported sales for the fourth quarter of $414.9 million, up 21 percent compared with $344.2
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 5 of 14
million in the fourth quarter of 2002. Boat segment sales benefited from incremental sales from its new P&A business, which began with the acquisition of Land N' Sea and Attwood Marine in June and September of 2003, respectively. Excluding these acquisitions, sales increased 13 percent in the quarter. Operating earnings for the Boat segment increased to $9.3 million, more than double the $4.5 million reported in the fourth quarter of 2002, and operating margins rose to 2.2 percent, up from 1.3 percent.
     For 2003, Boat segment sales were up 15 percent to $1,616.9 million from $1,405.3 million in 2002. Excluding the new P&A businesses, Boat segment sales were up 11 percent for the year. Operating earnings for the Boat segment more than tripled to $63.9 million from $19.0 million in 2002, and operating margins improved to 4.0 percent compared with 1.4 percent in 2002.
     "Our Boat Group showed remarkable strength across all brands and segments in 2003," Buckley said. "The improvement in retail demand that began toward the end of the second quarter has continued, leading to stronger wholesale shipments to our dealers. Importantly, pipeline inventories are in excellent shape at 28 weeks of supply at year end, unchanged from the same time a year ago."
     "Among the most significant accomplishments during the year has been the turnaround at our US Marine Division, which we expect to return to profitability in 2004," Buckley remarked. "By starting with exciting new products such as the Bayliner 175 (an entry-level boat, engine and trailer package with a suggested retail price of $9,995), and then adding the Bayliner 185, we've re-established Bayliner as the leader in family boating. Sea Ray also contributed to the Boat segment's strong performance for the year with double-digit sales and earnings growth driven by the success of a number of new models."
     "During 2003, we continued to expand our offerings of products and services, including boat parts and accessories and wholesale financing," Buckley added. "The acquisition of Land N' Sea and Attwood and the launch of Brunswick Acceptance
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 6 of 14
Company were instrumental in achieving our goal of enveloping our dealers with the competitive advantages that will make them, and Brunswick, more successful."
Fitness Segment
     The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment, and operates Omni Fitness retail stores. Segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2003 totaled $157.2 million, up 13 percent from $139.4 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings rose 27 percent to $28.3 million from $22.3 million, and operating margins were 18.0 percent, up 200 basis points from 16.0 percent in the fourth quarter of 2002.
     For 2003, the Fitness segment reported sales of $486.6 million, up 7 percent from $456.7 million in 2002. Operating earnings in 2003 increased 22 percent to $54.8 million and operating margins rose to 11.3 percent, excluding the previously mentioned $25 million litigation charge. Operating margins, including the charge, were 6.1 percent in 2003. In 2002, operating earnings were $44.9 million and operating margins were 9.8 percent.
     "During 2003, Life Fitness successfully introduced 50 new products," Buckley said. "The market's response to our Pro II and Signature strength products and the industrial design of our cardiovascular products was beyond our expectations. The success of these products, increased market share and the weaker U.S. dollar are behind the strong sales and earnings performance for the Fitness segment."
     "To better serve our European customers, in November we began shipping strength products manufactured in our new plant in Hungary," Buckley added. "By manufacturing closer to our customers, we reduce lead times and freight costs. We are also seeking to improve our operating efficiency in the United States by consolidating the manufacture of strength equipment in our Ramsey, Minn., plant. As previously announced, this will result in the closure of our Paso Robles, Calif., plant, which will be completed in the next few months."
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 7 of 14
Bowling & Billiards Segment
     The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, air hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2003 totaled $115.7 million, up 12 percent compared with $103.1 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings were up 4 percent to $15.2 million in the quarter versus $14.6 million in the comparable quarter in 2002. Operating margins were 13.1 percent in the fourth quarter of 2003 compared with 14.2 percent in 2002.
     For 2003, the segment reported sales of $392.4 million, up 4 percent from $377.7 million in 2002. Operating earnings for the year were up 20 percent to $25.6 million from $21.4 million in 2002, and operating margins improved to 6.5 percent from 5.7 percent.
     "During the year, we expanded into the coin-operated billiards table segment with the acquisition of Valley-Dynamo, which continues to meet expectations. Incremental sales from this acquisition drove the sales gain for the year," Buckley said. "We have also been investing heavily in R&D and quality programs to enhance our offerings of bowling products and services such as Vector, a new bowling center scoring and business management system introduced in the fourth quarter. We also continue to convert our bowling centers into Brunswick Zones with 13 completed in 2003. About one-third of our centers have been converted to date, and we will have 10 more Brunswick Zones by the end of 2004. In addition to providing a clean, family-friendly environment, we are expanding our customer base by offering more features that attract the casual bowler."
Looking Ahead
     "As we enter 2004, we are very encouraged that many of our strategic initiatives are starting to take hold," Buckley noted. "With the economy showing more stability and consumer confidence on the rise, we estimate marine retail market growth in the mid-single digits for the year. When we couple these factors along with new product
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 8 of 14
introductions, share gains and incremental sales from acquisitions completed in 2003, we expect to post sales growth for our marine businesses in the low-double digits, and for our fitness and bowling and billiards businesses in the high-single digits. Operating margins will benefit from higher volumes as well as our ongoing focus on effective cost management. This should more than offset costs associated with new product introductions and new plant openings in Mexico and China, and the margin impact of the transition to low-emission outboard engines. Our overall operating margins improved by 70 basis points in 2003, and we would expect to do better than that in 2004. As a result, we estimate diluted earnings per share in the range of $2.10 to $2.30 for 2004."
     When looking at the first quarter, keep in mind that we got off to a very slow start in the first quarter of 2003 with marine retail down 15 to 20 percent," Buckley explained. "Given the easy comparison, our first quarter 2004 performance should exceed the growth rates estimated for the full year. We are estimating diluted earnings per share for the first quarter to be between $0.35 and $0.40, compared with $0.22 per diluted share for 2003, excluding the $0.18 per diluted share litigation charge recorded in the first quarter of 2003."
Forward-Looking Statements
     Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this release. These risks include, but are not limited to, the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus on demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; the impact of interest rates, fuel prices and weather conditions on demand for marine products; the ability to develop and produce new products and technologies; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the ability to maintain effective distribution; competitive pricing
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 9 of 14
pressures; the success of new product introductions; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to maintain or increase market share; the financial strength of dealers and independent boat builders; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; adverse foreign economic conditions; shifts in currency exchange rates; the effect of financial markets on pension expense and funding levels; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the success of global sourcing and supply chain management initiatives; the ability to maintain good relationships and negotiate favorable terms with its labor unions; competition from new technologies; possible increases in tariffs on certain of the company's products sold into Europe; and imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors. Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2002 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2003.
About Brunswick
     
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian and Sealine pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Princecraft fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, air hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 10 of 14
(in millions, except per share data) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 11 of 14
(in millions, except per share data)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 12 of 14
(in millions)
Brunswick Corporation Selected Financial Information
Segment Information
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 13 of 14
(in millions)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
Brunswick Corporation Jan. 29, 2004 Page 14 of 14
(in millions)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20040308090623.txt.gz
TIME:20040308090623
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
Item 5. Other Events.
On March 8, 2004, Brunswick Corporation announced that it had signed a definitive agreement to acquire the Crestliner, Lowe and Lund aluminum boat brands from Genmar Industries, Inc. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing the signing of the definitive agreement is incorporated herein by reference, and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Table of Contents

 
        
      Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today it has signed a definitive agreement to acquire the Crestliner, Lowe and Lund aluminum boat brands from Genmar Industries, Inc., for approximately $191 million in cash.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., March 8, 2004
     "These brands are an ideal complement to Brunswick's line of fiberglass runabouts, cruisers and yachts, as well as our line of aluminum boats in the Princecraft brand," said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley. "This acquisition will expand our offerings to include a broader array of products in the important aluminum boat segments, in which we have little presence."
     The agreement covers the purchase of Crestliner, Inc., based in Little Falls, Minn.; Lowe Boats, Inc., based in Lebanon, Mo.; Lund Boats, Inc., of New York Mills, Minn., and Genmar Boats Canada, Inc. (which produces the Lund brand in Canada), of Steinbach, Manitoba. Each of these companies produces numerous models of aluminum fishing, pontoon, deck and utility boats ranging from 10 to 25 feet. Combined, these entities had sales of approximately $311 million in the year ended June 30, 2003.
 
Brunswick Corporation March 8, 2004 Page 2 of 3
     Commenting on the earnings impact, Buckley said, "On an annualized basis, these businesses would add approximately $0.14 per diluted share to the company's earnings. How much of that we would realize in 2004, however, will depend on precisely when the acquisition is closed." Subject to governmental approval and other customary closing conditions, the company said it expects to complete the transaction by the beginning of the second quarter.
     "The goal of the Brunswick Boat Group is to offer our dealers a full line of products in all major powerboat segments," said group President Dustan E. McCoy. "Currently, we do not participate in the aluminum segment in any meaningful way in the United States. The addition of these quality brands represents a significant step in our effort to fill the white spaces' in our product line-up and to offer dealers a full range of products to meet their customers' particular boating needs. In addition, this acquisition supports our effort to provide consumers with products that benefit from an integrated approach to boat and engine manufacturing, allowing the efficiencies, product planning and integration to deliver a more satisfying boat-owning experience."
     The company said the agreement contains provisions for additional consideration of up to $30 million to be paid in three years based on the achievement of certain financial targets over that time period.
Forward-Looking Statements
     Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this release. These risks include, but are not limited to, the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus on demand for marine products; the impact of interest rates, fuel prices and weather conditions on demand for marine products; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the ability to maintain effective distribution; competitive pricing pressures; and the financial strength of dealers and independent boat builders. Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2003.
 
Brunswick Corporation March 8, 2004 Page 3 of 3
About Brunswick
     
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian and Sealine pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Princecraft fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20040419171346.txt.gz
TIME:20040419171346
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On April 19, 2004, Brunswick Corporation announced new earnings estimates for the first quarter of 2004 and the full year. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing these estimated earnings is incorporated herein by reference, and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: April 19, 2004
Table of Contents

 
      Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today it will report earnings estimated between $0.48 and $0.50 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2004. Further, the company raised its estimate for the full year to between $2.45 and $2.65 per diluted share. Previously, the company had estimated diluted earnings per share in the range of $0.35 to $0.40 for the first quarter and $2.10 to $2.30 for 2004.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., April 19, 2004
     The company said that strong performances from its Marine Engine and Boat segments were the primary reasons for the better-than-expected results for the quarter.
     "We continue to see growing demand at retail for our marine products," explained Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley. "The improving marine environment, the strong first quarter, along with the $0.08 to $0.10 per share contribution from the three aluminum boat companies we acquired earlier this month, are behind the increase in our earnings estimates for 2004."
     Brunswick will release its first quarter 2004 financial earnings results on Tuesday, April 27, 2004, before the market opens. The company will hold a conference call at 10 a.m. CDT that same day, which will be hosted by George W. Buckley, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter G. Leemputte, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Kathryn J. Chieger, vice president - corporate and investor relations.
 
Brunswick Corporation
April 19, 2004
Page 2 of 2
     The call also will be broadcast over the Internet and can be accessed at www.brunswick.com. To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software. Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (888) 283-3870 and ask to be connected to the Brunswick call. Callers outside of North America should call (773) 756-4631 to be connected. These numbers can be accessed as early as 25 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call. A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Tuesday, May 4, 2004, by calling (800) 925-3758. The replay will also be available at www.brunswick.com.
About Brunswick
     
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian and Sealine pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Princecraft aluminum fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20040427092502.txt.gz
TIME:20040427092502
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
Item 7.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c)        Exhibits.
Item 12.   Results of Operation and Financial Condition.
On April 27, 2004, Brunswick Corporation announced its first quarter 2004 financial results. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a "non-GAAP financial measure" is a numerical measure of a registrant's historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States. Pursuant to the requirements of Regulation G, Brunswick has included, as a part of the news release, a reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswick's management believes that these measures  including those that are "non-GAAP financial measures"  and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswick's performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswick's ongoing business performance. Brunswick's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "free cash flow" is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswick's management believes that presentation of 2003 operating earnings, operating margins and earnings per share excluding a first quarter 2003 litigation charge, and presentation of sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior year's results, provides a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
      Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today net earnings of $48.0 million, or $0.50 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2004. This compares to net earnings of $3.8 million, or $0.04 per diluted share for the year-ago quarter, which includes a $25.0 million ($0.18 per diluted share) litigation charge to operating earnings relating to the settlement of a lawsuit.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., April 27, 2004
     Commenting on the quarter, Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley said, "We started the year on a very strong note with a 28 percent increase in sales in the quarter coming on double-digit gains reported by all of our operating units. The primary drivers were our marine engine and boat groups, which benefited from a better marine retail environment than we've seen in some time. Acquisitions also played a role in the sales gain. Excluding the sales from business units we didn't own in the first quarter last year, sales rose 19 percent, illustrating the strong performance delivered by our base operations. Higher sales and production volumes, along with our ongoing focus on effective cost management, contributed to a doubling of operating earnings to $78.5 million and a 240 basis point improvement in operating margins, excluding the litigation charge. We ended the quarter with our balance sheet in excellent shape. Debt-to-total capital was 30.4 percent at quarter end compared with 35.9 percent a year earlier. All in all it was a great quarter and further evidence of the successful execution of our growth strategy."
 
Brunswick Corporation April 27, 2004 Page 2 of 11
First Quarter Results
     For the quarter ended March 31, 2004, the company reported a net sales increase of 28 percent to $1,199.6 million, up from $934.5 million a year earlier. Operating earnings rose to $78.5 million compared with $13.0 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins improved to 6.5 percent from 1.4 percent. Excluding the $25.0 million litigation charge in the first quarter of 2003, operating earnings totaled $38.0 million, and operating margins were 4.1 percent.
     Net earnings totaled $48.0 million, or $0.50 per diluted share, up from $3.8 million, or $0.04 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2003. Excluding the previously mentioned litigation charge, net earnings totaled $19.8 million, or $0.22 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2003.
Marine Engine Segment
     The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group and Brunswick New Technologies, reported sales of $527.9 million in the first quarter of 2004, up 28 percent from $412.8 million in the year-ago first quarter. Operating earnings in the first quarter more than doubled to $42.6 million versus $19.3 million, and operating margins increased to 8.1 percent compared with 4.7 percent for the same quarter in 2003.
     "Mercury Marine had an excellent quarter with strong performances from all units  outboard and sterndrive engines and parts and accessories  contributing to the sales gain," Buckley said. "Strong retail demand was the primary driver behind the improved results."
     "Highlighting the quarter was the much-anticipated launch of Verado, our family of high-horsepower supercharged four-stroke outboard engines. Customer response to the new engines has been outstanding, and we began shipping product this week," Buckley added. "Verado's power, torque, near-silent running, excellent fuel economy and low-emission characteristics are unlike anything available in the market today. We
 
Brunswick Corporation April 27, 2004 Page 3 of 11
believe Verado reaffirms Mercury's standing as the technology leader in marine propulsion."
     "Brunswick New Technologies (BNT) also contributed to the sales gain for the Marine Engine segment, primarily due to the acquisition of Navman NZ Limited, a producer of global positioning system-based products, which was completed in the second quarter of 2003," Buckley added. "We have been very pleased with Navman's financial results and growth rates, fueled primarily by the success of new products. In addition, Navman, working in conjunction with Northstar and other BNT units, is an important contributor to our product development and boat electronics integration initiatives."
Boat Segment
     The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and includes the Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Sealine, Meridian, Boston Whaler, Trophy, Baja, Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Princecraft boat brands and the Land N' Sea and Attwood marine parts and accessories distribution and manufacturing businesses. The Boat segment reported sales for the first quarter of $512.0 million, up 35 percent compared with $378.6 million in the first quarter of 2003. Boat segment sales benefited from incremental sales from its new parts and accessories (P&A) business, which began with the acquisition of Land N' Sea and Attwood last year. Excluding the P&A business, boat sales increased 23 percent in the quarter. Operating earnings increased to $32.0 million, more than double the $14.1 million reported in the first quarter of 2003, and operating margins rose to 6.3 percent, up from 3.7 percent. The acquisition of the Crestliner, Lowe and Lund brands was completed at the end of the quarter and, therefore, did not have any impact on sales or operating earnings for the Boat Group in the first quarter of 2004.
     "We are seeing strong retail demand for all of our boat brands, which is leading to stronger wholesale shipments to our dealers," Buckley said. "Early boat shows are
 
Brunswick Corporation April 27, 2004 Page 4 of 11
showing positive trends. Even more encouraging is that we are seeing strength in all parts of the country and across our entire product range. New models in all portions of the product spectrum are selling especially well, including the Bayliner 175 runabout, the Sea Ray 500 Sundancer, and the Hatteras 80 Motor Yacht. Demand for these particular models is nearly outstripping our ability to supply. Higher volumes and effective cost management account for the significant improvement in operating margins."
Fitness Segment
     The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment, and operates Omni Fitness retail stores. Segment sales in the first quarter of 2004 totaled $130.6 million, up 10 percent from $119.2 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings for the quarter totaled $9.2 million compared with an operating loss of $12.5 million for the year-ago quarter, which includes the $25 million litigation charge. Operating margins were 7.0 percent in the first quarter of 2004. Excluding the litigation charge, operating earnings totaled $12.5 million, and operating margins were 10.5 percent in the first quarter of 2003.
     "In the past two years, Life Fitness has introduced 90 new products. They have been very well received in the marketplace, and strong customer demand is the primary driver of the sales gain in the quarter," Buckley noted. "That's the good news. However, the pace and the timing of these new product launches, 40 of which were introduced in the fourth quarter of 2003 alone, are having a temporary impact on operating margins for the segment. The start-up of new model production at our Ramsey, Minn., facility came at the same time we were transitioning production to Ramsey from our Paso Robles, Calif., facility, which we closed during the quarter. Operating inefficiencies, higher freight cost to meet customer delivery requirements, along with costs associated with the Paso Robles closure, had an adverse impact on
 
Brunswick Corporation April 27, 2004 Page 5 of 11
operating margins. As actions to resolve the operational issues take hold over the coming months, we expect the margin pressure for the segment to be mitigated."
Bowling & Billiards Segment
     The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the first quarter of 2004 totaled $110.2 million, up 29 percent compared with $85.1 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings were up 61 percent to $13.5 million in the first quarter versus $8.4 million, and operating margins improved to 12.3 percent compared with 9.9 percent in 2003.
     "Each business unit  bowling retail centers, bowling products and billiards  contributed to the strong sales and earnings performance for the segment," Buckley said. "In addition, Valley-Dynamo, the leading player in coin-operated pool tables that we acquired last June, continues to perform at expected levels. Excluding incremental sales from this acquisition, segment sales increased 19 percent in the quarter. Higher volumes, effective cost management and accretive margins from the Valley-Dynamo acquisition accounted for the significant improvement in operating margins for the segment."
Looking Ahead
     "2004 is shaping up to be a record year for Brunswick in both sales and earnings," Buckley commented. "The success of innovative new products, cost management efforts and accretive acquisitions, all buoyed by improved economic and marine market conditions, are behind our more optimistic outlook for the year. As we previously announced, we have raised our earnings estimate for 2004 to $2.45 to $2.65 per share, up from $2.10 to $2.30 per share. For our marine segments combined, we expect sales growth in the 27 to 29 percent range, assuming an increase in marine retail in the low-to mid-teens and including the incremental sales from acquisitions. For
 
Brunswick Corporation April 27, 2004 Page 6 of 11
our fitness and bowling and billiards segments, we maintain our earlier expectations of sales growth in the high-single digits. Overall, operating margins will benefit from higher volumes as well as our ongoing focus on effective cost management. This should more than offset costs associated with new product introductions and new plant openings and the margin impact of the transition to low-emission outboard engines. Our earnings estimates assume full-year operating margin improvement in the range of 150 to 200 basis points. Looking at the second quarter, which is seasonally the strongest for marine product sales, we're estimating earnings in the range of $0.82 to $0.90 per share, as compared with $0.59 per share for the second quarter of 2003."
Forward-Looking Statements
     Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this release. These risks include, but are not limited to, the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus on demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the success of global sourcing and supply chain management initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the success of new product introductions; the impact of weather conditions on sales of marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the financial strength of dealers and independent boat builders; shifts in currency exchange rates; the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the impact of financial markets on pension expense and funding levels; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; adverse foreign economic conditions; the ability to maintain good relationships with its
 
Brunswick Corporation April 27, 2004 Page 7 of 11
labor unions; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; and imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors. Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2003.
About Brunswick
     
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian and Sealine pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Princecraft aluminum fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit www.brunswick.com .
 
Brunswick Corporation April 27, 2004 Page 8 of 11
(in millions, except per share data) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(1) Operating earnings include a $25.0 million litigation charge recorded in the first quarter of 2003 in connection with a patent infringement lawsuit relating to the design of a cross trainer.
NM = Not Meaningful
 
Brunswick Corporation April 27, 2004 Page 9 of 11
(in millions) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Selected Financial Information
Segment Information
(1) Operating earnings include a $25.0 million litigation charge recorded in the first quarter of 2003 in connection with a patent infringement lawsuit relating to the design of a cross trainer.
NM = Not Meaningful
 
Brunswick Corporation April 27, 2004 Page 10 of 11
(in millions)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Balance Sheet
 
Brunswick Corporation April 27, 2004 Page 11 of 11
(in millions) (unaudited)
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Cash Flow


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20040526150013.txt.gz
TIME:20040526150013
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
Item 5. Other Events.
     On May 21, 2004, Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") and Merrill Lynch & Co., Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Bank of America Securities LLC entered into an Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") with respect to the offering and sale of $150,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 5% Notes due 2011 (the "Notes") under the Company's shelf Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-71344). The sale of the Notes closed on May 26, 2004. The Notes are being issued pursuant to an Indenture dated as of March 15, 1987 (as filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 1987, the "Indenture"), between the Company and BNY Midwest Trust Company, as successor trustee.
     The Underwriting Agreement and the form of the Notes are filed as Exhibits 1.1 and 4.1, respectively, to this Current Report on Form 8-K, and incorporated by reference herein.
     In connection with the offering and sale of the Notes, the Company is filing as Exhibit 12.1 a computation of ratio of earnings to fixed charges, which is incorporated by reference herein.
Item 7. Exhibits.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: May 26, 2004
 

 
Exhibit 1.1
 
 
May 21, 2004
Ladies and Gentlemen:
     Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), confirms its agreement with Merrill Lynch & Co., Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated ("Merrill Lynch"), J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and each of the other underwriters named in Schedule I attached hereto (collectively, the "Underwriters," which term shall also include any underwriter substituted as hereinafter provided in Section 10 hereof), for whom Merrill Lynch, J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Banc of America Securities LLC are acting as representatives (in such capacity, the "Representatives"), with respect to the issue and sale by the Company and the purchase by the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, of the respective principal amounts set forth in said Schedule I of $150,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Notes due 2011 (the "Securities"). The Securities are to be issued pursuant to an indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987 (the "Indenture"), between the Company and BNY Midwest Trust Company, as successor to Harris Trust and Savings Bank, as trustee (the "Trustee"). The term "Indenture," as used herein, includes the Officers' Certificate (as defined in the Indenture) establishing the form and terms of the Securities pursuant to Sections 2.01 and 2.03 of the Indenture.
 
     The Company understands that the Underwriters propose to make a public offering of the Securities as soon as the Representatives deem advisable after this underwriting agreement (this "Agreement") has been executed and delivered.
     The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") a registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-71344), including the related preliminary prospectus or prospectuses, covering the registration of certain of its securities, including the Securities, under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "1933 Act"), and the offering thereof from time to time, in accordance with Rule 415 of the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1933 Act (the "1933 Act Regulations"). Such registration statement has been declared effective by the Commission, and the Indenture has been qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (the "1939 Act"). Such registration statement, including the financial statements, exhibits and schedules thereto, in the form in which it was declared effective by the Commission under the 1933 Act, including all documents incorporated or deemed incorporated by reference therein and any information deemed to be a part thereof pursuant to paragraph (b) of Rule 430A of the 1933 Act Regulations (the "Rule 430A Information"), is referred to herein as the "Registration Statement." In accordance with Section 3(a) of this Agreement, the Company will prepare and file a prospectus consisting of a prospectus supplement relating to the Securities together with the preliminary prospectus included in the Registration Statement at the time it was declared effective, in accordance with the provisions of Rule 424(b) of the 1933 Act Regulations. Such prospectus in the form first furnished to the Underwriters by the Company for use in connection with the offering of the Securities, including such prospectus supplement and such basic prospectus and all documents incorporated or deemed incorporated therein by reference, are collectively referred to herein as the "Prospectus."
     All references in this Agreement to financial statements and schedules and other information which is "contained," "included" or "stated" in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus (and all other references of like import) shall be deemed to mean and include all such financial statements and schedules and other information which is or is deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, as the case may be; and all references in this Agreement to amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus shall be deemed to mean and include the filing of any document under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "1934 Act"), which is or is deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, as the case may be. For purposes of this Agreement, all references to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or to any amendment or supplement to any of the foregoing shall be deemed to include any copy filed with the Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval System ("EDGAR").
     SECTION 1. Representations and Warranties.
     (a) The Company represents and warrants to each Underwriter as of the date hereof and as of the Closing Time referred to in Section 2(b) hereof, and agrees with each Underwriter, as follows:
 
     (1) The Company meets the requirements for use of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act. Each of the Registration Statement and any post-effective amendment thereto has become effective under the 1933 Act and no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto has been issued under the 1933 Act and no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, are contemplated by the Commission, and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information has been complied with. In addition, the Indenture has been duly qualified under the 1939 Act.
          At the respective times the Registration Statement and any post-effective amendments thereto became effective, at the date hereof and at the Closing Time, the Registration Statement and any amendments and supplements thereto complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1939 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1939 Act (the "1939 Act Regulations") and did not and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading. At the date of the Prospectus and at the Closing Time, neither the Prospectus nor any amendments or supplements thereto included or will include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or will omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the representations and warranties in this subsection shall not apply to that part of the Registration Statement which shall constitute the Statement of Qualification of the Trustee on Form T-1 under the 1939 Act or to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement or Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Trustee or any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) or in the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
          The prospectus filed as part of the Registration Statement as originally filed complied when so filed in all material respects with the 1933 Act Regulations, and the Prospectus delivered to the Underwriters for use in connection with the offering of the Securities will, at the time of such delivery, be identical to any electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
     (2) The accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included in the Registration Statement are independent public accountants as required by the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations.
     (3) The financial statements included in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus present fairly the financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of the dates indicated and the results of their operations for the periods specified; except as otherwise stated in the Registration Statement, said financial statements have been prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a consistent basis; and the supporting schedules included in the Registration Statement present fairly the information required to be stated therein. The
 
selected financial data included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2003 present fairly the information shown therein and have been compiled on a basis consistent with that of the audited financial statements included in the Registration Statement.
     (4) Since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, except as otherwise stated therein, (A) there has been no material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business and (B) there have been no transactions entered into by the Company or any of its subsidiaries, other than those in the ordinary course of business, which are material with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
     (5) The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware with corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Prospectus and to enter into and perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Indenture; and the Company is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
     (6) Each subsidiary of the Company which is a significant subsidiary (a "Subsidiary") as defined in Rule 405 of the 1933 Act Regulations has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Prospectus and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each such Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and nonassessable and is owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity.
     (7) Each of the Indenture and each supplement thereto, if any, to the date hereof has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company, has been duly qualified under the 1939 Act, and, assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by the Trustee, constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as enforcement thereof may be subject to (A) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to creditors' rights generally, and (B) general principles
 
of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law); and the Indenture conforms in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus.
     (8) The Securities have been duly authorized, and, when executed, authenticated, issued and delivered in the manner provided for in the Indenture and sold and paid for as provided herein, the Securities will constitute legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company, entitled to the benefits of the Indenture and enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except as enforcement thereof may be subject to (A) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to creditors' rights generally, and (B) general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law); and the Securities conform in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus.
     (9) Neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries is in violation of its charter or in default (and, to the knowledge of the Company, no event has occurred, and no circumstances exist, that with the passage of time or giving of notice would constitute a default) in the performance or observance of any material obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which it or any of them may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is subject; and the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Indenture, the issuance and delivery of the Securities and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and therein and compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder and thereunder have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action and will not conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default (or with the passage of time or giving of notice constitute a default) under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries pursuant to, any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which it or any of them may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is subject, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the charter or by-laws of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries or any violation of any applicable law, administrative regulation or administrative or court decree.
     (10) Other than as disclosed in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, there is no action, suit or proceeding before or by any court or governmental agency or body, domestic or foreign, now pending, or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, which is required to be disclosed in the Registration Statement, or which might result in any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, or which might materially and adversely affect the properties or assets thereof or which might materially and adversely affect the consummation of this Agreement or the issuance of the Securities pursuant to the Indenture; all pending legal or governmental
 
proceedings to which the Company or any subsidiary is a party or of which any of their respective property or assets is the subject which are not described in the Registration Statement, including ordinary routine litigation incidental to the business, are, considered in the aggregate, not material; and there are no contracts or documents of the Company or any of its subsidiaries which are required to be filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement by the 1933 Act or by the 1933 Act Regulations which have not been so filed.
     (11) The Company and the Subsidiaries own or possess, or can acquire on reasonable terms, the patents, patent rights, licenses, inventions, copyrights, know-how (including trade secrets and other unpatented and/or unpatentable proprietary or confidential information, systems or procedures), trademarks, service marks and trade names (collectively, "patent and proprietary rights") presently employed by them in connection with the business now operated by them, and neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries has received any notice or is otherwise aware of any infringement of or conflict with asserted rights of others with respect to any patent and proprietary rights, or of any facts which would render any patent and proprietary rights invalid or inadequate to protect the interest of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries therein, and which infringement or conflict (if the subject of any unfavorable decision, ruling or finding) or invalidity or inadequacy, singly or in the aggregate, would result in any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
     (12) No authorization, approval or consent of any court or governmental authority or agency is necessary in connection with the offering, issuance or sale of the Securities hereunder, except such as may be required under the 1933 Act, the 1933 Act Regulations, the 1939 Act, the 1939 Act Regulations or state securities laws.
     (13) The Company and the Subsidiaries possess such certificates, authorities or permits issued by the appropriate state, federal or foreign regulatory agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business now operated by them, and neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries has received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such certificate, authority or permit which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would materially and adversely affect the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
     (14) Except as described in the Registration Statement and except as would not, singly or in the aggregate, result in any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, (A) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of any federal, state, local or foreign statute, law, rule, regulation, ordinance, code, policy or rule of common law or any judicial or administrative interpretation thereof, including any judicial or administrative order, consent, decree or judgment, relating to pollution or protection of human health, the environment (including, without limitation, ambient air, surface water, groundwater, land surface or subsurface strata) or wildlife, including, without limitation, laws and regulations relating to the release or threatened release of chemicals, pollutants,
 
contaminants, wastes, toxic substances, hazardous substances, petroleum or petroleum products, asbestos-containing materials or mold (collectively, "Hazardous Materials") or to the manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, disposal, transport or handling of Hazardous Materials (collectively, "Environmental Laws"), (B) the Company and its subsidiaries have all permits, authorizations and approvals required under any applicable Environmental Laws and are each in compliance with their requirements, (C) there are no pending or threatened administrative, regulatory or judicial actions, suits, demands, demand letters, claims, liens, notices of noncompliance or violation, investigation or proceedings relating to any Environmental Law against the Company or any of its subsidiaries and (D) there are no events or circumstances that would reasonably be expected to form the basis of an order for clean-up or remediation, or an action, suit or proceeding by any private party or governmental body or agency, against or affecting the Company or any of its subsidiaries relating to Hazardous Materials or any Environmental Laws.
     (15) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
     (16) The Company and the Subsidiaries have good and sufficient title to all property described or referred to in the Registration Statement as being owned by them, in each case free and clear of all liens, claims, security interests or other encumbrances, with such exceptions as are described or referred to in the Registration Statement or as are not material to the condition, financial or otherwise, or to the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
     (17) The documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Prospectus, at the time they were or hereafter are filed with the Commission, complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1934 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1934 Act (the "1934 Act Regulations"), and, when read together with the other information in the Prospectus, at the time the Registration Statement became effective, at the date of the Prospectus and at the Closing Time will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
     (18) There are no outstanding loans, advances (except normal advances for business expenses in the ordinary course of business) or guarantees of indebtedness by the Company to or for the benefit of any of the officers or directors of the Company or any of their respective family members, except as disclosed in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus.
     (19) The Company is in material compliance with all the applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (the "Sarbanes-Oxley Act") that are currently in effect and require compliance on or before the date hereof. The Company is taking steps it reasonably deems appropriate to
 
ensure that it will be in compliance with other applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act that are not currently in effect upon the effectiveness of such provisions.
     (20) The Company and its consolidated subsidiaries maintain a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurances that (A) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; (B) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain accountability for assets; (C) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (D) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.
     (21) The Company has implemented the "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rules 13a-15 and 15d-15 of the 1934 Act Regulations) required in order for the principal executive officer and principal financial officer of the Company to engage in the review and evaluation process mandated by the 1934 Act Regulations. To the extent required by the 1934 Act Regulations, the Company's "disclosure controls and procedures" are reasonably designed to ensure that all information (both financial and non-financial) required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the 1934 Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations, and that all such information is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure and to make the certifications of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer of the Company required under the 1934 Act with respect to such reports.
     (b) Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company and delivered to you or to counsel for the Underwriters in connection with the offering of the Securities shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company to each Underwriter as to the matters covered thereby.
     SECTION 2. Sale and Delivery to Underwriters; Closing. On the basis of the representations and warranties contained herein and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth:
     (a) The Company agrees to sell to each Underwriter, and each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the purchase price set forth in Schedule II, the principal amount of the Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter on Schedule I, plus any additional principal amount of the Securities which such Underwriter may become obligated to purchase pursuant to the provisions of Section 10 hereof.
     (b) Payment of the purchase price for, and delivery of certificates for, the Securities shall be made at the date, time and location specified in Schedule II (unless postponed in accordance with the provisions of Section 10) or such other date, time and location as shall be agreed upon by the Representatives and the Company (such time and date of payment and delivery being herein called "Closing Time"). Unless otherwise specified in Schedule II,
 
payment shall be made to the Company by wire transfer of immediately available funds, against delivery to the Representatives for the respective accounts of the Underwriters of certificates for the Securities to be purchased by them. Certificates for the Securities shall be in such denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request in writing at least two business days prior to the Closing Time. It is understood that each Underwriter has authorized the Representatives, for its account, to accept delivery of, receipt for, and make payment of the purchase price for, the Securities which it has agreed to purchase. You, individually and not as Representatives of the Underwriters, may (but shall not be obligated to) make payment of the purchase price for the Securities to be purchased by any Underwriter whose money has not been received by the Closing Time but such payment shall not relieve such Underwriter from its obligations hereunder. The certificates, which may be in temporary form, for the Securities will be made available for examination and packaging by the Representatives not later than 10:00 A.M. on the last business day prior to the Closing Time.
     SECTION 3. Covenants of the Company. The Company covenants with each Underwriter as follows:
     (a) In connection with the offering of the Securities, the Company will prepare a prospectus supplement setting forth the principal amount of the Securities covered thereby and their terms not otherwise specified in the Indenture, the names of the Underwriters and the principal amount of the Securities which each severally has agreed to purchase, the name of the Representatives, the price at which the Securities are to be purchased by the Underwriters from the Company, the initial public offering price, the selling concession and reallowance, if any, and such other information as the Representatives and the Company deem appropriate in connection with the offering of the Securities. The Company will promptly transmit copies of the prospectus supplement to the Commission for filing pursuant to Rule 424 of the 1933 Act Regulations and will furnish to the Underwriters named therein as many copies of the Prospectus as the Representatives shall reasonably request.
     (b) The Company will notify the Representatives promptly, and confirm the notice in writing, (i) of the effectiveness of any amendment to the Registration Statement, (ii) of the mailing or the delivery to the Commission for filing of any supplement to the Prospectus or any document to be filed pursuant to the 1934 Act which will be incorporated by reference into the Prospectus or the Registration Statement, (iii) of the receipt of any comments from the Commission with respect to the Registration Statement or Prospectus, (iv) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or for additional information, (v) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any order preventing or suspending the use of any Prospectus or the initiation of any proceedings for any such purpose, and (vi) of the suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, or the initiation or threatening of any proceedings for such purpose of which the Company becomes aware. The Company will use all reasonable efforts to prevent the issuance of any stop order or any order preventing or suspending the use of any Prospectus or suspending such qualification, and, in the event of the issuance of a stop order or any order preventing or suspending the use of any Prospectus or suspending such qualifications, to use all reasonable efforts to promptly obtain the lifting thereof.
 
     (c) The Company will give the Representatives notice of its intention to file or prepare any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus, whether pursuant to the 1933 Act, the 1934 Act or otherwise, will furnish the Representatives with copies of any such amendment or supplement within a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing, and will not file any such amendment or supplement to which the Representatives or counsel for the Underwriters shall reasonably object.
     (d) The Company will deliver to the Representatives without charge five signed copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto (including exhibits filed therewith or incorporated by reference therein and documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein) and as many conformed copies as the Representatives may reasonably request and will also deliver to the Representatives a conformed copy of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto (without exhibits) for each of the Underwriters.
     (e) The Company will furnish to each Underwriter without charge, from time to time during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act or the 1934 Act, such number of copies of the Prospectus (as amended or supplemented) as such Underwriter may reasonably request for the purposes contemplated by the 1933 Act or the 1934 Act or the respective applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
     (f) If any event shall occur as a result of which it is necessary to amend or supplement the Prospectus in order to make the Prospectus not misleading in the light of the circumstances existing at the time it is delivered to a purchaser, or if it shall be necessary to amend the Registration Statement or supplement the Prospectus to comply with the 1933 Act or the 1934 Act or the respective rules and regulations thereunder, the Company will forthwith amend the Registration Statement or supplement the Prospectus, as the case may be (in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters), so as to correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance and the Company will furnish to the Underwriters a reasonable number of copies of such amendment or supplement.
     (g) The Company will endeavor, in cooperation with the Underwriters, to qualify the Securities for offering and sale under the applicable securities laws of such states and other jurisdictions of the United States as the Representatives may designate; provided, however, that the Company shall not be obligated to qualify as a foreign corporation in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction. In each jurisdiction in which the Securities have been so qualified, the Company will file such statements and reports as may be required by the laws of such jurisdiction to continue such qualification in effect for a period of not less than one year from the effective date of the Registration Statement.
     (h) The Company will timely file such reports pursuant to the 1934 Act as are necessary in order to make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable an earnings statement for the purposes of, and to provide the benefits contemplated by, the last paragraph of Section 11(a) of the 1933 Act.
 
     (i) The Company will use the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Securities in the manner specified in the Prospectus under "Use of Proceeds."
     (j) Until the business day following the Closing Time or such other date as may be specified in Schedule II, the Company will not, without the Representatives' prior written consent, directly or indirectly, sell, offer to sell or announce the offering of, or otherwise dispose of, any debt securities of the Company covered by the Registration Statement or any other registration statement filed under the 1933 Act.
     (k) The Company, during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act, will file all documents required to be filed with the Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15 of the 1934 Act within the time periods required by the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations.
     SECTION 4. Payment of Expenses. The Company will pay all expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, including (i) the printing and filing of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, (ii) the typing, printing and distribution of this Agreement and the Indenture, (iii) the preparation, issuance and delivery of the certificates for the Securities to the Underwriters, including transfer taxes, if any, payable upon the sale, issuance and delivery to the Underwriters of the Securities, (iv) the fees and disbursements of the Company's counsel and accountants, (v) the qualification of the Securities under securities laws in accordance with the provisions of Section 3(g) hereof, including filing fees and the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters in connection therewith and in connection with the preparation of the Blue Sky Survey, (vi) the printing and delivery to the Underwriters of copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, of each preliminary prospectus, and of the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto, (vii) the printing and delivery to the Underwriters of copies of the Blue Sky Survey, (viii) the fees of rating agencies, (ix) the fees, if any, of the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. and (x) the fees and expenses of the Trustee, including the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Trustee, in connection with the Indenture.
     If this Agreement is terminated by the Representatives in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 or Section 9(a)(i) hereof, the Company shall reimburse the Underwriters for all of their out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for such Underwriters.
     SECTION 5. Conditions of Underwriters' Obligations. The obligations of the several Underwriters hereunder are subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties of the Company contained in Section 1 hereof or in certificates of any officer of the Company or any subsidiary of the Company delivered pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and under the Indenture, and to the following further conditions:
     (a) At the Closing Time, (i) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued under the 1933 Act or proceedings therefor initiated or threatened by the Commission and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the satisfaction of counsel for the
 
Underwriters and (ii) the rating assigned by any nationally recognized securities rating agency to any debt securities of the Company as of the date hereof shall not have been lowered since the date hereof and no such agency shall have publicly announced that it has placed any of such debt securities on what is commonly termed a "watch list" for possible downgrading.
     (b) At the Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received:
     (1) The favorable opinion, dated as of the Closing Time, of Sidley Austin Brown & Wood LLP, counsel to the Company, in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters, to the effect that:
     (i) The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware.
     (ii) The Securities have been duly authorized for issuance and sale to the Underwriters, and, when issued and delivered by the Company pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, against payment of the consideration set forth herein, will constitute legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company, entitled to the benefits provided by the Indenture, and be enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject as to enforcement, to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization and other laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
     (iii) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
     (iv) The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and, assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by the Trustee, constitutes a valid and binding instrument of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject, as to enforcement, to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization and other laws of general applicability relating to or affecting creditors' rights and to general equity principles.
     (v) The Indenture has been duly qualified under the 1939 Act.
     (vi) The Registration Statement is effective under the 1933 Act and, to the best of their knowledge and information, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued under the 1933 Act or proceeding therefor initiated or threatened by the Commission.
     (vii) The Securities conform in all material respects to the description thereof in the Prospectus, and the form of certificate used to evidence the Securities is in due and proper form.
 
     (viii) At the time the Registration Statement became effective and at the date of the execution of this Agreement, the Registration Statement and the Prospectus (other than the financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included therein and in the documents incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, as to which no opinion need be rendered) complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations.
     (ix) To the best of their knowledge and information, there are no contracts, indentures, mortgages, loan agreements, notes, leases or other instruments required to be described or referred to in the Registration Statement or to be filed as exhibits thereto other than those described or referred to therein or filed or incorporated by reference as exhibits thereto.
     (x) No authorization, approval, consent or order of any court or governmental authority or agency is required in connection with the offering, issuance or sale of the Securities to the Underwriters, except as may be required under the 1933 Act, the 1933 Act Regulations, the 1939 Act, the 1939 Act Regulations or state securities laws.
     (xi) To the best of their knowledge and information, the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Indenture and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and therein and compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder and thereunder will not conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries pursuant to, any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which it or any of them may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is subject, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws of the Company, or any applicable law, administrative regulation or administrative or court decree.
     (xii) Each document filed pursuant to the 1934 Act (other than the financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included therein, as to which no opinion need be rendered) and incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Prospectus complied when so filed as to form in all material respects with the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations.
     (2) The favorable opinion, dated as of the Closing Time, of Marschall I. Smith, General Counsel to the Company, in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters, to the effect that:
 
     (i) To the best of his knowledge and information, the Company is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
     (ii) Each Subsidiary has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement and, to the best of his knowledge and information, is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and nonassessable and, to the best of his knowledge and information, is owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity.
     (iii) Other than as disclosed in the Registration Statement, to the best of his knowledge and information, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending or threatened which are required to be disclosed in the Registration Statement, and all pending legal or governmental proceedings to which the Company or any subsidiary is a party or to which any of their property is subject which are not described in the Registration Statement, including ordinary routine litigation incidental to the business, are, considered in the aggregate, not material.
     (iv) To the best of his knowledge and information, there are no contracts, indentures, mortgages, loan agreements, notes, leases or other instruments required to be described or referred to in the Registration Statement or to be filed as exhibits thereto other than those described or referred to therein or filed or incorporated by reference as exhibits thereto, the descriptions thereof or references thereto are correct, and no default exists in the due performance or observance of any material obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument so described, referred to, filed or incorporated by reference.
     (v) The Company has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in
 
the Registration Statement and to enter into and perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Indenture.
     (3) The favorable opinion, dated as of the applicable Closing Time, of Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, with respect to the issuance and sale of the Securities, the Indenture, the Registration Statement, the Prospectus (together with any supplement thereto) and other related matters as the Representatives may reasonably require.
     (4) In giving their opinions required by subsections (b)(1), (b)(2) and (b)(3), respectively, of this Section, Sidley Austin Brown & Wood LLP, Mr. Smith and Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP shall each additionally state that nothing has come to their attention that has caused them to believe that the Registration Statement (except for financial statements and schedules and other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein, as to which counsel need make no statement), at the time it became effective or at the date of this Agreement, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or that the Prospectus (except for financial statements and schedules and other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein, as to which counsel need make no statement), at the date of this Agreement or at Closing Time, included an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
     (c) At the Closing Time there shall not have been, since the date of this Agreement or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, and the Representatives shall have received a certificate of the President or a Vice President of the Company and of the chief financial or chief accounting officer of the Company, dated as of such Closing Time, to the effect that (i) there has been no such material adverse change, (ii) the representations and warranties in Section 1 hereof are true and correct with the same force and effect as though expressly made at and as of such Closing Time, (iii) the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to such Closing Time, and (iv) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued, and no proceedings for that purpose have been initiated or are pending or are, to their knowledge, contemplated by the Commission.
     (d) At the time of the execution of this Agreement and at the Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP letters, dated such dates, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect that (i) they are independent public accountants with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries within the meaning of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations; (ii) it is their opinion that the financial statements and supporting schedules included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and covered by their opinions therein comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1934
 
Act and 1934 Act Regulations; (iii) based upon limited procedures set forth in detail in such letters, nothing has come to their attention which causes them to believe that (A) any unaudited financial statements and supporting schedules of the Company and its subsidiaries included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and the Prospectus do not comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1934 Act and 1934 Act Regulations or are not presented in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a basis substantially consistent with that of the audited financial statements included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, or (B) at a specified date not more than five days prior to the date of the letters, there has been any change in the capital stock of the Company or any increase in the consolidated long-term debt of the Company and its subsidiaries or any decrease in consolidated net current assets or net assets as compared with the amounts shown in the most recent financial statements included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement or, during the period from the date of the most recent financial statements included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement to a specified date not more than five days prior to the date of the letters, there were any decreases, as compared with the corresponding period in the preceding year, in consolidated revenues, net income or net income per share of the Company and its subsidiaries, except in all instances for changes, increases or decreases which the Registration Statement and the Prospectus disclose have occurred or may occur; and (iv) in addition to the examination referred to in their opinions and the limited procedures referred to in clause (iii) above, they have carried out certain specified procedures, not constituting an audit, with respect to certain amounts, percentages and financial information which are included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and the Prospectus and which are specified by the Representatives, and have found such amounts, percentages and financial information to be in agreement with the relevant accounting, financial and other records of the Company and its subsidiaries identified in such letters.
     (e) At the Closing Time, counsel for the Underwriters shall have been furnished with such documents and opinions as they may require for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon the issuance and sale of the Securities herein contemplated and related proceedings, or in order to evidence the accuracy of any of the representations or warranties, or the fulfillment of any of the conditions herein contained; and all proceedings taken by the Company in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated shall be satisfactory in form and substance to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters.
     (f) If any condition specified in this Section shall not have been fulfilled when and as required to be fulfilled, this Agreement may be terminated by the Representatives by notice to the Company at any time at or prior to the Closing Time, and such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except as provided in Section 4 and except that the provisions of Sections 1, 6, 7, and 8 hereof shall survive any such termination and remain in effect.
     SECTION 6. Indemnification.
     (a) Indemnification of Underwriters. The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter, its affiliates, as such term is defined in Rule 501(b) under the 1933
 
Act (each an "Affiliate"), its selling agents and each person, if any who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act as follows:
     (1) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the information incorporated by reference therein, if applicable, or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact included in any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
     (2) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, to the extent of the aggregate amount paid in settlement of any litigation, or of any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or of any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission; provided that any such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company; and
     (3) against any and all expense whatsoever, as incurred (including the fees and disbursements of counsel chosen by Merrill Lynch), reasonably incurred in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, to the extent that any such expense is not paid under (i) or (ii) above;
provided, however, that this indemnity agreement shall not apply to any loss, liability, claim, damage or expense (x) to the extent arising out of any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through Merrill Lynch expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the information incorporated by reference therein, if applicable, or any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or (y) if such untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission was contained or made in any preliminary prospectus and corrected in a Prospectus and (i) any such loss, liability, claim, damage or expense suffered or incurred by any Underwriter (or any person who controls any Underwriter) resulted from an action, claim or suit by any person who purchased the Securities which are the subject thereof from such Underwriter in the offering and (ii) such Underwriter failed to deliver or provide a copy of the Prospectus to such person at or prior to the confirmation of the sale of such securities in any case where such delivery is required by the 1933 Act or the 1933 Act Regulations, unless the Company did not furnish such Underwriter requisite copies of the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) in a timely manner pursuant to this Agreement.
     (b) Indemnification of Company, Directors and Officers. Each Underwriter severally and not jointly agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, its directors, each of its
 
officers who signed the Registration Statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense described in the indemnity contained in subsection (a) of this Section, as incurred, but only with respect to untrue statements or omissions, or alleged untrue statements or omissions, made in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) or any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through Merrill Lynch expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) or such preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
     (c) Actions against Parties; Notification. Each indemnified party shall give notice as promptly as reasonably practicable to each indemnifying party of any action commenced against it in respect of which indemnity may be sought hereunder, but failure to so notify an indemnifying party shall not relieve such indemnifying party from any liability hereunder to the extent it is not materially prejudiced as a result thereof and in any event shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have otherwise than on account of this indemnity agreement. In the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(a) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by Merrill Lynch and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., and, in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(b) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by the Company. An indemnifying party may participate at its own expense in the defense of any such action; provided, however, that counsel to the indemnifying party shall not (except with the consent of the indemnified party) also be counsel to the indemnified party. In no event shall the indemnifying parties be liable for fees and expenses of more than one counsel (in addition to any local counsel) separate from their own counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified parties, settle or compromise or consent to the entry of any judgment with respect to any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever in respect of which indemnification or contribution could be sought under this Section 6 or Section 7 hereof (whether or not the indemnified parties are actual or potential parties thereto), unless such settlement, compromise or consent includes an unconditional release of each indemnified party from all liability arising out of such litigation, investigation, proceeding or claim and does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of such indemnified party.
     SECTION 7. Contribution. If the indemnification provided for in Section 6 hereof is for any reason unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of any losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the aggregate amount of such losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by such indemnified party, as incurred, (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company, on the one hand, and of the Underwriters, on the other hand, in connection with
 
the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations.
     The relative benefits received by the Company, on the one hand, and the Underwriters on the other hand, in connection with the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the total net proceeds from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement (before deducting expenses) received by the Company and the total underwriting discount received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth on the cover of the Prospectus bear to the aggregate initial public offering price of the Securities as set forth on the cover of the Prospectus.
     The relative fault of the Company, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether any such untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or by the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
     The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 7 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this Section 7. The aggregate amount of losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by an indemnified party and referred to above in this Section 7 shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
     Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7, no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
     No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the 1933 Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
     For purposes of this Section 7, each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act and each Underwriter's Affiliates and selling agents shall have the same rights to contribution as such Underwriter, and each director of the Company, each officer of the Company who signed the Registration Statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company. The Underwriters' respective obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 7 are
 
several in proportion to the principal amount of Securities set forth opposite their respective names in Schedule I hereto and not joint.
     SECTION 8. Representations, Warranties and Agreements to Survive Delivery. All representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Agreement or contained in certificates of officers of the Company submitted pursuant hereto shall remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of (i) any investigation made by or on behalf of the Company, or any person controlling the Company, or any Underwriter or its Affiliates or selling agents or any person controlling any Underwriter, its officers or directors, and (ii) delivery of and payment for the Securities.
     SECTION 9. Termination.
     (a) The Representatives may terminate this Agreement, by notice to the Company, at any time at or prior to the Closing Time (i) if there has been, since the time of execution of this Agreement or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus (exclusive of any supplement thereto), any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, or (ii) if there has occurred any material adverse change in the financial markets in the United States or the international financial markets, any outbreak of hostilities or escalation thereof or other calamity or crisis or any change or development involving a prospective change in national or international political, financial or economic conditions, in each case the effect of which is such as to make it, in the judgment of the Representatives, impracticable or inadvisable to market the Securities or to enforce contracts for the sale of the Securities, or (iii) if trading in any securities of the Company has been suspended or materially limited by the Commission or the New York Stock Exchange, or if trading generally on the American Stock Exchange or the New York Stock Exchange or in the Nasdaq National Market has been suspended or materially limited, or minimum or maximum prices for trading have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices have been required, by any of said exchanges or by such system or by order of the Commission, the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. or any other governmental authority, or (iv) a material disruption has occurred in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services in the United States, or (v) if a banking moratorium has been declared by federal, New York or Illinois authorities.
     (b) If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to this Section, such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party, except to the extent provided in Section 4 hereof. Notwithstanding any such termination, the provisions of Sections 1, 6, 7 and 8 hereof shall remain in effect.
     SECTION 10. Default by One or More of the Underwriters. If one or more of the Underwriters shall fail at Closing Time to purchase the Securities that it or they are obligated to purchase under this Agreement (the "Defaulted Securities"), the Representatives shall have the right, within 24 hours thereafter, to make arrangements for one or more of the non-defaulting Underwriters, or any other underwriters, to purchase all, but not less than all, of the Defaulted Securities in such amounts as may be agreed upon and upon the terms herein set forth; if,
 
however, the Representatives shall not have completed such arrangements within such 24-hour period, then:
     (a) if the number of Defaulted Securities does not exceed 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities to be purchased hereunder, each of the non-defaulting Underwriters shall be obligated, severally and not jointly, to purchase the full amount thereof in the proportions that their respective underwriting obligations hereunder bear to the underwriting obligations of all non-defaulting Underwriters, or
     (b) if the number of Defaulted Securities exceeds 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities to be purchased hereunder, this Agreement shall terminate, without any liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter.
     No action taken pursuant to this Section shall relieve any defaulting Underwriter from liability in respect of its default.
     In the event of any such default which does not result in a termination of this Agreement, either the Representatives or the Company shall have the right to postpone Closing Time for a period not exceeding seven days in order to effect any required changes in the Registration Statement or Prospectus or in any other documents or arrangements.
     As used herein, the term "Underwriter" includes any person substituted for an Underwriter under this Section 10.
     SECTION 11. Notices. All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted by any standard form of telecommunication. Notices to the Underwriters shall be directed to the Representatives at World Financial Center, New York, New York 10080, attention of Paul Nagle; and notices to the Company shall be directed to it at 1 North Field Ct., Lake Forest, Illinois 60045, attention of Marschall I. Smith, General Counsel.
     SECTION 12. Parties. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Underwriters named herein and the Company and their respective successors. Nothing expressed or mentioned in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give any person, firm or corporation, other than the Underwriters named herein and the Company and their respective successors and the controlling persons and officers and directors referred to in Sections 6 and 7 and their heirs and legal representatives, any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement or any provision herein contained. This Agreement and all conditions and provisions hereof are intended to be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Underwriters named herein and the Company and their respective successors, and said controlling persons and officers and directors and their heirs and legal representative(s), and for the benefit of no other person, firm or corporation. No purchaser of any of the Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed to be a successor by reason merely of such purchase.
     SECTION 13. Governing Law. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the state of New York applicable to agreements made and to be performed in said State.
 
     SECTION 14. TIME. TIME SHALL BE OF THE ESSENCE OF THIS AGREEMENT. EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE SET FORTH HEREIN, SPECIFIED TIMES OF DAY REFER TO NEW YORK CITY TIME.
     SECTION 15. Counterparts. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same agreement.
     SECTION 16. Effect of Headings. The Section headings herein are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
 
     If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, please sign and return to the Company a counterpart hereof, whereupon this instrument, along with all counterparts, will become a binding agreement between the Underwriters and the Company in accordance with its terms.
For themselves and as Representatives of the Underwriters named in Schedule I attached to the Underwriting Agreement.
 
 
Underwriting Agreement dated May 21, 2004
Registration Statement No. 333-71344
Title, Purchase Price and Description of Securities:

 
Exhibit 4.1
Unless this certificate is presented by an authorized representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation ("DTC"), to the Company (as defined below) or its agent for registration of transfer, exchange, or payment, and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.
CUSIP No.: 117043 AH 2
     Brunswick Corporation, a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (hereinafter called the "Company", which term shall include any successor corporation as defined in the Indenture referred to on the reverse side hereof), for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or its registered assigns, the sum of                                             ($                     ) at the principal corporate trust office of the Trustee, or at an office or agency maintained by the Company for such purpose, in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois, or in the Borough of Manhattan, The City and State of New York, on June 1, 2011, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment shall be legal tender for the payment of public and private debts, and to pay interest, semiannually on June 1 and December 1 of each year beginning December 1, 2004, on said principal sum in like coin or currency, at the rate per annum specified in the title of this Note, from the next preceding date on which interest has been paid or, if no interest has been paid on the Notes, from                                      until payment of said principal sum has been made or duly provided for.
     The interest so payable on any June 1 or December 1 will, subject to certain exceptions provided in the Indenture referred to herein, be paid to the person in whose name this Note is registered at the close of business on the May 15 or November 15 next preceding such June 1 or December 1 (whether or not such May 15 or November 15 is a business day) at the principal executive offices of the Company and at its offices or agencies in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois and the Borough of Manhattan, The City and State of New York, except that interest may, at the option of the Company, be paid by check mailed to the registered address of such person.
     This Note is one of a duly authorized issue of securities of the Company (herein called the "Securities"), issued and to be issued in one or more series under an Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987 (herein called the "Indenture"), between the Company and BNY Midwest Trust Company, as successor to Harris Trust and Savings Bank, as trustee
 
(herein called the "Trustee," which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the holders of the Securities and of the terms upon which the Securities are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered. This Note is one of the series of Securities designated on the first page hereof (the Securities of such series being herein called the "Notes").
     The Company may, at its option, redeem the Notes in whole or in part at any time at a redemption price equal to the greater of (i) 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be redeemed, plus accrued interest to the redemption date, or (ii) as determined by the Independent Investment Banker, the sum of the present values of the remaining principal amount and scheduled payments of interest on the Notes to be redeemed (not including any portion of payments of interest accrued as of the redemption date) discounted to the redemption date on a semi-annual basis at the Treasury Rate plus 20 basis points plus accrued interest to the redemption date. The redemption price will be calculated assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months. "Treasury Rate" means, with respect to any redemption date, the rate per year equal to the semi-annual equivalent yield to maturity of the Comparable Treasury Issue, calculated on the third business day preceding the redemption date, assuming a price for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed as a percentage of its principal amount) equal to the Comparable Treasury Price for that redemption date. "Comparable Treasury Issue" means the United States Treasury security selected by the Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes that would be used, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Notes. "Comparable Treasury Price" means, with respect to any redemption date, (i) the average of the Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations for that redemption date, after excluding the highest and lowest of the Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations, or (ii) if the Trustee obtains fewer than three Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations so received. "Independent Investment Banker" means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company. "Reference Treasury Dealer" means (i) each of Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and their respective successors, unless either of them ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in New York City (a "Primary Treasury Dealer"), in which case the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer, and (ii) any other Primary Treasury Dealer selected by the Company. "Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations" means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on the third business day preceding that redemption date. The Company shall mail notice of any redemption at least 30 days but not more than 60 days before the redemption date to each holder of the Notes to be redeemed. The notice of redemption to each holder will specify, among other items, the redemption price and the principal amount of the Notes held by the holder to be redeemed. Notices of
 
redemption may not be conditional. Unless the Company defaults in payment of the redemption price, on and after the redemption date, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes or portions of the Notes called for redemption. If less than all of the Notes are to be redeemed at any time, the Trustee will select Notes for redemption as follows: (i) if the Notes are listed on any national securities exchange, in compliance with the requirements of such national securities exchange; or (ii) if the Notes are not listed on any national securities exchange, on a pro rata basis, by lot or by such method as the Trustee deems fair and appropriate. If any Note is to be redeemed in part only, the notice of redemption that relates to that Note must state the portion of the principal amount thereof to be redeemed. A new Note in principal amount equal to the unredeemed portion of the original Note will be issued in the name of the holder thereof upon cancellation of the original Note. No Notes of $1,000 or less will be redeemed in part.
     In case an Event of Default (as defined in the Indenture) with respect to the Notes shall have occurred and be continuing, the principal hereof may be declared, and upon such declaration shall become, due and payable, in the manner, with the effect and subject to the conditions provided in the Indenture. The Indenture also provides that, prior to any declaration accelerating the maturity of the Securities of any series, the holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities of such series at the time outstanding may on behalf of the holders of all of the Securities of such series waive any past default or Event of Default under the Indenture and its consequences except a default in the payment of principal of, or premium, if any, or interest on the Securities of such series.
     The Indenture contains provisions permitting the Company and the Trustee, with the consent of the holders of not less than 66 2/3% in aggregate principal amount of the securities of each series to be affected at the time outstanding, evidenced as provided in the Indenture, to execute supplemental indentures adding any provisions to or changing in any manner or eliminating any of the provisions of the Indenture or of any supplemental indenture or modifying in any manner the rights of the holders of the Securities of such series; provided, however, that no such supplemental indenture shall (i) extend the fixed maturity on any Security of such series, or reduce the rate or extend the time of payment of interest thereon, or reduce the principal amount thereof or any premium thereon, or extend the time of or reduce the amount of any mandatory sinking fund payment, or make the principal of any Security or any premium or interest thereon payable in any coin or currency other than that provided for in the Securities of such series or adversely affect the rights of the Securityholders to institute suit for the enforcement of any payment of principal of or premium, if any, or interest on any Security of such series, in each case without the consent of the holder of each Security so affected, or (ii) reduce the aforesaid percentage of Securities, the holders of which are required to consent to any such supplemental indenture, without the consent of the holders of all Securities of such series then outstanding.
     No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and interest on this Note at the place, at the respective times, at the rate and in the coin or currency herein prescribed.
 
     The Notes are issued in registered form without coupons in denominations of $1,000 or any integral multiple of $1,000. In the manner and subject to the limitations provided in the Indenture, but without the payment of any service charge, Notes may be exchanged for an equal aggregate principal amount of Notes of other authorized denominations at the principal executive office of the Company or, at the option of the registered holder thereof, at its office or agency maintained for such exchange in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois, or the Borough of Manhattan, The City and State of New York.
     The Notes are not entitled to the benefit of, and are not subject to, any mandatory or optional sinking fund.
     Except as otherwise provided in this Note, upon due presentment for registration of transfer of this Note at the principal executive offices of the Company or, at the option of the person making presentment for registration of transfer, at its office or agency maintained for such registration in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois or the Borough of Manhattan, The City and State of New York, a new Note or Notes of authorized denomination for any equal aggregate principal amount will be issued to the transferee in exchange herefor, subject to the limitations provided in the Indenture, without charge except for any tax or other governmental charge imposed in connection therewith.
     The Company, the Trustee, any paying agent or Authenticating Agent and any Security Registrar may deem and treat the registered holder hereof as the absolute owner of this Note (whether or not this Note shall be overdue and notwithstanding any notation of ownership or other writing hereon) for the purpose of receiving payment hereof or on account hereof, as herein and in the Indenture provided, and for all other purposes, and neither the Company nor the Trustee nor any paying agent nor any Authenticating Agent nor any Security Registrar shall be affected by any notice to the contrary. All such payments shall effectively satisfy and discharge the liability upon this Note to the extent of the sum or sums so paid.
     No recourse for the payment of the principal of or interest on this Note, or for any claim based hereon or otherwise in respect hereof, and no recourse under or upon any obligation, covenant or agreement of the Company contained in the Indenture or in any supplemental indenture, or in this Note, or because of the creation of any indebtedness represented hereby, shall be had against any incorporator, stockholder, officer or director as such, past, present or future, of the Company or any successor corporation, either directly or through the Company or any successor corporation, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as a part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
     This Note shall not be valid or become obligatory for any purpose until the certificate of authentication hereon shall have been signed by the Trustee under the Indenture referred to below.
 
     IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Brunswick Corporation has caused this instrument to be signed in its name by one of its Vice Presidents under its corporate seal and attested by the signature of its Secretary or one of its Assistant Secretaries.
[Seal]
ATTEST:
     This is one of the Securities of the series designated therein referred to in the within-mentioned Indenture.

 
Exhibit 12.1
Brunswick Corporation
Computation of Ratio of Earnings to Fixed Charges
(A)
(In millions)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20040729092043.txt.gz
TIME:20040729092043
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
     (c) Exhibits.
Item 12. Results of Operation and Financial Condition.
On July 29, 2004, Brunswick Corporation announced its second quarter 2004 financial results. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a "non-GAAP financial measure" is a numerical measure of a registrant's historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States. Pursuant to the requirements of Regulation G, Brunswick has included, as a part of the news release, a reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswick's management believes that these measures  including those that are "non-GAAP financial measures"  and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswick's performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswick's ongoing business performance. Brunswick's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "free cash flow" is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswick's management believes that presentation of 2003 operating earnings, operating margins and earnings per share excluding a first quarter 2003 litigation charge, and presentation of sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior year's results, provides a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: July 29, 2004
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Court Lake Forest, IL 60045 Telephone 847.735.4700 Facsimile 847.735.4750 www.brunswick.com
      Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today a 68 percent increase in net earnings on 33 percent sales growth and a 60 percent improvement in operating earnings for the second quarter of 2004. Net earnings totaled $90.1 million, or $0.93 per diluted share, for the second quarter, compared with net earnings of $53.6 million, or $0.59 per diluted share, for the year-ago quarter.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 29, 2004
     "All of our operations  marine, fitness and bowling and billiards  registered double-digit sales growth for the period, contributing to the company's outstanding performance in the quarter," said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley. "A stronger marine retail environment, popular new boats, engines and fitness equipment and recent acquisitions were the primary drivers behind the 33 percent sales gain. Excluding the effects of acquired businesses that were not part of the company a year ago, sales were up a strong 17 percent in the quarter. In addition, higher sales and production volumes, combined with effective cost management, resulted in a 60 percent increase in operating earnings to $139.5 million and a 170 basis point improvement in operating margins to 9.8 percent for the quarter. Our balance sheet remains in excellent shape, with debt-to-total capital of 31.9 percent at quarter end as compared with 34.9 percent a year earlier, and cash reached $438.2 million. The combination of sales growth, earnings growth and cash flow performance was quite remarkable this quarter."
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 2 of 13
Second Quarter Results
     For the quarter ended June 30, 2004, net sales increased 33 percent to $1,422.7 million, up from $1,071.0 million a year earlier. Operating earnings rose to $139.5 million compared with $87.2 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins improved to 9.8 percent from 8.1 percent. Net earnings totaled $90.1 million, or $0.93 per diluted share, up 68 percent from $53.6 million, or $0.59 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2003.
Marine Engine Segment
     The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group and Brunswick New Technologies (BNT), reported sales of $665.2 million in the second quarter of 2004, up 27 percent from $521.9 million in the year-ago second quarter. Operating earnings in the second quarter increased 49 percent to $95.6 million versus $64.2 million, and operating margins advanced 210 basis points to 14.4 percent compared with 12.3 percent for the same quarter in 2003.
     "While recent acquisitions contributed to this segment's solid results, sales for our core marine engine operations alone were up 21 percent, well outstripping industry numbers. Sales of outboard and sterndrive engines were up double digits for the quarter as were our parts and accessories and international sales," Buckley said. "A strong retail environment and excitement generated by our new Verado outboard engine, which we started shipping in April, helped set a positive tone and build momentum for the quarter."
     "When we launched Verado in February, we promised it would be unlike anything seen in the marketplace today, and we have succeeded in doing that," Buckley said. "Customer response has been very enthusiastic with Verado garnering critical acclaim and industry buzz. This high-horsepower, four-stroke outboard range is the only production supercharged engine on the market. Our investment has produced an engine unmatched in power, torque, near-silent running, excellent fuel economy and low-emissions."
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 3 of 13
     "During the quarter, BNT continued on plan, establishing itself as an integral, growing and increasingly valuable member of the Brunswick family," Buckley said. "While all BNT units did well, we have been particularly pleased with the performance of Navman NZ Limited, a producer of global positioning system-based products. Indeed, during the quarter, we purchased the remaining 30 percent of Navman, which had been our intent when we made the initial investment in June 2003. We believe that the combined strengths of Navman and Brunswick will lead to continued growth and more innovative products in this increasingly important market segment."
Boat Segment
     The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and includes the Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Sealine, Meridian, Boston Whaler, Trophy, Baja, Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Princecraft boat brands and the Land N' Sea and Attwood marine parts and accessories distribution and manufacturing businesses. The Boat segment reported sales for the second quarter of $629.9 million, up 50 percent compared with $418.9 million in the second quarter of 2003. Boat segment sales for the quarter benefited from the full impact of our 2003 acquisitions of Land N' Sea and Attwood, which serve as the foundation for a new boat parts and accessories business, as well as the Crestliner, Lowe and Lund aluminum boat brands acquired at the end of the first quarter of 2004. Excluding the sales of these businesses, Boat segment sales increased 17 percent in the quarter. Operating earnings increased to $57.0 million, 76 percent ahead of the $32.3 million reported in the second quarter of 2003, and operating margins rose 130 basis points to 9.0 percent, up from 7.7 percent.
     "We are particularly gratified by the performance of our leading boat brands," Buckley explained. "US Marine, maker of our Bayliner brand, joins our Sea Ray, Boston Whaler, Baja and Sealine brands registering double-digit sales gains for the quarter. Such performance points to our boat brands' appeal and reach, as well as our continuing focus on leading-edge products and innovation.
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 4 of 13
The Bayliner 175 runabout, the Sea Ray 500 Sundancer, the Boston Whaler 305 Conquest and the Trophy 2502 Walkaround are among our best selling models. But, we also saw superb growth in all of our new models and a strong order book emerging on large boats, especially Hatteras, which is as good or better than what we saw in 1999."
     "I'm also pleased to report that US Marine continued its quite remarkable turnaround, operating profitably for a second consecutive quarter, with sales up 29 percent in the quarter," Buckley noted. "Further, our Boat Group continues to benefit from higher volumes and effective cost management, which also contributed to the improved operating margins in the quarter."
Fitness Segment
     The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment, and operates Omni Fitness retail stores. Segment sales in the second quarter of 2004 reached $122.3 million, up 16 percent from $105.1 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings for the quarter totaled $2.9 million compared with $5.3 million in the second quarter of 2003, and operating margins were 2.4 percent compared with 5.0 percent a year ago.
     "We were pleased with the growth in our fitness sales for the quarter," Buckley said. "This reflects the strength of our brands in the market as well as the steady drum beat of new products we have maintained for the past two years. Margins contracted somewhat in this off-season period, however, due to a combination of competitive pricing pressure in Europe, a shift in product mix towards hot selling but lower margin strength equipment, technology licensing costs and increases in steel pricing. We have made great progress in productivity improvements at our Ramsey, Minn., facility, which has been busily integrating products from the closure of our Paso Robles, Calif., facility, and productivity run rates are approaching pre-facility merger numbers. We expect steel pricing and technology costs to abate in the coming year, which, along with
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 5 of 13
further reductions in delivery and installation costs, should help to narrow the year-over-year operating margin gap."
Bowling & Billiards Segment
     The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the second quarter of 2004 totaled $105.8 million, up 12 percent compared with $94.1 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings more than doubled to $4.2 million in the second quarter versus $1.9 million, and operating margins improved to 4.0 percent compared with 2.0 percent in 2003.
     "The quarter saw strong sales gains in our bowling products group, led by the success of our new Vector scoring system," Buckley said. "Billiards sales were also up double digits, aided by the acquisition of Valley-Dynamo in June 2003. Excluding Valley-Dynamo, Bowling & Billiards segment sales increased 6 percent. Valley-Dynamo, which concentrates on the coin-operated pool table market, gives Brunswick a solid one-two punch along side its traditional billiards operations, where new tables, such as the contemporary Metro, have energized sales."
     "During the quarter, we opened two new bowling entertainment centers located in suburban Chicago and Denver, which are based on an enhanced Brunswick Zone concept," Buckley said. "These newly built centers are about twice the size of our traditional centers and feature not only bowling, but expanded recreation options designed to attract families who come to have fun, which is what our retail centers are all about. Initial sales in these two new centers were very encouraging and were multiples of what we typically see in traditional bowling centers in the slow summer season. A new business model in bowling is clearly beginning to emerge, and we intend to capitalize on it."
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 6 of 13
Six-Month Results
     For the six months ended June 30, 2004, the company had net sales of $2,622.3 million, up 31 percent from $2,005.5 million for the first half of 2003. Excluding contributions from acquired businesses, sales were up 17 percent. Operating earnings totaled $218.0 million for the first half of 2004, more than double the $100.2 million reported for the corresponding period in 2003, and operating margins expanded 330 basis points, reaching 8.3 percent versus 5.0 percent a year ago. Operating earnings for the first six months of 2003 include a $25.0 million litigation charge ($16.0 million after tax) recorded in the first quarter of 2003. Excluding the litigation charge, operating earnings were $125.2 million, and operating margins were 6.2 percent for the first half of 2003.
     Net earnings for the first six months of 2004 reached $138.1 million, or $1.43 per diluted share, up from $57.4 million, or $0.63 per diluted share, for the same period in 2003. Excluding the previously mentioned litigation charge, net earnings for the first half of 2003 totaled $73.4 million, or $0.81 per diluted share.
Looking Ahead
     "Based on our performance in the first six months and our current outlook, 2004 is shaping up to be a record year for Brunswick, which is testimony to the soundness of our strategy and our capabilities to execute against that plan," Buckley commented. "Likewise, we have been bolstered by the steadily improving economic climate and marine marketplace, having anticipated and reacted to market changes and opportunities. Retail demand for our marine products is tracking at our estimates, and higher volumes are resulting in improved operating margins. Inventories are in great shape with 21 weeks supply of boats and 17 weeks supply of engines in the pipeline, both down about two weeks from a year ago. This is just where we want to be as we enter the new boat model year  clean pipelines and good momentum. When we consider all these factors, along with contributions from recent acquisitions, we are again raising our estimate for 2004 to $2.60 to $2.68 per share from our
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 7 of 13
previous estimate of $2.45 to $2.65 per share. For the third quarter, we're estimating earnings in the range of $0.60 to $0.65 per share. Free cash flow has also been significantly better than our estimates, and we should close the year at almost $290 million."
Forward-Looking Statements
     Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the success of new product introductions; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the financial strength of dealers and independent boat builders; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the company's ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the impact of financial markets on pension expense and funding levels; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; competition from new technologies; impact of possible duties on Japanese-manufactured outboard engines sold in the United States; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; and increases in tariffs on the Company's bowling equipment sales into Europe. Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2003 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004.
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 8 of 13
About Brunswick
     
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian, Sealine, Bermuda, Ornvik, Savage and Uttern pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Arvor, Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Princecraft aluminum fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 9 of 13
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data) (unaudited)
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 10 of 13
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data) (unaudited)
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 11 of 13
Brunswick Corporation Selected Financial Information
(in millions) (unaudited)
Segment Information
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 12 of 13
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Balance Sheets
(in millions)
 
Brunswick Corporation July 29, 2004 Page 13 of 13
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(in millions) (unaudited)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20040730145738.txt.gz
TIME:20040730145738
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
Table of Contents
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
Table of Contents
Item 11. Temporary Suspension of Trading Under Registrant's Employee Benefit Plans
The Brunswick Employee Stock Ownership Plan (the "BESOP") is coming to its scheduled end. As a result, BESOP balances for each BESOP participant who is also a participant in a 401(k) plan maintained by Brunswick Corporation ("Brunswick") will be transferred to the ESOP Company Stock Fund.
In order to facilitate the transfer, affected plan participants and beneficiaries will be prohibited from effecting certain transactions in the ESOP Company Stock Fund held in the following plans during the period beginning at 9 a.m. Eastern Time on September 15, 2004 and ending at 4 p.m. Eastern Time on September 22, 2004:
The Brunswick Retirement Savings Plan;
The Brunswick Rewards Plan; and
The Brunswick Rewards Plan With Variable Profit Sharing.
Trading restrictions include loan transactions, distributions (including hardship withdrawals), fund election and contribution changes, and fund transfers and reallocations.
Brunswick received notice, as required by Section 101(i)(2)(E) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, of the temporary trading suspension from the Brunswick Benefits Administration Committee, the plan administrator for each of the above plans, on July 30, 2004. Notice of the temporary trading suspension has been sent to all affected plan participants and beneficiaries.
The temporary trading suspension qualifies as a "blackout period" under Regulation BTR promulgated pursuant to Section 306(a)(3) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. Notice of this blackout period has also been sent to Brunswick's directors and executive officers.
Inquiries concerning the blackout period should be directed to Kristin M. Coleman, Brunswick's Associate General Counsel, at 1 N. Field Ct., Lake Forest, Illinois 60045-4811 or (847) 735-4700.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20041028090856.txt.gz
TIME:20041028090856
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 28, 2004, Brunswick Corporation announced its third quarter 2004 financial results. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a "non-GAAP financial measure" is a numerical measure of a registrant's historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States. Pursuant to the requirements of Regulation G, Brunswick has included, as a part of the news release, a reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswick's management believes that these measures  including those that are "non-GAAP financial measures"  and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswick's performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswick's ongoing business performance. Brunswick's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "free cash flow" is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswick's management believes that presentation of 2003 operating earnings, operating margins and earnings per share excluding a first quarter 2003 litigation charge, and presentation of sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior year's results, provides a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits.
Table of Contents
     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Dated: October 28, 2004
Table of Contents

 
Exhibit 99.1
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Court Lake Forest, IL 60045
Telephone 847.735.4700 Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
      Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today net earnings of $72.9 million, or $0.75 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2004, compared with $37.9 million, or $0.41 per diluted share, for the year-ago quarter. The company said that earnings in the 2004 third quarter benefited by approximately $0.10 per diluted share from completion of a tax audit, discussed below. Operating earnings in the third quarter of 2004 rose 59 percent on a 23 percent sales gain.
LAKE FOREST, III., Oct. 28, 2004
     "Led by our marine and fitness equipment units, we had another excellent quarter of solid sales growth," commented Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley. "Higher unit volumes due to market growth and the success of new products, strength in international markets and contributions from acquisitions completed earlier this year were the primary drivers behind the 23 percent sales gain. Excluding sales from companies that were not in the portfolio a year ago, sales were up 14 percent in the third quarter. Through effective cost management and higher unit volumes, we leveraged our top-line growth into a 59 percent increase in operating earnings to $99.3 million and a 180 basis point improvement in operating margins."
     "We again ended the quarter with our balance sheet in excellent shape. Debt-to-total capital was 30.7 percent at quarter end, compared with 33.3 percent a year earlier, and cash reached $493.1 million. This provides us with the financial flexibility to make additional acquisitions and investments, advance our core businesses and capitalize on opportunities to carry out our growth strategy," Buckley said.
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 2 of 14
     "Our third quarter results were achieved despite an increasingly competitive global marketplace and disruptions caused by the four hurricanes that hit Florida and impacted much of the Southeastern United States," Buckley added. "Fortunately, their immediate effect on Brunswick was minimized through the grit and determination of our dedicated employees. We estimate that interruptions to our sales and production efforts during those trying weeks cost Brunswick about $0.05 in earnings per diluted share in the third quarter."
     "Although the storms have passed, we probably haven't seen the end of their impact on our business," Buckley continued. "The fourth quarter is seasonally the slowest for marine retail sales, and the sales effect of the hurricanes will likely linger for a while longer. As you would expect, people will probably be more focused on rebuilding and repairing their homes and getting their lives back together than on repairing or replacing their boats. Once repairs have been made to the infrastructure, such as damaged docks and marinas, there will, however, be a longer-term new boat and repair part sales opportunity. Our objective is to get a disproportionate share of that opportunity. The replacement cycle will most likely be layered in over several quarters. Further, industry estimates are still being compiled and, at this time, we don't know how many boats were totally destroyed versus damaged. Insurance industry estimates of sailboat and powerboat repairs and replacements from all four hurricanes exceed $680 million, excluding damage that occurred in the Caribbean and to the marine infrastructure. With many moving parts, these things are difficult to predict accurately, but we have assumed some lingering hurricane impact in our current-year earnings estimate."
Third Quarter Results
     For the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2004, net sales increased 23 percent to $1,273.2 million, up from $1,036.3 million a year earlier. Operating earnings rose to $99.3 million compared with $62.5 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins improved to 7.8 percent from 6.0 percent. Net earnings totaled $72.9 million, or $0.75 per diluted
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 3 of 14
share, up 92 percent from $37.9 million, or $0.41 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2003.
Tax Provision for 2004
     The company said that, during the third quarter, the Internal Revenue Service completed its routine audit of tax years 1998 through 2001. Following the completion of the examination of this four-year period, Brunswick reduced its tax reserves and, consequently, its tax provision by approximately $10 million in the third quarter of 2004. This is equivalent to approximately $0.10 per diluted share in the quarter. Further, during the third quarter, Brunswick reduced its projected tax rate for the year to 32.5 percent from 33 percent, excluding the impact of the audits. This was due to effective tax planning and a higher-than-anticipated tax benefit from export sales. As a result of these items, the company's effective tax rate was 20.5 percent and 29.1 percent for the quarter and nine months ended Sept. 30, 2004, respectively.
     In addition, as a result of the extension of the research and development tax credit by Congress in early October, the company said it expects to reduce further its full-year tax rate to 32 percent in the fourth quarter of 2004. This excludes the impact of the audits, noted above.
Marine Engine Segment
     The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group and Brunswick New Technologies (BNT), reported sales of $575.5 million in the third quarter of 2004, up 15 percent from $500.8 million in the year-ago third quarter. Operating earnings in the third quarter increased 16 percent to $70.7 million versus $60.9 million, and operating margins were up slightly to 12.3 percent as compared with 12.2 percent for the same quarter in 2003.
     "Our outboard and sterndrive engine sales increased during the quarter in both the domestic and international markets," Buckley said. "Parts and accessories sales,
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 4 of 14
however, while up in the quarter, were adversely affected by the unprecedented hurricane activity throughout the Southeast. Mother Nature kept people off the water, not using their boats, and subsequently not requiring the usual complement of maintenance and replacement parts and products."
     "In the quarter, BNT again recorded strong sales growth along with positive overall operating margins. This was primarily due to the contributions from Navman, a producer of global positioning system-based products," Buckley noted.
     "We continue to see strong demand for our Verado family of high-horsepower, four-stroke outboard engines, which are designed to meet low-emission requirements while maintaining the high-performance characteristics of traditional two-stroke outboards," Buckley explained. "Operating margins, however, were adversely affected by the typical start-up costs associated with the introduction of Verado, the transition to low-emission outboards that carry lower margins, expenses related to our China manufacturing plant currently under construction, as well as by higher research and development spending, primarily for BNT and new Verado models to be released next year. Margin improvement will continue to be a focus in our Marine Engine segment as we seek to mitigate the cost pressures through effective cost management, global sourcing and applying the principles of Lean Six Sigma to improve productivity. Our China plant and our expanded Japanese manufacturing plant are scheduled to come on line late in the first quarter next year, which will gradually help improve our margins," Buckley said.
Boat Segment
     The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and includes the Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Sealine, Meridian, Boston Whaler, Trophy, Baja, Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Princecraft boat brands and the Land N' Sea and Attwood marine parts and accessories distribution and manufacturing businesses. The Boat segment reported sales for the third quarter of $567.3 million, up 40 percent compared with $404.5 million in the third quarter of 2003. Operating earnings increased to $36.1 million, more than quadruple the $8.2 million reported in the third quarter of 2003, and
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 5 of 14
operating margins increased by 440 basis points, rising to 6.4 percent for the quarter from 2.0 percent a year ago. About half of the sales gain was due to incremental sales from acquisitions, primarily the aluminum boat brands purchased in April of this year. Nevertheless, Boat segment sales absent acquisitions were up a healthy 18 percent for the quarter, even with the hurricane impact.
     The significant improvement in operating margins was the result of a number of factors, including higher unit volumes and a richer product mix. The Boat segment also benefited from the turnaround at US Marine as the division reported its third consecutive quarter of profitability.
     "The hurricanes had a significant impact on the Boat segment," Buckley noted. "We shut down our Sea Ray and Boston Whaler plants on the East Coast of Florida for each of the hurricanes, losing several production days. In addition, our Land N' Sea distribution facility in Lake Suzy, Fla., was virtually destroyed by Hurricane Charley. We are grateful that all of our employees made it safely through the storms and are pleased to report that our boat plants are all operational, and our Land N' Sea customers are being serviced from our other distribution centers."
Fitness Segment
     The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment, and operates Omni Fitness retail stores. Segment sales in the third quarter of 2004 reached $132.2 million, up 26 percent from $105.1 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings for the quarter totaled $8.4 million compared with $8.7 million in the third quarter of 2003, and operating margins were 6.4 percent compared with 8.3 percent a year ago.
     "Life Fitness continued to build sales momentum during the quarter, with gains in the commercial segment being driven by the success of our new strength products and increased sales to the military," Buckley said. "Further, the success of new Life Fitness consumer products released during the quarter helped advance sales."
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 6 of 14
     "Operating margins in this segment continue to be under pressure from significantly higher steel prices, a competitive pricing environment in the European market, and a shift in product mix towards hot selling, but lower margin, strength equipment," Buckley explained. "The year-over-year margin gap is narrowing as we continue to improve efficiency in U.S.-based manufacturing and restructure our overall manufacturing footprint. Our new Hungarian cardiovascular equipment plant is on schedule to open in the first quarter of next year where material costs, as well as labor, are significantly lower than in the United States. Local manufacturing will help us reduce shipping costs and improve delivery times on cardiovascular products to better serve our European customers."
Bowling & Billiards Segment
     The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the third quarter of 2004 totaled $106.6 million, up 9 percent compared with $97.5 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings rose to $4.0 million in the third quarter versus $0.1 million, and operating margins improved to 3.8 percent compared with 0.1 percent in 2003.
     "The quarter again saw double-digit sales gains in our bowling products group, where our new Vector scoring system and popular new bowling balls, like the Inferno, continue to sell well," Buckley said. "Billiards sales were up for the quarter, with good growth in our traditional tables business, driven by the popularity of new models. Always a reliable and consistent performer, our bowling retail centers also posted solid growth, despite the hurricanes shutting down some of our centers for several days during the quarter."
     "We believe our family friendly approach to bowling is a key ingredient to the success of our new bowling entertainment centers, building on our popular Brunswick Zone concept. These centers are nearly twice the size of our traditional Brunswick Zones and feature expanded recreation options in addition to bowling," Buckley said.
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 7 of 14
"The two we opened during the second quarter in suburban Chicago and Denver continue to perform at or above our forecasts."
Nine-Month Results
    For the nine months ended Sept. 30, 2004, the company had net sales of $3,895.5 million, up 28 percent from $3,041.8 million for the first three quarters of 2003. Excluding contributions from acquired businesses, sales were up 16 percent. Operating earnings totaled $317.3 million for the first nine months of 2004, up from $162.7 million reported for the corresponding period in 2003, and operating margins reached 8.1 percent versus 5.3 percent a year ago. Operating earnings for the first nine months of 2003 include a $25.0 million litigation charge ($16.0 million after tax) recorded in the first quarter of 2003. Excluding the litigation charge, operating earnings were $187.7 million, and operating margins were 6.2 percent for the first nine months of 2003.
    Net earnings for the first nine months of 2004 reached $211.0 million, or $2.18 per diluted share, up from $95.3 million, or $1.04 per diluted share, for the same period in 2003. Excluding the previously mentioned litigation charge, net earnings for the nine months of 2003 totaled $111.3 million, or $1.22 per diluted share. Results for 2004 also benefited from a 29.1 percent effective tax rate for the nine-month period. This lower tax rate was due to the same factors that affected the tax rate for the third quarter of 2004, discussed above.
Looking Ahead
     "2004 is shaping up to be a record year for Brunswick, resulting from the efforts of our entire team to successfully execute our growth strategy," Buckley said. "Innovative new products and acquisitions are driving top-line growth, and effective cost management and operational improvements are leading to higher operating margins. Consequently, we are estimating diluted EPS for 2004 in the range of $2.70 to $2.75 per share. While this is above our previous estimate of $2.60 to $2.68 per share, keep
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 8 of 14
in mind that this new estimate includes approximately $0.10 per share related to the completion of the four-year tax return audit. In addition, we have factored into our estimate some carryover impact of the hurricanes, which will be somewhat offset by the lower full-year tax rate, as discussed previously."
Forward-Looking Statements
     Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the success of new product introductions; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the financial strength of dealers and independent boat builders; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the company's ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the impact of financial markets on pension expense and funding levels; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to resolve contract disputes with suppliers; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of possible duties on Japanese-manufactured outboard engines sold in the United States; competition from new technologies; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; and increases in tariffs on the company's bowling equipment sales into Europe. Additional
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 9 of 14
factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2003 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2004.
About Brunswick
     Headquartered in Lake Forest, III., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian, Sealine, Bermuda, Ornvik, Savage and Uttern pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Arvor, Boston Whaler and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Princecraft aluminum fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit .
www.brunswick.com
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 10 of 14
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data) (unaudited)
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 11 of 14
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data) (unaudited)
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 12 of 14 Brunswick Corporation Selected Financial Information
(in millions) (unaudited)
Segment Information
NM = Not Meaningful
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 13 of 14
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Balance Sheets
(in millions)
 
Brunswick Corporation Oct. 28, 2004 Page 14 of 14
Brunswick Corporation Comparative Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(in millions) (unaudited)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20041209163557.txt.gz
TIME:20041209163557
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
[ ]
   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
[ ]
   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
[ ]
   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
 
 
[ ]
   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
ITEM 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On December 6, 2004, the Human Resources and Compensation Committee of Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") approved the Brunswick Corporation 2005 Automatic Deferred Compensation Plan (the "Officer Plan"). The Officer Plan, which will become effective on January 1, 2005, provides for the automatic deferral of compensation payable by the Company and certain related entities that would, in the absence of such deferral, not be deductible by the Company by reason of section 162(m) of the Internal Revenue Code. The Officer Plan will replace the Company's existing Automatic Deferred Compensation Plan and is designed to comply with the requirements of the American Jobs Creation Act of 2004.
Cash compensation otherwise due to an executive that is deferred under the Officer Plan will be credited to an Automatic Cash Deferral Account established for such executive. Amounts in this account will be credited as of the last day of each calendar month with interest for that month at a rate equal to the greater of: (a) the prime rate in effect at Chase Manhattan Bank on the first day of the month plus four percentage points, or (b) the Company's short term borrowing rate. If an executive so elects, the Company may, after consultation with the executive, invest amounts credited to the executive's Automatic Cash Deferral Account in securities and other assets as the Company may determine.
Shares of the Company's Common Stock otherwise due to an executive that are deferred under the Officer Plan will be credited to an Automatic Stock Deferral Account. The Officer Plan does not provide for new grants of stock, but rather the deferral of stock which would otherwise have been paid to an executive pursuant to the Company's other plans. The Automatic Stock Deferral Account will be adjusted from time to time to reflect the deemed reinvestment of dividends in accordance with the terms of the Company's dividend reinvestment program.
Amounts credited to an executive's Automatic Cash Deferral Account and Automatic Stock Deferral Account shall be distributed upon the earliest of: (a) a "change in control" as defined under Internal Revenue Code section 409A or (b) six months after the date the executive ceases to be employed by the Company and certain related entities.
On December 7, 2004, the Company's Board of Directors (the "Board"), following the recommendation of the Corporate Governance Committee, approved the Brunswick Corporation 2005 Deferred Compensation Plan for Non-Employee Directors (the "Director Plan"). The Director Plan, which will become effective on January 1, 2005, and is designed to comply with the requirements of the American Jobs Creation Act of 2004, provides for the continuation of the deferral program previously been available to the Corporation's non-employee directors. Under the Director Plan, non-employee directors may elect to receive on a deferred basis, (i) the portion of the director's annual retainer that is payable in Company common stock (the "Stock Retainer") and (ii) shares of Company common stock in lieu of t he portion of the director's annual retainer that would otherwise be paid in cash (the "Cash Retainer"). Shares received under the mechanism established by the Director Plan shall be deemed to have been issued under the Company's 2003 Stock Incentive Plan.
 
Non-employee directors may elect under the Director Plan to receive all, some or none of their annual retainer on a deferred basis. An account will be established for each director who makes a deferral election under the Director Plan. That account will be credited with:
(i) a number of shares of Company Common Stock equal to the number of shares, otherwise payable as part of the Stock Retainer, the receipt of which the director has elected to defer,
(ii) a number of shares of Company Common Stock equal to the amount of the Cash Retainer that the director has elected to receive in deferred shares divided by the fair market value of a share of Company Common Stock on the date on which such amount would otherwise have been paid, and
(iii) a number of shares of Company Common Stock equal to 20% of the total number of shares of Company Common Stock credited to the account pursuant to (ii) above.
Accounts established under the Director Plan will be adjusted to reflect the reinvestment of dividends in accordance with the terms of the Company's dividend reinvestment program.
Amounts held in a non-employee director's account established pursuant to the Director Plan will be distributed on the first day of the calendar month following the date of the participant's "separation from service" with the Company, as defined under Internal Revenue Code section 409A. Upon a "change of control" (as defined under Internal Revenue Code section 409A), non-employee directors will receive a lump sum distribution of their account balance as soon as practicable after the date of the change of control. All distributions from accounts established under the Director Plan will be distributed by the Company in whole shares of Company Common Stock.
 
 
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 

EXHIBIT 10.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
1.1.
  
Purpose
.
The
Brunswick Corporation 2005 Automatic Deferred Compensation Plan (the "Plan") has been established by Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") to provide for the deferral of compensation payable to Covered Executives by the Company and Related Companies that would otherwise be non-deductible by reason of section 162(m) of the Code, and thereby avoid the loss of such deducti on, and to compensate the Covered Executives for such deferral. The Plan shall apply to the deferral of amounts that are earned or become vested after December 31, 2004.
The
Brunswick Corporation Automatic Deferred Compensation Plan (the "Prior Plan") shall apply to the deferral of amounts that are earned and become vested on or before December 31, 2004.
 
1.2.
  
Code
. For purposes of the Plan, the term "Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. References to sections of the Code also refer to any successor provisions thereof. If, after the Effective Date, there is a change in the provisions or interpretation of Code sections 162(m) or 409A which would have a material effect on the benefits
of the Plan
to a Covered Executive or the Co mpany, the Company shall revise the Plan in good faith to preserve the benefit
s
of the Plan for the Company, the Related Companies, and the Covered Executives; provided, however, that if any change to the Plan pursuant to this sentence is adverse to a Covered Executive, the Covered Executive shall be provided with reasonable compensation therefor
e
.
 
1.3.
  
Effective Date
. The "Effective Date" of the Plan is January 1, 2005.
 
1.4.
  
Related Companies
. The term "Related Company" means any company during any period in which compensation paid to a Covered Executive by such company would be required to be aggregated with compensation paid to the Covered Executive by the Company, in accordance with the affiliated group rules applicable to Code section 162(m). The Company shall enter into such arrangements with the Related Companies as it shall deem appropriate to implement the terms of the Plan, and shall inform the Covered Executive of any material failure to provide for such implementation.
 
1.5.
  
Operation and Administration
. The authority to control and manage the operation and administration of the Plan shall be vested in the Human Resources and Compensation Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Board"). In controlling and managing the operation and administration of the Plan, the Committee shall have the rights, powers and duties set forth in Section 6. Capitalized terms in the Plan shall be defined as set forth in the Plan.
 
1.6.
  
Applicable Law
. The Plan shall be construed and administered in accordance with the laws of the State of Illinois to the extent that such laws are not preempted by the laws of the United States of America.
 
1.7.
  
Number
. Where the context admits, words in the singular shall include the plural and the plural shall include the singular.
 
1.8.
  
Notices
. Any notice or document required to be filed with the Committee under the Plan will be properly filed if delivered or mailed to the Human Resources and Compensation Committee, in care of the Company, at its principal executive offices. The Committee may, by advance written notice to affected persons, revise such notice procedure from time to time. Any notice required under the Plan may be waived by the person entitled to notice.
 
1.9.
  
Benefits Under Qualified Plans
. Compensation of any Covered Executive that is deferred under the Plan, and benefits payable under the Plan, shall be disregarded for purposes of determining the benefits under any plan that is intended to be qualified under section 401(a) of the
Internal Revenue
Code
of 1986
.
 
1.10.
  
Other Costs and Benefits
. The Plan is intended to defer, but not to eliminate, payment of compensation to a Covered Executive. Accordingly, if any compensation or benefits that would otherwise be provided to a Covered Executive in the absence of the Plan are reduced or eliminated by reason of deferral under the Plan, the Company shall equitably compensate the Covered Executive for such reduction or elimination, and the Company shall reimburse the Covered Executive for any increased or additional
penalty
penalty
taxes which the Covered Executive may incur by reason of deferral under the Plan which would not have been incurred in the absence of such deferral, except that no reimbursement will be made for taxes resulting from an increase or decrease in individual income tax rates, or resulting from an increase in the amount of compensation payable to the Covered Executive by reason of the accrual of earnings or any other provision of the Plan.
 
1.11.
  
Evidence
. Evidence required of anyone under the Plan may be by certificate, affidavit, document or other information which the person acting on it considers pertinent and reliable, and signed, made or presented by the proper party or parties.
 
1.12.
  
Action by Company
. Any action required or permitted to be taken by the Company or any Related
C
Company shall be by resolution of its board of directors, or by a duly authorized officer of the
C
Company or Related Company, as the case may b e.
 
1.13.
  
Withholding
.
 
Except as otherwise provided by the Committee, (i) the deduction of withholding and any other taxes required by law will be made from all amounts paid in cash and (ii) in the case of payments in shares of common stock of the Company ("Company Stock"), the Participant shall be required to pay in cash t he amount of any taxes required to be withheld prior to receipt of such Company Stock, or alternatively, a number of shares of Company Stock the Fair Market Value (defined below) of which equals the amount required to be withheld may be deducted from the payment;
 
provided, however, that the number of shares of Company Stock so deducted may not have an aggregate Fair Market Value in excess of the amount determined by applying the minimum statutory withholding rate. "Fair Market Value" means the closing price on the New York Stock Exchange - Composite Transactions Tape on the relevant date or on the next preceding date on which a closing price was quoted; provided, however, that the Committee may specify some other definition of Fair Market Value.
 
1.14.
  
Adjustments
. In the event of any increase or decrease in the number of issued shares of Company Stock resulting from a subdivision or consolidation of shares or other capital adjustment, or the payment of a stock dividend or other increase or decrease in shares, effected without receipt of consideration by the Company, or other change in corporate or capital structure, the number and class of securities distributable under this Plan and the number of share units in Participants'
 
Automatic Stock Deferral Accounts shall be appropriately adjusted by the Committee; provided, however, that any fractional shares resulting from any such adjustment shall be eliminated. The decision of the Committee regarding any such adjustment shall be final, binding and conclusive.
 
 
 
2.1.
  
Covered Executives
. Subject to the terms of the Plan, an individual shall be a "Covered Executive" subject to the deferral requirements of the Plan for any year, if, for that year, the individual is a "covered employee" with respect to the Company, as that term is used in Code section 162(m)(3) and Treas.
 
Reg.
 
section 1.162-27(c)(2). The provisions of the Plan shall not apply to any employee to the extent that the employee is subject to an individual agreement with the Company providing for automatic deferral of compensation to avoid non-deductibility of compensation by reason of Code section 162(m).
 
2.2.
  
Plan Not Contract of Employment
. The Plan does not constitute a contract of employment, and participation in the Plan will not give any employee the right to be retained in the employ of the Company nor any right or claim to any benefit under the Plan, unless such right or claim has specifically accrued under the terms of the Plan.
 
 
 
3.1.
  
Deferred Amount
. If any compensation otherwise payable to a Covered Executive by the Company or any Related Company would be non-deductible by reason of Code section 162(m), such amount shall
,
 
unless otherwise provided by the Committee,
not be paid to the Covered Executive when otherwise due, but an amount equal to the foregone payment shall instead be credited to the Covered Executive's Automatic Cash Deferral Account or Automatic Stock Deferral Account in accordance with this Section 3. In determining the amounts subject to deferral under this subsection 3.1, the following shall apply:
 
 
 
 
 
 
3.2.
  
Automatic Cash Deferral Account
. The Automatic Cash Deferral Account balance shall be credited with the amount determined in accordance with subsection 3.1(a), as of the date on which such amount would otherwise have been paid to the Covered Executive were it not for deferral under the Plan. The Automatic Cash Deferral Account shall be adjusted from time to time in accordance with the following:
 
 
 
3.3.
  
Automatic Stock Deferral Account
.
Automatic Stock Deferral Account.
The Automatic Stock Deferral Account balance shall be credited with the number of share units equal to number of shares of Company Stock as of the date on which such shares would otherwise have been paid to a Covered Executive were it not for deferral under the Plan. The Automatic Stock Deferral Account shall be adjusted from time to time to reflect t he deemed reinvestment of dividends in accordance with the terms of the Company's dividend reinvestment program, as in effect from time to time.
 
3.4.
  
Statements
. On a quarterly basis, the Committee shall provide the Covered Executive with statements of the Covered Executive's Automatic Cash Deferral Account and Automatic Stock Deferral Account. Upon request of a Covered Executive, the Committee shall provide the computations of amounts under Sections 3 and 4.
 
 
 
4.1.
  
Time of Payment of Deferred Amount
. Amounts credited to a Covered Executive's Automatic Cash Deferral Account and Automatic Stock Deferral Account shall be paid or distributed upon the earliest of the following:
 
 
 
4.2.
  
Form of Payment of Deferred Amount
. To the extent that an amount is payable to or on behalf of a Covered Executive with respect to the Automatic Cash Deferral Account in accordance with subsection 3.2, it shall be paid by the Company in a cash lump sum. To the extent that an amount is payable to or on behalf of a Covered Executive with respect to the Automatic Stock Deferral Account in accordance with subsection 3.3, it shall be distributed by the Company in shares of Company Stock in a lump sum.
 
4.3.
  
Beneficiary
. Subject to the terms of the Plan, any benefits payable to a Covered Executive under the Plan that have not been paid at the time of the Covered Executive's death shall be paid at the time and in the form determined in accordance with the foregoing provisions of the Plan
,
to the beneficiary designated by the Covered Executive in writing filed with the Committee in such form and at such time as the Com mittee shall require. A beneficiary designation form will be effective only when the signed form is filed with the Committee while the Participant is alive and will cancel all beneficiary designation forms filed earlier. If a Covered Executive fails to designate a beneficiary, or if the designated beneficiary of the deceased Covered Executive dies before the Covered Executive or before complete payment of the Covered Executive's benefits, the amounts shall be paid to the legal representative or representatives of the estate of the last to die of the Covered Executive and the Covered Executive's designated beneficiary.
 
4.4.
  
Distributions to Disabled Persons
. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 4, if, in the Committee's opinion, a Covered Executive or a beneficiary is under a legal disability or is in any way incapacitated so as to be unable to manage such individual's financial affairs, the Committee may direct that payment be made to a relative or friend of such individual for such individual's benefit until claim is made by a conservator or other person legally charged with the care of such individual's person or estate, and such payment shall be in lieu of any such payment to the Co vered Executive or the beneficiary. Thereafter, any benefits under the Plan to which the Covered Executive or the beneficiary is entitled shall be paid to such conservator or other person legally charged with the care of such individual's person or estate.
 
4.5.
  
Benefit May Not be Assigned
. Neither a Covered Executive nor any other person shall have any voluntary or involuntary right to commute, sell, assign, pledge, anticipate, mortgage or otherwise encumber, transfer, hypothecate or convey in advance of actual receipt of the amounts, if any,
payable hereunder,
or any part
t
hereof,
payable hereunder,
which are expressly declared to be unassignable and non-transferable. No part of the amounts payable shall be, prior to actual payment, subject to seizure or sequestration for payment of any debts, judg
e
ments, alimony or separate maintenance ow
n
ed by the Covered Executive or any other person, or be transferred by operation of law in the event of the Covered Executive's or any other person's bankruptcy or insolvency. Payments to or on behalf of a Covered Executive under the Plan are not subject to reduction or offset for amounts due or alleged to be due from the Covered Employee to the Company or any Related Company.
 
 
 
The amount of any benefit payable under the Plan shall be paid from the general assets of the Company. Neither a Covered Executive nor any other person shall acquire by reason of the Plan any right in or title to any assets, funds or property of the Company whatsoever, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, any specific funds, assets, or other property which the Company, in its sole discretion, may set aside in anticipation of a liability under the Plan. A
C
overed Executive shall have only a contractual right to the amounts, if any, payable under the Plan, unsecured by any assets of the Company. Nothing conta ined in the Plan shall constitute a guarantee by the Company that the assets of the Company shall be sufficient to pay any benefits to any person.
 
 
 
6.1.
  
Powers of Committee
. The authority to control and manage all aspects of the operation and administration of the Plan shall be vested in the Committee. The Committee is authorized to interpret the Plan, to establish, amend, and rescind any rules and regulations relating to the Plan, and to make all other determinations that may be necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan. Except as otherwise specifically provided by the Plan, any determinations to be made by the Committee under the Plan shall be decided by the Committee in its sole discretion. Any interpretation of the Plan by the Committee and any decision made by it under the Plan is final and binding on all persons. The amount to be deferred under Section 3 shall be based on such estimates as the Committee determines in good faith to be appropriate.
 
6.2.
  
Delegation by Committee
. The Committee may allocate all or any portion of its responsibilities and powers to any one or more of its members and may delegate all or any part of its responsibilities and powers to any person or persons selected by it. Any such allocation or delegation may be revoked by the Committee at any time.
 
6.3.
  
Information to be Furnished to Committee
. The Company and the Related Companies shall furnish the Committee with such data and information as may be required for it to discharge its duties. The records of the Company and the Related Companies as to a Covered Executive's employment, termination of employment, leave of absence, reemployment and compensation shall be conclusive on all persons unless determined to be incorrect. Covered Executives and other persons entitled to benefits under the Plan must furnish the Committee such evidence, data or information as the Committee considers desirabl e to carry out the Plan.
 
6.4.
  
Liability and Indemnification of Committee
. No member or authorized delegate of the Committee shall be liable to any person for any action taken or omitted in connection with the administration of the Plan unless attributable to such individual's own fraud or willful misconduct; nor shall the Company be liable to any person for any such action unless attributable to fraud or willful misconduct on the part of a director or employee of the Company. The Committee, the individual members thereof, and persons acting as the authorized delegates of the Committee under the Plan, shall be indemnified by the Company against any and all liabilities, losses, costs and expenses (including legal fees and expenses) of whatsoever kind and nature which may be imposed on, incurred by or asserted against the Committee or its members or authorized delegates by reason of the performance of a Committee function if the Committee or its members or authorized delegates did not act dishonestly or in willful violation of the law or regulation under which such liability, loss, cost or expense arises. This indemnification shall not duplicate but may supplement any coverage available under any applicable insurance.
 
 
 
The Committee may, at any time, amend or terminate the Plan, subject to the following:
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 10.2
 
 
 
 
 
1.1.
  
Purpose
. The Brunswick Corporation Deferred Compensation Plan for Non-Employee Directors (the "Plan") has been established by Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") to provide non-employee directors with an opportunity to meet stock ownership guidelines and otherwise save in a tax effective manner and thereby aiding in attracting and retaining non-employee directors of exceptional ability. The Plan shall apply to amounts deferred after December 31, 2004; amounts deferred on or prior to that date shall be accounted for and governed by the Company's prior deferred compensati on program for non-employee Directors under the 1997 Stock Plan.
 
1.2.
  
Effective Date
. The "Effective Date" of the Plan is January 1, 2005.
 
1.3.
  
Operation and Administration
. The authority to control and manage the operation and administration of the Plan shall be vested in the Corporate Governance Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Board"). In controlling and managing the operation and administration of the Plan, the Committee shall have the rights, powers and duties set forth in Section 7. Capitalized terms in the Plan shall be defined as set forth in the Plan.
 
1.4.
  
Plan Year
. The term "Plan Year" means the calendar year.
 
1.5.
  
Applicable Law
. The Plan shall be construed and administered in accordance with the laws of the State of Illinois to the extent that such laws are not preempted by the laws of the United States of America.
 
1.6.
  
Number
. Where the context admits, words in the singular shall include the plural and the plural shall include the singular.
 
1.7.
  
Notices
. Any notice or document required to be filed with the Plan Administrator (as defined in subsection 7.1) or the Committee under the Plan will be properly filed if delivered or mailed to the Plan Administrator, in care of the Company, at its principal executive offices. The Plan Administrator may, by advance written notice to affected persons, revise such notice procedure from time to time. Any notice required under the Plan may be waived by the person entitled to notice.
 
1.8.
  
Form and Time of Elections
. Unless otherwise specified herein, each election required or permitted to be made by any Participant or other person entitled to benefits under the Plan, and any permitted modification or revocation thereof, shall be in writing filed with the Plan Administrator at such times, in such form, and subject to such restrictions and limitations as the Plan Administrator shall require.
 
1.9.
  
Evidence
. Evidence required of anyone under the Plan may be by certificate, affidavit, document or other information which the person acting on it considers pertinent and reliable, and signed, made or presented by the proper party or parties.
 
1.10.
  
Adjustments
. In the event of any increase or decrease in the number of issued shares of Company Stock resulting from a subdivision or consolidation of shares or other capital adjustment, or the payment of a stock dividend or other increase or decrease in shares, effected without receipt of consideration by the Company, or other change in corporate or capital structure, the number and class of securities distributable under this Plan and the number of shares in Participants' Accounts shall be appropriately adjusted by the Committee; provided, however, that any fractional shares resulting fro m any such adjustment shall be eliminated. The decision of the Committee regarding any such adjustment shall be final, binding and conclusive.
 
 
2.1.
  
Participant
. Subject to the terms of the Plan, a director of the Company who is not an employee of the Company or any of its subsidiaries (a "Non-Employee Director") shall be eligible to make deferrals under the Plan.
 
2.2.
  
Deferral Election
. A Non-Employee Director shall become a "Participant" in the Plan by electing to defer payment of all or a portion of the Non-Employee Director's Eligible Compensation pursuant to the terms of a "Deferral Election". A Non-Employee Director's Deferral Election with respect to Eligible Compensation for services to be performed in a calendar year shall be filed before the end of the preceding calendar year; provided, however, that the initial Deferral Election of a new Non-Employee Director may be filed within 30 days after the date on which such indiv idual became a Non-Employee Director, and shall be applicable only to Eligible Compensation for services to be performed by the Non-Employee Director after the Deferral Election is filed.
 
2.3.
  
Eligible Compensation
. For purposes of the Plan, a Non-Employee Director's "Eligible Compensation" means the sum of (a) the portion of such Non-Employee Director's annual retainer payable in common stock of the Company ("Eligible Stock Compensation") and (b) the portion of such Non-Employee Director's annual retainer payable in cash ("Eligible Cash Compensation").
 
 
 
3.1.
  
Deferred Compensation
Accounts
. An Account shall be maintained on behalf of each Participant, which shall be credited with (a) the number of shares of Company Stock payable to the Participant as Eligible Stock Compensation with respect to which the Participant has made a Deferral Election and (b) the number of "Original" shares equal to the sum of (i) the number of shares of Company Stock the "Fair Market Value" of which (determined as of the date on which the Eligible Cash Compen sation would have been paid to the Participant if it had not been deferred) equals the amount of the Eligible Cash Compensation with respect to which the Participant has made a Deferral Election and (ii) the number of "Premium" shares equal to 20% of the number of Original shares determined in (i). Such crediting shall occur as of the date on which the Eligible Compensation would have been paid to the Participant if it had not been deferred. A Participant's Account shall be adjusted to reflect the deemed reinvestment of dividends in accordance with the terms of the Company's dividend reinvestment program, as in effect from time to time, and shall be charged the amount of any distributions under the Plan that have not previously been charged. "Fair Market Value" means the closing price on the New York Stock Exchange - Composite Transactions Tape on the relevant date or on the next preceding date on which a closing price was quoted; provided, however, that the Committee may specif y some other definition of Fair Market Value.
 
3.2.
  
Statement of Accounts
. As soon as practicable after the end of each Plan Year, and at such other times as determined by the Committee, the Company shall provide each Participant with a statement of the transactions in the Participant's Accounts during that year and the Participant's Account balance as of the end of the year.
 
 
3.3
 
  
Relationship to 2003 Plan
. Shares of Company Stock awarded under the Plan shall be deemed to have been issued under the Company's 2003 Stock Incentive Plan, as it shall be amended from time to time (the "2003 Plan"). If there shall no longer be shares of Company Stock available for issuance under the 2003 Plan, whether due to termination of such plan or otherwise, shares of Company Stock awarded under the Plan shall be deemed to be issued under such other plan that (a) has been approved by the stockholders of the Company and (b) provides for awards of shares of Company Stock to Non-Employee Directors (an "Alternative Plan"). If there shall no longer be shares of Company Stock available for issuance under the 2003 Plan and there is no Alternative Plan, no additional shares of Company Stock shall be issued to Non-Employee Directors under the Plan.
 
 
 
4.1.
  
General
. Subject to this Section 4 and Section 5 (relating to change in control), the balance of a Participant's Account shall be distributed on the first day of the calendar month following the date of the Participant's "separation from service" with the Company (as defined under Code section 409A). Distribution shall be made in either a single lump sum or in annual installments for up to 15 years, as elected by the Participant in the Participant's Distribution Election (defined below). The elected number of installments will automatically be shortened to the number of y ears equal to the account value at time of first scheduled distribution divided by $10,000.
 
4.2.
  
Distribution Election
. A Participant's initial Deferral Election shall specify the number of payments in which the Participant's Account shall be distributed ("Distribution Election"). A Participant's Distribution Election may be changed to increase, but not to decrease, the number of payments in which the Participant's Account shall be distributed, subject to the following:
 
 
 
4.3.
  
Medium of Payment
. All distributions from Participants' Accounts shall be distributed by the Company in whole shares of Company Stock (plus cash equal to the Fair Market Value of any fractional share).
 
4.4.
  
Beneficiary
. Subject to the terms of the Plan, any benefits payable to a Participant under the Plan that have not been paid at the time of the Participant's death shall be paid at the time and in the form determined in accordance with the foregoing provisions of the Plan, to the beneficiary designated by the Participant in writing filed with the Plan Administrator in such form and at such time as the Plan Administrator shall require. A beneficiary designation form will be effective only when the signed form is filed with the Plan Administrator while the Participant is alive and will cancel a ll beneficiary designation forms filed earlier. If a deceased Participant failed to designate a beneficiary, or if the designated beneficiary of a deceased Participant dies before the Participant or before complete payment of the Participant's benefits, the amounts shall be paid to the legal representative or representatives of the estate of the last to die of the Participant and the Participant's designated beneficiary.
 
4.5.
  
Distributions to Disabled Persons
. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 4, if, in the Plan Administrator's opinion, a Participant or beneficiary is under a legal disability or is in any way incapacitated so as to be unable to manage such individual's financial affairs, the Plan Administrator may direct that payment be made to a relative or friend of such individual for such individual's benefit until claim is made by a conservator or other person legally charged with the care of such individual's person or estate, and such payment shall be in lieu of any such payment to such Participant or beneficiary. Thereafter, any benefits under the Plan to which such Participant or beneficiary is entitled shall be paid to such conservator or other person legally charged with the care of such individual's person or estate.
 
4.6.
  
Benefits May Not be Assigned
. Neither the Participant nor any other person shall have any voluntary or involuntary right to commute, sell, assign, pledge, anticipate, mortgage or otherwise encumber, transfer, hypothecate or convey in advance of actual receipt of the amounts, if any, payable hereunder, or any part hereof, which are expressly declared to be unassignable and non-transferable. No part of the amounts payable shall be, prior to actual payment, subject to seizure or sequestration for payment of any debts, judgements, alimony or separate maintenance owed by the Participant or any other p erson, or be transferred by operation of law in the event of the Participant's or any other person's bankruptcy or insolvency.
 
 
 
To the extent provided by the Secretary of the Treasury under Code section 409A, each Participant's then effective Deferral Election and Distribution Election shall be automatically revoked as of the date on which a "change in control" (as defined under Code section 409A occurs and the Participant shall receive a lump sum distribution of the Participant's Account balance as soon as practicable after the date of the change in control. Such distribution shall be made to the Participant regardless of any elections providing for later distribution that may otherwise be applicable under the Plan.
 
 
 
Neither a Participant nor any other person shall, by reason of the Plan, acquire any right in or title to any assets, funds or property of the Company whatsoever, including, without limitation, any specific funds, assets, or other property which the Company, in its sole discretion, may set aside in anticipation of a liability under the Plan. A Participant shall have only a contractual right to the amounts, if any, payable under the Plan, unsecured by any assets of the Company. Nothing contained in the Plan shall constitute a guarantee by the company that the assets of the Company shall be sufficient to pay any benefits to any person.
 
 
 
7.1.
  
Powers of Committee
. Responsibility for the day-to-day administration of the Plan shall be vested in the Plan Administrator, which shall be the Committee. The authority to control and manage all other aspects of the operation and administration of the Plan shall also be vested in the Committee. The Committee is authorized to interpret the Plan, to establish, amend, and rescind any rules and regulations relating to the Plan, to determine the terms and provisions of any agreements made pursuant to the Plan, and to make all other determinations that may be necessary or advisable for the administrati on of the Plan. Except as otherwise specifically provided by the Plan, any determinations to be made by the Committee under the Plan shall be decided by the Committee in its sole discretion. Any interpretation of the Plan by the Committee and any decision made by it under the Plan is final and binding on all persons.
 
7.2.
  
Delegation by Committee
. The Committee may allocate all or any portion of its responsibilities and powers to any one or more of its members and may delegate all or any part of its responsibilities and powers to any person or persons selected by it. Any such allocation or delegation may be revoked by the Committee at any time. Until the Committee takes action to the contrary, the powers and responsibilities of the Plan Administrator shall be delegated to the Vice President - Human Resources (or delegate) of the Company, subject to such direction as may be provided to the Vice President - Human Res ources or delegate from time to time by the Committee.
 
7.3.
  
Information to be Furnished to Committee
. The Company shall furnish the Committee with such data and information as may be required for it to discharge its duties. The records of the Company as to a Participant's membership on the Board shall be conclusive on all persons unless determined to be incorrect. Participants and other persons entitled to benefits under the Plan must furnish the Committee such evidence, data or information as the Committee considers desirable to carry out the Plan.
 
7.4.
  
Liability and Indemnification of Committee
. No member or authorized delegate of the Committee shall be liable to any person for any action taken or omitted in connection with the administration of the Plan unless attributable to such individual's own fraud or willful misconduct; nor shall the Company be liable to any person for any such action unless attributable to fraud or willful misconduct on the part of a director or employee of the Company. The Committee, the individual members thereof, and persons acting as the authorized delegates of the Committee under the Plan, shall be indemnified by the Company against any and all liabilities, losses, costs and expenses (including legal fees and expenses) of whatsoever kind and nature which may be imposed on, incurred by or asserted against the Committee or its members or authorized delegates by reason of the performance of a Committee function if the Committee or its members or authorized delegates did not act dishonestly or in willful violation of the law or regulation under which such liability, loss, cost or expense arises. This indemnification shall not duplicate but may supplement any coverage available under any applicable insurance.
 
 
 
The Committee may, at any time, amend or terminate the Plan (including the rules for administration of the Plan), subject to the following:
 
 
 
 
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20050127090803.txt.gz
TIME:20050127090803
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 [ ] 
   
 
   
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 27, 2005, Brunswick Corporation announced its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2004 and the full year. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a "non-GAAP financial measure" is a numerical measure of a registrant's historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP fina ncial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States. Pursuant to the requirements of Regulation G, Brunswick has included, as a part of the news release, a reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswick's management believes that these measures- including those that are "non-GAAP financial measures"- and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswick's performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswick's ongoing business performance. Brunswick's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "free cash flow" is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Br unswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswick's management believes that presentation of: (i) 2003 operating earnings, operating margins and earnings per share excluding a first quarter 2003 litigation charge; (ii) sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior year's results; and (iii) Brunswick's effective tax rate excluding a tax reserve reduction, provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 

               
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
  
 
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Court Lake Forest, IL 60045
Telephone 847.735.4700 Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
 
 
Release:      IMMEDIATE
Contact:      Kathryn Chieger
 Vice President - Corporate and Investor Relations
   
 
  
Phone:         847-735-4612
 
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today net earnings of $58.8 million, or $0.59 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2004, up from net earnings of $39.9 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, for the year-ago quarter. The company said the 47 percent increase in net earnings came on a 23 percent increase in sales and a 42 percent improvement in operating earnings.
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Jan. 27, 2005
Commenting on the quarter, Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley said, "We had a strong finish to an excellent year with our Marine Engine, Boat and Fitness segments posting double-digit sales increases for the quarter. Excluding acquisitions completed earlier in the year, net sales for the quarter were up 16 percent. Due to our continual emphasis on operations excellence and effective cost management, we leveraged these sales gains into increased operating earnings and a 90-basis-point improvement in operating margins to 6.3 percent for the final quarter of the year."
 
Fourth Quarter Results
 
For the quarter ended Dec. 31, 2004, the company reported that net sales increased 23 percent to $1,333.8 million, up from $1,086.9 million a year earlier. Sales in the fourth quarter of 2004 benefited from higher boat volumes and acquisitions. Led by double-digit improvements in the Marine Engine, Boat and Bowling & Billiards segments, operating earnings rose 42 percent to $83.4 million, compared with $58.7 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins improved to 6.3 percent from 5.4 percent. Net earnings rose to $58.8 million, or $0.59 per diluted share, up from $39.9 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2003.
2004 Results
For the year ended Dec. 31, 2004, the company had net sales of $5,229.3 million, up 27 percent from $4,128.7 million in 2003. Sales in 2004 benefited from acquisitions made earlier in the year, as well as incremental sales from acquisitions completed in 2003. Excluding acquisitions, net sales were up 16 percent. Operating earnings reached $400.7 million for the year, up 81 percent from $221.4 million in 2003, and operating margins reached 7.7 percent versus 5.4 percent a year ago. Operating earnings for 2003 include a $25.0 million litigation charge ($16.0 million after tax, or $0.18 per diluted share) recorded in the first quarter of 2003. Excluding the litigation charge, operating earnings were $246.4 million and operating margins were 6.0 percent in 2003. Net earnings for 2004 doubled to $269.8 million, or $2.77 per diluted share, compared with $135.2 million, or $1.47 per diluted share, in 2003. Excluding the previously mentioned litigation charge, net earnings totaled $151.2 million, or $1.65 per diluted share, in 2003.
 
For the year, higher sales and effective cost management helped to mitigate increased research and development (R&D) spending, higher variable compensation costs, costs of integrating acquisitions, investments in new manufacturing plants and higher spending to support new product introductions.
The company said that, during the third quarter of 2004, the Internal Revenue Service completed its routine audit of tax years 1998 through 2001. Following the completion of the examination of this four-year period, Brunswick reduced its tax reserves and, consequently, its tax provision by approximately $10 million in the third quarter of 2004. This is equivalent to approximately $0.10 per diluted share. In addition, Brunswick reduced its effective tax rate for the year to 31.4 percent, excluding the impact of the audits, compared with 32.75 percent in 2003. This was due to effective tax planning, higher tax benefits from export sales and higher research and development tax credits. The company said it expects its effective tax rate for 2005 to be between 31 percent and 32 percent.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group and Brunswick New Technologies, reported sales of $584.6 million in the fourth quarter of 2004, up 23 percent from $473.4 million in the year-ago fourth quarter. Operating earnings in the fourth quarter were up 28 percent to $34.3 million versus $26.7 million, and operating margins increased to 5.9 percent compared with 5.6 percent for the same quarter in 2003.
 
For the full year, Marine Engine segment sales rose 23 percent to $2,353.2 million, and operating earnings were $243.2 million versus $171.1 million a year ago. Operating margins increased by 130 basis points for the year to 10.3 percent from 9.0 percent in 2003.
 
"For the year, Mercury Marine benefited from strong international sales, which were up 17 percent for the year to $713 million," commented Buckley. "Our domestic operations also posted double-digit sales gains with domestic outboards up 13 percent to $476 million, domestic sterndrive engines up 19 percent to $542 million, and our parts and services businesses up 20 percent to $329 million. Operating margin improvement was registered in all units with the exception of domestic outboards where we continue to experience significant competitive pricing pressure from Japanese imports."
 
"Mercury, however, got a well-earned sales boost from the introduction of the Verado family of outboard engines earlier in the year," Buckley said. "This high-horsepower, four-stroke engine is the only supercharged production outboard engine in the world. We will be launching three more models within the Verado family next month. Verado has received critical acclaim, and should help to offset to some extent a continually challenging domestic outboard market, in which we believe unfair trade practices by Japanese competitors have artificially depressed prices and harmed American manufacturers, severely hampering operating margins."
"Brunswick New Technologies (BNT), our newest operating unit, also posted strong gains with sales reaching $202 million for the year," Buckley explained. "BNT results were led by Navman and BNT Marine Electronics, which markets the Northstar brand of components. BNT is quickly completing an aggressive push to broaden its product line and expand its markets. By the middle of this year, BNT will offer a full suite of marine electronics, which we will continue to integrate and install at the factory level to improve the convenience, quality and reliability of our marine products."
 
Boat Segment
The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and includes the Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Sealine, Meridian, Boston Whaler, Trophy, Sea Pro, Baja, Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Princecraft boat brands and the Land N' Sea, Swivl-Eze and Attwood marine parts and accessories distribution and manufacturing businesses. The Boat segment reported sales for the fourth quarter of $561.9 million, up 35 percent compared with $414.9 million in the fourth quarter of 2003. Boat segment sales benefited from healthy sales across its boat brands, including those of its Aluminum Boat Group, which was formed in early 2004 with the acquisition of the Crestliner, Lowe and Lund brands.
 
Excluding the aluminum boat acquisitions, sales increased 17 percent in the quarter, pointing to strong organic growth within the Boat Group, particularly among Boston Whaler, Sea Ray, US Marine and Hatteras, all of which posted double-digit sales gains. Operating earnings for the Boat segment increased to $24.2 million, up 160 percent from $9.3 million reported in the fourth quarter of 2003, and operating margins increased by 210 basis points to 4.3 percent.
For 2004, Boat segment sales were up 40 percent to $2,271.1 million from $1,616.9 million in 2003. Excluding incremental sales from acquisitions, Boat segment sales were up 19 percent for the year. Operating earnings for the Boat segment more than doubled to $149.3 million from $63.9 million in 2003, and operating margins improved to 6.6 percent compared with 4.0 percent in 2003.
 
"The strong growth in sales reflects the first increase in retail demand for the boating industry since 2000 and the success of new and innovative products introduced in 2004," Buckley said. "We are also pleased to report the successful turnaround of our US Marine Division, which returned to profitability for the first time since 2000. This, along with effective cost management, was a significant contributor to the improved operating earnings performance of the Boat segment."
"Our Boat Group has done a wonderful job of continuing to broaden and build its presence and appeal in the marketplace," Buckley added. "The acquisition of the Lowe, Lund and Crestliner aluminum boat brands earlier in the year, along with our Princecraft brand, has positioned Brunswick in an important segment of the market that we had previously underserved. Our offerings in the offshore saltwater fishing category were also enhanced with the acquisition of the Sea Pro brands last month. With an eye towards deeper and better partnerships with our distribution network, we continue to seek ways to better serve our dealers and deliver superior products to consumers."
"By offering a wider range of products and services, including the growing ability to provide parts on a same-day or next-day basis to nearly all of North America, we continue to make our dealers more competitive and able to serve a larger portion of boating consumers," said Buckley. "Developing a boat parts and accessories business is an important component of our embrace the dealer' strategy. Benefiting from strategic acquisitions completed in 2003, boat P&A sales reached $193 million in 2004."
"Further, we have stayed the course in product development to bring innovative, affordable and easy-to-use products to excite current boaters and draw others to the water," Buckley said. "During 2004 we saw strong demand across our complete product line, from our affordable Bayliner 175 (an entry-level boat, engine and trailer package with a suggested retail price of $9,995), through our Sea Ray cruisers and Hatteras yachts. We have continued to invest in new products, with more than 37 new models scheduled for launch in 2005."
 
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment. Segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2004 totaled $173.2 million, up 10 percent from $157.2 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings declined 13 percent to $24.7 million from $28.3 million, and operating margins were 14.3 percent, down from 18.0 percent in the fourth quarter of 2003.
 
For 2004, the Fitness segment reported sales of $558.3 million, up 15 percent from $486.6 million in 2003. Operating earnings in 2004 increased to $45.2 million from $29.8 million, and operating margins were 8.1 percent versus 6.1 percent a year ago. Operating earnings in 2003 include a $25.0 million litigation charge recorded in the first quarter of 2003. Excluding the charge, Fitness segment operating earnings for 2003 totaled $54.8 million, and operating margins were 11.3 percent.
 
"During the year, Life Fitness experienced a shift in its sales mix to popular, but lower-margin strength products. It also coped with increasing prices for raw materials such as steel as well as weak performance from the Omni retail chain, the divestiture of which was completed at the end of last year," Buckley explained. "Additionally, the impact of manufacturing inefficiencies during the ramp-up of production at our expanded Ramsey, Minn., plant in early 2004 put additional pressure on margins. Life Fitness is beginning to see the results of cost cutting measures and other productivity improvements pursued to mitigate operating margin pressure."
 
"Life Fitness has recently introduced several new products, maintaining its tradition of innovation, which have been well received in the marketplace," Buckley said. "These include the Life Fitness G5 cable motion system. This product joins an ever expanding line-up, which includes three products that were chosen as magazine's Best of Fitness 2005 award winners - the Life Fitness T9i treadmill, R9i Lifecycle and ParaBody GS6 Gym System."
 
Health
"Further, Life Fitness continues to expand its global manufacturing footprint, particularly in Europe, to better serve its customers, and take advantage of lower costs and other efficiencies," Buckley added. "We now manufacture both strength and cardiovascular equipment in Hungary, reducing lead times and freight costs to our European customers."
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2004 totaled $119.8 million, up 4 percent compared with $115.7 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings were up 32 percent to $20.0 million in the quarter versus $15.2 million in the comparable quarter in 2003. Operating margins advanced 360 basis points to 16.7 percent in the fourth quarter of 2004 compared with 13.1 percent in 2003.
For 2004, the segment reported sales of $442.4 million, up 13 percent from $392.4 million in 2003. Operating earnings for the year were up 63 percent to $41.7 million from $25.6 million in 2003, and operating margins improved to 9.4 percent from 6.5 percent.
"Our bowling and billiards teams have done a great job of both launching new products and wringing out costs," Buckley said. "Top-line growth was driven by double-digit sales gains in bowling products, led by increases in scoring and bowling center management systems. On the retail side, sales benefited from the opening during the year of two new expanded Brunswick Zone centers. In billiards, we continue to build our presence in the commercial and home markets with successful introductions of new Brunswick billiards tables, as well as in the coin-operated billiards table segment served by Valley-Dynamo. The significant improvement in operating earnings is attributable to cost reduction and supply chain programs along with the benefit of higher sales volumes. These efforts offset higher research and development, sales and marketing expenses in support of new products, as well as the impact of inflation on raw material costs."
"In bowling, we saw double-digit sales growth in our products business to complement the rock steady performance of our retail operations, where we continue to expand our Brunswick Zone concept. In 2005, we will construct three new expanded Brunswick Zone centers. We also are beginning to reap the benefits of our active R&D investments in this segment, with such products as the Vector scoring and center management system."
 
Looking Ahead
"We start 2005 well-positioned to take advantage of another year of increased retail demand for marine products, which we estimate will be up in the mid-single digits for the industry," Buckley noted. "Marine pipeline inventories stand at 30 weeks of supply for boats and 26 weeks of supply for engines, up two and four weeks, respectively, from the same time a year ago, reflecting our marine dealers' expectations for solid growth in 2005. Further, we have a full complement of new products on tap for introduction this year that we expect will drive our marine sales up in the mid-teens. In the Fitness and Bowling & Billiards segments, we are assuming mid-single digit sales growth. Fitness sales growth is affected by the absence in 2005 of sales from Omni Fitne ss retail stores, which were sold."
 
"Increased volumes along with our continued focus on effective cost management are expected to result in operating margin improvement of 70 to 100 basis points," Buckley noted. "This is despite an estimated $50 million of incremental investments for new product development and launches, information technology systems, and other growth and cost initiatives across all our segments. These investments and the full benefit of four new manufacturing plants starting up in the first quarter of 2005 should enable us to accelerate margin improvement in 2006. Further, for 2005 our budget assumes we will incur approximately $9 million in possible duties on outboard engines imported from Japan and an estimated $4 million for the expensing of stock options in the second half of t he year."
 
"By leveraging an estimated 11 to 12 percent sales growth with improved operating margins, we are budgeting earnings for 2005 at $3.25 per diluted share," Buckley said. "Given that we are still early in the marine season, and the challenges facing us with the transition to low-emission outboard engines, the number of new products scheduled for introduction and the start up of new manufacturing plants, we are estimating earnings per diluted share in the range of $3.15 to $3.30 for 2005, and $0.55 to $0.60 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2005. This compares with earnings per diluted share of $2.77 and $0.50 for the full year and first quarter of 2004, respectively."
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to resolve contract disputes with suppliers; the impact of possible duties on Japanese-manufactured outboard engines imported into the United States; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the company's ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel pri ces on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2003 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2004.
 
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman marine and GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian, Sealine, Bermuda, Ornvik, Quicksilver, Savage and Uttern pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Arvor, Boston Whaler, Palmetto, Sea Boss, Sea Pro and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Princecraft aluminum fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea marine parts a nd accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data)
(unaudited)
 
 
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data)
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Selected Financial Information
(in millions)
Segment Information
 
 
 
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Balance Sheets
(in millions)
 
 
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(in millions)



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20050203142411.txt.gz
TIME:20050203142411
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
o
                                   
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
 
ITEM 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
(a) 2005 Brunswick Performance Plan
 
after-tax profits after a deduction for the cost of total capital ("BVA"), 40% of BPP awards will be based on the Company's earnings per share, and the remaining 20% of BPP awards will be based on revenue growth. For the Company's division participants, 75% of BPP awards for 2005 will be based on division BVA, and the remaining 25% of BPP awards will be based on division operating margin. Opportunities for participants in the BPP generally range from 25% to 100% of salary.
On January 31, 2005, the Human Resources and Compensation Committee (the "Committee") of Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") approved the Brunswick Corporation 2005 Brunswick Performance Plan (the "BPP"). The BPP provides cash-based incentive opportunities to the Company's executive officers and other key employees to reward the achievement of specified annual goals. The Committee established performance measures for the Company's corporate and division participants that are tied to financial performance goals. For the Company's corporate participants, 40% of BPP awards for 2005 will be based on Corporate Brunswick Value Added, which is defined as
 
(b) 2005-2006 Strategic Incentive Plan
 
On January 31, 2005, the Committee approved the Brunswick Corporation 2005-2006 Strategic Incentive Plan (the "SIP"). The SIP provides cash-based incentive opportunities to the Company's executive officers and other key employees to reward the achievement of specified financial and strategic goals measured over a two-year period. The SIP has overlapping two-year cycles with a new cycle beginning each year. The Committee established performance measures for participants that are tied to (i) overall corporate financial performance and (ii) performance against identified strategic factors. 60% of SIP awards for the 2005-2006 cycle will be weighted equally by corporate BVA and the Company's earnings per share, and the remaining 40% of SIP awards will be based on the strategic factor performance by the SIP participant's division, or in the case of corporate participants, the average of strategic factor performance across divisions. Division strategic factors to be measured include customer satisfaction, growth in market share, product innovation based on the percentage of sales from new products and employee satisfaction. Opportunities for participants in the SIP generally range from 30% to 100% of salary.
 
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
2005 BRUNSWICK PERFORMANCE PLAN (BPP)
TERMS AND CONDITIONS
 
 
Nothing contained in these materials constitutes or is intended to create a promise of an individual incentive award or a contract of continued employment.  Employment is at-will and may be terminated by either the employee or Corporation for any reason at any time.
 

Exhibit 10.2
 
2005  2006 STRATEGIC INCENTIVE PLAN (SIP)
TERMS AND CONDITIONS
 
 
Nothing contained in these materials constitutes or is intended to create a promise of an individual incentive award or a contract of continued employment.  Employment is at-will and may be terminated by either the employee or Corporation for any reason at any time.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20050224132952.txt.gz
TIME:20050224132952
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 23, 2005, Brunswick Corporation announced it had completed the previously announced sale of its 1,861,200 shares of MarineMax, Inc. (NYSE:HZO) common stock. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing this sale is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
 
 
 
 
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

       
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
 
 
 
- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) said today that it had completed the previously announced sale of its 1,861,200 shares of MarineMax, Inc. (NYSE: HZO) common stock. The sale was made pursuant to a registered public offering by MarineMax.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Feb. 23, 2005
Proceeds from the stock sale totaled approximately $57.6 million pre tax, net of $3.4 million of selling expenses. The company said it would record a pre-tax gain on the sale estimated at $39 million in the first quarter of 2005. The after-tax gain of approximately $32 million, or $0.32 per diluted share, reflects the benefit from applying tax loss carry forwards to the transaction. The company added that it currently intends to use the estimated $52 million of net cash proceeds for general corporate purposes, including possible acquisitions.
About Brunswick
 .
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman marine and GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian, Sealine, Bermuda, Ornvik, Quicksilver, Savage and Uttern pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Arvor, Boston Whaler, Palmetto, Sea Boss, Sea Pro and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Princecraft aluminum fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20050426090803.txt.gz
TIME:20050426090803
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On April 26, 2005, Brunswick Corporation announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2005.  The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures.  For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a "non-GAAP financial measure" is a numerical measure of a registrant's historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented.  Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures.  GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.  Pursuant to the requirements of Regulation G, Brunswick has included, as a part of the news release, a reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure.
 
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses.  Brunswick's management believes that these measures- including those that are "non-GAAP financial measures"- and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswick's performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswick's ongoing business performance. Brunswick's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "free cash flow" is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives.  Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities.  In addition, Brunswick's management believes that presentation of: (i) the first quarter of 2005 diluted earnings per share excluding a first quarter investment sale gain; (ii) sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior year's results; (iii) sales excluding companies divested in 2004; and (iv) the first quarter of 2005 effective tax rate excluding the tax expense associated with the investment sale gain, provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Brunswick Corporation  1 N. Field Court  Lake Forest, IL 60045
Telephone 847.735.4700  Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
 
 Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today net earnings of $94.6 million, or $0.96 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2005, up from net earnings of $48.0 million, or $0.50 per diluted share, for the year-ago quarter.  Results for the first quarter of 2005 include a $0.32 per diluted share gain on the sale of securities.  The company said operating earnings increased 26 percent on a 17 percent sales gain in the first quarter.
               
LAKE FOREST, Ill., April 26, 2005
Commenting on the quarter, Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley said, "Once again our marine operating units led the way with combined engine and boat sales up 21 percent during the period.  The sales gain was driven by strong dealer response to new product introductions as well as continued strength in international markets.  We are reaping the benefits of our customer-led strategy to provide the right products at the right price sold through the best dealer network in the industry."
               
Buckley also noted that acquisitions played a role in Brunswick's 17 percent sales increase in the quarter.  "Excluding sales from business units we didn't own in the first quarter last year, sales rose 10 percent, illustrating the strong performance delivered by our base operations.  Further, we continue to look for more effective ways to leverage our top-line growth down to the bottom line," Buckley explained.  "Higher volumes combined with our focus on effective cost management resulted in an increase in operating margins to 7.1 percent, up from 6.5 percent a year ago.  In addition, we
               
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
April 26, 2005
Page 2 of 11
 
continued to maintain a strong balance sheet, with debt-to-total capital at 28.9 percent at quarter end compared with 30.4 percent a year earlier.  This provides us with the financial flexibility to invest in our ongoing businesses, while seeking attractive acquisitions."
 
First Quarter Results
                For the quarter ended March 31, 2005, the company reported that net sales increased 17 percent to $1,401.1 million, up from $1,199.6 million a year earlier.  Operating earnings rose to $99.1 million compared with $78.5 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins improved to 7.1 percent from 6.5 percent.  Net earnings totaled $94.6 million, or $0.96 per diluted share, up from $48.0 million, or $0.50 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2004.
                As previously announced, during the first quarter of 2005 the company completed the sale of approximately 1.9 million shares of MarineMax, Inc. (NYSE: HZO) stock.  The sale resulted in a pre-tax gain of $38.7 million, equivalent to $0.32 per diluted share in the quarter.
 
Marine Engine Segment
                The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group and Brunswick New Technologies (BNT), reported sales of $605.6 million in the first quarter of 2005, up 15 percent from $527.9 million in the year-ago first quarter.  Operating earnings in the first quarter advanced 22 percent to $52.0 million versus $42.6 million, and operating margins increased to 8.6 percent compared with 8.1 percent for the same quarter in 2004.
"We continue to see strong demand for our new products, which is driving sales growth in the segment," Buckley said.  "During the first quarter we extended our Verado family of supercharged four-stroke outboard engines with the launch of the 135-, 150- and 175- horsepower models.  Like their previously introduced, larger-horsepower counterparts, these models enhance Verado's reputation for power, reduced noise and
               
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
April 26, 2005
Page 3 of 11
 
vibration, and technological sophistication, setting the performance bar ever higher in marine propulsion."
                "BNT, particularly our Navman unit, also contributed to segment sales growth in the quarter," Buckley added.  "We are beginning to see the results of Navman's accelerated research and development investments as well as its increasing presence in markets around the world."
                "In the first quarter, Mercury opened a new production facility in China.  The 174,000-square-foot plant produces four-stroke outboard engines between 40 and 60 horsepower," Buckley noted.  "We also opened a new 275,000-square-foot facility in Japan with our joint venture partner Tohatsu, where we make 2.5 to 30 horsepower four-stroke outboards.  Worker training and production validation have been completed, and the plants have now begun production.  As the year continues, we expect the plants will ramp up volume and, in turn, increase our cost competitiveness in these market segments."
 
Boat Segment
                The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and produces fiberglass and aluminum boats as well as marine parts and accessories. The Boat segment reported sales for the first quarter of $677.5 million, up 32 percent compared with $512.0 million in the first quarter of 2004.  Operating earnings increased 55 percent to $49.5 million, up from $32.0 million, and operating margins were up 100 basis points to 7.3 percent from 6.3 percent.
"The success of new products contributed to the sales gain with double-digit growth reported by Sea Ray, Boston Whaler, Sealine, Princecraft and Baja.  The boat parts and accessories business also reported sales gains during the quarter," Buckley noted.  A portion of the Boat segment sales gain was due to the acquisition of the Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Sea Pro brands, which were not included in the prior-year quarter.  "Excluding incremental sales from these acquisitions, Boat segment sales were up 17 percent.  Higher volumes and effective cost management accounted for the significant improvement in operating margins," Buckley explained.
               
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
April 26, 2005
Page 4 of 11
 
"We continue to execute our strategy of covering the waterfront' by filling in the white spaces' to gain or strengthen our participation in certain market segments," Buckley said.  "During the quarter, we added the Albemarle brand.  This acquisition enabled us to extend our offering of offshore sportfishing boats, which, along with Hatteras, now range from 24 to 90 feet."
               
"On the smaller-boat side, we continue to see strong demand for our Bayliner 175 and Bayliner 185 entry-level runabouts.  During the quarter, we opened a second boat plant in Mexico, which doubled our capacity to produce these and other popular models in this family," Buckley added.
               
 
Fitness Segment
                The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment.  Segment sales in the first quarter of 2005 totaled $127.5 million, down 2 percent from $130.6 million in the year-ago quarter.  The sales decline is attributable to Brunswick's divestiture of the Omni Fitness retail stores, which was completed in late 2004.  Excluding Omni sales in the year-ago quarter, fitness equipment sales were up 5 percent.  Segment operating earnings for the first quarter of 2005 totaled $6.4 million compared with $9.2 million for the year-ago quarter, and operating margins were 5.0 percent compared with 7.0 percent a year ago. 
                "We continue to see strong demand for fitness equipment," Buckley explained, "underscoring the power of our brands and the success of new products.  Operating earnings, however, were adversely affected by higher steel costs, pricing pressures in the international marketplace, higher costs for delivery and installation as well as a shift in product mix in the quarter to lower-margin strength equipment.  We are actively pursuing several avenues to improve productivity and operating results within the Fitness segment, with an immediate emphasis on manufacturing and supply chain efficiencies."
 
Brunswick Corporation
April 26, 2005
Page 5 of 11
 
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  Segment sales in the first quarter of 2005 totaled $111.5 million, up 1 percent compared with $110.2 million in the year-ago quarter.  Operating earnings totaled $11.1 million in the first quarter versus $13.5 million, and operating margins were 10.0 percent compared with 12.3 percent in 2004.
               
"Our bowling product and retail businesses led the sales gain in the quarter," Buckley noted.  "We are especially pleased with the success of our expanded Brunswick Zone retail bowling centers, which continue to grow at rates higher than our traditional centers.  These family-friendly centers have helped us attract casual bowlers who now outnumber league bowlers.  The drop in segment operating earnings and margins was primarily due to legal expenses associated with an ongoing arbitration proceeding in China."
               
 
Looking Ahead
                "We continue to be very encouraged by the trends we are seeing in the marine market, especially as we enter the spring selling season," commented Buckley.  "Our marine pipeline inventories are at 31 weeks of supply for boats and 29 weeks of supply for engines, up three weeks and five weeks, respectively from a year ago, representing a return to more normal levels.  The pipeline build is due to a number of factors, including higher dealer inventories in international markets in response to strong demand and the introduction of new boat models both here and abroad.  Also keep in mind that retail sales in the first quarter of 2004 were exceptionally high, resulting in a rapid draining of pipeline inventories to almost unprecedented low levels at this time last year.  The current level of inventories represents our dealers' expectations for growth in retail demand this year.  In addition, a healthier pipeline will help us avoid the shortage of popular new models that we experienced in some categories last year."
                "While always being cognizant of the influence of underlying economic and stock market conditions, we remain on track for another very good year," Buckley said. 
 
Brunswick Corporation
April 26, 2005
Page 6 of 11
 
"Given our performance in the first quarter, we are raising our estimate for the year by $0.05 to $3.52 to $3.67 per diluted share, which includes the $0.32 gain on the stock sale.  This compares with $2.77 per diluted share for 2004.  For the second quarter, we are estimating earnings in the range of $1.08 to $1.13 per diluted share, compared with $0.93 per diluted share for the year-ago second quarter."
                The company said its new estimate assumes sales growth for the year of between 12 percent and 13 percent and operating margin improvement of between 90 and 110 basis points. Versus its previous estimate, this represents a one percent increase in the rate of sales growth and 10 to 20 basis points higher operating margin expansion.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
                Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency
 
Brunswick Corporation
April 26, 2005
Page 7 of 11
 
exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products.  Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2004.
 
About Brunswick
               
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman marine and GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Meridian, Sealine, Bermuda, Ornvik, Quicksilver, Savage and Uttern pleasure boats; Baja high-performance boats; Albemarle, Arvor, Boston Whaler, Palmetto, Sea Boss, Sea Pro and Trophy offshore fishing boats; Crestliner, Lowe, Lund and Princecraft aluminum fishing, deck and pontoon boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.
 
Brunswick Corporation
April 26, 2005
Page 8 of 11
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data)
(unaudited)
 
 
 (1) The Company sold its investment in MarineMax, Inc., pursuant to a registered public offering by MarineMax.
 
(2) The decrease in the effective tax rate for the first quarter of 2005 was primarily due to lower tax expense associated with the gain on sale of the investment in MarineMax, Inc.  Excluding the tax effect of this gain, the effective tax rate was 32.0 percent.
 
NM = Not Meaningful
Brunswick Corporation
April 26, 2005
Page 9 of 11
 
Brunswick Corporation
Selected Financial Information
(in millions)
(unaudited)
 
Segment Information
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
April 26, 2005
Page 10 of 11
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Balance Sheets
(in millions)
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
April 26, 2005
Page 11 of 11
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(in millions)
(unaudited)
 
(1) Free Cash Flow in 2005 includes pre-tax proceeds from the sale of the Company's investment in MarineMax, Inc., net of selling costs, of $56.8 million.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20050510152549.txt.gz
TIME:20050510152549
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
            Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
            Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
            Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
o
            Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
o
ITEM 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
(a) Director Compensation
 
On May 4, 2005, the Board of Directors of Brunswick Corporation ("Brunswick") approved certain changes to the compensation of the non-management members of the Brunswick Board of Directors.  Those changes, as outlined in the Board of Directors Compensation Summary attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1 and incorporated herein by reference, include the annual payment of a:
 
$20,000 fee to the non-management Presiding Director;
(1)
           
 
$10,000 fee to the Chair of the Human Resources and Compensation Committee; and
(2)
           
 
$7,500 fee to any Board member serving on more than one committee (except that such fee shall not be paid in the case of a Board member who receives a fee for both committees on which he or she serves).
(3)
           
 
In addition, directors shall now receive an annual grant of 1,000 restricted stock units, which shall be granted on the date of Brunswick's annual meeting of shareholders (for directors appointed during the year, the number of restricted stock units will be awarded on a pro rata basis).  The units will be converted to shares of Brunswick common stock to be distributed either on the date of the director's retirement from the Board, or deferred, at the director's election, in annual installments of up to fifteen years following retirement.
 
Finally, directors may receive Brunswick products with an aggregate value of up to $15,000 annually.  The value of these products is included in the directors' taxable income, and Brunswick reimburses directors for the applicable tax liability associated with the receipt of such products.  In addition, directors may lease certain boats from Brunswick at no charge except for the payment of applicable taxes, and all or a portion of a director's $15,000 product allowance may be applied to defray those taxes.  Directors may also purchase Brunswick products at Brunswick's wholesale prices.
 
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
BOARD OF DIRECTORS COMPENSATION SUMMARY
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20050727090926.txt.gz
TIME:20050727090926
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                                   
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
o
                                   
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On July 27, 2005, Brunswick Corporation announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2005.  The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures.  For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a "non-GAAP financial measure" is a numerical measure of a registrant's historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented.  Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures.  GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.  Pursuant to the requirements of Regulation G, Brunswick has included, as a part of the news release, a reconciliation of the non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure.
 
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses.  Brunswick's management believes that these measures- including those that are "non-GAAP financial measures"- and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswick's performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswick's ongoing business performance. Brunswick's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "free cash flow" is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives.  Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities.  In addition, Brunswick's management believes that presentation of: (i) the diluted earnings per share for the first six months ended June 30, 2005 excluding a first quarter investment sale gain; (ii) sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior year's results; (iii) sales excluding companies divested in 2004; and (iv) the effective tax rate for the first six months ended June 30, 2005 excluding the tax expense associated with the investment sale gain, provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 27, 2005
 Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today a 27 percent increase in net earnings on 12 percent sales growth and a 23 percent improvement in operating earnings for the second quarter of 2005.  Net earnings totaled $114.1 million, or $1.15 per diluted share, for the second quarter, compared with net earnings of $90.1 million, or $0.93 per diluted share, for the year-ago quarter.
 
 "It was a record quarter for Brunswick, evidence of our ability to leverage our competitive and technological advantages to extend our leadership position in all of our market segments," said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley.  "We saw strength in our marine operations where our customer-led strategy of offering new products incorporating the technologies and features that resonate with consumers continues to drive sales growth.  For the quarter, marine engine and boat sales advanced 14 percent and 18 percent, respectively, energized by share gains by some of our most established brands.  While acquisitions contributed to the company's 12 percent overall sales increase, our organic growth was an impressive 10 percent.  We head into the remainder of the year with good sales momentum and a positive market outlook that will aid our efforts to grow the business, while our strong balance sheet affords us flexibility to invest further in our business and pursue attractive acquisition opportunities."
 
 
 
Second Quarter Results
 
For the quarter ended June 30, 2005, net sales increased 12 percent to $1,598.6 million, up from $1,422.7 million a year earlier.  Excluding the effect of acquired businesses that were not part of the company a year ago, sales were up 10 percent in the quarter.  Operating earnings rose 23 percent to $171.7 million compared with $139.5 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins improved to 10.7 percent from 9.8 percent.  Net earnings totaled $114.1 million, or $1.15 per diluted share, up 27 percent from $90.1 million, or $0.93 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2004.  Debt-to-total capital was 27.7 percent at quarter end as compared with 31.9 percent a year earlier, and cash totaled $508.6 million.
 
Marine Engine Segment
 
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group and Brunswick New Technologies (BNT), reported net sales of $755.5 million in the second quarter of 2005, up 14 percent from $665.2 million in the year-ago quarter.  Operating earnings in the second quarter increased 12 percent to $107.0 million versus $95.6 million, while operating margins declined slightly to 14.2 percent from 14.4 percent for the same quarter in 2004.
 
"Our Mercury Marine engine business continued to show strength, with solid sales growth reported for outboard and sterndrive engines as well as parts and accessories in both the domestic and international markets," Buckley explained.  "In addition, BNT sales remained robust, up 65 percent for the quarter, primarily driven by an 80 percent increase at Navman with its growing family of marine electronics products, as well as an expanding assortment of new GPS-based products for land navigation."
 
"During the quarter we continued to invest in projects that will lead to improved financial performance in the coming year.  Our new engine plants in China and Japan that started up in the first quarter are good examples of this effort," Buckley noted.  "While we incurred costs associated with the ramp up of production at these facilities,
we will begin to see the benefit of our improved cost structure as we build volume over the coming year."
 
The China facility is making 40 to 60 horsepower four-stroke outboard engines, while Mercury uses the Japan operation, with joint venture partner, Tohatsu, to make four-stroke outboards from 2.5 to 30 horsepower.
 
"Effective the first of July, Mercury became the first major engine maker to exit the carbureted two-stroke outboard market, fulfilling our commitment to discontinue producing non-emission compliant two-strokes for sale in the United States and Canada beginning with the 2006 model year," Buckley noted.  "We now have a full line of low-emission engines that includes our direct fuel injected OptiMax two-stroke outboards as well as four-stroke engines ranging from 2.5 horsepower to our new Verado supercharged outboards with offerings up to 275 horsepower.  Indeed, low-emission engines accounted for 71 percent of our outboard sales during the quarter, up from 56 percent in the year-ago period.  We are very pleased with consumers' response to our new offerings; however, they generally have lower margins than carbureted two-strokes due to their more advanced technology and higher-cost components.  Increased volumes as well as our move to lower cost manufacturing areas are helping to improve that situation."
 
Boat Segment
 
The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment.  The group has 18 boat brands, including Sea Ray, Bayliner, Maxum, Hatteras, Sealine, Meridian, Boston Whaler, Trophy, Baja, Sea Pro and Triton along with the Land N' Sea and Attwood marine parts and accessories distribution and manufacturing businesses.
 
The Boat segment reported net sales for the second quarter of $742.2 million, up 18 percent compared with $629.9 million in the second quarter of 2004.  Boat segment sales for the quarter benefited from the Albemarle, Sea Pro and Triton acquisitions, all made since the end of 2004.  Excluding the sales of these businesses, Boat segment sales increased 13percent in the quarter.  Operating earnings increased to $74.8
million, 31 percent ahead of the $57.0 million reported in the second quarter of 2004, and operating margins rose 110 basis points to 10.1 percent, up from 9.0 percent.
"Our sales growth was driven by a stellar performance from Sea Ray with a 26 percent gain in the quarter as well as from strong contributions from Bayliner and our other fiberglass boat brands.  Our customer-led strategy means getting the product right and getting the distribution right.  The strong retail demand for our products that we saw in the second quarter is evidence of the success of that approach."
 
"Additionally, our strategy of organizing and grouping our boat brands around specific market segments is sharpening our focus and firmly establishing Brunswick as a major player in such areas as freshwater and saltwater fishing," Buckley explained.  "Last year, for example, we had two brands  Boston Whaler and Trophy  targeting offshore fishing.  Now with the formation of the Saltwater Boat Group and the addition of the Sea Pro, Sea Boss and Palmetto brands, Brunswick now offers our dealers and consumers more choices to meet their saltwater boating needs and preferences."
 
"The same is happening in the Freshwater Boat Group, where we acquired Triton Boats during the quarter," Buckley added.  "One of the leading bass boat brands, Triton also offers us additional pontoon and aluminum models to address the needs of anglers and boating enthusiasts.  And while we have recently seen some regional weakness in the aluminum boat market, particularly in the Midwest and Northeast where poor weather at the start of the boating season dampened demand, we believe we have put together a formidable line-up of freshwater boats that will provide our dealers with a full array of products to meet their customers' needs.  During the quarter we reduced production at two of our aluminum plants to properly balance supply to demand and prune pipeline inventories in advance of the start of the 2006 model year."
 
Buckley also pointed out that Brunswick's acquisition efforts have not been confined to the U.S. boat market.  "During the quarter, we completed the acquisition of the portion that we previously did not own of Valiant, a leading European maker of rigid inflatable boats.  We expect to be more active on the international front in the future as we look to fill in the white space' in other world markets."
 
The Brunswick Boat Group's growing parts and accessories business also had a strong quarter with Land N' Sea registering a double-digit sales increase.  In July, Brunswick acquired Kellogg Marine of Old Lyme, Conn., to serve as a hub for its parts
distribution efforts in the Northeast.  Brunswick is nearing its goal, set just two years ago, of offering same- or next-day service on parts and accessories to anywhere in the continental U.S. and Canada.
 
Fitness Segment
 
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment.  Fitness equipment sales increased 2 percent in the quarter, excluding sales from the Omni retail stores that were sold in late 2004.  Segment sales in the second quarter of 2005 reached $120.4 million, down from $122.3 million in the year-ago quarter, which included Omni retail sales.  Fitness segment operating earnings for the quarter totaled $5.1 million, up 76 percent from $2.9 million in the second quarter of 2004, and operating margins advanced 180 basis points to 4.2 percent from 2.4 percent a year ago.
 
"The increase in fitness equipment sales was driven by strong demand in the domestic commercial markets.  Double-digit growth in the United States was partially offset by a decline in European sales where we continue to face competitive pricing pressure.  Our many efforts to improve productivity and operating results within the Fitness segment are beginning to bear fruit, with improvement in operating margins evident during the most recent quarter," Buckley said.  "By concentrating on manufacturing and supply chain efficiencies, as well as expense control, we have been able to improve our margins and operating performance at Life Fitness.  It is for these reasons and others we anticipate that improvement in financial performance will continue as our Fitness operations sharpen their focus on market segments to better leverage the enduring power of our brands and the excitement of new products."
 
Bowling & Billiards Segment
 
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  Segment sales in the second quarter of 2005 totaled $114.9 million, up 9 percent
compared with $105.8 million in the year-ago quarter.  Year-over-year operating earnings advanced 24 percent to $5.2 million in the second quarter versus $4.2 million, and operating margins improved to 4.5 percent compared with 4.0 percent in 2004.
 
"Every segment of Bowling & Billiards advanced its sales during the quarter," Buckley said.  "Bowling products had a double-digit gain for the quarter and built sales momentum with the introduction of Brunswick Premium Furniture at a late June trade event.  The new living-room styled furniture is more inviting and comfortable than traditional configurations.  Meant to be more appealing to the casual bowler, who continues to grow in importance for center operators, this furniture invites longer time spent in the bowling centers, more repeat business and, subsequently, greater revenue opportunities."
 
"Likewise, our bowling retail operations continue to prove to be dependable revenue generators thanks to our management expertise and our continuing efforts to expand our Brunswick Zone concept," Buckley added.  "We have been particularly happy with the response to our larger bowling entertainment centers.  They continue to grow at rates that eclipse traditional locations."
 
Six-Month Results
 
For the six months ended June 30, 2005, the company had net sales of $2,999.7 million, up 14 percent from $2,622.3 million for the first half of 2004.  Excluding contributions from acquired businesses, sales were up 10 percent.  Operating earnings totaled $270.8 million for the first half of 2005, up 24 percent from the $218.0 million for the corresponding period in 2004, and operating margins expanded 70 basis points, reaching 9.0 percent versus 8.3 percent a year ago.  Net earnings for the first six months of 2005 increased 51 percent to $208.7 million, or $2.11 per diluted share, from $138.1 million, or $1.43 per diluted share, for the same period in 2004. 
As previously announced, during the first quarter of 2005 the company completed the sale of approximately 1.9 million shares of MarineMax, Inc. stock.  Results for the first half of 2005 include a pre-tax gain of $38.7 million, equivalent to $0.32 per diluted share, recorded on the stock sale in the first quarter.
Looking Ahead
 
"At the beginning of the year we based our planning on the assumption that marine retail demand would be up in the mid-single digits.  Although there have been puts and takes in various geographical areas and market segments, results through the first half of 2005 continue to support that assumption," Buckley said.  "We are also seeing positive trends in pipeline inventories with 23 weeks of supply for boats and 20 weeks of supply of engines in the channel, down eight weeks and nine weeks, respectively, from the end of March.  This reflects the strong demand at retail we saw in the second quarter and our dealers' expectations for continued growth at retail for the remainder of the year."
 
"While keeping in mind the impact of underlying economic and stock market conditions, we expect to report another record year for Brunswick," Buckley said.  "Based on our performance in the second quarter and outlook for the second half, we are raising our estimate for the year to $3.62 to $3.72 per diluted share, which includes the $0.32 gain on the stock sale.  This compares with $2.77 per diluted share for 2004.  This would imply earnings for the second half in the range of $1.51 to $1.61 per diluted share, which we believe will be more or less evenly divided between the third and fourth quarters.  The wild card is the timing of planned investment spending, which could result in a few pennies shifting between the two quarters."
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from
suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products.  Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2004 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2005.
 
About Brunswick
 
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman marine and GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Crestliner, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea and Kellogg marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data)
(unaudited)
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data)
(unaudited)
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Selected Financial Information
(in millions)
)
(unaudited
 
Segment Information
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Balance Sheets
(in millions)
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(in millions)
(unaudited)
 
 
(1) Pre-tax proceeds from the sale of the company's investment in MarineMax, Inc.,  net of selling costs.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20050922135355.txt.gz
TIME:20050922135355
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
ITEM 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure
On September 20, 2005, Brunswick Corporation announced new earnings estimates for the third quarter of 2005 and the full year. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing these estimated earnings is incorporated herein by reference, and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. A non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
One non-GAAP financial measure used in the news release was Brunswicks estimated diluted earnings per share for 2005. In the news release, we stated that we had previously estimated that diluted earnings per share for 2005 would fall in the range of $3.30 to $3.40 but that our current thinking was that a range of $3.20 to $3.25 is more appropriate under the circumstances. In the news release, the company noted that the estimate for 2005 excluded a $0.32 per diluted share gain on the sale of securities recorded in the first quarter of the year, as well as anticipated tax adjustments, which are estimated to be in the same order of magnitude as a $0.10 per diluted share tax benefit recorded in the third quarter of 2004.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures -- including those that are non-GAAP financial measures-- and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that presentation of earnings per share excluding (i) nonrecurring tax benefits in the third quarter of 2004 and anticipated tax adjustments in 2005, and (ii) a first quarter 2005 gain on the sale of securities, provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

Exhibit 99.1
    
          
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
             
  
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Sept. 20, 2005
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that the combined effects of high fuel prices, lower consumer confidence and Hurricane Katrina could contribute to a slowing of the economy just as the marine industry moves into the off season.
Retail demand for our marine products has remained robust relative to last year with several of our boat brands registering double-digit retail growth in July and August. Further, our pipeline inventories remain at healthy levels, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer George W. Buckley. As we go into the marine off season when retail activity tapers off, however, our financial results are driven primarily by demand at the wholesale level, which is affected by confidence in the economy. We are concerned that if high fuel prices, the drop in consumer confidence and Katrina lead to slower overall economic conditions, then wholesale demand for marine products could be affected. We believe that in this confusing economic environment, it is prudent for us to be cautious and proactively manage pipeline inventories down even further still. Therefore, we intend to cut production rates to position ourselves and our marine customers in the best possible way entering the marine off season. Should the economy not be impacted by this confluence of events, or in fact accelerate, we will readjust production rates to meet stronger wholesale demand. In addition, we have several new products scheduled to launch in the coming months and healthy pipelines permit these products to reach the marketplace in a rapid and effective fashion.
 
Given this developing view, we have tempered the assumptions behind our previous earnings estimates, Buckley added. We continue to see strong performances from our fitness, electronics and bowling and billiards businesses, which are heading into their stronger seasons. We will also benefit from a more favorable tax structure brought on by investments in our global manufacturing footprint. Lower sales and fixed cost absorption in our marine businesses, however, will temporarily offset those benefits. Most recently, we had estimated that diluted earnings per share for 2005 would fall in the range of $3.30 to $3.40. This is compared with $2.67 per diluted share reported a year ago, which excludes $0.10 from a nonrecurring tax benefit recorded in the third quarter of 2004. Our current thinking is that a range of $3.20 to $3.25 is more appropriate under the circumstances. For the quarter ending Sept. 30, 2005, we are estimating diluted earnings per share in the range of $0.70 to $0.74, which compares to $0.65 in the year-ago third quarter, excluding the previously mentioned $0.10 tax benefit in 2004. The company noted that estimates for 2005 exclude a $0.32 per diluted share gain on the sale of securities recorded in the first quarter of the year, as well as anticipated tax adjustments, which are estimated to be in the same order of magnitude as the $0.10 per diluted share tax benefit recorded in the third quarter of 2004.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from
 
suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain
manufacturing operations within the time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the
ability to
successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2004 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2005.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman marine and GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea and Kellogg Marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
.



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20051028091807.txt.gz
TIME:20051028091807
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 28, 2005, Brunswick Corporation announced its financial results for the third quarter of 2005 and the full year. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its third quarter 2005 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswicks management believes that presentation of: (i) the diluted earnings per share for the three months and nine months ended September 30, 2005, excluding a first quarter investment sale gain; (ii) net sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior years results; (iii) net sales excluding businesses divested in 2004; and (iv) estimated earnings per share for 2005, excluding a first quarter investment sale gain and certain non-recurring tax benefits, provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
 
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

           
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
         
                Exhibit 99.1
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
          
 
 
  
  
   
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20051207125224.txt.gz
TIME:20051207125224
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
In connection with his election as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, certain changes to Mr. McCoys compensation have been approved. These changes are discussed below in Item 5.02, which discussion is incorporated into this Item 1.01 by reference.
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
Resignation of George W. Buckley as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
On December 7, 2005, Brunswick Corporation (the Company) announced that George W. Buckley has resigned as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of the Company, effective immediately. 
 
 
Election of Dustan E. McCoy as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
On December 7, 2005, the Company announced that Dustan E. McCoy, Vice President and President - Brunswick Boat Group, has been named Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, effective immediately.  Mr. McCoy, age 56, has served as Vice President and President - Brunswick Boat Group since 2000. From 1999 to 2000, he was Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of the Company. In connection with Mr. McCoys election, the Companys Board of Directors (the Board) has approved an annual salary of
$800,000, a target annual Brunswick Performance Plan bonus of 100% of his annual salary, and a Strategic Incentive Plan bonus target of 100% of his annual salary, and the Human Resources and Compensation Committee of the Board has approved an award of 25,000 restricted stock units that vest on December 6, 2009.
 
 
Election of Lawrence A. Zimmerman as Director
 
On December 6, 2005, the Board elected Lawrence A. Zimmerman to the Companys Board of Directors effective February 7, 2006. Mr. Zimmerman will stand for re-election at the Companys 2007 annual meeting of stockholders. The Board has not yet determined the committees of the Board to which Mr. Zimmerman will be named.
A copy of the press release announcing the resignation of Mr. Buckley and the election of Mr. McCoy is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
A copy of the press release announcing the election of Mr. Zimmerman is furnished as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Item 9.01                           Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(c) Exhibits
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

                                                                                                                                                     
Exhibit 99.1
                                                                                                              
 
 
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Dec. 7, 2005
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that its Board of Directors has elected Dustan E. McCoy as the companys chairman and chief executive officer. McCoy replaces George W. Buckley who has resigned from the company to become the chairman, president and chief executive officer of 3M Company.
 
 
We are fortunate to have an executive with Dustys broad range of operating management and corporate experience to lead Brunswick, said Manuel A. Fernandez, Brunswicks lead director. Over the past five years, Dusty has nearly doubled the size of the boat group, acquired 13 boat brands and enhanced relationships with our dealer network. His background and operations experience make him uniquely qualified to take Brunswick to the next level.
Brunswick has a rich history, but an even more promising future, McCoy said. We have a sound strategy for moving forward. Our 26,000 employees worldwide have shown their passion for innovation and growth, and I am excited about this opportunity to lead them and our company and to further leverage our leading brands in marine, fitness, bowling and billiards.
McCoy, 56, has served as vice president of Brunswick Corporation and president of the Brunswick Boat Group since its formation in 2000. He joined Brunswick in 1999 as vice president, general counsel and corporate secretary. Prior to joining Brunswick,
McCoy served as executive vice president of Witco Corporation with operating
responsibility for a variety of global businesses and functions. During his six years at
Witco, McCoy also served as senior vice president, general counsel and corporate secretary. He earned a bachelor of arts degree from Eastern Kentucky University and his law degree from Chase Law School.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman marine and GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea and Kellogg Marine parts and accessories distributors; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit .
www.brunswick.com
 

                    60;                              
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
Exhibit 99.2
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill. Dec. 7, 2005 -
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that Lawrence A. Zimmerman, senior vice president and chief financial officer of Xerox Corporation, has been elected to Brunswicks board of directors, effective as of the boards Feb. 7, 2006, meeting. He will stand for election at the companys 2007 annual meeting of shareholders. Zimmermans election brings the number of board members to 11, nine of whom are independent directors.
A respected and experienced executive, Zimmerman, 63, joined Xerox in 2002 and has been instrumental in the Stamford, Conn., companys recent turnaround efforts. Before his current duties, he spent more than 30 years with IBM where he held positions of increasing responsibility, including corporate controller and vice president of finance for IBM's Europe, Middle East and Africa operations. Prior to retiring from IBM, Zimmerman was vice president and chief financial officer of IBMs Server, Components and Technology Group, which at the time had annual sales of $34 billion.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman marine and GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea and Kellogg Marine parts and accessories distributors; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
.
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20060126091039.txt.gz
TIME:20060126091039
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 26, 2006, Brunswick Corporation announced its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2005 and the full year. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswicks management believes that presentation of: (i) (ii) net sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior years results; and (iii) Brunswicks effective tax rate excluding a tax reserve reduction, provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
diluted earnings per share excluding the effects of certain tax-related items and excluding an investment sale of gain for the related quarterly and annual periods; 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                                                                                 Exhibit 99.1     
                                                                                                                                        
 
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Court Lake Forest, IL 60045
Telephone 847.735.4700 Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Jan. 26, 2006
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today net earnings of $88.3 million, or $0.90 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2005, up from net earnings of $58.8 million, or $0.59 per diluted share, for the year-ago quarter. The company said that its fourth quarter diluted earnings per share benefited by $0.17 from several tax-related items, discussed below. Excluding the effect of these items, diluted earnings per share for the fourth quarter would have been $0.73, a 24 percent increase from the year-ago quarter.
Commenting on the quarter, Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy said, It was a solid finish to a record sales and earnings year for Brunswick, as we approached nearly $6 billion in annual sales. All of our business segments contributed to the 12 percent sales gain in the fourth quarter led by strong performances from Sea Ray, Boston Whaler, Bayliner and Hatteras, as well as significant growth from Brunswick New Technologies. Sales also benefited from acquisitions, which accounted for half the sales increase in the fourth quarter. Operating earnings improved by 22 percent with gains reported in our marine engine, boat and fitness segments. Operating margins improved by 50 basis points to 6.8 percent in the final quarter of the year.
Our balance sheet remained healthy with debt-to-total capital at 26.8 percent at year end, compared with 30.2 percent a year earlier, and cash totaled $487.7 million, McCoy noted. In addition, we repurchased approximately 1.9 million shares of Brunswick stock for approximately $76 million in 2005.
 
Fourth Quarter Results
For the quarter ended Dec. 31, 2005, the company reported that net sales increased 12 percent to $1,489.5 million, up from $1,333.8 million a year earlier. Operating earnings rose 22 percent to $101.9 million, compared with $83.4 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins improved to 6.8 percent from 6.3 percent. Net earnings rose to $88.3 million, or $0.90 per diluted share, up from $58.8 million, or $0.59 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2004.
 
During the quarter, the company recognized certain tax benefits, described below. These actions increased diluted earnings per share by $0.17 in the fourth quarter of 2005.
2005 Results
For the year ended Dec. 31, 2005, the company had net sales of $5,923.8 million, up 13 percent from $5,229.3 million in 2004. Excluding the benefit of acquisitions, sales were up 8 percent. Operating earnings reached $478.6 million for the year, up 19 percent from $400.7 million in 2004, and operating margins reached 8.1 percent versus 7.7 percent a year ago. Net earnings for 2005 increased 43 percent to $385.4 million, or $3.90 per diluted share, compared with $269.8 million, or $2.77 per diluted share, in 2004.
For the year, the company said that the benefits from higher sales, effective cost management and lower variable compensation costs were partially offset by the impact of the transition to low-emission outboard engines, investments in several new manufacturing plants, the costs of fully integrating acquisitions, increased research and development spending, and higher spending to support new product introductions.
During the first quarter of 2005, the company completed the sale of approximately 1.9 million shares of MarineMax, Inc. stock. Results for 2005 include a pre-tax gain of $38.7 million, equivalent to $0.32 per diluted share, recorded on the stock sale in the first quarter.
As announced with third quarter 2005 results, the company said that earnings from certain of its foreign subsidiaries would be indefinitely reinvested outside the United States, resulting in a change in the application of APB 23, Accounting for Income Taxes - Special Areas, effective July 1, 2005, for those entities. Further, the company said it had refined its tax planning strategies for research and foreign export tax benefits. The cumulative effect of these actions reduced the companys tax provision for the third quarter of 2005, which benefited earnings by approximately $0.16 per diluted share.
In the fourth quarter of 2005, earnings benefited by $0.17 per diluted share from other tax-related matters, most notably the amended filings of prior years tax returns.
In the third quarter 2004, the Internal Revenue Service completed its routine audit of tax years 1998 through 2001. Following the completion of the examination of this four-year period, Brunswick reduced its tax reserves and, consequently, its tax provision, by approximately $10 million, or approximately $0.10 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2004.
Excluding the effect of the tax-related items in 2004 and 2005, and the gain on the sale of the MarineMax stock, diluted earnings per share for 2005 would have been $3.25, up 22 percent from $2.67 in 2004.
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group and Brunswick New Technologies, reported sales of $634.2 million in the fourth quarter of 2005, up 8 percent from $584.6 million in the year-ago fourth quarter. Operating earnings in the fourth quarter were up 7 percent in the period to $36.8 million versus $34.3 million, and operating margins were 5.8 percent compared with 5.9 percent for the same quarter in 2004.
For the full year, Marine Engine segment sales rose 12 percent to $2,638.7 million from $2,353.2 million, and operating earnings were $260.7 million versus $243.2 million in 2004. Operating margins decreased for the year to 9.9 percent from 10.3 percent in 2004.
Mercury Marines international sales set the pace for the year reporting a 10 percent increase to $791 million, McCoy said. Meanwhile, our domestic engine operations posted single-digit sales gains with sterndrive engine sales rising 4 percent to $561 million. Our domestic outboard engine business, which continues to face the strongest competition, reported sales up 1 percent to $480 million. Sales of Mercurys domestic parts and services were up 7 percent to $352 million. Finally, Brunswick New Technologies, with its Navman and Northstar brands, reported sales for the year of $356 million, up 76 percent.
The company said that the increase in segment operating earnings was partially offset by the mix shift to low-emission outboard engines, costs to ramp up Asian manufacturing plants, higher research and development expense for Brunswick New Technologies and lower production rates to maintain healthy inventory levels. Low-emission engines which are technically complex and contain higher-cost components, have lower margins than the carbureted two-stroke engines they are replacing. In 2005, low-emission engines accounted for 82 percent of Mercurys outboard sales compared with 59 percent a year earlier.
We continue to monitor our pipeline inventories and adjust our production rates to ensure that inventories remain at healthy levels, remarked McCoy. By carefully managing our business and reducing production where necessary, we ended 2005 with 26 weeks of supply of engines in the field, which is the same level we reported at the end of 2004 and appropriate for this time of the year.
 
Boat Segment
The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and includes 19 major boat brands, as well as a marine parts and accessories business. The Boat segment reported sales for the fourth quarter of $667.4 million, up 19 percent compared with $561.9 million in the fourth quarter of 2004. Excluding contributions from acquisitions, Boat segment sales increased 6 percent in the quarter. Operating earnings for the Boat segment increased to $29.8 million, up 23 percent from $24.2 million reported in the fourth quarter of 2004, and operating margins rose to 4.5 percent from 4.3 percent.
For 2005, Boat segment sales were up 22 percent to $2,769.8 million from $2,271.1 million in 2004. Excluding incremental sales from acquisitions, Boat segment sales were up 11 percent for the year. Operating earnings for the Boat segment were up 29 percent to $192.1 million from $149.3 million in 2004, and operating margins improved to 6.9 percent compared with 6.6 percent a year ago.
We continued to play to our strengths in the Boat segment during 2005, McCoy explained. Our multi-tiered strategy of filling in the white space in our product portfolio, improving the overall quality of our products, stressing technological innovation and nurturing stronger ties with our dealer network, is continuing to produce results. Well-known brands such as Sea Ray, Boston Whaler and Hatteras all had double-digit sales increases. The Boat Groups parts and accessories business also registered a double-digit increase for the year, enhanced by the acquisitions of Benrock and Kellogg Marine. Boat parts and accessories accounted for approximately $237 million of the Boat segments sales in 2005. Boat acquisitions also played an important role in the Boat segments sales gains, with contributions from the purchase of Albemarle, Triton boats and HarrisKayot completed in 2005, and Sea Pro, which closed at the very end of 2004.
The improvement in operating margins from volume gains and cost reduction activities was partially offset by our decision to lower production levels at certain of our boat plants to adjust field inventories, McCoy noted. Maintaining inventories at healthy levels is important for a seasonal business. At the end of the year, there were 30 weeks of supply of boats in the dealer channel, which was even with where they were a year ago and, as with our marine engine business, at levels appropriate for this point in the boating season.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment. Segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2005 totaled $176.0 million, up 2 percent from $173.2 million in the year-ago quarter, which included revenue from the since sold chain of Omni retail stores. Operating earnings increased 24 percent to $30.6 million from $24.7 million, and operating margins improved by 310 basis points to 17.4 percent from 14.3 percent in the fourth quarter of 2004.
For 2005, the Fitness segment reported sales of $551.3 million, down 1 percent from $558.3 million in 2004. Excluding sales from the Omni retail stores, equipment sales in 2005 increased 2 percent. Operating earnings in 2005 increased 25 percent to $56.3 million from $45.2 million, and operating margins were up 210 basis points to 10.2 percent from 8.1 percent a year ago.
With its expanding global manufacturing footprint, Life Fitness continues to make significant progress toward improving its operating performance, McCoy said. Effective cost management is a large part of the improvement in operating margins at Life Fitness, as well as more efficient manufacturing and a more favorable sales mix toward higher-margin cardiovascular equipment versus strength equipment.
 
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2005 totaled $126.2 million, up 5 percent compared with $119.8 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings were $15.2 million in the quarter versus $20.0 million in the comparable quarter in 2004. Operating margins were 12.0 percent in the fourth quarter of 2005 compared with 16.7 percent in 2004.
For 2005, the segment reported sales of $464.5 million, up 5 percent from $442.4 million in 2004. Operating earnings for the year were $37.2 million compared with $41.7 million in 2004, and operating margins were 8.0 percent versus 9.4 percent a year earlier.
The sales gain for the segment was primarily the result of strong sales of bowling products, primarily in Europe and Asia, as well as higher sales at our bowling retail centers, which were aided by the opening of another new, larger Brunswick Zone, McCoy said. The reduction in operating earnings was primarily related to costs associated with our decision in 2005 to move bowling ball production to a new manufacturing facility we are opening in Mexico.
 
Looking Ahead
The company said it was providing its initial range of earnings estimates for 2006. As we look ahead, we are expecting 2006 to be another record year for Brunswick with diluted earnings per share in the range of $3.25 to $3.45, McCoy said. We expect to post low- to mid-single digit sales growth in our marine businesses coming from a combination of pricing, new products, incremental sales from 2005 acquisitions, share gains and growth in international markets. For our non-marine businesses, we expect to grow the top line in the high-single digits for fitness and in the mid-single digits for our bowling and billiards businesses. Brunswick New Technologies is expected to continue its fast-paced growth rate, which, combined with our other businesses, should bring the companys total sales increase to 6 to 8 percent in 2006.
While we are early in 2006, several factors are influencing our view of sales and margin gains for the year, McCoy explained. Marine retail was down significantly in the fourth quarter of 2005 versus the prior year, and, although it is too early in the boat show season to draw meaningful conclusions about retail demand for all of 2006, we see nothing which indicates retail demand across the marine industry will be anything but flat with 2005. In fact, there could be downward pressures on marine retail demand driven by economic weakness in certain markets such as the Midwest.
As we look at margins, we anticipate several puts and takes coming together to make margin growth difficult as we see the market today, McCoy added. As a result, we expect operating margins to be relatively flat to up slightly compared with 2005.
With our view of the marine business, the timing of productivity improvements and cost savings resulting from investments we have been making, along with the seasonality of certain of our businesses and the low-emission engine transition, much of our earnings growth will come in the second half of the year, explained McCoy.
Consequently, we expect that earnings per share in the first quarter of 2006 will be in the range of $0.56 to $0.60, compared with the $0.64 reported in the first quarter of 2005, which excludes the $0.32 gain we recorded on the sale of our shares of MarineMax stock.
Were confident that we can report another record year for Brunswick even in a flat marine retail environment, McCoy concluded. Should the market experience material growth, however, well be ready to step up and take advantage of the opportunity.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; competition in the consumer electronics markets; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2004 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2005.
About Brunswick
 
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman marine and GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea and Kellogg Marine parts and accessories distributors; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20060228124925.txt.gz
TIME:20060228124925
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On February 27, 2006, the Company issued a news release announcing the appointment of Peter B. Hamilton as President - Brunswick Boat Group, John E. Stransky as President - Life Fitness Division and Warren N. Hardie as President - Brunswick Bowling & Billiards. The Company also announced the appointment of Richard C. Stone as President of the Sea Ray Division, replacing Cynthia M. Trudell, who has resigned.
 
The news release announcing the appointments is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

                                                                                                                      
 
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Court Lake Forest, IL 60045
Telephone 847.735.4700 Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
 
 
Release:
 
IMMEDIATE
Contact:
 
Dan Kubera
Director - Media Relations and Corporate Communications
Phone:
 
847-735-4617
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Feb. 27, 2006 -
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that Peter B. Hamilton has been named president - Brunswick Boat Group, reporting to Dustan E. McCoy, Brunswick chairman and chief executive officer.
Hamilton replaces McCoy, who was elected chairman and chief executive officer in December 2005. Most recently, Hamilton, 59, was president of Brunswicks Life Fitness Division, having assumed that responsibility in February 2005. He continues to serve as vice chairman of Brunswick Corporation. Previously, he had served as president - Brunswick Bowling & Billiards since 2000. Prior positions held by Hamilton at Brunswick are executive vice president and chief financial officer from 1998 to 2000, and senior vice president and chief financial officer from 1995 to 1998. Prior to joining Brunswick in 1995, he was vice president and chief financial officer of Cummins, Inc. from 1988 to 1995. Hamilton received his bachelor of arts degree from Princeton University and his law degree from Yale Law School.
Peter has a broad range of operating management and corporate experience, which will serve him well as he takes over the Brunswick Boat Group, the companys largest division, said McCoy. Under his leadership, both our Life Fitness Division and Brunswick Bowling and Billiards Division have improved their financial performance and operating margins. The Boat Group will benefit from Peters insights and leadership.
 
Stransky to head Life Fitness
John E. Stransky, currently president - Brunswick Bowling & Billiards, has been named president - Life Fitness Division, succeeding Hamilton.
Stransky, 54, assumed his current position in 2005, after leading the resurgence of Brunswick Billiards, where he had been president since 1998. During his seven years at Billiards, John oversaw a very successful and comprehensive re-branding effort, which made the Brunswick legacy come alive, while attracting customers with exciting new products and traditional craftsmanship, McCoy said. Johns energy and vision will be valuable assets as he takes over his new role.
Stransky joined Brunswick in 1981 as product manager for pins, finishes and supplies in Brunswick Bowling. During the next 17 years, he held various positions of increasing responsibility with the Bowling division, including vice president of capital equipment sales from 1993 through 1996 and vice president of the electronics unit from 1996 to 1998. He holds a bachelors degree from the University of Kansas and his MBA from the University of Arizona.
 
Hardie to head Brunswick Bowling & Billiards
Warren N. Hardie, 55, will succeed Stransky as president - Brunswick Bowling & Billiards. Most recently president - bowling retail, Hardie was responsible for the management and performance of more than 100 Brunswick-owned and operated bowling centers around the world. He had held that position since 1998. Hardie had originally joined Brunswick in 1997 as senior vice president - Brunswick Indoor Recreation Group.
Prior to Brunswick, Hardie had distinguished himself in the restaurant industry, serving as president of Kettle Restaurants, Inc. from 1995 to 1997 and in a number of positions of increasing responsibility with Dennys Inc. from 1981 to 1995. When he left Dennys, Hardie was vice president - international operations and franchising. Hardie has a bachelors degree from the University of Nevada - Las Vegas.
Warren has injected the right balance of enthusiasm and discipline in creating the family friendly atmosphere at Brunswick bowling centers, McCoy said. He has helped expand our very successful Brunswick Zone concept, while improving the operational expertise and performance of this steady contributor to Brunswicks continuing success.
 
Stone to head Sea Ray
The company also announced that Richard C.
 
Stone, 50, has been named president of its Sea Ray Division, reporting to Hamilton. He succeeds Cynthia M. Trudell, who has resigned. Most recently, Stone served as chief financial officer of the Brunswick Boat Group, as well as managing director of the companys Sealine International business unit, based in Kidderminster, United Kingdom.
Stone joined Sea Ray in 1985, as vice president and controller. During his 16 years at Sea Ray, he held various positions of increasing responsibility rising to senior vice president and chief financial officer before being named CFO of the Brunswick Boat Group in 2001. He holds a bachelors degree in accounting from Northern Arizona University and has completed the Program for Management Development at Harvard University.
 
About Brunswick
 
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Northstar marine electronics; Navman marine and GPS-based products; IDS dealer management systems; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Benrock and Kellogg Marine parts and accessories distributor; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
.



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20060427092216.txt.gz
TIME:20060427092216
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 27, 2006, Brunswick Corporation announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2006. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Some of the non-GAAP financial measures included in the news release relate to the companys
decision to sell substantially all of its Brunswick New Technologies (BNT) business unit. As a result of this decision, the company presents its first quarter results in the news release excluding these businesses, as well as the tax-related benefit and the gain on the sale of securities noted in the news release. Brunswick believes that the pro forma (non-GAAP) numbers, excluding the results of BNT, are more representative of the financial performance of Brunswicks operations as a whole. The company has provided the corresponding GAAP measures in the financial information that follows the body of the press release.
Previously, all of the BNT businesses were included in the Marine Engine segment. Although substantially all of the businesses are being held for sale, some minor businesses will be retained in the Boat, Marine Engine and Fitness segments. Information for the Bowling & Billiards segment is not affected by the decision to sell BNT. In accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 144,
Accounting for the Impairment or Disposal of Long-Lived Assets
, as the decision to sell substantially all of its BNT business unit was made in the second quarter, the company will formally disaggregate its financial statements to account for this decision in the Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q that it will file for the second quarter of 2006.
The news release also uses the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow. Brunswicks management believes that the financial measure free cash flow is useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments), excluding financing activities for continuing operations. In addition, Brunswicks management believes that presentation of: (i) diluted earnings per share for the quarter ended March 31, 2005 and 2006, excluding a first quarter 2005 investment sale gain and the effect of certain tax-related items; and (ii) Brunswicks effective tax rate excluding a tax reserve reduction, provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
Brunswick has used some of the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 8.01 Other Events.
On April 27, 2006, Brunswick Corporation issued the attached press release announcing its decision to sell substantially all of its Brunswick New Technologies (BNT) business unit. The Board of Directors also authorized Brunswick to repurchase up to $500 million of its outstanding common stock, supplanting the $200 million authorization approved by the Board in May 2005. The press release is filed as Exhibit 99.2 to this Current Report and is incorporated by reference.
 
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
3
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
4
 

                                                                                                             
                 Exhibit 99.1
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
 
 
 
               
LAKE FOREST, Ill., April 27, 2006
- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today net earnings of $67.4 million, or $0.70 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2006, on sales of $1,458.0 million and operating earnings of $87.2 million. Diluted earnings per share in 2006 include a $0.13 per-share benefit from tax-related items. For the year-ago first quarter, the company reported net earnings of $94.6 million, or $0.96 per diluted share, on sales of $1,401.1 million and operating earnings of $99.1 million. Diluted earnings per share for 2005 included a $0.32 per diluted share gain on the sale of securities.
In light of the companys previously announced decision to sell substantially all of its Brunswick New Technologies (BNT) business unit, the company will present its first quarter results excluding these businesses, as well as the tax-related benefit and the gain on the sale of securities noted above, as the company believes the pro forma (non-GAAP) numbers are more representative of the financial performance of its ongoing operations. On this basis, the company reported pro forma diluted earnings per share of $0.64 for the first quarter of 2006 compared with $0.63 for the year-ago first quarter. Sales increased 5 percent to $1,413.3 million from $1,342.5 million in the quarter, and operating earnings declined slightly to $98.2 million from $98.8 million.
Commenting on the first quarter, Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy said, The 5 percent sales growth from ongoing operations was driven primarily by contributions from boat companies acquired subsequent to the first quarter last year, as well as increased sales from our Bowling & Billiards and Fitness segments. Excluding the benefit of acquisitions, sales were down slightly. The decline in operating earnings was primarily due to lower production to reduce marine pipelines and the shift in product mix to low-emission outboard engines, described below.
Boat Segment
The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and produces fiberglass and aluminum boats and marine parts and accessories, as well as offers dealer management systems. On a pro forma basis, the Boat segment reported sales for the first quarter of $751.0 million, up 10 percent compared with $680.7 million in the first quarter of 2005. Operating earnings were $48.4 million, down from $49.1 million for the quarter, and operating margins were 6.4 percent compared with 7.2 percent in the prior year.
The sales gain for the segment was driven by acquisitions as organic sales, which excludes boat brands that were not in our portfolio in the year-ago quarter, fell by a little less than 1 percent. Marine retail was down in the first quarter when compared with very robust demand in the first quarter of 2005, McCoy said. As a result, we placed tremendous focus on managing the pipeline to ensure that we do not build up unnecessary inventory at our dealers. Consequently, we reduced production levels in certain of our brands to accomplish that. Pipeline inventories of boats totaled 31 weeks of supply at quarter end, unchanged from the same date a year ago. The higher mix of sales from acquired businesses, which have lower margins than our core brands, as well as the impact of fixed-cost absorption from lower production, led to the reduction in operating margins.
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, reported pro forma sales of $557.2 million in the first quarter of 2006, up 3 percent from $543.2 million in the year-ago first quarter. Operating earnings in the first quarter declined to $44.9 million versus $52.0 million, and operating margins declined to 8.1 percent compared with 9.6 percent for the same quarter in 2005.
2
During the quarter, segment sales benefited from increased sales of sterndrive engines and parts and accessories in the United States, partially offset by slightly lower outboard sales, McCoy said. Operating earnings, however, were affected by the outboard engine technology transition. As we have previously disclosed, we discontinued selling traditional carbureted two-stroke outboard engines in North America beginning July 1, 2005. Our current product offerings of low-emission outboards now account for practically all of our outboard product mix as we complete this technology transition. Approximately 97 percent of our U.S. outboard sales in the first quarter of 2006 came from low-emission engines, up from 65 percent in the year-ago first quarter. The lower margins on these products, along with the fixed-cost absorption impact from lower production levels to maintain pipeline inventories, are largely behind the decline in Marine Engine segment operating earnings and margins. Operating earnings are expected to increase in the second half of this year as we mark the anniversary of the transition date and as we begin to realize more savings from our lower-cost manufacturing facilities in Asia, at which we are currently ramping up production.
The companys pipeline management efforts are paying off. We had 28 weeks of supply of engines in the pipeline at the end of the first quarter of 2006, down one week compared with the same time a year ago, McCoy noted. We will continue to manage our production to keep pipelines at healthy levels as we move into the spring selling season.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment. Segment sales in the first quarter of 2006 on a pro forma basis totaled $134.5 million, up 5 percent from $128.1 million in the year-ago quarter. Segment operating earnings were up 39 percent for the first quarter of 2006, totaling $8.9 million compared with $6.4 million for the year-ago quarter, and operating margins were up 160 basis points to 6.6 percent as compared with 5.0 percent a year ago.
3
Margin and earnings improvement remain the story at Life Fitness, McCoy said. Life Fitness has achieved this result through hard work, diligence and steadily improving productivity and operating results through manufacturing and supply chain efficiencies.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the first quarter of 2006 totaled $114.7 million, up 3 percent compared with $111.5 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings advanced 15 percent, totaling $12.8 million in the first quarter versus $11.1 million from the year-ago quarter. Operating margins were up 120 basis points to 11.2 percent as compared with 10.0 percent in 2005.
We saw sales increases across the board in our Bowling & Billiards segment during the quarter, McCoy said. Our expanded Brunswick Zone retail bowling centers continue to perform at very high levels, growing at rates higher than our traditional centers. Operating margins benefited from lower litigation expense, which was partially offset by costs associated with the transition of bowling ball manufacturing from Michigan to Mexico.
Looking Ahead
While we are just entering the boat-selling season, given the continued weakness we saw at retail in the first quarter, we believe retail demand overall for the full year will be flat to down slightly, McCoy said. In the second quarter, we estimate our marine operating earnings will be down when compared with the strong 18 percent increase we reported in the second quarter of 2005. This is primarily due to our decision to make additional production cuts in the quarter in select products to continue to manage pipeline inventories. This will contribute to lower operating margins for the quarter and the full year due to the impact of lower fixed-cost absorption. Margins will also be affected by the low-emission outboard transition. When we factor in the decision to sell substantially all of our BNT business unit, total corporate sales for the year are estimated to be up in the low- to mid-single digits, compared with pro forma sales for 2005. Therefore, we are estimating that diluted earnings per share for 2006 will be in the range of $3.00 to $3.15. This is compared with pro forma EPS of $3.13 for 2005, which excludes the gain on the sale of securities mentioned earlier, as well as tax-related benefits. For the second quarter, earnings per diluted share are estimated in the range of $0.90 to $0.97, as compared with $1.12 for the year-ago second quarter.
4
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; competition in the consumer electronics markets; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2005.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Information
As noted above, certain information relating to the companys financial results is presented in this news release on a pro forma (non-GAAP) basis, as the company believes that presentation on this basis is more representative of the financial performance of its ongoing operations. Results are presented on both a GAAP and non-GAAP basis in the financial information that follows the body of this release. The company said it will formally disaggregate its financial statements in its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the second quarter of 2006, at which time the financial information disclosed in this announcement as non-GAAP will be in accordance with GAAP.
5
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
6
 
 
 
7
 
 
8
 
 
9
 
 
 
 
10
 
 
 
11
 
 
 
 
12
 
 
 
 
13
 
 
14

                                                                                                                 
                 Exhibit 99.2
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
 
 
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., April 27, 2006 -
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today it intends to sell substantially all of its Brunswick New Technologies (BNT) business unit. This business units products are primarily based on GPS technologies and sold in the portable consumer navigation, fleet tracking, and automotive and marine markets. The company said it has retained Merrill Lynch & Co. to act as its financial advisor in connection with the sale.
This business unit has experienced exceptional growth under Brunswicks ownership over the past few years - especially in the portable land-based navigation segment, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. As we become increasingly focused on our core business segments - marine, fitness, bowling and billiards - we have determined that continuing to invest in this business unit to fuel growth is not consistent with our long-term strategic objectives. We believe that BNTs excellent long-term prospects may be better achieved under different ownership - one that is focused on BNTs technological expertise - to enable it to reach its full potential.
BNT operations included in the proposed sale consist primarily of its Navman, Northstar and MX Marine brands. The company said it would retain MotoTron, which
designs and supplies sophisticated engine control and vehicle networking systems, IDS Integrated Dealer Systems, which provides management systems to marine and other dealerships, and technologies and engineering talent related to connectivity features in Brunswicks fitness products
.
The company also announced that its board of directors has authorized the repurchase of up to $500 million of the companys outstanding common stock. Share repurchases will be made from time to time in the open market or through privately negotiated transactions, based on market conditions. This authorization supplants the $200 million authorization approved by the board in May 2005, under which the company repurchased approximately 3.6 million shares for approximately $137.8 million. The company currently has approximately 94.5 million shares outstanding.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Benrock parts and accessories distributors
;
IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20060501120013.txt.gz
TIME:20060501120013
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
This Form 8-K/A is being filed for the purposes of providing financial information that supplements the information provided in a Form 8-K filed by Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) on April 27, 2006, and to correct an error in the Comparative Consolidated Condensed Statements of Cash Flows in the financial statements provided with the news release furnished with that Form 8-K.
In its Form 8-K filed on April 27, 2006, Brunswick announced its decision to sell substantially all of its Brunswick New Technologies (BNT) business unit. Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K/A provides unaudited comparative consolidated condensed statements of income, balance sheets, cash flows and selected segment information for quarterly periods in 2006, 2005, 2004 and 2003, excluding the results of BNT (the Supplemental Financial Information). The Supplemental Financial Information has been prepared utilizing non-GAAP financial information to illustrate how Brunswicks financial statements would have appeared had the decision to sell BNT been made prior to March 31, 2006. Brunswick believes that the pro forma (non-GAAP) numbers, excluding the results of BNT, are more representative of the financial performance of its ongoing financial operations.
For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Previously, all of the BNT businesses were included in the Marine Engine segment. Although substantially all of the businesses are being held for sale, some minor businesses will be retained in the Boat, Marine Engine and Fitness segments. Information for the Bowling & Billiards segment is not affected by the decision to sell BNT. In accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 144,
Accounting for the Impairment or Disposal of Long-Lived Assets
, as the decision to sell substantially all of its BNT business unit was made in the second quarter, the company will formally disaggregate its financial statements to account for this decision in the Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q that it will file for the second quarter of 2006.
In the Form 8-K filed on April 27, 2006, on the page in the news release containing the Comparative Consolidated Condensed Statements of Cash Flows, the Company provided non-GAAP supplemental information on Free Cash Flow. For the three months ended March 31, 2005, the Other, net and "Total Free Cash Flow" amounts in this supplemental data were incorrect. Corrected Comparative Consolidated Condensed Statements of Cash Flows are included as Exhibit 99.2 to this Form 8-K/A. This Form 8-K/A does not change or update any other previously reported financial statements or disclosures of Brunswick Corporation contained in the original Form 8-K.
Both the Supplemental Financial Information and the corrected cash flow statement include the use of the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow. Brunswicks management believes that the financial measure free cash flow is useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments), excluding financing activities for continuing operations. Brunswicks management believes that this measure is useful to investors because it permits investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.
 
Brunswick has used some of the financial measures that are included in the Supplemental Financial Information and the cash flow statements for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Page 1 of 5
 
 
Page 2 of 5
 
 
 
Page 3 of 5
 
 
Page 4 of 5
 
 
 
 
Page 5 of 5

 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20060712092621.txt.gz
TIME:20060712092621
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
ITEM 2.02
Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 12, 2006, Brunswick Corporation announced expectations for the second quarter earnings and provided new earnings estimates for the full year 2006. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing these estimated earnings is incorporated herein by reference, and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. A non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Non-GAAP financial measures used in the news release were Brunswicks estimated diluted earnings per share for the second quarter and the full year 2006. In the news release, the Company stated that it expects to report earnings from continuing operations in the range of $0.93 to $0.94 per diluted share, excluding tax-related items, which falls in the middle of the Companys previously announced estimate of $0.90 to $0.97. In addition, the Company had previously estimated that diluted earnings per share for the full year 2006 would fall in the range of $3.00 to $3.15, excluding tax-related items, but that a range of $2.40 to $2.55, also excluding tax-related items, is currently more appropriate under the circumstances. In the news release, Brunswick also stated that in 2005 the Company reported earnings from continuing operations of $3.13 per diluted share, excluding stock sale gains and tax-related items.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures -- including those that are non-GAAP financial measures-- and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that presentation of earnings per share excluding (i) non-recurring tax items, and (ii) a first quarter 2005 gain on the sale of securities provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                         & #160;                                   Exhibit 99.1
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
                                                                                                                          
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 12, 2006
- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that it expects to report earnings from continuing operations in the range of $0.93 to $0.94 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2006, in the middle of the companys previously announced estimate of $0.90 to $0.97. This estimate excludes tax-related benefits expected to be reported in the quarter.
Brunswick will release its second quarter 2006 financial results before the markets open on Thursday, July 27. The company said it expects to report sales up 1 percent to approximately $1.55 billion. Excluding acquisitions, however, sales are estimated to have declined about 4 percent.
The company said that during the second quarter, it acquired approximately 1.5 million shares of its common stock for approximately $56 million. Over the past year, approximately 5.1 million shares have been repurchased for approximately $193 million.
Our second quarter results are in line with our expectations, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. Throughout the key second quarter selling season for 2006-model-year marine products, however, we have experienced significant declines in retail demand, which has resulted in an increase in pipeline inventories. As we now enter the off-season, we cant rely solely on retail demand to rebalance the pipeline. So, we will be reducing further our production levels, leading to a lowering of our earnings estimate for the second half of the year. This is primarily due to reduced sales and the impact of fixed cost absorption from production cuts needed to adjust pipeline inventories. Although this will result in reduced margins, we believe that managing pipeline inventories is critical in a cyclical, as well as a seasonal, industry.
The company said that 2006 earnings from continuing operations are expected to be in the range of $2.40 to $2.55 per diluted share, compared with its previous estimate of $3.00 and $3.15 per diluted share, in both cases excluding tax-related items. In 2005, the company reported earnings from continuing operations of $3.13 per diluted share, excluding stock sale gains and tax-related items.
While changing market conditions impact our financial results in the short-term, we have not lost sight of our long-term value creation objectives, and we continue to execute relentlessly against our five key strategies: get the product right; get the distribution right; be best cost in our industries; be global and attract and retain talent, McCoy continued. Focusing intently on such fundamentals is better positioning us to benefit when industry conditions improve.
Conference Call Scheduled
The company said a conference call with investors has been scheduled for 10 a.m. CDT today, hosted by McCoy, Peter G. Leemputte, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Kathryn J. Chieger, vice president - corporate and investor relations. The call will be broadcast over the Internet at
www.br
u
nswick.com
. To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call
800-857-4546 (passcode: Brunswick). Callers outside of North America should call 1-210-234-0035
to be connected. These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call. A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Wednesday, July 19, 2006, by calling 866-367-6718
or 1-203-369-0236.
The replay will also be available at
www.brun
s
w
ick.com
.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; competition in the consumer electronics markets; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the ability to successfully complete announced divestitures; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2005 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com.



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20060718122337.txt.gz
TIME:20060718122337
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
  July 18, 2006
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):
 
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
 
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
o
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
o
 
 
Item 8.01               Other Events.
A statement setting forth the computation of Brunswick Corporation's ratios of earnings to fixed charges for the three months ended March 31, 2005 and 2006 and the years ended December 31, 2003, 2004 and 2005 is attached hereto as Exhibit 12.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01
      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
                          
(d)           Exhibits
The following exhibit is filed with this Current Report on Form 8-K:
 
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3
 
4

Exhibit 12.1
 
Brunswick Corporation Computation of Ratio of Earnings to Fixed Charges(A) (In millions)
 
For computation of the ratio of earnings to fixed charges, earnings have been calculated by adding fixed charges to earnings from continuing operations before income taxes and dividends received from equity affiliates, then deducting the undistributed earnings of affiliates. Fixed charges consist of interest expense, estimated interest portion of rental expense and capitalized interest.
(A)
        


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20060724113504.txt.gz
TIME:20060724113504
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
o
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 8.01               Other Events.
On July 19, 2006, Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") entered into an Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") with Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., as Representatives of the several Underwriters named therein, with respect to the offering and sale by the Company of $250,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its Floating Rate Notes due 2009 (the "Notes") under the Company's shelf Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-71344).  The sale of the Notes closed on July 24, 2006.  The Notes were issued pursuant to an Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987, between the Company and BNY Midwest Trust Company, as successor trustee.  A press release issued by the Company announcing the sale of the Notes is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
The Underwriting Agreement and the form of the Notes are filed as Exhibits 1.1 and 4.1, respectively, to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In connection with the issuance of the Notes, Sidley Austin LLP provided the Company with the legal opinion attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 5.1.
Item 9.01 
      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
                       
(d)           Exhibits
The following exhibits are filed with this Current Report on Form 8-K:
 
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3
 
4

Exhibit 1.1
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(a Delaware corporation)
Floating Rate Notes due 2009
UNDERWRITING AGREEMENT
Dated July 19, 2006
 
 
 
 
 
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(a Delaware corporation)
$250,000,000
Floating Rate Notes due 2009
UNDERWRITING AGREEMENT
July 19, 2006
MERRILL LYNCH & CO. Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith                     Incorporated J.P. Morgan Securities Inc.        as Representatives of the several Underwriters
c/o Merrill Lynch & Co.                 Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith                                     Incorporated 4 World Financial Center New York, New York 10080
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), confirms its agreement with Merrill Lynch & Co., Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated ("Merrill Lynch"), J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. ("JPMorgan") and each of the other underwriters named in Schedule I attached hereto (collectively, the "Underwriters," which term shall also include any underwriter substituted as hereinafter provided in Section 10 hereof), for whom Merrill Lynch and JPMorgan are acting as representatives (in such capacity, the "Representatives"), with respect to the issue and sale by the Company and the purchase by the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, of the respective principal amounts set forth in said Schedule I of $250,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Floating Rate  Notes due 2009 (the "Securities").  The Securities are to be issued pursuant to an indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987 (the "Indenture"), between the Company and BNY Midwest Trust Company, as successor to Harris Trust and Savings Bank, as trustee (the "Trustee").  The term "Indenture," as used herein, includes the Officers' Certificate (as defined in the Indenture) establishing the form and terms of the Securities pursuant to Sections 2.01 and 2.03 of the Indenture.
1
 
The Company understands that the Underwriters propose to make a public offering of the Securities as soon as the Representatives deem advisable after this underwriting agreement (this "Agreement") has been executed and delivered.
The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") a registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-71344), including the related preliminary prospectus or prospectuses, covering the registration of certain of its securities, including the Securities, under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "1933 Act"), and the offering thereof from time to time, in accordance with Rule 415 of the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1933 Act (the "1933 Act Regulations").  Such registration statement has been declared effective by the Commission, and the Indenture has been qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (the "1939 Act").  Such registration statement, at any given time, including the amendments thereto to such time, the exhibits and any schedules thereto at such time, the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act at such time and the documents otherwise deemed to be a part thereof or included therein by the 1933 Act Regulations, is referred to herein as the "Registration Statement."  The Company has also filed with the Commission a preliminary prospectus, specifically relating to the Securities, in accordance with the provisions of Rule 424(b) of the 1933 Act Regulations ("Rule 424(b)").  In accordance with Section 3(a) of this Agreement, the Company will prepare and file a final prospectus, consisting of a final prospectus supplement relating to the Securities together with the basic prospectus included in the Registration Statement at the time it was declared effective (the "Base Prospectus"), in accordance with the provisions of Rule 424(b).  Such final prospectus in the form first furnished to the Underwriters by the Company for use in connection with the offering of the Securities, including such final prospectus supplement and the Base Prospectus and all documents incorporated or deemed incorporated therein by reference pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act at the time of the execution of this Agreement, are collectively referred to herein as the "Prospectus."  Any information included in such final prospectus that was omitted from the Registration Statement at the time it became effective but that is deemed to be part of and included in the Registration Statement pursuant to Rule 430B of the 1933 Act Regulations ("Rule 430B") is referred to as "Rule 430B Information."  Each prospectus used in connection with the offering of the Securities that omitted Rule 430B Information is herein called a "preliminary prospectus."
All references in this Agreement to financial statements and schedules and other information which is "contained," "included" or "stated" in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (and all other references of like import) shall be deemed to mean and include all such financial statements and schedules and other information which is or is deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be; and all references in this Agreement to amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to mean and include the filing of any document under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "1934 Act"), which is or is deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, such preliminary or the Prospectus, as the case may be.  For purposes of this Agreement, all references to the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus or to any amendment or supplement to any of the foregoing shall be deemed to include any copy filed with the
2
Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval System ("EDGAR").
SECTION 1.           .
Representations and Warranties
(a)           The Company represents and warrants to each Underwriter as of the date hereof, the Applicable Time referred to in this Section(1)(a) and as of the Closing Time referred to in Section 2(b) hereof, and agrees with each Underwriter, as follows:
(1)             At the time the Company or any person acting on its behalf (within the meaning, for this clause only, of Rule 163(c) of the 1933 Act Regulations) made any offer relating to the Securities in reliance on the exemption of Rule 163 of the 1933 Act Regulations and at the date hereof, the Company was and is a "well-known seasoned issuer" as defined in Rule 405 of the 1933 Act Regulations ("Rule 405"), including not having been and not being an "ineligible issuer" as defined in Rule 405.
(2)             The Company meets the requirements for use of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act.  Each of the Registration Statement and any post-effective amendment thereto has become effective under the 1933 Act and no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto has been issued under the 1933 Act and no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, are contemplated by the Commission, and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information has been complied with.  In addition, the Indenture has been duly qualified under the 1939 Act.
At the respective times the Registration Statement and any post-effective amendments thereto became effective, at the date hereof and at the Closing Time, the Registration Statement and any amendments and supplements thereto complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1939 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1939 Act (the "1939 Act Regulations") and did not and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.  Neither the Prospectus nor any amendments or supplements thereto, at the time the Prospectus or any such amendment or supplement was issued and at the Closing Time, included or will include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or will omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the representations and warranties in this subsection shall not apply to that part of the Registration Statement which shall constitute the Statement of Qualification of the Trustee on Form T-1 under the 1939 Act or to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by the Trustee or any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), in any preliminary prospectus or in the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
3
 
The prospectus filed as part of the Registration Statement as originally filed  complied when so filed in all material respects with the 1933 Act Regulations, and the Prospectus delivered to the Underwriters for use in connection with the offering of the Securities will, at the time of such delivery, be identical to any electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
As of the Applicable Time, neither (x) the Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus(es) (as defined below) issued at or prior to the Applicable Time (as defined below) or the Statutory Prospectus (as defined below), all considered together (collectively, the "General Disclosure Package"), nor (y) any individual Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus, when considered together with the General Disclosure Package, included any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
As used in this subsection and elsewhere in this Agreement:
"Applicable Time" means 1:45 pm (Eastern time) on July 19, 2006 or such other time as agreed by the Company and the Representatives.
"Issuer Free Writing Prospectus" means any "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433 of the 1933 Act Regulations ("Rule 433"), relating to the Securities that (i) is required to be filed with the Commission by the Company, (ii) is a "road show that is a written communication" within the meaning of Rule 433(d)(8)(i), whether or not required to be filed with the Commission or (iii) is exempt from filing pursuant to Rule 433(d)(5)(i) because it contains a description of the Securities or of the offering that does not reflect the final terms, in each case in the form filed or required to be filed with the Commission or, if not required to be filed, in the form retained in the Company's records pursuant to Rule 433(g).
"Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is intended for general distribution to prospective investors, as evidenced by its being specified in Schedule II hereto.
"Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not an Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus.
"Statutory Prospectus" as of any time means the prospectus relating to the Securities that is included in the Registration Statement immediately prior to that time, including any document incorporated by reference therein and any preliminary or other prospectus deemed to be a part thereof.
Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the completion of the public offer and sale of the Securities or until any earlier date that the issuer notified or notifies the Representatives as described in Section 3(f), did not, does not and will not include any information that conflicted, conflicts or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement or
4
the Prospectus, including any document incorporated by reference therein and any preliminary or other prospectus deemed to be a part thereof that has not been superseded or modified.
The representations and warranties in this subsection shall not apply to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein.
(3)             The accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included in the Registration Statement are independent public accountants as required by the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations.
(4)             The financial statements, together with the related notes thereto, included in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus present fairly the financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries as of the dates indicated and the results of their operations for the periods specified; except as otherwise stated in the Registration Statement, said financial statements have been prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a consistent basis; and the supporting schedules included in the Registration Statement present fairly the information required to be stated therein.  The selected financial data included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005 present fairly the information shown therein and have been compiled on a basis consistent with that of the audited financial statements included in the Registration Statement.
(5)             Since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, except as otherwise stated therein, (A) there has been no material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business and (B) there have been no transactions entered into by the Company or any of its subsidiaries, other than those in the ordinary course of business, which are material with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
(6)             The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware with corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Prospectus and to enter into and perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Indenture; and the Company is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
5
 
(7)             Each subsidiary of the Company which is a significant subsidiary (a "Subsidiary") as defined in Rule 405 of the 1933 Act Regulations has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Prospectus and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each such Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and nonassessable and is owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity.
(8)             Each of the Indenture and each supplement thereto, if any, to the date hereof has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company, has been duly qualified under the 1939 Act, and, assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by the Trustee, constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as enforcement thereof may be subject to (A) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to creditors' rights generally, and (B) general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law); and the Indenture conforms in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus.
(9)             The Securities have been duly authorized, and, when executed, authenticated, issued and delivered in the manner provided for in the Indenture and sold and paid for as provided herein, the Securities will constitute legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company, entitled to the benefits of the Indenture and enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except as enforcement thereof may be subject to (A) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to creditors' rights generally, and (B) general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law); and the Securities conform in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus.
(10)           Neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries is in violation of its charter or in default (and, to the knowledge of the Company, no event has occurred, and no circumstances exist, that with the passage of time or giving of notice would constitute a default) in the performance or observance of any material obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which it or any of them may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is subject; and the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Indenture, the issuance and delivery of the Securities and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and therein and
6
 
compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder and thereunder have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action and will not conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default (or with the passage of time or giving of notice constitute a default) under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries pursuant to, any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which it or any of them may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is subject, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the charter or by-laws of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries or any violation of any applicable law, administrative regulation or administrative or court decree.
(11)           Other than as disclosed in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, there is no action, suit or proceeding before or by any court or governmental agency or body, domestic or foreign, now pending, or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, which is required to be disclosed in the Registration Statement, or which might result in any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, or which might materially and adversely affect the properties or assets thereof or which might materially and adversely affect the consummation of this Agreement or the issuance of the Securities pursuant to the Indenture; all pending legal or governmental proceedings to which the Company or any subsidiary is a party or of which any of their respective property or assets is the subject which are not described in the Registration Statement, including ordinary routine litigation incidental to the business, are, considered in the aggregate, not material; and there are no contracts or documents of the Company or any of its subsidiaries which are required to be filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement by the 1933 Act or by the 1933 Act Regulations which have not been so filed.
(12)           The Company and the Subsidiaries own or possess, or can acquire on reasonable terms, the patents, patent rights, licenses, inventions, copyrights, know-how (including trade secrets and other unpatented and/or unpatentable proprietary or confidential information, systems or procedures), trademarks, service marks and trade names (collectively, "patent and proprietary rights") presently employed by them in connection with the business now operated by them, and neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries has received any notice or is otherwise aware of any infringement of or conflict with asserted rights of others with respect to any patent and proprietary rights, or of any facts which would render any patent and proprietary rights invalid or inadequate to protect the interest of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries therein, and which infringement or conflict (if the subject of any unfavorable decision, ruling or finding) or invalidity or inadequacy, singly or in the aggregate, would result in any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
(13)           No authorization, approval or consent of any court or governmental authority or agency is necessary in connection with the offering, issuance or sale of the
7
Securities hereunder, except such as may be required under the 1933 Act, the 1933 Act Regulations, the 1939 Act, the 1939 Act Regulations or state securities laws.
(14)           The Company and the Subsidiaries possess such certificates, authorities or permits issued by the appropriate state, federal or foreign regulatory agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business now operated by them, and neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries has received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such certificate, authority or permit which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would materially and adversely affect the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
(15)           Except as described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, and except as would not, singly or in the aggregate, result in any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, (A) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of any federal, state, local or foreign statute, law, rule, regulation, ordinance, code, policy or rule of common law or any judicial or administrative interpretation thereof, including any judicial or administrative order, consent, decree or judgment, relating to pollution or protection of human health, the environment (including, without limitation, ambient air, surface water, groundwater, land surface or subsurface strata) or wildlife, including, without limitation, laws and regulations relating to the release or threatened release of chemicals, pollutants, contaminants, wastes, toxic substances, hazardous substances, petroleum or petroleum products, asbestos-containing materials or mold (collectively, "Hazardous Materials") or to the manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, disposal, transport or handling of Hazardous Materials (collectively, "Environmental Laws"), (B) the Company and its subsidiaries have all permits, authorizations and approvals required under any applicable Environmental Laws and are each in compliance with their requirements, (C) there are no pending or threatened administrative, regulatory or judicial actions, suits, demands, demand letters, claims, liens, notices of noncompliance or violation, investigation or proceedings relating to any Environmental Law against the Company or any of its subsidiaries and (D) there are no events or circumstances that would reasonably be expected to form the basis of an order for clean-up or remediation, or an action, suit or proceeding by any private party or governmental body or agency, against or affecting the Company or any of its subsidiaries relating to Hazardous Materials or any Environmental Laws.
(16)           This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
(17)           The Company and the Subsidiaries have good and sufficient title to all property described or referred to in the Registration Statement as being owned by them, in each case free and clear of all liens, claims, security interests or other encumbrances, with such exceptions as are described or referred to in the Registration Statement or as are not material to the condition, financial or otherwise, or to the earnings, business
8
affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
(18)           The documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Prospectus, at the time they were or hereafter are filed with the Commission, complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1934 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1934 Act (the "1934 Act Regulations"), and, when read together with the other information in the Prospectus, at the time the Registration Statement became effective, at the date of the Prospectus and at the Closing Time will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(19)           There are no outstanding loans, advances (except normal advances for business expenses in the ordinary course of business) or guarantees of indebtedness by the Company to or for the benefit of any of the officers or directors of the Company or any of their respective family members, except as disclosed in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus.
(20)           There is and has been no failure on the part of the Company or any of the Company's directors or officers, in their capacities as such, to comply in all material respects with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and the rules and regulations promulgated in connection therewith, including Section 402 related to loans and Sections 302 and 906 related to certifications.
(21)           The Company and its consolidated subsidiaries maintain a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurances that (A) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; (B) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain accountability for assets; (C) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (D) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.  Except as described in the Prospectus, since the end of the Company's most recent audited fiscal year, there has been (I) no material weakness in the Company's internal control over financial reporting (whether or not remediated) and (II) no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting.
(22)           The Company has implemented the "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rules 13a-15 and 15d-15 of the 1934 Act Regulations) required in order for the principal executive officer and principal financial officer of the Company to engage in the review and evaluation process mandated by the 1934 Act Regulations.  To the extent required by the 1934 Act Regulations, the Company's "disclosure controls and procedures" are reasonably designed to ensure that all information (both financial and non-financial) required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or
9
submits under the 1934 Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations, and that all such information is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure and to make the certifications of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer of the Company required under the 1934 Act with respect to such reports.
(b)           Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company and delivered to you or to counsel for the Underwriters in connection with the offering of the Securities shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company to each Underwriter as to the matters covered thereby.
SECTI0N 2.            .  On the basis of the representations and warranties contained herein and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth:
Sale and Delivery to Underwriters; Closing
(a)           The Company agrees to sell to each Underwriter, and each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the purchase price set forth in Schedule III, the principal amount of the Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter on Schedule I, plus any additional principal amount of the Securities which such Underwriter may become obligated to purchase pursuant to the provisions of Section 10 hereof.
(b)           Payment of the purchase price for, and delivery of certificates for, the Securities shall be made at the date, time and location specified in Schedule III (unless postponed in accordance with the provisions of Section 10) or such other date, time and location as shall be agreed upon by the Representatives and the Company (such time and date of payment and delivery being herein called "Closing Time"). Unless otherwise specified in Schedule III, payment shall be made to the Company by wire transfer of immediately available funds, against delivery to the Representatives for the respective accounts of the Underwriters of certificates for the Securities to be purchased by them. Certificates for the Securities shall be in such denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request in writing at least two business days prior to the Closing Time. It is understood that each Underwriter has authorized the Representatives, for its account, to accept delivery of, receipt for, and make payment of the purchase price for, the Securities which it has agreed to purchase. You, individually and not as Representatives of the Underwriters, may (but shall not be obligated to) make payment of the purchase price for the Securities to be purchased by any Underwriter whose money has not been received by the Closing Time but such payment shall not relieve such Underwriter from its obligations hereunder. The certificates, which may be in temporary form, for the Securities will be made available for examination and packaging by the Representatives not later than 10:00 A.M. on the last business day prior to the Closing Time.
SECTION 3.           .  The Company covenants with each Underwriter as follows:
Covenants of the Company
(a)           In connection with the offering of the Securities, the Company will prepare a prospectus supplement setting forth the principal amount of the Securities covered thereby and their terms not otherwise specified in the Indenture, the names of the Underwriters and the
 
10
 
principal amount of the Securities which each severally has agreed to purchase, the name of the Representatives, the price at which the Securities are to be purchased by the Underwriters from the Company, the initial public offering price, the selling concession and reallowance, if any, and such other information as the Representatives and the Company deem appropriate in connection with the offering of the Securities. The Company will promptly transmit copies of the prospectus supplement to the Commission for filing pursuant to Rule 424 of the 1933 Act Regulations in the manner and within the time period required under Rule 424(b) (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8)) and will furnish to the Underwriters named therein as many copies of the Prospectus as the Representatives shall reasonably request.
(b)           The Company will notify the Representatives promptly, and confirm the notice in writing, (i) of the effectiveness of any amendment to the Registration Statement, (ii) of the mailing or the delivery to the Commission for filing of any supplement to the Prospectus or any document to be filed pursuant to the 1934 Act which will be incorporated by reference into the Prospectus or the Registration Statement, (iii) of the receipt of any comments from the Commission with respect to the Registration Statement or Prospectus, (iv) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or for additional information, (v) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any order preventing or suspending the use of any Prospectus or the initiation of any proceedings for any such purpose, or of any examination pursuant to Section 8(e) of the 1933 Act concerning the Registration Statement, (vi) if the Company becomes the subject of a proceeding under Section 8A of the 1933 Act in connection with the offering of the Securities and (vii) of the suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, or the initiation or threatening of any proceedings for such purpose of which the Company becomes aware. The Company will use all reasonable efforts to prevent the issuance of any stop order or any order preventing or suspending the use of any Prospectus or suspending such qualification, and, in the event of the issuance of a stop order or any order preventing or suspending the use of any Prospectus or suspending such qualifications, to use all reasonable efforts to promptly obtain the lifting thereof.
(c)           The Company will give the Representatives notice of its intention to file or prepare any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus, whether pursuant to the 1933 Act, the 1934 Act or otherwise, will furnish the Representatives with copies of any such amendment or supplement within a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing, and will not file any such amendment or supplement to which the Representatives or counsel for the Underwriters shall reasonably object.  The Company has given the Representatives notice of any filings made pursuant to the 1934 Act or 1934 Act Regulations within 48 hours prior to the Applicable Time; the Company will give the Representatives notice of its intention to make any such filing from the Applicable Time to the Closing Time and will furnish the Representatives with copies of any such documents a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing and will not file or use any such document to which the Representatives or counsel for the Underwriters shall reasonably object.  The Company will prepare a final term sheet (the "Final Term Sheet") reflecting the final terms of the Securities, which shall be in the form set forth in Schedule II, and shall file such Final Term Sheet as an "issuer free writing prospectus" pursuant to Rule 433 prior to the close of business two business days after the date hereof; provided that the Company shall furnish the
11
Representative(s) with copies of any such Final Term Sheet a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing and will not use or file any such document to which the Representative(s) or counsel to the Underwriters shall reasonably object.
(d)           The Company will deliver to the Representatives without charge five signed copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto (including exhibits filed therewith or incorporated by reference therein and documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein) and as many conformed copies as the Representatives may reasonably request and will also deliver to the Representatives a conformed copy of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto (without exhibits) for each of the Underwriters.
(e)           The Company will furnish to each Underwriter without charge, from time to time during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act or the 1934 Act, such number of copies of the Prospectus (as amended or supplemented) as such Underwriter may reasonably request for the purposes contemplated by the 1933 Act or the 1934 Act or the respective applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
(f)            If at any time when a prospectus is required by the 1933 Act to be delivered in connection with the sale of the Securities, any event shall occur as a result of which it is necessary to amend or supplement the Prospectus in order to make the Prospectus not misleading in the light of the circumstances existing at the time it is delivered to a purchaser, or if it shall be necessary to amend the Registration Statement or supplement the Prospectus to comply with the 1933 Act or the 1933 Act Regulations, the Company will forthwith amend the Registration Statement or supplement the Prospectus, as the case may be (in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters), so as to correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance and the Company will furnish to the Underwriters a reasonable number of copies of such amendment or supplement.  The Company will use its best efforts to have such amendment declared effective as soon as practicable.  If at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus there occurred or occurs an event or development as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus conflicted or would conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement (or any other registration statement relating to the Securities) or the Statutory Prospectus or any preliminary prospectus or included or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or would omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances prevailing at that subsequent time, not misleading, the Company will promptly notify the Representatives and will promptly amend or supplement, at its own expense, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to eliminate or correct such conflict, untrue statement or omission.
(g)           The Company will endeavor, in cooperation with the Underwriters, to qualify the Securities for offering and sale under the applicable securities laws of such states and other jurisdictions of the United States as the Representatives may designate; provided, however, that the Company shall not be obligated to qualify as a foreign corporation in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction. In each jurisdiction in which the Securities have been so qualified, the Company will file such statements and reports as may be required by the laws of such jurisdiction to continue such
12
 
qualification in effect for a period of not less than one year from the effective date of the Registration Statement.
(h)           The Company will timely file such reports pursuant to the 1934 Act as are necessary in order to make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable an earnings statement for the purposes of, and to provide the benefits contemplated by, the last paragraph of Section 11(a) of the 1933 Act.
(i)            The Company will use the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Securities in the manner specified in the Prospectus under "Use of Proceeds."
(j)            Until the business day following the Closing Time, the Company will not, without the Representatives' prior written consent, directly or indirectly, sell, offer to sell or announce the offering of, or otherwise dispose of, any debt securities of the Company covered by the Registration Statement or any other registration statement filed under the 1933 Act.
(k)           The Company, during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act, will file all documents required to be filed with the Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15 of the 1934 Act within the time periods required by the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations.
(l)            The Company represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Representatives, and each Underwriter represents and agrees that unless it obtains the prior consent of the Company and the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, or that would otherwise constitute a "free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 405, required to be filed with the Commission; provided that
Issuer General Use
the prior written consent of the parties hereto shall be deemed to have been given in respect of the
.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Underwriters may convey the information to be included in the Final Term Sheet to be prepared and filed in accordance with Section 3(c) prior to the time the Final Term Sheet is prepared.  Any such free writing prospectus consented to by the Company and the Representatives is hereinafter referred to as a "Permitted Free Writing Prospectus."  The Company represents that it has treated or agrees that it will treat each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433,  and has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including timely filing with the Commission where required, legending and record keeping.
Free Writing Prospectuses included in Schedule II hereto
SECTION 4.           .  The Company will pay all expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, including (i) the printing and filing of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, (ii) the typing, printing and distribution of this Agreement and the Indenture, (iii) the preparation, issuance and delivery of the certificates for the Securities to the Underwriters, including transfer taxes, if any, payable upon the sale, issuance and delivery to the Underwriters of the Securities, (iv) the fees and disbursements of the Company's counsel and accountants, (v) the qualification of the Securities under securities laws in accordance with the provisions of Section 3(g) hereof, including filing fees and the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters in connection therewith and
Payment of Expenses
13
 
in connection with the preparation of the Blue Sky Survey, (vi) the printing and delivery to the Underwriters of copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, of each preliminary prospectus, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus and of the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto and any costs associated with electronic delivery of any of the foregoing by the Underwriters to investors, (vii) the printing and delivery to the Underwriters of copies of the Blue Sky Survey, (viii) the fees of rating agencies, (ix) the fees, if any, of the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. and (x) the fees and expenses of the Trustee, including the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Trustee, in connection with the Indenture.
If this Agreement is terminated by the Representatives in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 or Section 9(a)(i) hereof, the Company shall reimburse the Underwriters for all of their out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for such Underwriters.
SECTION 5            .  The obligations of the several Underwriters hereunder are subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties of the Company contained in Section 1 hereof or in certificates of any officer of the Company or any subsidiary of the Company delivered pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and under the Indenture, and to the following further conditions:
Conditions of Underwriters' Obligations
(a)           At the Closing Time, (i) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued under the 1933 Act or proceedings therefor initiated or threatened by the Commission and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the satisfaction of counsel for the Underwriters and (ii) the rating assigned by any nationally recognized securities rating agency to any debt securities of the Company as of the date hereof shall not have been lowered since the date hereof and no such agency shall have publicly announced that it has placed any of such debt securities on what is commonly termed a "watch list" for possible downgrading.  A prospectus containing the Rule 430B Information shall have been filed with the Commission in the manner and within the time period required by Rule 424(b) (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8)) (or a post-effective amendment providing such information shall have been filed and become effective in accordance with the requirements of Rule 430B).
(b)           At the Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received:
(1)   The favorable opinion, dated as of the Closing Time, of Sidley Austin LLP, counsel to the Company, in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters, to the effect that:
(i)        The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware.
(ii)       The Securities have been duly authorized for issuance and sale to the Underwriters, and, when issued and delivered by the Company
14
 
pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, against payment of the consideration set forth herein, will constitute legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company, entitled to the benefits provided by the Indenture, and be enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except to the extent enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by the effect of general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(iii)      This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
(iv)      The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes a valid and binding instrument of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except to the extent enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by the effect of general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(v)       The Indenture has been duly qualified under the 1939 Act.
(vi)      The Registration Statement is effective under the 1933 Act; any required filing of each prospectus relating to the Securities (including the Prospectus) has been made pursuant to Rule 424(b) in accordance with Rule 424(b); any required filing of each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus has been made pursuant to Rule 433 in accordance with Rule 433; and, to the best of their knowledge and information, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued under the 1933 Act or proceeding therefor initiated or threatened by the Commission.
(vii)     The Securities conform in all material respects to the description thereof in the Prospectus, and the form of certificate used to evidence the Securities is in due and proper form.
(viii)    The Registration Statement (other than the financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included therein or omitted therefrom and other than the documents incorporated by reference therein, as to which such counsel need not express any belief), at the time the Registration Statement became effective, and the Prospectus (other than the financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included therein or omitted therefrom and other than the documents incorporated by reference therein, as to which such counsel
15
need not express any belief), as of the date of the execution of this Agreement, each complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations.
(ix)       To the best of their knowledge and information, there are no contracts, indentures, mortgages, loan agreements, notes, leases or other instruments required to be described or referred to in the Registration Statement or to be filed as exhibits thereto other than those described or referred to therein or filed or incorporated by reference as exhibits thereto.
(x)        No authorization, approval, consent or order of any court or governmental authority or agency is required in connection with the offering, issuance or sale of the Securities to the Underwriters, except as may be required under the 1933 Act, the 1933 Act Regulations, the 1939 Act, the 1939 Act Regulations or the securities or blue sky laws of any jurisdiction.
(xi)       To the best of their knowledge and information, the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Indenture and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and therein and compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder and thereunder will not conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries pursuant to, any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument which was filed as an exhibit to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 or the Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws of the Company, or any applicable law, administrative regulation or administrative or court decree.
(xii)      Each document filed pursuant to the 1934 Act (other than the financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included therein, as to which no opinion need be rendered) and incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Prospectus complied when so filed as to form in all material respects with the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations.
(2)   The favorable opinion, dated as of the Closing Time, of Marschall I. Smith, General Counsel to the Company, in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters, to the effect that:
(i)        To the best of his knowledge and information, the Company is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
(ii)       Each Subsidiary has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement and, to the best of his knowledge and information, is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse
16
 
effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and nonassessable and, to the best of his knowledge and information, is owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity.
(iii)      Other than as disclosed in the Registration Statement, to the best of his knowledge and information, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending or threatened which are required to be disclosed in the Registration Statement, and all pending legal or governmental proceedings to which the Company or any subsidiary is a party or to which any of their property is subject which are not described in the Registration Statement, including ordinary routine litigation incidental to the business, are, considered in the aggregate, not material.
(iv)      To the best of his knowledge and information, there are no contracts, indentures, mortgages, loan agreements, notes, leases or other instruments required to be described or referred to in the Registration Statement or to be filed as exhibits thereto other than those described or referred to therein or filed or incorporated by reference as exhibits thereto, the descriptions thereof or references thereto are correct, and no default exists in the due performance or observance of any material obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument so described, referred to, filed or incorporated by reference.
(v)       The Company has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement and to enter into and perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Indenture.
17
 
(vi)      To the best of his knowledge and information, the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Indenture and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and therein and compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder and thereunder will not conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries pursuant to, any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which it or any of them may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is subject, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws of the Company, or any applicable law, administrative regulation or administrative or court decree.
(3)   The favorable opinion, dated as of the applicable Closing Time, of Latham & Watkins LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, with respect to the issuance and sale of the Securities, the Indenture, the Registration Statement, the Prospectus (together with any supplement thereto), the General Disclosure Package and other related matters as the Representatives may reasonably require.
(4)   In giving their opinions required by subsections (b)(1), (b)(2) and (b)(3), respectively, of this Section, Sidley Austin LLP, Mr. Smith and Latham & Watkins LLP shall each additionally state that nothing has come to their attention that has caused them to believe that (i) the Registration Statement (except for financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or omitted therefrom, as to which counsel need make no statement), at the time it became effective or at the date of this Agreement, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, (ii) the Prospectus (except for financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or omitted therefrom, as to which counsel need make no statement), as of the date of the prospectus supplement included in the Prospectus or at Closing Time, included or includes an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or (iii) the General Disclosure Package (except for financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or omitted therefrom, as to which counsel need make no statement), as of the Applicable Time, included an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.  With respect to statements contained in the General Disclosure Package, any statement contained in any of the constituent documents shall be deemed to be modified or superseded to the extent that any information contained in subsequent constituent documents modifies or replaces such statement.
18
 
(c)           At the Closing Time there shall not have been, since the date of this Agreement or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus or the General Disclosure Package, any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, and the Representatives shall have received a certificate of the President or a Vice President of the Company and of the chief financial or chief accounting officer of the Company, dated as of such Closing Time, to the effect that (i) there has been no such material adverse change, (ii) the representations and warranties in Section 1 hereof are true and correct with the same force and effect as though expressly made at and as of such Closing Time, (iii) the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to such Closing Time, and (iv) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued, and no proceedings for that purpose have been initiated or are pending or are, to their knowledge, contemplated by the Commission.
(d)           At the time of the execution of this Agreement and at the Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP letters, dated such dates, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect that (i) they are independent public accountants with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries within the meaning of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations; (ii) it is their opinion that the financial statements and supporting schedules included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and covered by their opinions therein comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1934 Act and 1934 Act Regulations; (iii) based upon limited procedures set forth in detail in such letters, nothing has come to their attention which causes them to believe that (A) any unaudited financial statements and supporting schedules of the Company and its subsidiaries included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and the Prospectus do not comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1934 Act and 1934 Act Regulations or are not presented in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a basis substantially consistent with that of the audited financial statements included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, or (B) at a specified date not more than five days prior to the date of the letters, there has been any change in the capital stock of the Company or any increase in the consolidated long-term debt of the Company and its subsidiaries or any decrease in consolidated net current assets or net assets as compared with the amounts shown in the most recent financial statements included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement or, during the period from the date of the most recent financial statements included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement to a specified date not more than five days prior to the date of the letters, there were any decreases, as compared with the corresponding period in the preceding year, in consolidated revenues, net income or net income per share of the Company and its subsidiaries, except in all instances for changes, increases or decreases which the Registration Statement and the Prospectus disclose have occurred or may occur; and (iv) in addition to the examination referred to in their opinions and the limited procedures referred to in clause (iii) above, they have carried out certain specified procedures, not constituting an audit, with respect to certain amounts, percentages and financial information which are included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and the Prospectus and which are specified by the Representatives, and have found such
19
 
amounts, percentages and financial information to be in agreement with the relevant accounting, financial and other records of the Company and its subsidiaries identified in such letters.
(e)           At the Closing Time, counsel for the Underwriters shall have been furnished with such documents and opinions as they may require for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon the issuance and sale of the Securities herein contemplated and related proceedings, or in order to evidence the accuracy of any of the representations or warranties, or the fulfillment of any of the conditions herein contained; and all proceedings taken by the Company in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated shall be satisfactory in form and substance to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters.
(f)            If any condition specified in this Section shall not have been fulfilled when and as required to be fulfilled, this Agreement may be terminated by the Representatives by notice to the Company at any time at or prior to the Closing Time, and such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except as provided in Section 4 and except that the provisions of Sections 1, 6, 7, and 8 hereof shall survive any such termination and remain in effect.
SECTION 6,           .
Indemnification
(a)           . The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter, its affiliates, as such term is defined in Rule 501(b) under the 1933 Act (each an "Affiliate"), its selling agents and each person, if any who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act as follows:
Indemnification of Underwriters
(1)   against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the information incorporated by reference therein, if applicable, or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact included in any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
(2)   against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, to the extent of the aggregate amount paid in settlement of any litigation, or of any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or of any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission; provided that any such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company; and
(3)   against any and all expense whatsoever, as incurred (including the fees and disbursements of one counsel chosen by the Representatives), reasonably incurred in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or
20
 
proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, to the extent that any such expense is not paid under (i) or (ii) above;
, , that this indemnity agreement shall not apply to any loss, liability, claim, damage or expense to the extent arising out of any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the information incorporated by reference therein, if applicable, or any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
provided
however
(b)           .  Each Underwriter severally and not jointly agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, its directors, each of its officers who signed the Registration Statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense described in the indemnity contained in subsection (a) of this Section, as incurred, but only with respect to untrue statements or omissions, or alleged untrue statements or omissions, made in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) or any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) or such preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
Indemnification of Company, Directors and Officers
(c)           .  Each indemnified party shall give notice as promptly as reasonably practicable to each indemnifying party of any action commenced against it in respect of which indemnity may be sought hereunder, but failure to so notify an indemnifying party shall not relieve such indemnifying party from any liability hereunder to the extent it is not materially prejudiced as a result thereof and in any event shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have otherwise than on account of this indemnity agreement.  In the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(a) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by Merrill Lynch and JP Morgan, and, in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(b) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by the Company.  An indemnifying party may participate at its own expense in the defense of any such action; provided, however, that counsel to the indemnifying party shall not (except with the consent of the indemnified party) also be counsel to the indemnified party.  In no event shall the indemnifying parties be liable for fees and expenses of more than one counsel (in addition to any local counsel) separate from their own counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified parties, settle or compromise or consent to the entry of any judgment with respect to any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever in respect of which indemnification or contribution could be sought under this Section 6 or Section 7 hereof (whether or not the indemnified parties are actual or potential parties thereto), unless such settlement, compromise or
Actions against Parties; Notification
21
 
consent includes an unconditional release of each indemnified party from all liability arising out of such litigation, investigation, proceeding or claim and does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of such indemnified party.
SECTION 7.           .  If the indemnification provided for in Section 6 hereof is for any reason unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of any losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the aggregate amount of such losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by such indemnified party, as incurred, (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company, on the one hand, and of the Underwriters, on the other hand, in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations.
Contribution
The relative benefits received by the Company, on the one hand, and the Underwriters on the other hand, in connection with the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the total net proceeds from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement (before deducting expenses) received by the Company and the total underwriting discount received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth on the cover of the Prospectus bear to the aggregate initial public offering price of the Securities as set forth on the cover of the Prospectus.
The relative fault of the Company, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether any such untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or by the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 7 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this Section 7. The aggregate amount of losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by an indemnified party and referred to above in this Section 7 shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7, no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of
22
 
any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the 1933 Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
For purposes of this Section 7, each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act and each Underwriter's Affiliates and selling agents shall have the same rights to contribution as such Underwriter, and each director of the Company, each officer of the Company who signed the Registration Statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company. The Underwriters' respective obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 7 are several in proportion to the principal amount of Securities set forth opposite their respective names in Schedule I hereto and not joint.
SECTION 8.           .  All representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Agreement or contained in certificates of officers of the Company submitted pursuant hereto shall remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of (i) any investigation made by or on behalf of the Company, or any person controlling the Company, or any Underwriter or its Affiliates or selling agents or any person controlling any Underwriter, its officers or directors, and (ii) delivery of and payment for the Securities.
Representations, Warranties and Agreements to Survive Delivery
SECTION 9.           .
Termination
(a)           The Representatives may terminate this Agreement, by notice to the Company, at any time at or prior to the Closing Time (i) if there has been, since the time of execution of this Agreement or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus (exclusive of any supplement thereto) or the General Disclosure Package, any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, or (ii) if there has occurred any material adverse change in the financial markets in the United States or the international financial markets, any outbreak of hostilities or escalation thereof or other calamity or crisis or any change or development involving a prospective change in national or international political, financial or economic conditions, in each case the effect of which is such as to make it, in the judgment of the Representatives, impracticable or inadvisable to market the Securities or to enforce contracts for the sale of the Securities, or (iii) if trading in any securities of the Company has been suspended or materially limited by the Commission or the New York Stock Exchange, or if trading generally on the American Stock Exchange or the New York Stock Exchange or in the Nasdaq National Market has been suspended or materially limited, or minimum or maximum prices for trading have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices have been required, by any of said exchanges or by such system or by order of the Commission, the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. or any other governmental authority, or (iv) a material disruption has occurred in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services in the United
23
 
States, or (v) if a banking moratorium has been declared by federal, New York or Illinois authorities.
(b)           If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to this Section, such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party, except to the extent provided in Section 4 hereof. Notwithstanding any such termination, the provisions of Sections 1, 6, 7 and 8 hereof shall remain in effect.
SECTION 10          .  If one or more of the Underwriters shall fail at Closing Time to purchase the Securities that it or they are obligated to purchase under this Agreement (the "Defaulted Securities"), the Representatives shall have the right, within 24 hours thereafter, to make arrangements for one or more of the non-defaulting Underwriters, or any other underwriters, to purchase all, but not less than all, of the Defaulted Securities in such amounts as may be agreed upon and upon the terms herein set forth; if, however, the Representatives shall not have completed such arrangements within such 24-hour period, then:
Default by One or More of the Underwriters
(a)           if the number of Defaulted Securities does not exceed 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities to be purchased hereunder, each of the non-defaulting Underwriters shall be obligated, severally and not jointly, to purchase the full amount thereof in the proportions that their respective underwriting obligations hereunder bear to the underwriting obligations of all non-defaulting Underwriters, or
(b)           if the number of Defaulted Securities exceeds 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities to be purchased hereunder, this Agreement shall terminate, without any liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter.
No action taken pursuant to this Section shall relieve any defaulting Underwriter from liability in respect of its default.
In the event of any such default which does not result in a termination of this Agreement, either the Representatives or the Company shall have the right to postpone Closing Time for a period not exceeding seven days in order to effect any required changes in the Registration Statement or Prospectus or in any other documents or arrangements.
As used herein, the term "Underwriter" includes any person substituted for an Underwriter under this Section 10.
SECTION 11.         .  All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted by any standard form of telecommunication. Notices to the Underwriters shall be directed to the Representatives at Merrill Lynch & Co., 4 World Financial Center, New York, New York 10080, attention of Paul Nagle and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., 270 Park Avenue New York, NY 10017, attention of High Grade Syndicate Desk - 8th floor, Fax No. (212) 834-6081; and notices to the Company shall be directed to it at 1 North Field Ct., Lake Forest, Illinois 60045, attention of Marschall I. Smith, General Counsel.
Notices
24
 
SECTION 12          .  The Company acknowledges and agrees that (a) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement, including the determination of the public offering price of the Securities and any related discounts and commissions, is an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Company, on the one hand, and the several Underwriters, on the other hand, (b) in connection with the offering contemplated hereby and the process leading to such transaction each Underwriter is and has been acting solely as a principal and is not the agent or fiduciary of the Company, or its stockholders, creditors, employees or any other party, (c) no Underwriter has assumed or will assume an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the offering contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters) and no Underwriter has any obligation to the Company with respect to the offering contemplated hereby except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement, (d) the Underwriters and their respective affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company, and (e) the Underwriters have not provided any legal, accounting, regulatory or tax advice with respect to the offering contemplated hereby and the Company has consulted its own legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate.
No Advisory or Fiduciary Relationship
SECTION 13.         .  This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) between the Company and the Underwriters, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Integration
SECTION 14.         .  This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Underwriters named herein and the Company and their respective successors. Nothing expressed or mentioned in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give any person, firm or corporation, other than the Underwriters named herein and the Company and their respective successors and the controlling persons and officers and directors referred to in Sections 6 and 7 and their heirs and legal representatives, any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement or any provision herein contained. This Agreement and all conditions and provisions hereof are intended to be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Underwriters named herein and the Company and their respective successors, and said controlling persons and officers and directors and their heirs and legal representative(s), and for the benefit of no other person, firm or corporation. No purchaser of any of the Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed to be a successor by reason merely of such purchase.
Parties
SECTION 15          .  This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the state of New York applicable to agreements made and to be performed in said State.
Governing Law
SECTION 16.         .  TIME SHALL BE OF THE ESSENCE OF THIS AGREEMENT.  EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE SET FORTH HEREIN, SPECIFIED TIMES OF DAY REFER TO NEW YORK CITY TIME.
TIME
SECTION 17.         .  This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
25
 
SECTION 18.         .  The Section headings herein are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
Effect of Headings
 
26
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, please sign and return to the Company a counterpart hereof, whereupon this instrument, along with all counterparts, will become a binding agreement between the Underwriters and the Company in accordance with its terms.
 
 
 
For themselves and as Representatives of the Underwriters named in Schedule I attached to the Underwriting Agreement.
 
SCHEDULE I
 
SCHEDULE II
Schedule of Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectuses Included in the General Disclosure Package
1.                 Final Term Sheet, attached hereto as Annex A to this Schedule
 
Filed Pursuant to Rule 433 Registration No. 333-71344
Final Term Sheet July 19, 2006
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION $250,000,000  FLOATING RATE NOTES DUE 2009
 
4
 
 
THE ISSUER HAS FILED A REGISTRATION STATEMENT (INCLUDING A PROSPECTUS) WITH THE SEC FOR THE OFFERING TO WHICH THIS COMMUNICATION RELATES. BEFORE YOU INVEST, YOU SHOULD READ THE PROSPECTUS IN THAT REGISTRATION STATEMENT AND OTHER DOCUMENTS THE ISSUER HAS FILED WITH THE SEC FOR MORE COMPLETE INFORMATION ABOUT THE ISSUER AND THIS OFFERING. YOU MAY GET THESE DOCUMENTS FOR FREE BY VISITING EDGAR ON THE SEC WEB SITE AT WWW.SEC.GOV. ALTERNATIVELY, THE ISSUER, ANY UNDERWRITER OR ANY DEALER PARTICIPATING IN THE OFFERING WILL ARRANGE TO SEND YOU THE PROSPECTUS IF YOU REQUEST IT BY CALLING TOLL-FREE 1-(866) 500-5408
ANY DISCLAIMERS OR OTHER NOTICES THAT MAY APPEAR BELOW ARE NOT APPLICABLE TO THIS COMMUNICATION AND SHOULD BE DISREGARDED. SUCH DISCLAIMERS OR OTHER NOTICES WERE AUTOMATICALLY GENERATED AS A RESULT OF THIS COMMUNICATION BEING SENT VIA BLOOMBERG OR ANOTHER EMAIL SYSTEM.
 
5
 
Underwriting Agreement dated July 19, 2006
 
Registration Statement No. 333-71344
 
 

Exhibit 4.1
Unless this certificate is presented by an authorized representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation ("DTC"), to the Company (as defined below) or its agent for registration of transfer, exchange, or payment, and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.
 
CUSIP No.:            117043 AJ 8
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION Floating Rate Notes due 2009
Brunswick Corporation, a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (hereinafter called the "Company", which term shall include any successor corporation as defined in the Indenture referred to on the reverse side hereof), for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or its registered assigns, the principal sum of TWO HUNDRED FIFTY MILLION DOLLARS ($250,000,000) on July 24, 2009 (if such date is not a Business Day, payment of principal on this Note and accrued and unpaid interest thereon will be paid on the next Business Day, provided, however, that no interest on that payment will accrue from and after July 24, 2009) at the principal corporate trust office of the Trustee, or at an office or agency maintained by the Company for such purpose, in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois, or in the Borough of Manhattan, The City and State of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment shall be legal tender for the payment of public and private debts, and to pay interest, quarterly on January 24, April 24, July 24 and October 24 of each year (each, an "Interest Payment Date") beginning October 24, 2006, on said principal sum in like coin or currency, at a floating rate equal to three-month USD LIBOR plus 0.65% per annum, as described below, from July 24, 2006, or from the most recent Interest Payment Date which interest has been paid or duly provided for, until payment of said principal sum has been made or duly provided for.
The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date will, subject to certain exceptions provided in the Indenture referred to herein, be paid to the person in whose name this Note is registered at the close of business on the regular record date for such interest, which shall be the Business Day preceding the Interest Payment Date.
This Note is one of a duly authorized issue of securities of the Company (herein called the "Securities"), issued and to be issued in one or more series under that certain Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987 (herein called the "Indenture"), between the Company and BNY Midwest Trust Company, as successor trustee (herein called the
"Trustee," which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the holders of the Securities and of the terms upon which the Securities are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered. This Note is one of the series of Securities designated on the first page hereof (the Securities of such series being herein called the "Notes").
The Notes will bear interest for each interest period at a rate determined by the calculation agent, which shall initially be BNY Midwest Trust Company until such time as the Company appoints a successor calculation agent (herein called the "Calculation Agent").  The interest rate on the Notes for a particular Interest Period (as defined below) will be a per annum rate equal to three-month USD LIBOR (as defined below) as determined on the Interest Determination Date plus 0.65% (the "Interest Rate").  The "Interest Determination Date" for an Interest Period will be the second London Business Day preceding the first day of such Interest Period.  Promptly upon determination, the Calculation Agent will inform the Trustee and the Company of the Interest Rate for the next Interest Period.  Absent manifest error, the determination of the Interest Rate by the Calculation Agent shall be binding and conclusive on the holders of the Notes, the Trustee and the Company.  A "London Business Day" is a day on which dealings in deposits in U.S. dollars are transacted in the London interbank market.
Interest on the Notes will be paid to but excluding the relevant Interest Payment Date.  Interest payments on the Notes will be made quarterly in arrears on the Interest Payment Date, beginning on October 24, 2006, to the person in whose name those Notes are registered at the close of business on the Business Day immediately preceding the Interest Payment Date.  Interest on the Notes will accrue from and including July 24, 2006, to but excluding the first Interest Payment Date and then from and including the immediately preceding Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for to but excluding the next Interest Payment Date or the maturity date of the Notes, as the case may be (each of these periods is referred to as an "Interest Period").  The amount of accrued interest that the Company will pay for any Interest Period shall be calculated by the Calculation Agent by multiplying the face amount of the Notes then outstanding by an Accrued Interest Factor.  This Accrued Interest Factor is computed by adding the Interest Factor calculated for each day from July 24, 2006, or from the latest date interest was paid to the date for which accrued interest is being calculated.  The "Interest Factor" for each day is computed by dividing the Interest Rate applicable to that date by 360.  If an Interest Payment Date for the Notes falls on a day that is not a Business Day, the Interest Payment Date shall be postponed to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would be in the following month, in which case the Interest Payment Date shall be the immediately preceding Business Day.
On any Interest Determination Date, "LIBOR" will be equal to the offered rate for deposits in U.S. dollars having an index maturity of three months, in amounts of at least $1,000,000, as such rate appears on "Telerate Page 3750" at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, on such Interest Determination Date. If on an Interest Determination Date
2
such rate does not appear on the "Telerate Page 3750" as of 11:00 a.m., London time, or if the "Telerate Page 3750" is not available on such date, the Calculation Agent will obtain such rate from Bloomberg L.P.'s page "BBAM."
If no offered rate appears on "Telerate Page 3750" or Bloomberg L.P.'s page "BBAM" on an Interest Determination Date at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, then the Calculation Agent (after consultation with the Company) will select four major banks in the London interbank market and shall request each of their principal London offices to provide a quotation of the rate at which three-month deposits in U.S. dollars in amounts of at least $1,000,000 are offered by it to prime banks in the London interbank market, on that date and at that time, that is representative of single transactions at that time.  If at least two quotations are provided, LIBOR will be the arithmetic average of the quotations provided.  Otherwise, the Calculation Agent will select three major banks in New York City and shall request each of them to provide a quotation of the rate offered by them at approximately 11:00 a.m., New York City time, on the Interest Determination Date for loans in U.S. dollars to leading European banks having an index maturity of three months for the applicable interest period in an amount of at least $1,000,000 that is representative of single transactions at that time.  If three quotations are provided, LIBOR will be the arithmetic average of the quotations provided.  Otherwise, the rate of LIBOR for the next Interest Period will be set equal to the rate of LIBOR for the then current Interest Period.
Upon request from any holder of the Notes, the Calculation Agent will provide the Interest Rate in effect for the Notes for the current Interest Period and, if it has been determined, the Interest Rate to be in effect for the next Interest Period.
All percentages resulting from any calculation of the Interest Rate on the Notes will be rounded to the nearest one hundred-thousandth of a percentage point with five one millionths of a percentage point rounded upwards (, 9.876545% (or .09876545) would be rounded to 9.87655% (or .0987655)), and all dollar amounts used in or resulting from such calculation on the Notes will be rounded to the nearest cent (with one-half cent being rounded upward).  Each calculation of the Interest Rate on the Notes by the Calculation Agent will (in absence of manifest error) be final and binding on the holders of the Notes and the Company.
e.g.
The Interest Rate on the Notes will in no event be higher than the maximum rate permitted by Illinois law as the same may be modified by United States law of general application.
The Company will have the right to redeem the Notes, in whole or in part, at any time after July 24, 2007, on at least 30 days' but no more than 60 days' prior written notice mailed to the registered holders of the Notes to be redeemed (the applicable date of any such redemption being referred to herein as the "Redemption Date").  The "Redemption Price" will be equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be redeemed, plus accrued and unpaid interest on the principal amount being redeemed to, but excluding, the Redemption Date.
3
If money sufficient to pay the Redemption Price of and accrued interest on the Notes (or portions thereof) to be redeemed on the Redemption Date is deposited with the Trustee or another paying agent for the Notes on or before the Redemption Date, then on and after the Redemption Date, interest will cease to accrue on such Notes (or such portion thereof) called for redemption and such Notes (or portions thereof) shall be deemed not to be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture except to receive payment of the Redemption Price together with interest accrued thereon to the Redemption Date.  If any Redemption Date is not a Business Day, the Company will pay the Redemption Price on the next Business Day without any interest or other payment due to the delay.
If less than all of the Notes are to be redeemed, the Company shall select in such manner as it shall deem appropriate and fair in its discretion the particular Notes to be redeemed as a whole or in part and shall thereafter promptly notify the Trustee in writing of the Notes so to be redeemed.  Notes shall be redeemed only in denominations of $1,000 or any integral multiple of $1,000.
In case an Event of Default (as defined in the Indenture) with respect to the Notes shall have occurred and be continuing, the principal hereof may be declared, and upon such declaration shall become, due and payable, in the manner, with the effect and subject to the conditions provided in the Indenture.  The Indenture also provides that, prior to any declaration accelerating the maturity of the Securities of any series, the holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities of such series at the time outstanding may on behalf of the holders of all of the Securities of such series waive any past default or Event of Default under the Indenture and its consequences except a default in the payment of principal of, or premium, if any, or interest on the Securities of such series.  Any such consent or waiver by the holder of this Note (unless revoked as provided in the Indenture) shall be conclusive and binding upon such holder and upon all future holders and owners of this Note and any Security which may be issued in exchange or substitution herefor, irrespective of whether or not any notation thereof is made upon this Note or such other Securities.
The Indenture contains provisions permitting the Company and the Trustee, with the consent of the holders of not less than 66 2/3% in aggregate principal amount of the Securities of each series to be affected at the time outstanding, evidenced as provided in the Indenture, to execute supplemental indentures adding any provisions to or changing in any manner or eliminating any of the provisions of the Indenture or of any supplemental indenture or modifying in any manner the rights of the holders of the Securities of such series; provided, however, that no such supplemental indenture shall (i) extend the fixed maturity on any Security of such series, or reduce the rate or extend the time of payment of interest thereon, or reduce the principal amount thereof or any premium thereon, or extend the time of or reduce the amount of any mandatory sinking fund payment, or make the principal of any Security or any premium or interest thereon payable in any coin or currency other than that provided for in the Securities of such series or adversely affect the rights of the Securityholders to institute suit for the enforcement of any payment of principal of or premium, if any, or interest on any Security of such series, in each case without the consent of the holder of each Security so affected, or (ii) reduce the aforesaid percentage of Securities, the holders of which are
4
required to consent to any such supplemental indenture, without the consent of the holders of all Securities of such series then outstanding.
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and interest on this Note at the place, at the respective times, at the rate and in the coin or currency herein prescribed.
The Notes are issued in registered form without coupons in denominations of $1,000 or any integral multiple of $1,000. In the manner and subject to the limitations provided in the Indenture, but without the payment of any service charge, Notes may be exchanged for an equal aggregate principal amount of Notes of other authorized denominations at the principal executive office of the Company or, at the option of the registered holder thereof, at its office or agency maintained for such exchange in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois, or the Borough of Manhattan, The City and State of New York.
The Notes are not entitled to the benefit of, and are not subject to, any mandatory or optional sinking fund.
Except as otherwise provided in this Note, upon due presentment for registration of transfer of this Note at the principal executive offices of the Company or, at the option of the person making presentment for registration of transfer, at its office or agency maintained for such registration in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois or the Borough of Manhattan, The City and State of New York, a new Note or Notes of authorized denomination for any equal aggregate principal amount will be issued to the transferee in exchange herefor, subject to the limitations provided in the Indenture, without charge except for any tax or other governmental charge imposed in connection therewith.
The Company, the Trustee, any paying agent or Authenticating Agent and any Security Registrar may deem and treat the registered holder hereof as the absolute owner of this Note (whether or not this Note shall be overdue and notwithstanding any notation of ownership or other writing hereon) for the purpose of receiving payment hereof or on account hereof, as herein and in the Indenture provided, and for all other purposes, and neither the Company nor the Trustee nor any paying agent nor any Authenticating Agent nor any Security Registrar shall be affected by any notice to the contrary. All such payments shall effectively satisfy and discharge the liability upon this Note to the extent of the sum or sums so paid.
No recourse for the payment of the principal of or interest on this Note, or for any claim based hereon or otherwise in respect hereof, and no recourse under or upon any obligation, covenant or agreement of the Company contained in the Indenture or in any supplemental indenture, or in this Note, or because of the creation of any indebtedness represented hereby, shall be had against any incorporator, stockholder, officer or director as such, past, present or future, of the Company or any successor corporation, either directly or through the Company or any successor corporation, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or
5
otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as a part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
This Note shall not be valid or become obligatory for any purpose until the certificate of authentication hereon shall have been signed by the Trustee under the Indenture referred to below.
All capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings ascribed to such terms in the Indenture.
 
6
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Brunswick Corporation has caused this instrument to be signed in its name by the signature one of its Vice Presidents and an imprint of its corporate seal to be affixed hereto, and attested by the signature of its Secretary.
 
 

 
Exhibit 5.1
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Ct. Lake Forest, Illinois  60045-4811
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We are acting as counsel to Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the ""), in connection with the proposed issuance and sale of $250,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's Floating Rate Notes due 2009 (the ""), pursuant to the prospectus supplement dated July 19, 2006 (the ""), supplementing the prospectus dated October 10, 2001 (the "") that forms part of the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-71344) (the "") filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "").  As used in this letter, the term "" means the Prospectus Supplement and the Base Prospectus, including the documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Securities Act.  The Notes are to be issued under that certain Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987 (the ""), by and between the Company and BNY Midwest Trust Company, as successor trustee (the "").
Company
Notes
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Registration Statement
SEC
Securities Act
Prospectus
Indenture
Trustee
We have examined and relied upon (i) the Prospectus, (ii) the Registration Statement, (iii) the Indenture, (iv) the Notes in global form, (v) the executed Underwriting Agreement, dated as of July 19, 2006, by and between the Company and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., as representatives of the several underwriters named therein (the ""), (vi) certain resolutions of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "") adopted on February 7, 2006, as certified by the Secretary of the Company on the date hereof as being complete, accurate and in effect, relating to, among other things, the execution and delivery of the Underwriting Agreement and the issuance and sale of the Notes (the ""), (vii) certain resolutions of the Finance Committee of the Board adopted on May 3, 2006 and July 17, 2006, as certified by the Secretary of the Company on the date hereof as being complete, accurate and in effect, relating to, among other things, the terms and conditions applicable to the issuance and sale by the Company of the Notes (the ""), (viii) certain minutes of a meeting of the Pricing Committee of the Finance Committee of the Board, dated as of July 18, 2006, and (viii) the officers' certificate, dated as of July 19, 2006, establishing the terms of the
Underwriting Agreement
Board
Board Resolutions
Finance Committee Resolutions
1
 
Notes pursuant to the Board Resolutions and the Finance Committee Resolutions.  We also have examined such records, documents and questions of law, and satisfied ourselves as to such matters of fact, as we have considered relevant and necessary as a basis for the opinion set forth below.
In rendering the opinion set forth below, we have assumed the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, the genuineness of all signatures, the legal capacity of all natural persons and the conformity with the original documents of any copies thereof submitted to us as certified or photostatic copies or by facsimile or other means of electronic transmission or which we obtained from the Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval System (EDGAR) of the SEC or other internet sites through which documents filed with the SEC can be obtained.  With respect to any instrument or agreement executed or to be executed by any party other than the Company, we have assumed, to the extent relevant to the opinion set forth herein, that (i) such other party (if not a natural person) has been duly formed or organized and is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of formation or organization and (ii) such other party has full right, power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under each instrument or agreement to which it is a party and each such instrument or agreement has been duly authorized (if applicable), executed and delivered by, and is a valid, binding and enforceable agreement or obligation, as the case may be, of, such other party.
Based on the foregoing and subject to the qualifications and limitations set forth below, we are of the opinion that:
The Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms (except to the extent enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent transfer or other laws of general applicability relating to or affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and by the effect of general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law) when the Notes shall have been duly executed by the Company and authenticated by the Trustee as provided in the Indenture, the Board Resolutions and the Finance Committee Resolutions and shall have been duly delivered to the purchasers thereof against payment of the agreed consideration therefor.
This opinion letter is limited to the federal laws of the United States of America, the laws of the State of Illinois and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
We do not find it necessary for the purposes of this opinion letter to cover, and accordingly we express no opinion as to, the application of the securities or blue sky laws of any jurisdiction to sales of the Notes.
2
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as an Exhibit to the filing by the Company of a Current Report on Form 8-K on the date hereof, which Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement, and to all references to our firm included in or made a part of the Prospectus.  In giving such consent, we do not thereby admit that we are in the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act or the related rules or regulations promulgated thereunder.
Very truly yours,
/s/ Sidley Austin LLP
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
 
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Court Lake Forest, IL 60045 Telephone 847.735.4700   Facsimile 847.735.4750 www.brunswick.com
 
BRUNSWICK ANNOUNCES $250 MILLION DEBT OFFERING
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 24, 2006
 Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today it has completed the offering of $250 million aggregate principal amount of Floating Rate Notes due 2009 under a shelf registration statement previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Interest will be paid quarterly commencing on Oct. 24, 2006, and will accrue at the rate of three-month USD LIBOR plus 65 basis points, set at the beginning of the period. The company said it intends to use the net proceeds from the offering to refinance its $250 million principal amount of 6
3
4
% notes due Dec. 15, 2006.
About Brunswick
 in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit www.brunswick.com
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20060727093514.txt.gz
TIME:20060727093514
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 27, 2006, Brunswick Corporation announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2006. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswicks management believes that presentation of: (i) diluted earnings per share excluding a first quarter 2005 investment sale gain and the effect of certain tax-related items; (ii) net sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior years results; and (iii) Brunswicks effective tax rate excluding a tax reserve reduction, provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                                                                                            
                    60; Exhibit 99.1
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 27, 2006
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today earnings from continuing operations of $0.99 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2006, compared with $1.12 per diluted share for the year-ago second quarter. Earnings from continuing operations for the second quarter of 2006 include a $0.06 per diluted share benefit from tax-related items.
We are pleased with our second quarter results given the increasingly difficult economic environment in which consumers are deferring expenditures for discretionary items, a factor affecting retail demand especially for marine products, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. Total sales increased 1 percent in the quarter due to contributions from our boat and fitness equipment operations. If we exclude incremental sales from acquired businesses, however, organic sales actually declined 5 percent. Lower organic sales, a mix shift to lower-margin products along with higher raw material and component costs, partially offset by lower operating expense, were the primary drivers behind a reduction in operating margins to 9.0 percent in the second quarter of 2006 from 11.0 percent in the comparable quarter a year ago.
Second Quarter Results
For the quarter ended June 30, 2006, net sales increased 1 percent to $1,543.1 million, up from $1,531.6 million a year earlier. Operating earnings declined 18 percent to $138.2 million compared with $168.2 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins were 9.0 percent, down from 11.0 percent. Net earnings from continuing operations totaled $94.5 million, or $0.99 per diluted share, down from $111.0 million, or $1.12 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2005. In the second quarter of 2006, the company recorded a tax benefit of $0.06 per diluted share resulting primarily from the resolution of a long-standing tax case with the Internal Revenue Service. Debt-to-total capital was 26.2 percent at quarter end as compared with 27.7 percent a year earlier, and cash totaled $310.6 million.
During the second quarter of 2006, the company announced its decision to pursue the sale of substantially all of its Brunswick New Technologies (BNT) business unit. As a result, the portions of BNT proposed for sale are being accounted for as discontinued operations. For the second quarter of 2006, the company reported a net loss from discontinued operations of $11.3 million, or $0.12 per diluted share, compared with net earnings of $3.1 million, or $0.03 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2005.
The company said that during the second quarter of 2006, it acquired approximately 1.5 million shares of its common stock for approximately $56 million under a $500 million repurchase authorization. Over the past year, approximately 5.1 million shares have been acquired for about $193 million. Diluted shares outstanding averaged 95.5 million in the second quarter of 2006, down from 99.2 million for the second quarter of 2005.
Boat Segment
The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and produces fiberglass and aluminum boats and marine parts and accessories, as well as offers dealer management systems. The Boat segment reported net sales for the second quarter of $769.7 million, up 3 percent compared with $745.5 million in the second quarter of 2005. Excluding incremental sales from acquired businesses, organic boat sales declined 7 percent. Operating earnings decreased to $53.1 million from $74.9 million reported in the second quarter of 2005, and operating margins were 6.9 percent, down from 10.0 percent.
We reduced production and increased promotional efforts in select product lines to manage pipeline inventories during the quarter, McCoy said. The lower fixed cost absorption due to reduced production levels, coupled with the fact that we had lower sales in some of our higher-margin product lines, had an adverse effect on operating margins.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, reported net sales of $668.5 million in the second quarter of 2006, down 2 percent from $683.5 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings in the second quarter decreased 9 percent to $94.7 million versus $103.5 million, and operating margins declined to 14.2 percent from 15.1 percent for the same quarter in 2005.
The reduction in sales was primarily driven by a decline in our domestic outboard engine business, partially offset by increased sales of products outside of the United States, McCoy said. Operating margins were adversely affected by lower sales along with the shift in product mix to lower-margin, low-emission outboard engines. Approximately 91 percent of our U.S. outboard sales in the second quarter of 2006 came from low-emission engines, up from 71 percent in the year-ago quarter.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment. Fitness segment sales increased 8 percent in the quarter to $129.7 million, up from $120.4 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings for the quarter totaled $7.4 million, up 45 percent from $5.1 million in the second quarter of 2005, and operating margins increased 150 basis points to 5.7 percent from 4.2 percent a year ago.
Through its market drive and increasing focus on improving productivity, Life Fitness produced a quarter of both solid sales increases with improving margins, McCoy explained. Segment sales benefited from continued expansion of health clubs in both domestic and international markets. At the same time, our continued emphasis on containing operating expenses led to the operating margin improvement.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the second quarter of 2006 totaled $110.1 million, down 4 percent compared with $114.9 million in the year-ago quarter. Year-over-year operating earnings were $0.6 million in the second quarter versus $5.2 million, and operating margins fell to 0.5 percent compared with 4.5 percent in 2005.
Segment sales were affected by a decline in sales of bowling equipment compared with a year ago. Quarterly product sales tend to fluctuate throughout the year as they are tied to the timing of new center openings by independent proprietors. The segment also reported lower billiards sales, reflecting customers desire to postpone discretionary purchases in these economic times, McCoy commented. Despite fewer centers versus a year ago, our bowling retail operation posted single-digit sales gains due to increased traffic at existing centers and the addition of two new Brunswick Zone XLs. Operating margins were adversely affected by lower equipment sales, new center start-up costs, as well as the costs associated with the closure of four bowling centers and renovation of a Massachusetts bowling center damaged by floods in the second quarter.
Six-Month Results
For the six months ended June 30, 2006, the company had net sales of $2,956.4 million, up 3 percent from $2,874.1 million for the first half of 2005. Excluding contributions from acquired businesses, sales were down 3 percent. Operating earnings totaled $236.4 million for the first half of 2006, down from $267.0 million for the corresponding period in 2005, and operating margins declined to 8.0 percent versus 9.3 percent a year ago. Net earnings from continuing operations for the first six months of 2006 were $168.6 million, or $1.76 per diluted share, down from $205.0 million, or $2.07 per diluted share, for the same period in 2005. Results for the first half of 2006 include the $0.06 per diluted share tax benefit recorded in the second quarter, as noted above, and a $0.13 per diluted share tax benefit recorded in the first quarter. Results for the first half of 2005 include an after-tax gain of $31.5 million, equivalent to $0.32 per diluted share, recorded in the first quarter on the sale of MarineMax, Inc. stock.
For the first half of 2006, the company reported a net loss from discontinued operations of $18.0 million, or $0.19 per diluted share, compared with net earnings of $3.7 million, or $0.04 per diluted share, for the same period in 2005.
Looking Ahead
Throughout the second quarter of 2006, we experienced declining retail demand for marine products, which has resulted in an increase in pipeline inventories. At quarter end, there were 26 weeks of supply of boats and 21 weeks of supply of engines, up from 23 weeks for boats and 20 weeks for engines a year ago, McCoy said. Managing pipelines is essential in a cyclical, as well as a seasonal, business. With the off-season quickly approaching, we cant rely solely on retail demand to rebalance the pipeline. So, we are planning further production cuts to manage pipelines for the 2007 model year, which began on July 1. As we previously announced, we are estimating that our 2006 earnings from continuing operations will fall in the range of $2.40 to $2.55 per diluted share, excluding tax-related benefits either already realized or expected for the year. That compares with the $3.13 per share we reported in 2005 from continuing operations, excluding tax-related benefits and the gain on the sale of MarineMax stock. The decline in earnings is primarily due to reduced sales and the impact of fixed cost absorption from production cuts needed to adjust pipeline inventories.
While we cant control market conditions, we will continue to operate our businesses in the most efficient manner possible and continue to execute relentlessly against our five key strategies: having new, high-quality products coming to the market faster than the competition; providing our dealers with profit opportunities not available elsewhere; be best cost in our industries; be global; and attract and retain talent, McCoy added. In doing so, we will achieve our long-term value creation objectives and better position the company to benefit our shareholders when industry conditions improve.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; competition in the consumer electronics markets; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the ability to successfully complete announced divestitures; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2005 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20060922162956.txt.gz
TIME:20060922162956
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Terms and Conditions of Employment with Dustan E. McCoy
 
 
On September 18, 2006, Brunswick Corporation (the Company) entered into new Terms and Conditions of Employment (the "CEO Terms") with Dustan E. McCoy, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer. The CEO Terms supersede the Executive Severance and Change in Control Agreement dated June 13, 2001 and the Indemnification Agreement dated September 13, 1999 between Mr. McCoy and the Company.
 
The CEO Terms describe Mr. McCoys salary and the benefits for which he is eligible, which include participation in the Brunswick Performance Plan (BPP) and Strategic Incentive Plan (SIP), equity-based awards under the Companys 2003 Stock Incentive Plan, and other benefits to which executive officers of the Company are entitled, including financial counseling services, health and welfare benefits, participation in the Companys deferred compensation plans and use of the Companys aircraft and boats. The CEO Terms also incorporate the terms of the existing Indemnification Agreement.
 
Mr. McCoy is an employee at will until his employment terminates in accordance with the CEO Terms. He is entitled to receive severance benefits upon termination in certain circumstances specified in the CEO Terms.
 
Prior to a change in control, he will be entitled to specified severance benefits if his employment is terminated by the Company other than for cause or long-term disability or if he terminates his employment for good reason. The terms cause, long-term disability and good reason are each defined in the CEO Terms. If there is a qualifying termination of employment prior to a change in control, he will be entitled, among other things, to a severance payment equal to two times the sum of (i) his annual base salary, (ii) his target annual bonus under the BPP for the year in which termination occurs and (iii) the Companys profit-sharing and 401(k) match on his behalf during the 12 months prior to termination.
 
After a change in control, he will be entitled to specified severance benefits if his employment is terminated by the Company other than for cause or long-term disability, he terminates his employment at any time for good reason or he resigns for any reason during the 30-day period commencing on the first anniversary of the change in control. If there is any such qualifying termination following a change in control, he will be entitled, among other things, to a severance payment equal to three times the sum of (i) his annual base salary, (ii) the larger of his targeted annual bonus under the BPP for the year of termination or the year in which the change in control occurs, (iii) his most recent full-cycle target percentage under the SIP, and (iv) the Companys profit-sharing and 401(k) match on his behalf during the 12 months prior to termination.
 
Upon any qualifying termination (without regard to whether the termination occurred prior to or after a change in control), he will be entitled to certain additional benefits. These include: payment of any annual bonus earned for the preceding year that had not yet been paid at the time of termination; disposition of all outstanding stock options, stock appreciation rights and restricted stock awards in accordance with their terms; gross-ups relating to certain excise taxes that he may incur in connection with payments under the CEO Terms, and other benefits and perquisites for up to two years prior to a change in control, or for up to three years following a change in control.
 
2
The definition of a change in control includes: (i) the acquisition of 25 percent or more of the outstanding voting stock of the Company; (ii) the failure of the incumbent Board of Directors to constitute a majority of the Companys Board of Directors, excluding new directors who (a) are approved by a vote of at least 50 percent of the members of the incumbent Board of Directors and (b) did not join the Board following an actual or threatened contested election of directors; (iii) a merger, reorganization or consolidation of the Company with another entity, or a sale of substantially all of its assets, unless after such transaction (a) the Companys shareholders continue to own at least 60 percent of the voting stock outstanding, (b) no person owns more than 25 percent of the Companys voting stock, and (c) the members of the incumbent Board of Directors still constitute a majority of the Board of Directors; or (iv) a complete liquidation or dissolution of the Company.
 
The CEO Terms require Mr. McCoy to consent to certain confidentiality, non-competition and non-solicitation provisions, and to sign a general release.
 
The CEO Terms do not alter Mr. McCoys existing levels of salary and benefits or the other elements of his compensation, other than with respect to certain benefits provided upon qualifying terminations, as described in this Current Report on Form 8-K
 
Terms and Conditions of Employment with other Officers
 
 
On September 18, 2006, the Company also adopted new standard Terms and Conditions of Employment (the "Officer Terms") for 14 additional officers of the Company, including all of its current executive officers. The Human Resources and Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors approved the form of Officer Terms in all material respects at its July 2006 meeting. When executed, the Officer Terms will supersede any existing severance, change in control, and indemnification agreements with these officers.
 
The Officer Terms are identical in all material respects to the CEO Terms, except that:
 
 
 
The Officer Terms do not alter existing levels of salary and benefits or the other elements of compensation for any officers of the Company, other than with respect to certain benefits provided upon qualifying terminations, as described in this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
3
The foregoing description of the CEO Terms and the Officer Terms is a summary of their material terms, does not purport to be complete, and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the CEO Terms and the form of Officer Terms filed as Exhibits 10.1 and 10.2 to this report and incorporated by reference herein.
   
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
4
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
5
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
6

Exhibit 10.1
These TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT (the Agreement) made in Lake County, Illinois, as of September 18, 2006 (the Effective Date), between Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation with its headquarters at 1 N. Field Court, Lake Forest, Illinois, 60045 (the Company), and DUSTAN E. MCCOY (the Executive).
WHEREAS, since September 1, 1999, the Executive has been employed by the Company, pursuant to an offer letter dated August 23, 1999, an Indemnification Agreement dated September 13, 1999, a Change of Control Agreement dated September 13, 1999, and an Executive Severance and Change of Control Agreement dated June 13, 2001 (collectively, the Initial Agreement); and
WHEREAS, the Company desires to be assured of the Executives experience, skills, knowledge, and background for the benefit of the Company, and the efficient achievement of the long-term strategy of the Company, and is therefore willing to continue the Executives employment upon the terms and conditions, and in consideration of the compensation and benefits, provided herein; and
WHEREAS, as is the case with many publicly held corporations, a change in control might occur and such possibility may result in the departure or distraction of key management personnel to the detriment of the Company and its stockholders; and
WHEREAS, the Company desires to take appropriate steps to reinforce and encourage the continued attention and dedication of members of management, including the Executive, to their assigned duties without distraction arising from the possibility of a change in control of the Company; and
WHEREAS, the Company desires to have the Executive agree to provisions relating to noncompetition and nonsolicitation and certain other provisions contained herein, and the Executive is willing to agree to such provisions in consideration for the additional severance benefits to which he may become entitled under the terms of this Agreement.
THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the agreements of the parties described below, the parties agree that the Initial Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to provide as follows (it being understood that this Agreement supersedes the Initial Agreement in whole and is the controlling agreement between the parties):
1.
  
Definitions
. For purposes of this Agreement, capitalized terms used in this Agreement shall have the meanings indicated in Appendix I to this Agreement.
2.
  
Employment and Duties
.
(a)
  
Position
. The Company hereby agrees to employ the Executive, and the Executive hereby agrees to serve the Company, under the title of Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer. The Executive shall have such authority, duties, and responsibilities as are commensurate with such position on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, and shall directly report to the Board.
(b)
  
Performance of Duties
. Subject to the provisions of Section 6, below, Executive shall diligently perform his duties as Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer or as may otherwise be directed by the Board, and agrees to use his reasonable best efforts to perform his duties faithfully and efficiently.
(c)
  
Other Duties; Related Companies
. The Executive agrees to serve, as requested, as an officer or director of any Related Company, and shall receive no additional compensation for such service.
3.
  
Agreement Term
. The term of this Agreement (the Term) shall begin on the Effective Date and shall continue until terminated in accordance with Section 14 below. The Company shall employ the Executive for a period of time beginning on the Effective Date and continuing for as long as the Executive retains the confidence of the Board, it being the express understanding that the Executive is an employee at will, subject only to the protections provided by the specific terms of this Agreement. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, the Board may remove the Executive as Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer and assign him to other duties within the Company or terminate his employment.
4.
  
Executives Compensation and Benefits
.
As remuneration to the Executive for his services to the Company hereunder, the Company shall compensate the Executive as provided in this Section 4 during the Term. Executive acknowledges and agrees that Section 15 of this Agreement is expressly applicable to any form of compensation or benefit provided to Executive.
(a)
  
Base Salary
. The Executives annual base salary (Base Salary) shall be $800,000 commencing on the Effective Date and, except as it may be modified in accordance with this Section 4 by action of the Committee, continuing throughout the Term. The Base Salary shall be payable in conformity with the Companys then-current payroll practices, as modified from time to time. The Base Salary will be reviewed annually during the Term in accordance with Companys usual salary review process for executive officers. Effective as of the date of any adjustment in the Executives Base Salary, the Base Salary as so adjusted shall be considered the new Base Salary for all purposes of this Agreement. Any adjustments in Base Salary shall be determined by the Committee and communicated by memorandum to the Executive from the Committee. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement.
2
(b)
  
Brunswick Performance Plan
. For each calendar year during the Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in the Brunswick Performance Plan (BPP) and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee (Annual Bonus). During the Term, the Executives target Annual Bonus for each full calendar year shall be determined by the Committee in accordance with the terms of the BPP, as in effect from time to time (Target Annual Bonus). During the Term, the performance goals to be achieved, and the extent to which those goals have been achieved for purposes of calculating the amount of the actual payment as a percentage of the Target Annual Bonus, will be determined by the Committee. The amount of any award under BPP shall be reviewed and approved by the Committee and communicated by memorandum to the Executive from the Committee. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement. Executive acknowledges and agrees that the payment of the Annual Bonus is subject to the Companys stock ownership guidelines for corporate officers, as in effect from time to time, pursuant to which Executive is currently required to own 175,000 shares of Company stock.
(c)
  
Strategic Incentive Plan
. During the Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in the Brunswick Strategic Incentive Plan (SIP) and any and all successor or replacement plans, as may be determined by the Board or the Committee (SIP Bonus). During the Term, the Executives target SIP Bonus for each full calendar year shall be determined by the Committee in accordance with the terms of the SIP, as in effect from time to time (Target SIP Bonus). During the Term, the performance goals to be achieved, and the extent to which those goals have been achieved for purposes of calculating the amount of the actual payment as a percentage of the SIP Bonus, will be determined by the Committee. The amount of any award under SIP shall be reviewed and approved by the Committee and communicated by memorandum to the Executive from the Committee. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement. Executive acknowledges and agrees that the payment of the SIP Bonus is subject to the Companys stock ownership guidelines for corporate officers, as in effect from time to time, pursuant to which Executive is currently required to own 175,000 shares of Company stock.
(d)
  
Equity-Based Awards
. For each calendar year during the Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in and receive equity-based awards under the Companys 2003 Stock Incentive Plan, and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee (collectively, Incentive Plan). Any such future awards when made will be set forth in a memorandum to the Executive from the Committee. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement.
3
(e)
  
Financial Counseling Services
. The Executive shall be entitled to receive financial counseling services from a qualified provider of financial counseling services selected by the Company. Alternatively, the Company shall pay the Executive the amount of $18,000 per year for such financial counseling services. The Executive shall be responsible for any Income Tax due on the amounts paid or the imputed income for financial counseling services under this Section 4(e).
(f)
  
Health and Welfare Benefits
. The Executive shall be entitled to participate in all Company-sponsored health and welfare benefits offered to senior executives of the Company, including health, dental, vision, term life insurance (except for the basic life insurance component thereof) and annual executive physical examination, and any and all successor or replacement benefits as may be determined by the Board or the Committee.
(g)
  
Executive Life Insurance
. The Executive shall be entitled to participate in the Companys life insurance plan for senior executives (formerly the Split Dollar Life Insurance Plan) under the terms and conditions described in a Memorandum dated April 14, 2004 and incorporated herein by reference.
(h)
  
Vacation
. The Executive shall earn pro rata four (4) weeks of paid vacation each calendar year, to be earned and taken as generally provided for senior executives of the Company. Earned but unused vacation shall be paid upon termination. The Executive shall also be entitled to such personal days and paid holidays as are generally available to other senior executives of the Company.
(i)
  
Deferred Compensation Plans
. The Executive shall be entitled to participate in the Brunswick Rewards Plan, the Companys 2005 Automatic Deferred Compensation Plan, its 2005 Elective Deferred Incentive Compensation Plan, its Restoration Plan, and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee.
(j)
  
Retirement Plan
. Executive is entitled to any vested benefits he currently holds under the Brunswick Salaried Pension Plan.
(k)
  
Expenses
. The Executive shall be entitled to receive prompt reimbursement for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by the Executive in connection with the performance of his duties hereunder, in accordance with Company policies for senior executives.
(l)
  
Aircraft and Boat Usage; Product Programs; Excess Liability Coverage
. The Executive shall be entitled to (i) use of the Companys aircraft and watercraft, (ii) excess liability coverage, (iii) obtain Company products under the Executive Product Program, and (iv) make purchases through the Employee Purchase Program, in accordance with the terms and conditions in effect from time to time.
4
5.
  
Restrictive Covenants
.
The Executive acknowledges that during employment with the Company or a Related Company, the Executive has and will acquire, develop and have access to confidential and proprietary information that belongs to the Company or the Related Company. This information takes years and extensive resources to develop, is valuable to the Company or the Related Company and provides the Company or the Related Company with a competitive edge. In consideration of employment or continued employment, Executive knowingly and voluntarily agrees to the following restrictions and further acknowledges and agrees that they are reasonably designed to protect the Company or the Related Company interests and good will, and will not unduly restrict Executives post-employment activities.
(a)
  
Noncompetition; Nonsolicitation; Nondisparagement
. The following provisions shall apply:
(i.)
  
During the Executives employment and during the two-year period immediately following termination of Executives employment (regardless of the reason for the termination of employment), without the prior written consent of the Board, (i) the Executive shall not directly or indirectly be employed or retained by, or render any services for, or be financially interested in any manner, in any person, firm or corporation engaged in any business which is then materially competitive in any way with any business in which the Company or any Related Company was engaged (including any program of development or research) during the Executives employment; (ii) the Executive shall not divert or attempt to divert any business from the Company or a Related Company; (iii) the Executive shall not disturb or attempt to disturb any business relationships of the Company or any Related Company; and (iv) the Executive shall not assist any person in any way to do, or attempt to do, anything prohibited by the preceding clauses (i), (ii) and (iii).
(ii.)
  
In furtherance of Section 5(a)(i) above, the Executive shall promptly notify the Board through the Companys General Counsel and Chief Human Resources Officer (or their respective representatives), in advance in writing (which shall include a description of the proposed activity) of his intention to engage in any activity which could reasonably be deemed to be subject to the noncompetition provision set forth in Section 5(a)(i). The Board (or one of its representatives) shall respond to the Executive in writing within thirty (30) calendar days indicating its approval or objections to the Executives engagement in the activity;
provided
,
however
, that if the Board (or one of its representatives) does not respond to or request additional information from the Executive within such thirty (30) day period, the Boards approval shall be deemed to be granted. If the Executive fails to notify the Board of his intended activity in advance, the Company shall retain all its rights of objections. Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed as preventing the Executive from investing his personal assets in any business that competes with the Company, in such form or manner as will not require any services on the part of the Executive in the operation or affairs of the business in which such investments are made, but only if the Executive does not own or control more than two percent of any class of the outstanding stock of such business, and such stock is listed on a national securities exchange or is quoted on the National Market System of NASDAQ.
5
(iii.)
  
For the two-year period following termination of Executives employment with the Company, the Executive shall not, without the prior written consent of the Board, (A) solicit, recruit or hire any individual who is employed by the Company or any Related Company (or was so employed within 180 calendar days prior to the Executives solicitation, recruitment or hiring), (B) solicit or encourage any employee of the Company or any Related Company to terminate or refrain from renewing or extending such employment or to become employed by or become a consultant to any other individual or entity other than the Company or a Related Company, or (C) initiate discussion with any such employee for any such purposes or authorize or knowingly cooperate with the taking of any such actions by any other individual or entity;
provided
,
however
, that nothing herein shall prohibit the Executive from generally advertising for personnel not specifically targeting any executive or other personnel of the Company.
(iv.)
  
During the Executives employment with the Company and thereafter, Executive will not make any comment or statement or engage in any other behavior that in any way disparages or is otherwise detrimental to the reputation and goodwill of the Company, any Related Company, or any director, officer, executive, or agent of the Company or any Related Company;
provided
,
however
, that nothing herein shall be interpreted as prohibiting Executive from making truthful statements, including statements of opinion, to Company directors, officers, auditors or regulators or when required by a court or other body having jurisdiction to require such statements.
(b)
  
Confidentiality
. The following provisions shall apply:
(i.)
  
Except as may be required by the lawful order of a court or agency of competent jurisdiction, or except to the extent that the Executive has express written authorization from the Company, he will keep secret and confidential all Confidential Information (as defined below), and not disclose the same, either directly or indirectly, to any other person, firm, or business entity, or use it in any way. The Executive agrees that, to the extent that any court or agency seeks to have the Executive disclose Confidential Information, he shall promptly inform the Company, and he shall take such reasonable steps to prevent disclosure of Confidential Information until the Company has been informed of such required disclosure, and the Company has an opportunity to respond to such court or agency. To the extent that the Executive obtains information on behalf of the Company or a Related Company that may be subject to attorney-client privilege as to the Company or an affiliates attorneys, the Executive shall take reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of such information and to preserve such privilege.
(ii.)
  
Upon his termination of employment with the Company for any reason, the Executive shall promptly return to the Company any keys, credit cards, passes, confidential documents and material, or other property belonging to the Company, and shall return all writings, files, records, correspondence, notebooks, notes and other documents and things (including any copies or electronic versions thereof) containing Confidential Information or relating to the business or proposed business of the Company or any Related Company or containing any trade secrets relating to the Company or any Related Company, except any personal diaries, calendars, rolodexes or personal notes or correspondence.
6
(iii.)
  
For purposes of this Agreement, the term Confidential Information means all non-public information concerning the Company and any Related Company that was acquired by or disclosed to the Executive during the course of his employment with the Company or a Related Company, or during discussions between the Executive and the Company or any Related Company following his termination of employment arising out of his employment or this Agreement, including, without limitation: (A) all of the Companys or any Related Companys trade secrets as that term is used in the Illinois Trade Secrets Act (or, if that Act is repealed, the Uniform Trade Secrets Act upon which the Illinois Trade Secrets Act is based); (B) any non-public information regarding the Companys or a Related Company's directors, officers, employees, customers, equipment, processes, costs, operations and methods, whether past, current or planned, as well as knowledge and data relating to business plans, marketing and sales information originated, owned, controlled or possessed by the Company or a Related Company; and (C) information regarding litigation and threatened litigation involving or affecting the Company or a Related Company.
(c)
 
Assistance with Claims
. The Executive agrees that, consistent with the Executives business and personal affairs, during and after his employment by the Company, he will assist the Company and any Related Company in the defense of any claims or potential claims that may be made or threatened to be made against any of them in any action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (a Proceeding), and will assist the Company and any Related Company in the prosecution of any claims that may be made by the Company or any Related Company in any Proceeding, to the extent that such claims may relate to the Executives employment or the period of the Executives employment by the Company. Executive agrees, unless precluded by law, to promptly inform the Company if Executive is asked to participate (or otherwise become involved) in any Proceeding involving such claims or potential claims. Executive also agrees, unless precluded by law, to promptly inform the Company if Executive is asked to assist in any investigation (whether governmental or private) of the Company or any Related Company (or their actions), regardless of whether a lawsuit has then been filed against the Company or any Related Company with respect to such investigation. The Company agrees to reimburse Executive for all of Executives reasonable out-of-pocket expenses associated with such assistance, including travel expenses and any attorneys fees and shall pay a reasonable per diem fee for Executives service.
(d)
 
The payments, benefits, and other entitlements under this Agreement are being made in consideration of, among other things, the obligations of this Section 5 and, in particular, compliance with Sections 5(a) and (b) of this Agreement;
provided
,
however
, that all such payments, benefits, or other entitlements pursuant to Section 6 of the Agreement are subject to and conditioned upon the Executives entering into the Release and Agreement referred to in Section 6(g) of this Agreement.
7
(e)
 
Remedies
. In the event of any material breach by the Executive of the provisions of Sections 5(a) or (b) of this Agreement (i) the Company shall be relieved of all obligations to make any further payments to the Executive pursuant to Sections 4 and 6 of this Agreement or otherwise under any incentive compensation plan of the Company or a Related Company, (ii) all outstanding equity-based awards held by the Executive shall be immediately forfeited and (iii) subject to the following provisos, the Executive will be required to pay the Company, in cash, within five business days after written demand is made therefor by the Company, an amount equal to any gain realized as a result of the exercise or vesting of equity awards during the period commencing twelve months prior to the date that the material breach began and ending on the date of payment;
provided
,
however
, that no forfeiture, cancellation, or repayment shall take place with respect to any payments, benefits, or entitlements under this Agreement or any other award agreement, plan, or practice, unless the Company shall have first given the Executive written notice of its intent to so forfeit, cancel, or require repayment and the Executive has not, within thirty (30) calendar days after such notice has been given, ceased such impermissible Competitive Activity or other activity in violation of this Agreement; and
provided further
,
however
, that such prior notice procedure shall not be required with respect to (A) a Competitive Activity or violation of Section 5(b) of this Agreement which the Executive initiated after the Company had informed the Executive in writing that it believed such activity violated this Agreement or the Companys noncompetition guidelines, or (B) any Competitive Activity regarding products or services which are part of a line of business which the Executive knew or should have known represented more than five percent (5%) of the Companys consolidated gross revenues for its most recently completed fiscal year at the time the Executives employment is terminated.
6.
  
Termination Provisions
.
(a)
  
Severance Benefits
. Prior to a Change in Control, if the Company terminates Executives employment for any reason other than Long-Term Disability or Cause, or if the Executive resigns for Good Reason, subject to Section 6(g), the Executive shall be entitled to the following:
(i.)
  
Severance payments in an aggregate amount equal to two times the sum of: (i) the Executives then-current Base Salary (disregarding any reductions made in contemplation of the termination), (ii) the Executives Target Annual Bonus for the year of termination, and (iii) the Companys profit-sharing, 401(k) match and other Company contributions made on behalf of the Executive to the Companys tax-qualified and nonqualified defined contribution plans during the 12-month period prior to the date of termination (the Total Severance Payment). In the event that the Total Severance Payment becomes due to the Executive under this Agreement, subject to Section 7, such payment shall be made in equal installments over the 24-month period following the date that the release described in Section 6(g) becomes effective and irrevocable (the Release Effective Date). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, in the event that the Executive will attain age 65 prior to the second anniversary of the date of termination, the Total Severance Amount shall be reduced to a level determined by multiplying the amount of such payment by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full months between the date of termination and the date the Executive will attain age 65 (and the numerator will not be reduced to reflect any six-month delay in payment that may be required pursuant to Section 7), and the denominator of which shall be 24. In addition, the period during which the Executive will receive installment payments with respect to the Total Severance Amount will also be reduced accordingly.
8
(ii.)
  
If such termination occurs prior to the payment of the Executives Annual Bonus payable with respect to the immediately preceding calendar year and/or SIP Bonus payable with respect to the most recently completed performance period (as that term is defined in SIP), payment of such Annual Bonus and/or SIP Bonus for such period(s), in the amount(s), and at such time(s), as he would otherwise have been entitled under the terms of the BPP and the SIP, as applicable, had employment not terminated.
(iii.)
  
All outstanding stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock units, restricted shares and other equity-based awards (the Equity Incentives) held by the Executive shall be governed by the terms and conditions of the equity compensation plans and award agreements pursuant to which they were granted.
(iv.)
  
The Executive shall be entitled to Company-provided continuation of medical, dental, vision and prescription coverage, but not Long-Term Disability coverage (the Benefits) (on either an insured or a self-insured basis, in the sole discretion of the Company) for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents (as determined under the terms of the Companys health and welfare benefit plans in effect as of the date of termination), on substantially the same terms of such coverage that are in existence immediately prior to the Executives date of termination (subject to commercial availability of such coverage), until the earlier of: (A) the date on which the Executive becomes employed by another employer, or (B) the second anniversary of the Executives date of termination;
provided
,
however
, that such coverage shall run concurrently with any coverage available to the Executive and his Eligible Dependents under COBRA; and
provided further
,
however
, that the Executive shall immediately notify the Company if he becomes covered under Medicare or another employers group health plan, at which time the Companys provision of medical coverage for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents at the subsidized rate will cease. During the continuation period, the Executive shall also continue to receive financial counseling and excess liability insurance in accordance with the Companys policy in effect on the date of termination, as may be modified by the Company from time to time during the continuation period. The Executive shall not be entitled to any other perquisites, and his right to an executive physical examination, use of Corporate aircraft/watercraft, and participation in the Companys executive product programs shall terminate on the date of termination. In lieu of continuing financial counseling and excess liability insurance, the Company may, in its discretion, make a cash payment to the Executive of equal value. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 6(a)(iv), in the event the Executive attains age 65 prior to the second anniversary of his date of termination, the benefits provided for in this Section 6(a)(iv) shall cease on the date the Executive attains age 65;
provided
,
however
, that if the commencement of benefits under this Section 6(a)(iv) is delayed by six months as a result of Section 7, the Executive shall continue to receive the benefits under this Section 6(a)(iv) following attainment of age 65 solely during the period necessary to avoid a reduction in benefits as a result of the six-month delay.
9
(b)
  
Change in Control Benefits
. After a Change in Control, if the Company terminates the Executives employment for any reason other than Long-Term Disability or Cause, or if the Executive resigns for any reason during the 30-day period commencing on the first anniversary of the Change in Control, or at any time for Good Reason, subject to Section 6(g), the Executive shall be entitled to the following:
(i.)
  
Change in Control payments in a lump sum in an aggregate amount equal to three times the sum of: (i) the Executives then-current Base Salary (disregarding any reductions made after the Change in Control or in contemplation of the Change in Control), (ii) the Executives Target Annual Bonus for the year of termination or, if greater, the Executives Target Annual Bonus for the year in which the Change in Control occurred, (iii) the Executives targeted bonus under the SIP for the period that ended most recently prior to the Change in Control, and (iv) the Companys profit-sharing, 401(k) match and other Company contributions made on behalf of the Executive to the Companys tax-qualified and nonqualified defined contribution plans during the 12 months prior to the date of termination (the Total Change in Control Payment). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, in the event that the Executive will attain age 65 prior to the third anniversary of the date of termination, the Total Change in Control Amount shall be reduced to a level determined by multiplying the amount of such payment by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full months between the date of termination and the date the Executive will attain age 65 (and the numerator will not be reduced to reflect any six-month delay in payment that may be required pursuant to Section 7), and the denominator of which shall be 36.
(ii.)
  
If such termination occurs prior to the payment of the Executives Annual Bonus payable with respect to the immediately preceding calendar year and/or SIP Bonus payable with respect to the most recently completed performance period (as that term is defined in SIP), payment of such Annual Bonus and/or SIP Bonus for such period(s), in the amount(s), and at such time(s), as he would otherwise have been entitled under the terms of the BPP and the SIP, as applicable, had employment not terminated.
(iii.)
  
Notwithstanding the terms and conditions of the equity compensation plans and award agreements pursuant to which outstanding awards were granted, upon termination of the Executives employment, all Equity Incentives awards held by the Executive will become fully vested and, if applicable, immediately exercisable, and will remain outstanding pursuant to their terms. All performance-based awards shall be deemed to have been earned at performance maximum levels.
10
(iv.)
  
The Executive shall be entitled to Company-provided continuation of Benefits (on either an insured or a self-insured basis, in the sole discretion of the Company) for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents, on substantially the same terms of such coverage that are in existence immediately prior to the Executives date of termination (subject to commercial availability of such coverage), until the earlier of: (A) the date on which the Executive becomes employed by another employer, or (B) the third anniversary of the Executives date of termination;
provided
,
however
, that such coverage shall run concurrently with any coverage available to the Executive and his Eligible Dependents under COBRA; and
provided further
,
however
, that the Executive shall immediately notify the Company if he becomes covered under Medicare or another employers group health plan, at which time the Companys provision of medical coverage for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents at the subsidized rate will cease. During the continuation period, the Executive shall also continue to receive financial counseling and excess liability insurance in accordance with the Companys policy in effect on the date of termination, as may be modified by the Company from time to time during the continuation period. The Executive shall not be entitled to any other perquisites, and his right to an executive physical examination, use of Corporate aircraft/watercraft, and participation in the Companys product purchase programs shall terminate on the date of termination. In lieu of continuing financial counseling and excess liability insurance, the Company may, in its discretion, make a cash payment to the Executive of equal value. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 6(b)(iv), in the event the Executive attains age 65 prior to the third anniversary of his date of termination, the benefits provided for in this Section 6(b)(iv) shall cease on the date the Executive attains age 65;
provided
,
however
, that if the commencement of benefits under this Section 6(b)(iv) is delayed by six months as a result of Section 7, the Executive shall continue to receive the benefits under this Section 6(b)(iv) following attainment of age 65 solely during the period necessary to avoid a reduction in benefits as a result of the six-month delay.
(c)
  
Benefits Upon Termination Due to Death or Long-Term Disability
. If, at any time during the Term, the Executives employment terminates as a result of the Executives death or Long-Term Disability, the Executive or his estate (as applicable) shall be entitled to:
(i.)
  
Payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination and any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination;
(ii.)
  
If such termination occurs prior to the payment of the Executives Annual Bonus payable with respect to the immediately preceding calendar year and/or SIP Bonus payable with respect to the most recently completed performance period (as that term is defined in SIP), payment of such Annual Bonus and/or SIP Bonus for such period(s), in the amount(s), and at such time(s), as he would otherwise have been entitled under the terms of the BPP and the SIP, as applicable, had employment not terminated.
11
(iii.)
  
Continuation of the ability of the Executive or the Executives beneficiaries (as applicable) to exercise all outstanding awards granted to the Executive under the Incentive Plan that became vested and exercisable on or prior to such date of termination in accordance with the terms and conditions of such grants.
(d)
  
Termination for Cause
. In the event the Executives employment is terminated for Cause at any time during the Term, the Executive shall not receive any payments, benefits, or other amounts provided by this Agreement, other than payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination and for payment of any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination (but shall still be subject to the restrictive covenants set forth in Section 5 of this Agreement). The Executive may, however, be eligible for certain benefits under the Companys tax-qualified pension and other employee benefit plans. The Executives employment may not be terminated for Cause unless and until the Company delivers to the Executive a copy of a resolution duly adopted by the affirmative vote of not less than three-quarters of the members of the Board who are independent directors at a meeting of the Board called and held for such purpose (after reasonable notice to the Executive and an opportunity for the Executive, together with counsel, to be heard before the Board) finding that, in the good faith opinion of the Board, the Executive was guilty of conduct constituting Cause and specifying the particulars thereof in detail.
(e)
  
Termination Due to Voluntary Resignation Without Good Reason
. In the event the Executive voluntarily resigns without Good Reason during the Term, the Executive shall not be entitled to any payments, benefits or other amounts under this Agreement, other than payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination and for payment of any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination (but shall still be subject to the restrictive covenants set forth in Section 5 of this Agreement). The Executive may, however, be eligible for certain benefits under the Companys tax-qualified pension and other employee benefit plans.
(f)
  
Notification Requirements for Termination for Good Reason
.
(i.)
  
In the event the Executive determines that Good Reason exists to terminate his employment with the Company, the Executive shall notify the Company in writing of the specific event, within sixty (60) calendar days after the date that the Executive becomes aware of the occurrence of such event, and such notice shall also include the date on which the Executive will terminate employment with the Company, which date shall be no earlier than fifteen (15) calendar days after the date of such notice;
provided
,
however
, that the Board, in its sole discretion, may relieve the Executive of his duties effective immediately upon the Companys receipt of notice provided pursuant to this Section 6(f).
12
(ii.)
  
In the event the Company agrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason, the Company, in its sole discretion, shall either (y) undertake to cure the circumstances that gave rise to Good Reason within thirty (30) calendar days of the Companys receipt of notice from the Executive under Section 6(f)(i) above, or (z) advise the Executive that his employment with the Company shall terminate on his date of termination as determined under Section 6(f)(i), above.
If the Company disputes the existence of Good Reason, the Company shall have the burden of proof to establish that Good Reason does not exist.
(iii.)
  
Notwithstanding the date on which the Executives termination occurs following the completion of the steps set forth in this Section 6(f),
so long as an event that constitutes Good Reason occurs during the Term and the Executive delivers the written notice of termination for Good Reason to the Company at any time prior to the expiration of the Term, for purposes of the payments, benefits and other entitlements set forth in this Section 6, the termination of the Executives employment pursuant thereto shall be deemed to be a resignation for Good Reason during the Term.
(g)
  
Conditional Payments
. Any payments or benefits made pursuant to this Section 6 will be subject to and conditioned upon (i) Executives compliance with the provisions, restrictions, and limitations of Section 5 of this Agreement, but not otherwise subject to offset or mitigation, (ii) the Executives signing and not revoking (following his date of termination), and the Companys receipt of, a Release and Agreement releasing the Company, Related Companies, and their respective directors, officers, employees and agents (Released Parties) from any and all claims and liabilities, and promising, to the fullest extent allowed by law, never to sue any of the Released Parties (such Release and Agreement shall be in the form set forth in Appendix III), and (iii) the Companys receipt of the Executives resignation from all offices, directorships, and fiduciary positions with the Company, its Related Companies, and their respective employee benefit plans.
7.
  
Section 409A of the Code
.
It is intended that the provisions of this Agreement comply with Section 409A of the Code, and all provisions of this Agreement shall be construed and interpreted in a manner consistent with Section 409A of the Code. In particular, if necessary to avoid imposition of penalties and additional taxes under Section 409A of the Code (the Section 409A Tax), notwithstanding the timing of payment provided in any other Section of this Agreement, the timing of any amounts payable pursuant to this Agreement shall be subject to a six-month delay in a manner consistent with Section 409A(a)(2)(B)(i) of the Code. I
n the case of a series of payments, the first payment shall include the amounts the Executive would have been entitled to receive during the six-month waiting period.
From and after the Effective Date and for the remainder of the Term, (a) the Company shall administer and operate this Agreement and any nonqualified deferred compensation plan (as defined in Section 409A of the Code) (and any other arrangement that could reasonably be expected to constitute such a plan) in which the Executive participates and the Executives rights and benefits hereunder and thereunder in compliance with Section 409A of the Code and any rules, regulations or other guidance promulgated thereunder as in effect from time to time, (b) in the event that the Company determines that any provision of this Agreement or any such plan or arrangement does not comply with Section 409A of the Code or any such rules, regulations or guidance and that the Executive may become subject to a Section 409A Tax, the Company shall amend or modify such provision to avoid the application of such Section 409A Tax, and (c) in the event that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the Executive is subject to a Section 409A Tax with respect to any such provision, the Company shall indemnify and hold the Executive harmless against all taxes (and any interest or penalties imposed with respect to such taxes) imposed as a result of the Companys failure to comply with clause (a) of this Section 7. The provisions of Sections 10(c), (d) and (e) shall apply
mutatis
 
mutandis
to any claim by the IRS that, if successful, would give rise to indemnification by the Company under this Section 7.
13
8.
  
Legal Fees
. In the event that it shall be necessary or desirable for the Executive to retain legal counsel or incur other costs and expenses in connection with enforcement of the Executives rights under this Agreement, the Company shall pay (or the Executive shall be entitled to recover from the Company, as the case may be) his reasonable attorneys fees and cost and expenses in connection with enforcement of his rights (including the enforcement of any arbitration award in court), (a) if the action relates to the Executive's employment with the Company or a Related Company during a period ending prior to a Change in Control, only if a final decision in connection with a material issue of the litigation (or arbitration) is issued in the Executives favor by an arbitrator or a court of competent jurisdiction, and (b) if the action relates to the Executive's employment with the Company or a Related Company during a period following a Change in Control or during a period that both precedes and follows a Change in Control, regardless of the final outcome, unless, in the case of this clause (b), the arbitrator or court shall determine that under the circumstances recovery by the Executive of all or a part of any such fees and costs and expenses would be unjust.
9.
  
Indemnification
.
The Executive shall be entitled to indemnification by the Company under the Indemnification Terms and Conditions described in Appendix IV to this Agreement.
 
10.
  
Excise Tax
.
(a)
  
Excise Tax Adjustment Payment Calculation
. If any element of compensation or benefit provided to the Executive under the terms of this Agreement or under any other plan, program, policy, or other arrangement, either alone or in combination with other elements of compensation and benefits paid or provided to such Executive, constitutes an excess parachute payment, as that term is defined in Section 280G of the Code and the regulations thereunder (Potential Parachute Benefit), and subjects such Executive to the excise tax pursuant to Section 4999 of the Code, and any interest and penalties thereon (collectively, the Excise Tax), then the Executive shall be entitled, subject to Section 10(f), to an additional lump-sum cash payment from the Company (the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment), subject to mandatory withholding, in an amount equal to the Excise Taxes (including the Excise Tax attributable to the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to the Potential Parachute Benefit) plus any Income Taxes and any interest and penalties thereon attributable to the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment. For purposes of calculating an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to the Executive in any year, it shall be assumed that the Executive is subject to Income Taxes at the highest marginal Federal and applicable state and local income tax rates, respectively, for the year in which the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment is paid. Also, the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to the Executive shall reflect the Federal tax benefits attributable to the deduction of applicable state and local income taxes
, taking into account limitations applicable to individuals subject to Federal income tax at the highest marginal rate
.
14
(b)
  
Independent Firm
. All determinations required to be made under this Section 10, including whether and when an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment is required and the amount of such Excise Tax Adjustment Payment and the assumptions utilized in arriving at such determinations, shall be made by an independent accounting or consulting firm chosen by the Company (the Firm). The Firm shall provide detailed supporting calculations to the Company and to the Executive within thirty (30) business days after the receipt of notice from the Company or the Executive that there has been a Potential Parachute Benefit provided to which these Excise Tax provisions apply (or such earlier time as requested by the Company). Any Excise Tax Adjustment Payment shall be paid by the Company to the Executive within fifteen (15) business days after the Companys receipt of the Firms determination.
(i.)
  
If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an IRS proceeding, or in the opinion of independent counsel agreed upon by the Company and the Executive, that the Excise Tax payable by the Executive on the Potential Parachute Benefit is less than the amount initially taken into account under Section 10(a) for purposes of calculating the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to such Potential Parachute Benefit, the Firm shall recalculate the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to reflect the actual Excise Tax. Within thirty (30) business days following the Executives receipt of notice of the results of such recalculation from the Firm and/or the Company, the Executive shall repay to the Company the excess of the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment.
(ii.)
  
If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an IRS proceeding, or in the opinion of an independent counsel agreed upon by the Company and the Executive, that the Excise Tax payable by the Executive on the Benefit is more than the amount initially taken into account under Section 10(a) for purposes of calculating the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to such Potential Parachute Benefit, the Firm shall recalculate the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to reflect the actual Excise Tax. Within thirty (30) business days following the Companys receipt of notice of the results of such recalculation from the Firm, the Company shall pay to the Executive the excess of the recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment.
15
(iii.)
  
All fees and expenses of the Firm and any independent counsel shall be borne solely by the Company.
(c)
  
Notice
. The Executive shall notify the Company in writing of any written claim by the IRS that, if successful, would require the payment by the Company of an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment or the recalculation of an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment. The notification shall apprise the Company of the nature of such claim, including (i) a copy of the written claim from the IRS, (ii) the identification of the element of compensation and/or benefit that is the subject of such IRS claim, and (iii) the date on which such claim is requested to be paid. Such notification shall be given as soon as practicable, but no later than ten (10) business days after the Executive actually receives notice in writing of such claim. The failure of the Executive to properly notify the Company of the IRS claim (or to provide any required information with respect thereto) shall not affect any rights granted to the Executive under this Section 10, except to the extent that the Company is materially prejudiced in the challenge to such claim as a direct result of such failure.
(d)
  
Payment
. Within ten (10) business days following receipt of such written notification by the Executive of such IRS claim, the Company shall pay to the Executive an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment, or the excess of a recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment, as applicable, related to the element of compensation and/or benefit which is the subject of the IRS claim. Within ten (10) business days following such payment to the Executive, the Executive shall provide to the Company written evidence that he or she has paid the claim to the IRS (the United States Treasury).
(e)
  
Contest
. If the Company notifies the Executive in writing, within sixty (60) business days following receipt from the Executive of notification of the IRS claim, that it desires to contest such claim, the Executive shall:
(i.)
  
Give the Company any information reasonably requested by the Company relating to such claim;
(ii.)
  
Take such action in connection with contesting such claim as the Company shall reasonably request in writing from time to time including, without limitation, accepting legal representation with respect to such claim by an attorney selected by the Company and reasonably acceptable to the Executive;
(iii.)
  
Cooperate with the Company in good faith in order to effectively contest such claim; and
(iv.)
  
Permit the Company to participate in any proceedings relating to such claim if the Company elects not to assume and control the defense of such claim;
16
provided
,
however
, that the Company shall bear and pay directly all costs and expenses (including additional interest and penalties) incurred in connection with such contest and shall indemnify and hold harmless the Executive, on an after-tax basis, for any Excise Tax and Income Taxes (including interest and penalties with respect thereto) imposed as a result of such representation and payment of costs and expenses. Without limitation on the foregoing provisions of this Section 10, the Company shall have the right, at its sole option, to assume the control of all proceedings in connection with such contest, in which case it may pursue or forego any and all administrative appeals, proceedings, hearings, and conferences with the taxing authority in respect of such claim, and may direct the Executive to sue for a refund or contest the claim in any permissible manner, and the Executive agrees to prosecute such contest to a determination before any administrative tribunal, in a court of initial jurisdiction and in one or more appellate courts, as the Company shall determine; and
provided further
,
however
, that (A) if the Company directs the Executive to pay such claim and sue for a refund, the Company shall advance the amount of such payment to the Executive, on an interest-free basis, and shall indemnify and hold the Executive harmless, on an after-tax basis, from any Excise Tax or income tax (including interest or penalties) imposed with respect to such advance or with respect to any imputed income in connection with such advance and (B) any extension of the statute of limitations relating to payment of tax for the taxable year of the Executive with respect to which such contested amount is claimed to be due is limited solely to such contested amount. Furthermore, the Companys rights to assume the control of the contest shall be limited to issues with respect to which an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment would be payable hereunder, and the Executive shall be entitled to settle or contest, as the case may be, any other issue raised by the IRS or any other taxing authority. To the extent that the contest of the IRS claim is successful, the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to the element of compensation and/or benefit that was the subject of the claim shall be recalculated in accordance with the provisions of Section 10(a).
(f)
 
Limitation on Potential Parachute Benefit
. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 10, if it shall be determined (by the reasonable computation of the Firm, which determination shall be certified by the Firm and set forth in a certificate delivered to Executive) that the aggregate amount of the Potential Parachute Benefits that, but for this Section 10(f), would be payable to Executive, does not exceed 110% of the greatest amount of Potential Parachute Benefits that could be paid to Executive without giving rise to any liability for Excise Taxes in connection therewith (such greatest amount, the Floor Amount), then:
(i) no Excise Tax Adjustment Benefit shall be made to Executive; and
(ii) the aggregate amount of Potential Parachute Benefits payable to Executive shall be reduced (but not below the Floor Amount) to the largest amount which would both (A) not cause any Excise Taxes to be payable by Executive, and (B) not cause any Potential Parachute Benefit to become nondeductible by the Company by reason of Section 280G of the Code (or any successor provision);
provided
,
however
, that in no event shall any such reduction (x) in any way affect any Potential Parachute Benefits that are provided to Executive in any form other than cash, or (y) reduce the aggregate amount of Potential Parachute Benefits that are payable in cash to an amount below the aggregate amount of Income Taxes payable by Executive in respect of all Potential Parachute Benefits received by him (whether in cash or otherwise).
17
11.
  
Wage Withholding and Reporting
. All taxable payments, reimbursements, benefits, and other amounts payable or provided by the Company pursuant to this Agreement shall be subject to applicable wage withholding of Income Taxes and shall be reported on IRS Form W-2.
12.
  
Remedies
.
The Executive acknowledges that the Company would be irreparably injured by any violation of Section 5 and agrees that (A) the Company, in addition to any other remedies available to it for such breach or threatened breach, shall be entitled to a preliminary injunction, temporary restraining order, or other equivalent relief, restraining the Executive from any actual or threatened breach of Section 5, and (B) if a bond is required to be posted in order for the Company to secure an injunction or other equitable remedy, the parties agree that said bond need not be more than a nominal sum.
If a final and non-appealable judicial determination is made that any of the provisions of Section 5 constitutes an unreasonable or otherwise unenforceable restriction against the Executive, the provisions of such Section will not be rendered void but will be deemed to be modified to the minimum extent necessary to remain in force and effect for the greatest period and to the greatest extent that such court determines constitutes a reasonable restriction under the circumstances. Moreover, notwithstanding the fact that any provision of Section 5 is determined not to be specifically enforceable, the Company will nevertheless be entitled to recover monetary damages as a result of the Executives breach of such provision.
13.
  
Dispute Resolution
.
Except as otherwise provided by Section 12 (Remedies) above, any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement (or the breach thereof) shall be settled by arbitration in the City of Chicago in accordance with the laws of the State of Illinois by one arbitrator. The arbitrator shall be appointed pursuant to Rule 11 of the American Arbitration Associations Commercial Arbitration Rules, amended and effective September 15, 2005. The arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association, Commercial Arbitration Rules. Judgment upon the award rendered by the arbitrators may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof.
14.
  
Termination Provisions
.
This Agreement shall automatically terminate upon the Executives attainment of age 65, and may be terminated at any time by the Company upon six months advance written notice to the Executive;
provided
,
however
, that if a Change in Control occurs prior to the termination of this Agreement, the Term shall continue through and terminate on the second anniversary of the date on which the Change in Control occurs.
18
15.
  
Other Benefit Plans
. The Company reserves the right to discontinue or modify its compensation, incentive, benefit, and perquisite plans, programs, and practices at any time and from time to time. Moreover, the brief summaries contained herein are subject to the terms of such plans, programs, and practices. For purposes of any and all employee benefit plans, the definition of compensation is as stated in such plans.
The severance benefits payable under Section 6 of this Agreement are in lieu of all other severance benefits which the Executive would otherwise be entitled to receive from the Company and any Related Company, except as may otherwise be provided in a written agreement specifically referencing this Section 15. The Executive acknowledges and agrees that the severance benefits to which the Executive may become entitled under this Agreement are in excess of those which the Executive would be entitled to under the Companys otherwise applicable severance pay plans, and that the Company is agreeing to provide such severance benefits in consideration for the Executives agreement to the terms and conditions of Section 5 of this Agreement.
16.
  
Entire Agreement; Amendments
. This Agreement represents the entire agreement between the Executive and the Company in respect of the subject matter contained herein and supersedes all prior agreements, promises, covenants, arrangements, communications, representations, or warranties, whether oral or written, by any officer, executive, or representative of any party hereto, including, but not limited to, the Initial Agreement. Except as specifically provided in Section 7, no amendments or modifications to this Agreement may be made except in writing signed by the Company (as authorized by the Board) and the Executive.
17.
  
Survivorship
. The respective rights and obligations of the parties hereunder shall survive the expiration of the Term and any termination of the Executives employment to the extent necessary to the intended preservation of such rights and obligations.
18.
  
Notices
. Any notice and all other communications provided for in this Agreement to be given to a party shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given when delivered in person or two (2) business days after being placed in the United States mails by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, duly addressed to the party concerned at the address indicated below or to such changed address as such party may subsequently furnish to the other in writing in accordance herewith, except that notices of change of address shall be effective only upon receipt:
If to the Company:
Brunswick Corporation
1 N. Field Court
Lake Forest, IL 60045
Attn: Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
If to the Executive:
at the last address filed with the Company
19
19.
  
Severability
. The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement. If any provision of this Agreement shall be held invalid or unenforceable in part, the remaining portion of such provision, together with all other provisions of this Agreement, shall remain valid and enforceable and continue in full force and effect to the fullest extent consistent with law. In furtherance and not in limitation of the foregoing, should the duration or geographical extent of, or business activities covered by, any provision of this Agreement be in excess of that which is valid and enforceable under applicable law, then such provision shall be construed to cover only that duration, extent, or activities which may be validly enforced.
20.
  
Headings
. Headings to Sections hereof are for convenience of reference only and shall not be construed to alter or affect the meaning of any provision of this Agreement.
21.
  
Injunctive Relief
. If there is a breach or threatened breach of the provisions of this Agreement, the non-breaching party shall be entitled to an injunction restraining the breaching party from such breach. Nothing herein shall be construed as prohibiting either party from pursuing any other remedies for a breach or threatened breach of this Agreement.
22.
  
No Assignment or Attachment
. Except as required by law, no right to receive payments under this Agreement shall be subject to anticipation, commutation, alienation, sale, assignment, encumbrance, charge, pledge, or hypothecation, or to execution, attachment, levy, or similar process or assignment by operation of law, and any attempt, voluntary or involuntary, to effect any such action shall be null, void, and of no effect;
provided
,
however
, that nothing in this Section 22 shall preclude the assumption of such rights by executors, administrators, or other legal representatives of the Executive or his estate and their assigning any rights hereunder to the person or persons entitled thereto; and
provided further
,
however
, that the Company may not assign this Agreement except in connection with an assignment or disposition of all or substantially all of the assets or stock of the Company or the division, subsidiary, or business unit for which the Executive is providing services under this Agreement or by law as a result of a merger or consolidation.
23.
  
Successors, Assumption of Contract
. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and any
successor
of the Company. The Company will require any successor (whether direct or indirect, by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business and/or assets of the Company to expressly assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent that the Company would be required to perform it if no succession had taken place.
As used in this Agreement, except for purposes of Section 5(a), the term Company shall mean the Company as hereinbefore defined and any successor of the Company and any permitted assignee to which this Agreement is assigned.
20
24.
  
Work For Hire Acknowledgment; Assignment
. The Executive acknowledges that all of the Executives work on and contributions to the Companys products (the Products) including, without limitation, any and all patterns, designs, and other expressions in any tangible medium (collectively, the Works) are within the scope of the Executives employment and are a part of the services, duties, and responsibilities of the Executive. All of the Executives work on and contributions to the Works will be rendered and made by the Executive for, at the instigation of, and under the overall direction of, the Company, and all of the Executives said work and contributions, as well as the Works, are and at all times shall be regarded as work made for hire as that term is used in the United States copyright laws. Without curtailing or limiting this acknowledgment, the Executive hereby assigns, grants, and delivers exclusively to the Company, as to work on and contribution to the Products pursuant hereto, all rights, titles, and renewals. The Executive will execute and deliver to the Company, or its successors and assigns, such other and further assignments, instruments, and documents as it from time to time reasonably may request for the purpose of establishing, evidencing, and enforcing or defending its complete, exclusive, perpetual, and worldwide ownership of all rights, titles, and interests of every kind and nature whatsoever, including all copyrights, in and to the Works. The Executive hereby constitutes and appoints the Company as his agent and attorney-in-fact, with full power of substitution, to execute and deliver said assignments, instruments, or documents as the Executive may fail or refuse to execute and deliver, this power and agency being coupled with an interest and being irrevocable.
25.
  
Governing Law
. The validity, interpretation, construction, and performance of this Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois, without regard to its choice of laws provisions, for contracts made and to be performed wholly in such state;
provided
,
however
, the rights of the Executive to indemnification under Section 9 shall be governed by the laws of the State of Delaware.
26.
  
Termination of Initial Agreement
. From and after the Effective Date, this Agreement shall supersede any other employment agreement, severance agreement, indemnification agreement and change of control agreement between the parties, including the Initial Agreement.
27.
  
Counterparts
.
This
Agreement
may be executed in two or more counterparts, any one of which shall be deemed the original without reference to the others.
IN WITNESS THEREOF, the Executive has hereunto set his hand and the Company has caused these presents to be executed in its name and on its behalf, and its corporate seal to be hereunto affixed, all as of the Effective Date.
 
 
 
21
 
Appendix I
Definitions
.
 
1
 
 
2
 
 
3
 
 
4
 
 
5
 
 
6
Appendix II
Changes to Base Salary,
BPP Awards, SIP Awards,
And Equity Incentives Awards
 
1
Appendix III
 
 
 
 
 
1
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
Intending to be legally bound hereby, I execute the foregoing General Release this ______ day of _________________, 20___.
 
 
3
 
Appendix IV
Brunswick Corporation (the Corporation) shall indemnify Executive (hereinafter, Indemnitee) against expenses and costs incurred by Indemnitee in connection with any claims, suits or proceedings arising from his service to the Corporation, to the fullest extent that is lawful in accordance with the following terms and conditions:
1.
Acts and Omissions Covered By This Agreement
. The Corporations agreement to indemnify Indemnitee (Agreement) shall cover any act or omission by an Indemnitee which (i) occurs or is alleged to have occurred by reason of his being or having been an officer and director, (ii) occurs or is alleged to have occurred before, during or after the time when the Indemnitee served as an officer and director and (iii) gives rise to, or is the direct or indirect subject of a claim in any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding at any time or times whether during or after his service as an officer or director.
2.
Indemnity
.
 
1
 
3.
Burden of Proof
. Indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification for any act or omission covered in Section 1 of this Agreement. The burden of proof of establishing that Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification because of the failure to fulfill some requirement of Delaware law, the Corporations charter, by-laws, or this Agreement shall be on the Corporation.
4.
  
Notice by Indemnitee
. Indemnitee shall notify the Corporation in writing of any matter with respect to which Indemnitee intends to seek indemnification hereunder as soon as reasonably practicable following the receipt by Indemnitee of written threat thereof;
provided
,
however
, that failure to so notify the Corporation shall not constitute a waiver by Indemnitee of his rights hereunder.
2
5.
 
Advancement of Expenses
. In the event of any action, suit or proceeding against Indemnitee which may give rise to a right of indemnification from the Corporation pursuant to this Agreement, following written request to the Corporation by the Indemnitee, the Corporation shall advance to Indemnitee amounts to cover expenses incurred by Indemnitee in defending the action, suit or proceeding in advance of final disposition upon receipt of (i) an undertaking by or on behalf of the Indemnitee to repay the amount advanced in the event that it shall be ultimately determined in accordance with Section 3 of this Agreement that he or she is not entitled to indemnification by the Corporation, and (ii) satisfactory evidence as to the amount of such expenses. Indemnitees written certification together with a copy of the statement paid or to be paid by Indemnitee shall constitute satisfactory evidence unless determined to the contrary in an arbitration proceeding conducted pursuant to Section 8 of this Agreement.
6.
Non-Exclusivity of Right of Indemnification
. The indemnification rights granted to Indemnitee under this Agreement shall not be deemed exclusive of, or in limitation of, any rights to which Indemnitee may be entitled under Delaware law, the Corporations charter or By-laws, any other agreement, vote of stockholders or directors or otherwise.
7.
 
Termination of Agreement and Survival of Right of Indemnification
.
3
8.
 
Arbitration of all Disputes Concerning Entitlement
. Any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement including, without limitation, the Indemnitees entitlement to indemnification under this Agreement, shall be settled by arbitration in the City of Chicago administered by the American Arbitration Association in accordance with its Commercial Arbitration Rules, and judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof. Interest on any judgment shall be assessed at a rate or rates the arbitrator considers just under the circumstances. If it is necessary or desirable for the Indemnitee to retain legal counsel or incur other costs and expenses in connection with enforcement of his rights under this Agreement, the Corporation shall pay his reasonable attorneys fees and costs and expenses in connection with enforcement of his rights (including the enforcement of any arbitration award in court), regardless of the final outcome, unless the arbitrator determines that under the circumstances recovery by the Indemnitee of all or a part of any such fees and costs and expenses would be unjust.
9.
Governing Law
. The Corporations obligations to indemnify Indemnitee under these terms and conditions shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware without regard to its choice of law provisions.
10.
Severability
. If any provision of this Agreement is determined to be invalid or unenforceable, this invalidity or unenforceability shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provisions of this Agreement, and this Agreement shall be interpreted as though the invalid or unenforceable provision was not part of this Agreement.
4

Exhibit 10.2
These TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT (the Agreement) made in Lake County, Illinois, as of _______, 2006 (the Effective Date), between Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation with its headquarters at 1 N. Field Court, Lake Forest, Illinois, 60045 (the Company), and [NAME] (the Executive).
[WHEREAS, since ___________, the Executive has been employed by the Company, pursuant to an offer letter dated _______________, an Indemnification Agreement dated _________________, a Change of Control Agreement dated ___________________, and an Executive Severance and Change of Control Agreement dated _________________ (collectively, the Initial Agreement)]; and
WHEREAS, the Company desires to be assured of the Executives experience, skills, knowledge, and background for the benefit of the Company, and the efficient achievement of the long-term strategy of the Company, and is therefore willing to continue the Executives employment upon the terms and conditions, and in consideration of the compensation and benefits, provided herein; and
WHEREAS, as is the case with many publicly held corporations, a change in control might occur and such possibility may result in the departure or distraction of key management personnel to the detriment of the Company and its stockholders; and
WHEREAS, the Company desires to take appropriate steps to reinforce and encourage the continued attention and dedication of members of management, including the Executive, to their assigned duties without distraction arising from the possibility of a change in control of the Company; and
WHEREAS, the Company desires to have the Executive agree to provisions relating to noncompetition and nonsolicitation and certain other provisions contained herein, and the Executive is willing to agree to such provisions in consideration for the additional severance benefits to which he may become entitled under the terms of this Agreement.
THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the agreements of the parties described below, the parties agree that the Initial Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to provide as follows (it being understood that this Agreement supersedes the Initial Agreement in whole and is the controlling agreement between the parties):
 
1.
  
Definitions
. For purposes of this Agreement, capitalized terms used in this Agreement shall have the meanings indicated in Appendix I to this Agreement.
 
2.
  
Employment and Duties
.
(a)
  
Position
. The Company hereby agrees to employ the Executive, and the Executive hereby agrees to serve the Company, under the title of [TITLE]. The Executive shall have such authority, duties, and responsibilities as are commensurate with such position on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, and shall directly report to the _______________________.
(b)
  
Performance of Duties
. Subject to the provisions of Section 6, below, Executive shall diligently perform his duties as [TITLE] or as may otherwise be directed by the Chief Executive Officer, and agrees to use his reasonable best efforts to perform his duties faithfully and efficiently.
(c)
  
Other Duties; Related Companies
. The Executive agrees to serve, as requested, as an officer or director of any Related Company, and shall receive no additional compensation for such service.
3.
  
Agreement Term
. The term of this Agreement (the Term) shall begin on the Effective Date and shall continue until terminated in accordance with Section 14 below. The Company shall employ the Executive for a period of time beginning on the Effective Date and continuing for as long as the Executive retains the confidence of the Chief Executive Officer, it being the express understanding that the Executive is an employee at will, subject only to the protections provided by the specific terms of this Agreement. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, the Chief Executive Officer may remove the Executive as [TITLE] and assign him to other duties within the Company or terminate his employment.
4.
  
Executives Compensation and Benefits
.
As remuneration to the Executive for his services to the Company hereunder, the Company shall compensate the Executive as provided in this Section 4 during the Term. Executive acknowledges and agrees that Section 15 of this Agreement is expressly applicable to any form of compensation or benefit provided to Executive.
(a)
  
Base Salary
. The Executives annual base salary (Base Salary) shall be $_______ commencing on the Effective Date and, except as it may be modified in accordance with this Section 4 by action of the Committee, continuing throughout the Term. The Base Salary shall be payable in conformity with the Companys then-current payroll practices, as modified from time to time. The Base Salary will be reviewed annually during the Term in accordance with Companys usual salary review process for executive officers. Effective as of the date of any adjustment in the Executives Base Salary, the Base Salary as so adjusted shall be considered the new Base Salary for all purposes of this Agreement. Any adjustments in Base Salary shall be determined by the Committee and communicated by memorandum to the Executive from the Chief Executive Officer. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement.
2
(b)
  
Brunswick Performance Plan
. For each calendar year during the Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in the Brunswick Performance Plan (BPP) and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee (Annual Bonus). During the Term, the Executives target Annual Bonus for each full calendar year shall be determined by the Committee in accordance with the terms of the BPP, as in effect from time to time (Target Annual Bonus). During the Term, the performance goals to be achieved, and the extent to which those goals have been achieved for purposes of calculating the amount of the actual payment as a percentage of the Target Annual Bonus, will be determined by the Committee or as delegated to the Chief Executive Officer. The amount of any award under BPP shall be reviewed and approved by the Committee and communicated by memorandum to the Executive from the Chief Executive Officer. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement. Executive acknowledges and agrees that the payment of the Annual Bonus is subject to the Companys stock ownership guidelines for corporate officers, as in effect from time to time, pursuant to which Executive is currently required to own __________ shares of Company stock.
(c)
  
Strategic Incentive Plan
. During the Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in the Brunswick Strategic Incentive Plan (SIP) and any and all successor or replacement plans, as may be determined by the Board or the Committee (SIP Bonus). During the Term, the Executives target SIP Bonus for each full calendar year shall be determined by the Committee in accordance with the terms of the SIP, as in effect from time to time (Target SIP Bonus). During the Term, the performance goals to be achieved, and the extent to which those goals have been achieved for purposes of calculating the amount of the actual payment as a percentage of the SIP Bonus, will be determined by the Committee or as delegated to the Chief Executive Officer. The amount of any award under SIP shall be reviewed and approved by the Committee and communicated by memorandum to the Executive from the Chief Executive Officer. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement. Executive acknowledges and agrees that the payment of the SIP Bonus is subject to the Companys stock ownership guidelines for corporate officers, as in effect from time to time, pursuant to which Executive is currently required to own __________ shares of Company stock.
(d)
  
Equity-Based Awards
. For each calendar year during the Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in and receive equity-based awards under the Companys 2003 Stock Incentive Plan, and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee (collectively, Incentive Plan). Any such future awards when made will be set forth in a memorandum to the Executive from the Chief Executive Officer. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement.
3
(e)
  
Financial Counseling Services
. The Executive shall be entitled to receive financial counseling services from a qualified provider of financial counseling services selected by the Company. The Company shall pay the financial counseling service provider directly. The Executive shall be responsible for any Income Tax due on imputed income for financial counseling services.
(f)
  
Health and Welfare Benefits
. The Executive shall be entitled to participate in all Company-sponsored health and welfare benefits offered to similarly situated senior executives, including health, dental, vision, term life insurance (except for the basic life insurance component thereof) and annual executive physical examination, and any and all successor or replacement benefits as may be determined by the Board or the Committee.
(g)
  
Executive Life Insurance
. The Executive shall be entitled to participate in the Companys life insurance plan for senior executives (formerly the Split Dollar Life Insurance Plan) under the terms and conditions described in a Memorandum dated ________________ and incorporated herein by reference.
(h)
  
Vacation
. The Executive shall earn pro rata four (4) weeks of paid vacation each calendar year, to be earned and taken as generally provided for other similarly situated senior executives of the Company. Earned but unused vacation shall be paid upon termination. The Executive shall also be entitled to such personal days and paid holidays as are generally available to other similarly situated senior executives of the Company.
(i)
  
Deferred Compensation Plans
. The Executive shall be entitled to participate in the Brunswick Rewards Plan, the Companys 2005 Automatic Deferred Compensation Plan, its 2005 Elective Deferred Incentive Compensation Plan, and its Restoration Plan, and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee.
(j)
  
Retirement Plan
. Executive is entitled to any vested benefits he currently holds under the Brunswick Salaried Pension Plan.
(k)
  
Expenses
. The Executive shall be entitled to receive prompt reimbursement for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by the Executive in connection with the performance of his duties hereunder, in accordance with Company policies for similarly situated senior executives.
(l)
  
Aircraft and Boat Usage; Product Programs; Excess Liability
. The Executive shall be entitled to (i) use of the Companys aircraft and watercraft, (ii) excess liability coverage, (iii) obtain Company products under the Executive Product Program, and (iv) make purchases through the Employee Purchase Program, in accordance with the terms and conditions in effect from time to time.
4
5.
  
Restrictive Covenants
.
The Executive acknowledges that during employment with the Company or a Related Company, the Executive has and will acquire, develop and have access to confidential and proprietary information that belongs to the Company or the Related Company. This information takes years and extensive resources to develop, is valuable to the Company or the Related Company and provides the Company or the Related Company with a competitive edge. In consideration of employment or continued employment, Executive knowingly and voluntarily agrees to the following restrictions and further acknowledges and agrees that they are reasonably designed to protect the Company or the Related Company interests and good will, and will not unduly restrict Executives post-employment activities.
(a)
  
Noncompetition; Nonsolicitation; Nondisparagement
. The following provisions shall apply:
(i.)
  
During the Executives employment and during the eighteen (18) month period immediately following termination of Executives employment (regardless of the reason for the termination of employment), without the prior written consent of the Company, (i) the Executive shall not directly or indirectly be employed or retained by, or render any services for, or be financially interested in any manner, in any person, firm or corporation engaged in any business which is then materially competitive in any way with any business in which the Company or any Related Company was engaged (including any program of development or research) during the Executives employment; (ii) the Executive shall not divert or attempt to divert any business from the Company or a Related Company; (iii) the Executive shall not disturb or attempt to disturb any business relationships of the Company or any Related Company; and (iv) the Executive shall not assist any person in any way to do, or attempt to do, anything prohibited by the preceding clauses (i), (ii) and (iii).
(ii.)
  
In furtherance of Section 5(a)(i) above, the Executive shall promptly notify the Company through the Companys General Counsel and Chief Human Resources Officer (or their respective representatives), in advance in writing (which shall include a description of the proposed activity) of his intention to engage in any activity which could reasonably be deemed to be subject to the noncompetition provision set forth in Section 5(a)(i). The Companys General Counsel or Chief Human Resources Officer (or one of their respective representatives) shall respond to the Executive in writing within thirty (30) calendar days indicating its approval or objections to the Executives engagement in the activity; provided, however, that if the Companys General Counsel or Chief Human Resources Officer (or one of their respective representatives) does not respond to or request additional information from the Executive within such thirty (30) day period, the Companys approval shall be deemed to be granted. If the Executive fails to notify the Company of his intended activity in advance, the Company shall retain all its rights of objections. Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed as preventing the Executive from investing his personal assets in any business that competes with the Company, in such form or manner as will not require any services on the part of the Executive in the operation or affairs of the business in which such investments are made, but only if the Executive does not own or control more than two percent of any class of the outstanding stock of such business, and such stock is listed on a national securities exchange or is quoted on the National Market System of NASDAQ.
5
(iii.)
  
For the eighteen (18) month period following termination of Executives employment with the Company, the Executive shall not, without the prior written consent of the Company, (A) solicit, recruit or hire any individual who is employed by the Company or any Related Company (or was so employed within 180 calendar days prior to the Executives solicitation, recruitment or hiring), (B) solicit or encourage any employee of the Company or any Related Company to terminate or refrain from renewing or extending such employment or to become employed by or become a consultant to any other individual or entity other than the Company or a Related Company, or (C) initiate discussion with any such employee for any such purposes or authorize or knowingly cooperate with the taking of any such actions by any other individual or entity; provided, however, that nothing herein shall prohibit the Executive from generally advertising for personnel not specifically targeting any executive or other personnel of the Company.
(iv.)
  
During the Executives employment with the Company and thereafter, Executive will not make any comment or statement or engage in any other behavior that in any way disparages or is otherwise detrimental to the reputation and goodwill of the Company, any Related Company, or any director, officer, executive, or agent of the Company or any Related Company;
provided
,
however
, that nothing herein shall be interpreted as prohibiting Executive from making truthful statements, including statements of opinion, to Company directors, officers, auditors or regulators or when required by a court or other body having jurisdiction to require such statements.
(b)
  
Confidentiality
. The following provisions shall apply:
(i.)
  
Except as may be required by the lawful order of a court or agency of competent jurisdiction, or except to the extent that the Executive has express written authorization from the Company, he will keep secret and confidential all Confidential Information (as defined below), and not disclose the same, either directly or indirectly, to any other person, firm, or business entity, or use it in any way. The Executive agrees that, to the extent that any court or agency seeks to have the Executive disclose Confidential Information, he shall promptly inform the Company, and he shall take such reasonable steps to prevent disclosure of Confidential Information until the Company has been informed of such required disclosure, and the Company has an opportunity to respond to such court or agency. To the extent that the Executive obtains information on behalf of the Company or a Related Company that may be subject to attorney-client privilege as to the Company or an affiliates attorneys, the Executive shall take reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of such information and to preserve such privilege.
(ii.)
  
Upon his termination of employment with the Company for any reason, the Executive shall promptly return to the Company any keys, credit cards, passes, confidential documents and material, or other property belonging to the Company, and shall return all writings, files, records, correspondence, notebooks, notes and other documents and things (including any copies or electronic versions thereof) containing Confidential Information or relating to the business or proposed business of the Company or any Related Company or containing any trade secrets relating to the Company or any Related Company, except any personal diaries, calendars, rolodexes or personal notes or correspondence.
6
(iii.)
  
For purposes of this Agreement, the term Confidential Information means all non-public information concerning the Company and any Related Company that was acquired by or disclosed to the Executive during the course of his employment with the Company or a Related Company, or during discussions between the Executive and the Company or any Related Company following his termination of employment arising out of his employment or this Agreement, including, without limitation: (A) all of the Companys or any Related Companys trade secrets as that term is used in the Illinois Trade Secrets Act (or, if that Act is repealed, the Uniform Trade Secrets Act upon which the Illinois Trade Secrets Act is based); (B) any non-public information regarding the Companys or a Related Company's directors, officers, employees, customers, equipment, processes, costs, operations and methods, whether past, current or planned, as well as knowledge and data relating to business plans, marketing and sales information originated, owned, controlled or possessed by the Company or a Related Company; and (C) information regarding litigation and threatened litigation involving or affecting the Company or a Related Company.
(c)
 
Assistance with Claims
. The Executive agrees that, consistent with the Executives business and personal affairs, during and after his employment by the Company, he will assist the Company and any Related Company in the defense of any claims or potential claims that may be made or threatened to be made against any of them in any action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (a Proceeding), and will assist the Company and any Related Company in the prosecution of any claims that may be made by the Company or any Related Company in any Proceeding, to the extent that such claims may relate to the Executives employment or the period of the Executives employment by the Company. Executive agrees, unless precluded by law, to promptly inform the Company if Executive is asked to participate (or otherwise become involved) in any Proceeding involving such claims or potential claims. Executive also agrees, unless precluded by law, to promptly inform the Company if Executive is asked to assist in any investigation (whether governmental or private) of the Company or any Related Company (or their actions), regardless of whether a lawsuit has then been filed against the Company or any Related Company with respect to such investigation. The Company agrees to reimburse Executive for all of Executives reasonable out-of-pocket expenses associated with such assistance, including travel expenses and any attorneys fees and shall pay a reasonable per diem fee for Executives service.
(d)
 
The payments, benefits, and other entitlements under this Agreement are being made in consideration of, among other things, the obligations of this Section 5 and, in particular, compliance with Sections 5(a) and (b) of this Agreement;
provided
,
however
, that all such payments, benefits, or other entitlements pursuant to Section 6 of the Agreement are subject to and conditioned upon the Executives entering into the Release and Agreement referred to in Section 6(h) of this Agreement.
7
(e)
 
Remedies
. In the event of any material breach by the Executive of the provisions of Sections 5(a) or (b) of this Agreement (i) the Company shall be relieved of all obligations to make any further payments to the Executive pursuant to Sections 4 and 6 of this Agreement or otherwise under any incentive compensation plan of the Company or a Related Company, (ii) all outstanding equity-based awards held by the Executive shall be immediately forfeited and (iii) subject to the following provisos, the Executive will be required to pay the Company, in cash, within five business days after written demand is made therefor by the Company, an amount equal to any gain realized as a result of the exercise or vesting of equity awards during the period commencing twelve months prior to the date that the material breach began and ending on the date of payment;
provided
,
however
, that no forfeiture, cancellation, or repayment shall take place with respect to any payments, benefits, or entitlements under this Agreement or any other award agreement, plan, or practice, unless the Company shall have first given the Executive written notice of its intent to so forfeit, cancel, or require repayment and the Executive has not, within thirty (30) calendar days after such notice has been given, ceased such impermissible Competitive Activity or other activity in violation of this Agreement; and
provided further
,
however
, that such prior notice procedure shall not be required with respect to (A) a Competitive Activity or violation of Section 5(b) of this Agreement which the Executive initiated after the Company had informed the Executive in writing that it believed such activity violated this Agreement or the Companys noncompetition guidelines, or (B) any Competitive Activity regarding products or services which are part of a line of business which the Executive knew or should have known represented more than five percent (5%) of the Companys consolidated gross revenues for its most recently completed fiscal year at the time the Executives employment is terminated.
6.
  
Termination Provisions
.
(a)
  
Severance Benefits
. Prior to a change in control, if the Company terminates the Executives employment for any reason other than Long-Term Disability or Cause, or if the Executive resigns for Good Reason, subject to Section 6(h), the Executive shall be entitled to:
(i.)
  
Severance payments in an aggregate amount equal to the sum of (x) one and one-half (1.5) times Executives then-current Base Salary (disregarding any reduction in salary made in contemplation of such termination of employment), (y) one and one-half (1.5) times the Companys profit-sharing, 401(k) match and other Company contributions made on behalf of the Executive to the Companys tax-qualified and nonqualified defined contribution plans during the 12-month period prior to the date of termination, and (z) such amount, if any, as may be determined by the Chief Executive Officer in his sole discretion based on the Executives Target Annual Bonus under the BPP (Total Severance Payment). In the event that the Total Severance Payment becomes due to the Executive under this Agreement, subject to Section 7, such payment shall be made in equal installments over the 18-month period following the date that the release described in Section 6(h) becomes effective and irrevocable (the Release Effective Date). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, in the event that the Executive will attain age 65 prior to the 18-month anniversary of the date of termination, the Total Severance Amount shall be reduced to a level determined by multiplying the amount of such payment by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full months between the date of termination and the date the Executive will attain age 65 (and the numerator will not be reduced to reflect any six-month delay in payment that may be required pursuant to Section 7), and the denominator of which shall be 18. In addition, the period during which the Executive will receive installment payments with respect to the Total Severance Amount will also be reduced accordingly.
8
(ii.)
  
If such termination occurs prior to the payment of the Executives Annual Bonus payable with respect to the immediately preceding calendar year and/or SIP Bonus payable with respect to the most recently completed performance period (as that term is defined in SIP), payment of such Annual Bonus and/or SIP Bonus for such period(s), in the amount(s), and at such time(s), as he would otherwise have been entitled under the terms of the BPP and the SIP, as applicable, had employment not terminated.
(iii.)
  
All outstanding stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock units, restricted shares and other equity-based awards (the Equity Incentives) held by the Executive shall be governed by the terms and conditions of the equity compensation plans and award agreements pursuant to which they were granted.
(iv.)
  
The Executive shall be entitled to Company-provided continuation of medical, dental, vision and prescription coverage, but not Long-Term Disability coverage (the Benefits) (on either an insured or a self-insured basis, in the sole discretion of the Company) for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents (as determined under the terms of the Companys health and welfare benefit plans in effect as of the date of termination), on substantially the same terms of such coverage that are in existence immediately prior to the Executives date of termination (subject to commercial availability of such coverage), until the earlier of: (A) the date on which the Executive becomes employed by another employer, or (B) the 18-month anniversary of the Executives date of termination;
provided
,
however
, that such coverage shall run concurrently with any coverage available to the Executive and his Eligible Dependents under COBRA; and
provided further
,
however
, that the Executive shall immediately notify the Company if he becomes covered under Medicare or another employers group health plan, at which time the Companys provision of medical coverage for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents at the subsidized rate will cease. During the continuation period, the Executive shall also continue to receive financial counseling and excess liability insurance in accordance with the Companys policy in effect on the date of termination
, as may be modified by the Company from time to time during the continuation period
. The Executive shall not be entitled to any other perquisites, and his right to an executive physical examination, use of Corporate aircraft/watercraft, and participation in the Companys product purchase programs shall terminate on the date of termination. In lieu of continuing financial counseling and excess liability insurance, the Company may, in its discretion, make a cash payment to the Executive of equal value. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 6(a)(iv), in the event the Executive attains age 65 prior to the 18-month anniversary of his date of termination, the benefits provided for in this Section 6(a)(iv) shall cease on the date the Executive attains age 65;
provided
,
however
, that if the commencement of benefits under this Section 6(a)(iv) is delayed by six months as a result of Section 7, the Executive shall continue to receive the benefits under this Section 6(a)(iv) following attainment of age 65 solely during the period necessary to avoid a reduction in benefits as a result of the six-month delay.
9
(b)
  
Change in Control Benefits
. After a Change in Control, if the Company terminates the Executives employment for any reason other than Cause or Long-Term Disability, or if the Executive resigns for Good Reason, subject to Section 6(h), the Executive shall be entitled to:
(i.)
  
Change in Control payments in a lump sum in an aggregate amount equal to three (3) times the sum of (w) the Executives then-current Base Salary (disregarding any reduction in salary made after the Change in Control or in contemplation of the Change in Control), (x) the Executives Target Annual Bonus for the year of termination or, if greater, the Target Annual Bonus for the year in which the Change in Control occurred, (y) the Executives targeted bonus under the SIP for the period that ended most recently prior to the Change in Control, and (z) the Companys profit-sharing, 401(k) match and other Company contributions made on behalf of the Executive to the Companys tax-qualified and nonqualified defined contribution plans during the 12 months prior to the date of termination (Total Change in Control Payment). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, in the event that the Executive will attain age 65 prior to the third anniversary of the date of termination, the Total Change in Control Amount shall be reduced to a level determined by multiplying the amount of such payment by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full months between the date of termination and the date the Executive will attain age 65 (and the numerator will not be reduced to reflect any six-month delay in payment that may be required pursuant to Section 7), and the denominator of which shall be 36.
(ii.)
  
If such termination occurs prior to the payment of the Executives Annual Bonus payable with respect to the immediately preceding calendar year and/or SIP Bonus payable with respect to the most recently completed performance period (as that term is defined in SIP), payment of such Annual Bonus and/or SIP Bonus for such period(s), in the amount(s), and at such time(s), as he would otherwise have been entitled under the terms of the BPP and the SIP, as applicable, had employment not terminated.
10
(iii.)
  
Notwithstanding the terms and conditions of the equity compensation plans and award agreements pursuant to which outstanding awards were granted, upon termination of the Executives employment, all Equity Incentives awards held by the Executive will become fully vested and, if applicable, immediately exercisable, and will remain outstanding pursuant to their terms. All performance-based awards shall be deemed to have been earned at performance maximum levels.
(iv.)
  
The Executive shall be entitled to Company-provided continuation of Benefits (on either an insured or a self-insured basis, in the sole discretion of the Company) for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents, on substantially the same terms of such coverage that are in existence immediately prior to the Executives date of termination (subject to commercial availability of such coverage), until the earlier of: (A) the date on which the Executive becomes employed by another employer, or (B) the third anniversary of the Executives date of termination;
provided
,
however
, that such coverage shall run concurrently with any coverage available to the Executive and his Eligible Dependents under COBRA; and
provided further
,
however
, that the Executive shall immediately notify the Company if he becomes covered under Medicare or another employers group health plan, at which time the Companys provision of medical coverage for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents at the subsidized rate will cease. During the continuation period, the Executive shall also continue to receive financial counseling and excess liability insurance in accordance with the Companys policy in effect on the date of termination
, as may be modified by the Company from time to time during the continuation period
. The Executive shall not be entitled to any other perquisites, and his right to an executive physical examination, use of Corporate aircraft/watercraft, and participation in the Companys product purchase programs shall terminate on the date of termination. In lieu of continuing financial counseling and excess liability insurance, the Company may, in its discretion, make a cash payment to the Executive of equal value. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 6(b)(iv), in the event the Executive attains age 65 prior to the third anniversary of his date of termination, the benefits provided for in this Section 6(b)(iv) shall cease on the date the Executive attains age 65;
provided
,
however
, that if the commencement of benefits under this Section 6(b)(iv) is delayed by six months as a result of Section 7, the Executive shall continue to receive the benefits under this Section 6(b)(iv) following attainment of age 65 solely during the period necessary to avoid a reduction in benefits as a result of the six-month delay.
(c)
  
Additional Severance Benefits
. In addition to any rights to which the Executive may be entitled under Section 6(a) or 6(b), above, in the event that the Executives employment is terminated during the Term (y) by the Company, and such termination is other than for Cause or Long-Term Disability, or (z) by the Executive for Good Reason, subject to Section 6(h), the Executive shall be entitled to the services of a Company-paid and Company-approved outplacement or career transition consultant in accordance with the Companys current practices for senior executives in effect as of the date of termination;
provided
,
however
, that commencement of such transition counseling services, if desired, must begin prior to the first anniversary of the date of termination.
11
(d)
  
Benefits Upon Termination Due to Death or Long-Term Disability
. If, at any time during the Term, the Executives employment terminates as a result of the Executives death or Long-Term Disability, the Executive or his estate (as applicable) shall be entitled to:
(i.)
  
Payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination and any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination;
(ii.)
  
If such termination occurs prior to the payment of the Executives Annual Bonus payable with respect to the immediately preceding calendar year and/or SIP Bonus payable with respect to the most recently completed performance period (as that term is defined in SIP), payment of such Annual Bonus and/or SIP Bonus for such period(s), in the amount(s), and at such time(s), as he would otherwise have been entitled under the terms of the BPP and the SIP, as applicable, had employment not terminated.
(iii.)
  
Continuation of the ability of the Executive or the Executives beneficiaries (as applicable) to exercise all outstanding awards granted to the Executive under the Incentive Plan that became vested and exercisable on or prior to such date of termination in accordance with the terms and conditions of such grants.
(e)
  
Termination for Cause
. In the event the Executives employment is terminated for Cause at any time during the Term, the Executive shall not receive any payments, benefits, or other amounts provided by this Agreement, other than payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination and for payment of any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination (but shall still be subject to the restrictive covenants set forth in Section 5 of this Agreement). The Executive may, however, be eligible for certain benefits under the Companys tax-qualified pension and other employee benefit plans. Provided that the activity, facts, or circumstances that precipitated the for Cause determination were not (i) the result of Executives bad faith, or (ii) undertaken without a reasonable belief by the Executive that he was acting in the best interests of the Company or as required by applicable law, the Executives employment may not be terminated for Cause prior to advance written notice to the Executive containing reasonable detail of the activity, facts, or circumstances constituting Cause for termination, the actions that the Executive must take to cease such activity or cure such facts and circumstances, and a reasonable amount of time (not to exceed thirty (30) calendar days) for the Executive to effectuate such cure. All determinations relating to a for Cause termination shall be made by the Company in its sole discretion.
(f)
  
Termination Due to Voluntary Resignation Without Good Reason
. In the event the Executive voluntarily resigns without Good Reason during the Term, the Executive shall not be entitled to any payments, benefits or other amounts under this Agreement, other than payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination and for payment of any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination (but shall still be subject to the restrictive covenants set forth in Section 5 of this Agreement). The Executive may, however, be eligible for certain benefits under the Companys tax-qualified pension and other employee benefit plans.
12
(g)
  
Notification Requirements for Termination for Good Reason
.
(i.)
  
In the event the Executive determines that Good Reason exists to terminate his employment with the Company, the Executive shall notify the Company in writing of the specific event, within sixty (60) calendar days after the date that the Executive becomes aware of the occurrence of such event, and such notice shall also include the date on which the Executive will terminate employment with the Company, which date shall be no earlier than fifteen (15) calendar days after the date of such notice;
provided
,
however
, that the Chief Executive Officer, in his sole discretion, may relieve the Executive of his duties effective immediately upon the Companys receipt of notice provided pursuant to this Section 6(g).
(ii.)
  
Within thirty (30) calendar days after the Companys receipt of such written notice, the Company shall notify the Executive that it agrees or disagrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Companys determination whether it agrees or disagrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason shall be reasonable, based on all the relevant facts and circumstances. The arbitrator in any arbitration proceeding initiated pursuant to Section 13 of this Agreement, in which the existence of Good Reason is an issue, shall be expressly empowered and directed to review, de novo, the facts and circumstances claimed by the Executive to constitute Good Reason.
(iii.)
  
In the event the Company notifies the Executive that it agrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason, the Company, in its sole discretion, shall either (y) undertake to cure the circumstances that gave rise to Good Reason within thirty (30) calendar days of the Companys response to Executive under Section 6(g)(ii), above, or (z) advise the Executive that his employment with the Company shall terminate on his date of termination as determined under Section 6(g)(i), above. In the event that the Executive and the Company do not agree that the action undertaken by the Company cures the circumstances that gave rise to Good Reason, the Executive shall be entitled to pursue the arbitration procedures set out in Section 13 of this Agreement. If the Executives claim in arbitration is ultimately concluded in the Executives favor, the Executive shall retain the right to receive the payments and benefits under this Agreement.
If
, during the two-year period following a Change in Control,
the Company attempts to cure the circumstances giving rise to Good Reason, the Company shall have the burden of proof to establish that such circumstances have been cured.
(iv.)
  
In the event the Company notifies the Executive that it disagrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason, the Executive may terminate his employment on the date specified in the notice (or such earlier date as determined by the Chief Executive Officer in his sole discretion or such later date as the Executive and the Company may mutually agree in writing) or may elect to continue his employment by so notifying the Company in writing. In either event, the Executive shall be entitled to pursue the arbitration procedures set out in Section 13 of this Agreement. If the Executives claim in arbitration is ultimately concluded in the Executives favor, the Executive shall retain the right to receive the payments and benefits under this Agreement.
If
, during the two-year period following a Change in Control,
the Company disputes the existence of Good Reason, the Company shall have the burden of proof to establish that Good Reason does not exist.
13
(v.)
  
Notwithstanding the date on which the Executives termination occurs following the completion of the steps set forth in this Section 6(g),
so long as an event that constitutes Good Reason occurs during the Term and the Executive delivers the written notice of termination for Good Reason to the Company at any time prior to the expiration of the Term, for purposes of the payments, benefits and other entitlements set forth in this Section 6, the termination of the Executives employment pursuant thereto shall be deemed to be a resignation for Good Reason during the Term.
(h)
  
Conditional Payments
. Any payments or benefits made pursuant to this Section 6 will be subject to and conditioned upon (i) Executives compliance with the provisions, restrictions, and limitations of Section 5 of this Agreement, but not otherwise subject to offset or mitigation, (ii) the Executives signing and not revoking (following his date of termination), and the Companys receipt of, a Release and Agreement releasing the Company, Related Companies, and their respective directors, officers, employees and agents (Released Parties) from any and all claims and liabilities, and promising, to the fullest extent allowed by law, never to sue any of the Released Parties (such Release and Agreement shall be in the form set forth in Appendix III), and (iii) the Companys receipt of the Executives resignation from all offices, directorships, and fiduciary positions with the Company, its Related Companies, and their respective employee benefit plans.
7.
  
Section 409A of the Code
.
It is intended that the provisions of this Agreement comply with Section 409A of the Code, and all provisions of this Agreement shall be construed and interpreted in a manner consistent with Section 409A of the Code. In particular, if necessary to avoid imposition of penalties and additional taxes under Section 409A of the Code (the Section 409A Tax), notwithstanding the timing of payment provided in any other Section of this Agreement, the timing of any amounts payable pursuant to this Agreement shall be subject to a six-month delay in a manner consistent with Section 409A(a)(2)(B)(i) of the Code. I
n the case of a series of payments, the first payment shall include the amounts the Executive would have been entitled to receive during the six-month waiting period.
From and after the Effective Date and for the remainder of the Term, (a) the Company shall administer and operate this Agreement and any nonqualified deferred compensation plan (as defined in Section 409A of the Code) (and any other arrangement that could reasonably be expected to constitute such a plan) in which the Executive participates and the Executives rights and benefits hereunder and thereunder in compliance with Section 409A of the Code and any rules, regulations or other guidance promulgated thereunder as in effect from time to time, (b) in the event that the Company determines that any provision of this Agreement or any such plan or arrangement does not comply with Section 409A of the Code or any such rules, regulations or guidance and that the Executive may become subject to a Section 409A Tax, the Company shall amend or modify such provision to avoid the application of such Section 409A Tax, and (c) in the event that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the Executive is subject to a Section 409A Tax with respect to any such provision, the Company shall indemnify and hold the Executive harmeless against all taxes (and any interest or penalties imposed with respect to such taxes) imposed as a result of the Companys failure to comply with the preceding clause (a) of this Section 7. The provisions of Sections 10(c), (d) and (e) shall apply mutatis mutandis to any claim by the IRS that, if successful, would give rise to indemnification by the Company under this Section 7.
14
8.
  
Legal Fees
. In the event that it shall be necessary or desirable for the Executive to retain legal counsel or incur other costs and expenses in connection with enforcement of the Executives rights under this Agreement, the Company shall pay (or the Executive shall be entitled to recover from the Company, as the case may be) his reasonable attorneys fees and cost and expenses in connection with enforcement of his rights (including the enforcement of any arbitration award in court), (a) if the action relates to the Executive's employment with the Company or a Related Company during a period ending prior to a Change in Control, only if a final decision in connection with a material issue of the litigation (or arbitration) is issued in the Executives favor by an arbitrator or a court of competent jurisdiction, and (b) if the action relates to the Executive's employment with the Company or a Related Company during a period following a Change in Control or during a period that both precedes and follows a Change in Control, regardless of the final outcome, unless, in the case of this clause (b), the arbitrator or court shall determine that under the circumstances recovery by the Executive of all or a part of any such fees and costs and expenses would be unjust.
9.
  
Indemnification
.
The Executive shall be entitled to indemnification by the Company under the Indemnification Terms and Conditions described in Appendix IV to this Agreement.
 
10.
  
Excise Tax
.
(a)
  
Excise Tax Adjustment Payment Calculation
. If any element of compensation or benefit provided to the Executive under the terms of this Agreement or under any other plan, program, policy, or other arrangement, either alone or in combination with other elements of compensation and benefits paid or provided to such Executive, constitutes an excess parachute payment, as that term is defined in Section 280G of the Code and the regulations thereunder (Potential Parachute Benefit), and subjects such Executive to the excise tax pursuant to Section 4999 of the Code, and any interest and penalties thereon (collectively, the Excise Tax), then the Executive shall be entitled, subject to Section 10(f), to an additional lump-sum cash payment from the Company (the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment), subject to mandatory withholding, in an amount equal to the Excise Taxes (including the Excise Tax attributable to the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to the Potential Parachute Benefit) plus any Income Taxes and any interest and penalties thereon attributable to the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment. For purposes of calculating an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to the Executive in any year, it shall be assumed that the Executive is subject to Income Taxes at the highest marginal Federal and applicable state and local income tax rates, respectively, for the year in which the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment is paid. Also, the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to the Executive shall reflect the Federal tax benefits attributable to the deduction of applicable state and local income taxes
, taking into account limitations applicable to individuals subject to Federal income tax at the highest marginal rate
.
15
(b)
  
Independent Firm
. All determinations required to be made under this Section 10, including whether and when an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment is required and the amount of such Excise Tax Adjustment Payment and the assumptions utilized in arriving at such determinations, shall be made by an independent accounting or consulting firm chosen by the Company (the Firm). The Firm shall provide detailed supporting calculations to the Company and to the Executive within thirty (30) business days after the receipt of notice from the Company or the Executive that there has been a Potential Parachute Benefit provided to which these Excise Tax provisions apply (or such earlier time as requested by the Company). Any Excise Tax Adjustment Payment shall be paid by the Company to the Executive within fifteen (15) business days after the Companys receipt of the Firms determination.
(i.)
  
If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an IRS proceeding, or in the opinion of independent counsel agreed upon by the Company and the Executive, that the Excise Tax payable by the Executive on the Potential Parachute Benefit is less than the amount initially taken into account under Section 10(a) for purposes of calculating the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to such Potential Parachute Benefit, the Firm shall recalculate the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to reflect the actual Excise Tax. Within thirty (30) business days following the Executives receipt of notice of the results of such recalculation from the Firm and/or the Company, the Executive shall repay to the Company the excess of the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment.
(ii.)
  
If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an IRS proceeding, or in the opinion of an independent counsel agreed upon by the Company and the Executive, that the Excise Tax payable by the Executive on the Benefit is more than the amount initially taken into account under Section 10(a) for purposes of calculating the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to such Potential Parachute Benefit, the Firm shall recalculate the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to reflect the actual Excise Tax. Within thirty (30) business days following the Companys receipt of notice of the results of such recalculation from the Firm, the Company shall pay to the Executive the excess of the recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment.
16
(iii.)
  
All fees and expenses of the Firm and any independent counsel shall be borne solely by the Company.
(c)
  
Notice
. The Executive shall notify the Company in writing of any written claim by the IRS that, if successful, would require the payment by the Company of an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment or the recalculation of an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment. The notification shall apprise the Company of the nature of such claim, including (i) a copy of the written claim from the IRS, (ii) the identification of the element of compensation and/or benefit that is the subject of such IRS claim, and (iii) the date on which such claim is requested to be paid. Such notification shall be given as soon as practicable, but no later than ten (10) business days after the Executive actually receives notice in writing of such claim. The failure of the Executive to properly notify the Company of the IRS claim (or to provide any required information with respect thereto) shall not affect any rights granted to the Executive under this Section 10, except to the extent that the Company is materially prejudiced in the challenge to such claim as a direct result of such failure.
(d)
  
Payment
. Within ten (10) business days following receipt of such written notification by the Executive of such IRS claim, the Company shall pay to the Executive an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment, or the excess of a recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment, as applicable, related to the element of compensation and/or benefit which is the subject of the IRS claim. Within ten (10) business days following such payment to the Executive, the Executive shall provide to the Company written evidence that he or she has paid the claim to the IRS (the United States Treasury).
(e)
  
Contest
. If the Company notifies the Executive in writing, within sixty (60) business days following receipt from the Executive of notification of the IRS claim, that it desires to contest such claim, the Executive shall:
(i.)
  
Give the Company any information reasonably requested by the Company relating to such claim;
(ii.)
  
Take such action in connection with contesting such claim as the Company shall reasonably request in writing from time to time including, without limitation, accepting legal representation with respect to such claim by an attorney selected by the Company and reasonably acceptable to the Executive;
(iii.)
  
Cooperate with the Company in good faith in order to effectively contest such claim; and
(iv.)
  
Permit the Company to participate in any proceedings relating to such claim if the Company elects not to assume and control the defense of such claim;
17
provided
,
however
, that the Company shall bear and pay directly all costs and expenses (including additional interest and penalties) incurred in connection with such contest and shall indemnify and hold harmless the Executive, on an after-tax basis, for any Excise Tax and Income Taxes (including interest and penalties with respect thereto) imposed as a result of such representation and payment of costs and expenses. Without limitation on the foregoing provisions of this Section 10, the Company shall have the right, at its sole option, to assume the control of all proceedings in connection with such contest, in which case it may pursue or forego any and all administrative appeals, proceedings, hearings, and conferences with the taxing authority in respect of such claim, and may direct the Executive to sue for a refund or contest the claim in any permissible manner, and the Executive agrees to prosecute such contest to a determination before any administrative tribunal, in a court of initial jurisdiction and in one or more appellate courts, as the Company shall determine; and
provided further
,
however
, that (A) if the Company directs the Executive to pay such claim and sue for a refund, the Company shall advance the amount of such payment to the Executive, on an interest-free basis, and shall indemnify and hold the Executive harmless, on an after-tax basis, from any Excise Tax or income tax (including interest or penalties) imposed with respect to such advance or with respect to any imputed income in connection with such advance and (B) any extension of the statute of limitations relating to payment of tax for the taxable year of the Executive with respect to which such contested amount is claimed to be due is limited solely to such contested amount. Furthermore, the Companys rights to assume the control of the contest shall be limited to issues with respect to which an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment would be payable hereunder, and the Executive shall be entitled to settle or contest, as the case may be, any other issue raised by the IRS or any other taxing authority. To the extent that the contest of the IRS claim is successful, the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to the element of compensation and/or benefit that was the subject of the claim shall be recalculated in accordance with the provisions of Section 10(a).
(f)
 
Limitation on Potential Parachute Benefit
. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 10, if it shall be determined (by the reasonable computation of the Firm, which determination shall be certified by the Firm and set forth in a certificate delivered to Executive) that the aggregate amount of the Potential Parachute Benefits that, but for this Section 10(f), would be payable to Executive, does not exceed 110% of the greatest amount of Potential Parachute Benefits that could be paid to Executive without giving rise to any liability for Excise Taxes in connection therewith (such greatest amount, the Floor Amount), then:
(i) no Excise Tax Adjustment Benefit shall be made to Executive; and
(ii) the aggregate amount of Potential Parachute Benefits payable to Executive shall be reduced (but not below the Floor Amount) to the largest amount which would both (A) not cause any Excise Taxes to be payable by Executive, and (B) not cause any Potential Parachute Benefit to become nondeductible by the Company by reason of Section 280G of the Code (or any successor provision);
provided
,
however
, that in no event shall any such reduction (x) in any way affect any Potential Parachute Benefits that are provided to Executive in any form other than cash, or (y) reduce the aggregate amount of Potential Parachute Benefits that are payable in cash to an amount below the aggregate amount of Income Taxes payable by Executive in respect of all Potential Parachute Benefits received by him (whether in cash or otherwise).
18
11.
  
Wage Withholding and Reporting
. All taxable payments, reimbursements, benefits, and other amounts payable or provided by the Company pursuant to this Agreement shall be subject to applicable wage withholding of Income Taxes and shall be reported on IRS Form W-2.
12.
  
Remedies
.
The Executive acknowledges that the Company would be irreparably injured by any violation of Section 5 and agrees that (A) the Company, in addition to any other remedies available to it for such breach or threatened breach, shall be entitled to a preliminary injunction, temporary restraining order, or other equivalent relief, restraining the Executive from any actual or threatened breach of Section 5, and (B) if a bond is required to be posted in order for the Company to secure an injunction or other equitable remedy, the parties agree that said bond need not be more than a nominal sum.
If a final and non-appealable judicial determination is made that any of the provisions of Section 5 constitutes an unreasonable or otherwise unenforceable restriction against the Executive, the provisions of such Section will not be rendered void but will be deemed to be modified to the minimum extent necessary to remain in force and effect for the greatest period and to the greatest extent that such court determines constitutes a reasonable restriction under the circumstances. Moreover, notwithstanding the fact that any provision of Section 5 is determined not to be specifically enforceable, the Company will nevertheless be entitled to recover monetary damages as a result of the Executives breach of such provision.
 
13.
  
Dispute Resolution
.
Except as otherwise provided by Section 12 (Remedies) above, any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement (or the breach thereof) shall be settled by arbitration in the City of Chicago in accordance with the laws of the State of Illinois by one arbitrator. The arbitrator shall be appointed pursuant to Rule 11 of the American Arbitration Associations Commercial Arbitration Rules, amended and effective September 15, 2005. The arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association, Commercial Arbitration Rules. Judgment upon the award rendered by the arbitrators may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof.
14.
  
Termination Provisions
.
This Agreement shall automatically terminate upon the Executives attainment of age 65, and may be terminated at any time by the Company upon six months advance written notice to the Executive;
provided
,
however
, that if a Change in Control occurs prior to the termination of this Agreement, this Agreement shall not terminate prior to the second anniversary of the date on which the Change in Control occurs.
19
15.
  
Other Benefit Plans
. The Company reserves the right to discontinue or modify its compensation, incentive, benefit, and perquisite plans, programs, and practices at any time and from time to time. Moreover, the brief summaries contained herein are subject to the terms of such plans, programs, and practices. For purposes of any and all employee benefit plans, the definition of compensation is as stated in such plans.
The severance benefits payable under Section 6 of this Agreement are in lieu of all other severance benefits which the Executive would otherwise be entitled to receive from the Company and any Related Company, except as may otherwise be provided in a written agreement specifically referencing this Section 15. The Executive acknowledges and agrees that the severance benefits to which the Executive may become entitled under this Agreement are in excess of those which the Executive would be entitled to under the Companys otherwise applicable severance pay plans, and that the Company is agreeing to provide such severance benefits in consideration for the Executives agreement to the terms and conditions of Section 5 of this Agreement.
16.
  
Entire Agreement; Amendments
. This Agreement represents the entire agreement between the Executive and the Company in respect of the subject matter contained herein and supersedes all prior agreements, promises, covenants, arrangements, communications, representations, or warranties, whether oral or written, by any officer, executive, or representative of any party hereto, including, but not limited to, the Initial Agreement. Except as specifically provided in Section 7, no amendments or modifications to this Agreement may be made except in writing signed by the Company (as authorized by the Board) and the Executive.
17.
  
Survivorship
. The respective rights and obligations of the parties hereunder shall survive the expiration of the Term and any termination of the Executives employment to the extent necessary to the intended preservation of such rights and obligations.
18.
  
Notices
. Any notice and all other communications provided for in this Agreement to be given to a party shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given when delivered in person or two (2) business days after being placed in the United States mails by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, duly addressed to the party concerned at the address indicated below or to such changed address as such party may subsequently furnish to the other in writing in accordance herewith, except that notices of change of address shall be effective only upon receipt:
If to the Company:
Brunswick Corporation
1 N. Field Court
Lake Forest, IL 60045
Attn: Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
If to the Executive:
at the last address filed with the Company
20
19.
  
Severability
. The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement. If any provision of this Agreement shall be held invalid or unenforceable in part, the remaining portion of such provision, together with all other provisions of this Agreement, shall remain valid and enforceable and continue in full force and effect to the fullest extent consistent with law. In furtherance and not in limitation of the foregoing, should the duration or geographical extent of, or business activities covered by, any provision of this Agreement be in excess of that which is valid and enforceable under applicable law, then such provision shall be construed to cover only that duration, extent, or activities which may be validly enforced.
20.
  
Headings
. Headings to Sections hereof are for convenience of reference only and shall not be construed to alter or affect the meaning of any provision of this Agreement.
21.
  
Injunctive Relief
. If there is a breach or threatened breach of the provisions of this Agreement, the non-breaching party shall be entitled to an injunction restraining the breaching party from such breach. Nothing herein shall be construed as prohibiting either party from pursuing any other remedies for a breach or threatened breach of this Agreement.
22.
  
No Assignment or Attachment
. Except as required by law, no right to receive payments under this Agreement shall be subject to anticipation, commutation, alienation, sale, assignment, encumbrance, charge, pledge, or hypothecation, or to execution, attachment, levy, or similar process or assignment by operation of law, and any attempt, voluntary or involuntary, to effect any such action shall be null, void, and of no effect;
provided
,
however
, that nothing in this Section 22 shall preclude the assumption of such rights by executors, administrators, or other legal representatives of the Executive or his estate and their assigning any rights hereunder to the person or persons entitled thereto; and
provided further
,
however
, that the Company may not assign this Agreement except in connection with an assignment or disposition of all or substantially all of the assets or stock of the Company or the division, subsidiary, or business unit for which the Executive is providing services under this Agreement or by law as a result of a merger or consolidation.
23.
  
Successors, Assumption of Contract
. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and any
successor
of the Company. The Company will require any successor (whether direct or indirect, by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business and/or assets of the Company to expressly assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent that the Company would be required to perform it if no succession had taken place.
As used in this Agreement, except for purposes of Section 5(a), the term Company shall mean the Company as hereinbefore defined and any successor of the Company and any permitted assignee to which this Agreement is assigned.
21
24.
  
Work For Hire Acknowledgment; Assignment
. The Executive acknowledges that all of the Executives work on and contributions to the Companys products (the Products) including, without limitation, any and all patterns, designs, and other expressions in any tangible medium (collectively, the Works) are within the scope of the Executives employment and are a part of the services, duties, and responsibilities of the Executive. All of the Executives work on and contributions to the Works will be rendered and made by the Executive for, at the instigation of, and under the overall direction of, the Company, and all of the Executives said work and contributions, as well as the Works, are and at all times shall be regarded as work made for hire as that term is used in the United States copyright laws. Without curtailing or limiting this acknowledgment, the Executive hereby assigns, grants, and delivers exclusively to the Company, as to work on and contribution to the Products pursuant hereto, all rights, titles, and renewals. The Executive will execute and deliver to the Company, or its successors and assigns, such other and further assignments, instruments, and documents as it from time to time reasonably may request for the purpose of establishing, evidencing, and enforcing or defending its complete, exclusive, perpetual, and worldwide ownership of all rights, titles, and interests of every kind and nature whatsoever, including all copyrights, in and to the Works. The Executive hereby constitutes and appoints the Company as his agent and attorney-in-fact, with full power of substitution, to execute and deliver said assignments, instruments, or documents as the Executive may fail or refuse to execute and deliver, this power and agency being coupled with an interest and being irrevocable.
25.
  
Governing Law
. The validity, interpretation, construction, and performance of this Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois, without regard to its choice of laws provisions, for contracts made and to be performed wholly in such state;
provided
,
however
, the rights of the Executive to indemnification under Section 9 shall be governed by the laws of the State of Delaware.
26.
  
Termination of Initial Agreement
. From and after the Effective Date, this Agreement shall supersede any other employment agreement, severance agreement, indemnification agreement and change of control agreement between the parties, including the Initial Agreement.
27.
  
Counterparts
. This
Agreement
may be executed in two or more counterparts, any one of which shall be deemed the original without reference to the others.
IN WITNESS THEREOF, the Executive has hereunto set his hand and the Company has caused these presents to be executed in its name and on its behalf, and its corporate seal to be hereunto affixed, all as of the Effective Date.
 
 
 
22
Appendix I
Definitions
.
 
1
 
 
2
 
 
3
 
4
Whether a Reduction in Authority or Responsibility of the Executive has occurred shall be determined in accordance with the criteria set forth below in the definition of Reduction in Authority or Responsibility;
provided
,
however
, that (A) a change in the Executives reporting relationship to another executive who is within the same reporting level (as that term is used in the Companys Delegation of Authority Policy or any successor policy); or (B) a reduction in the Executives business units budget or a reduction in the Executives business units head count or number of direct reports, by themselves, shall not constitute Good Reason.
5
It is intended by this definition that a Change in Control by itself, absent a Reduction in Authority or Responsibility as described above, will not constitute Good Reason.
 
6
 
 
7
 
Appendix II
Changes to Base Salary,
BPP Awards, SIP Awards,
And Equity Incentives Awards
1
Appendix III
 
 
 
 
 
1
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
Intending to be legally bound hereby, I execute the foregoing General Release this ______ day of _________________, 20___.
 
 
3
 
Appendix IV
Brunswick Corporation (the Corporation) shall indemnify Executive (hereinafter, Indemnitee) against expenses and costs incurred by Indemnitee in connection with any claims, suits or proceedings arising from his or her service to the Corporation, to the fullest extent that is lawful in accordance with the following terms and conditions:
1.
Acts and Omissions Covered By This Agreement
. The Corporations agreement to indemnify Indemnitee (Agreement) shall cover any act or omission by an Indemnitee which (i) occurs or is alleged to have occurred by reason of his or her being or having been an
[officer/director]
, (ii) occurs or is alleged to have occurred before, during or after the time when the Indemnitee served as an
[officer/director]
and (iii) gives rise to, or is the direct or indirect subject of a claim in any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding at any time or times whether during or after his or her service as an
[officer/director]
.
2.
Indemnity
.
 
1
 
3.
Burden of Proof
. Indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification for any act or omission covered in Section 1 of this Agreement. The burden of proof of establishing that Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification because of the failure to fulfill some requirement of Delaware law, the Corporations charter, by-laws, or this Agreement shall be on the Corporation.
4.
  
Notice by Indemnitee
. Indemnitee shall notify the Corporation in writing of any matter with respect to which Indemnitee intends to seek indemnification hereunder as soon as reasonably practicable following the receipt by Indemnitee of written threat thereof;
provided, however,
that failure to so notify the Corporation shall not constitute a waiver by Indemnitee of his or her rights hereunder.
2
5.
 
Advancement of Expenses
. In the event of any action, suit or proceeding against Indemnitee which may give rise to a right of indemnification from the Corporation pursuant to this Agreement, following written request to the Corporation by the Indemnitee, the Corporation shall advance to Indemnitee amounts to cover expenses incurred by Indemnitee in defending the action, suit or proceeding in advance of final disposition upon receipt of (i) an undertaking by or on behalf of the Indemnitee to repay the amount advanced in the event that it shall be ultimately determined in accordance with Section 3 of this Agreement that he or she is not entitled to indemnification by the Corporation, and (ii) satisfactory evidence as to the amount of such expenses. Indemnitees written certification together with a copy of the statement paid or to be paid by Indemnitee shall constitute satisfactory evidence unless determined to the contrary in an arbitration proceeding conducted pursuant to Section 8 of this Agreement.
6.
Non-Exclusivity of Right of Indemnification
. The indemnification rights granted to Indemnitee under this Agreement shall not be deemed exclusive of, or in limitation of, any rights to which Indemnitee may be entitled under Delaware law, the Corporations charter or By-laws, any other agreement, vote of stockholders or directors or otherwise.
7.
 
Termination of Agreement and Survival of Right of Indemnification
.
 
3
8.
 
Arbitration of all Disputes Concerning Entitlement
. Any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement including, without limitation, the Indemnitees entitlement to indemnification under this Agreement, shall be settled by arbitration in the City of Chicago administered by the American Arbitration Association in accordance with its Commercial Arbitration Rules, and judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof. Interest on any judgment shall be assessed at a rate or rates the arbitrator considers just under the circumstances. If it is necessary or desirable for the Indemnitee to retain legal counsel or incur other costs and expenses in connection with enforcement of his or her rights under this Agreement, the Corporation shall pay his or her reasonable attorneys fees and costs and expenses in connection with enforcement of his or her rights (including the enforcement of any arbitration award in court), regardless of the final outcome, unless the arbitrator determines that under the circumstances recovery by the Indemnitee of all or a part of any such fees and costs and expenses would be unjust.
9.
Governing Law
. The Corporations obligations to indemnify Indemnitee under these terms and conditions shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware without regard to its choice of law provisions.
10.
Severability
. If any provision of this Agreement is determined to be invalid or unenforceable, this invalidity or unenforceability shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provisions of this Agreement, and this Agreement shall be interpreted as though the invalid or unenforceable provision was not part of this Agreement.
 
4


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20061027090756.txt.gz
TIME:20061027090756
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 27, 2006, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the third quarter of 2006. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswicks management believes that presentation of: (i)
 
diluted earnings per share excluding non-recurring tax benefits in both 2006 and 2005 and an investment sale gain in the first quarter of 2005
; (ii) net sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior years results; and (iii)
Brunswick's effective tax rate excluding the effect of non-recurring tax benefits and the investment sale, provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
 
On October 25, 2006, the Board of Directors of Brunswick appointed Cambria W. Dunaway to the Board of Directors and the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee of the Board of Directors. Ms. Dunaway will stand for re-election at Brunswicks 2008 annual meeting of stockholders. Brunswick is not aware of any transaction requiring disclosure under Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K.
 
The news release announcing the appointment is furnished as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
2
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
3
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
4
EXHIBIT INDEX
 
 
5

Exhibit 99.1
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Court Lake Forest, IL 60045
Telephone 847.735.4700 Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Oct. 27, 2006
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today earnings from continuing operations of $0.54 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2006 compared with $0.83 per diluted share for the same period in 2005. Earnings from continuing operations include tax-related benefits of $0.06 per diluted share and $0.14 per diluted share in the third quarters of 2006 and 2005, respectively.
We were pleased with our results for the quarter, especially in light of a challenging marine market, Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy said. The most important consideration when operating in a cyclical industry is to manage pipeline inventories. As previously announced, we cut production in certain product lines in the third quarter to make pipeline corrections. Reducing production volumes was the right thing to do; however, lower fixed-cost absorption on lower production had an adverse effect on operating margins and earnings. Sales for the quarter were down 1 percent to $1.3 billion with gains from our Fitness and Bowling & Billiards segments and growth in international markets more than offset by a decline in domestic marine sales. Excluding incremental sales from acquired businesses, our organic sales declined 3 percent. A combination of a mix shift to lower-margin products; reduced fixed-cost absorption on lower production; and higher operating expenses due to acquisitions, inflation, and increased research and development spending on strategic initiatives led to the decline in operating margins to 5.6 percent for the third quarter compared with 7.6 percent a year ago.
 
 
Third Quarter Results
For the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2006, net sales from continuing operations decreased 1 percent to $1,337.8 million, down from $1,351.1 million a year earlier. Operating earnings decreased 27 percent to $74.3 million compared with $102.1 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins were 5.6 percent, down from 7.6 percent. Net earnings from continuing operations for the third quarter of 2006 totaled $50.4 million, or $0.54 per diluted share, down from $82.4 million, or $0.83 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2005. Both quarters include tax-related benefits discussed below.
During the second quarter of 2006, the company announced its decision to pursue the sale of substantially all of its Brunswick New Technologies business unit, which is being accounted for as a discontinued operation. For the third quarter of 2006, the company reported a net loss from discontinued operations of $13.9 million, or $0.15 per diluted share, compared with net earnings of $6.0 million, or $0.06 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2005.
The company said that during the third quarter of 2006, it acquired 1.5 million shares of its common stock for approximately $46 million under a $500 million repurchase authorization. Since the beginning of the year, approximately 4.6 million shares have been acquired for about $163 million. Diluted shares outstanding averaged 93.7 million in the third quarter of 2006, down from 99.3 million for the third quarter of 2005.
Tax Benefits
In the third quarter of 2006, the company recorded a tax benefit of approximately $0.06 per diluted share, primarily due to a claim for interest on open audits. In the third quarter of 2005, the company determined that earnings from certain of its foreign subsidiaries would be indefinitely reinvested outside of the United States, resulting in a change in the application of APB 23, Accounting for Income Taxes - Special Areas, effective July 1, 2005. Further, the company said it had refined its tax planning strategies for research and foreign export tax benefits. These actions benefited earnings from continuing operations by $0.14 per diluted share and earnings from discontinued operations by $0.02 per diluted share in the third quarter of 2005.
 
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, which produces fiberglass and aluminum boats and marine parts and accessories, as well as offers dealer management systems. The Boat segment reported net sales for the third quarter of 2006 of $679.2 million, down 1 percent compared with $685.5 million in the third quarter of 2005. Excluding incremental sales from acquired businesses, organic boat sales declined 5 percent. Operating earnings decreased to $24.8 million from $37.9 million reported in the third quarter of 2005, and operating margins were 3.7 percent, down from 5.5 percent.
During the quarter, we saw sales gains in boat parts and accessories as well as some of our larger models, McCoy said. Significant declines were seen in sales of our smaller freshwater boat lines that are sold primarily in the upper Midwest where regional economic issues have affected discretionary spending among purchasers of these boats. The margin decline was driven by an unfavorable mix shift away from our higher-margin cruiser business as we work to rebalance these pipelines, as well as lower fixed-cost absorption due to reduced production levels.
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, reported net sales of $536.5 million in the third quarter of 2006, down from $555.0 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings in the third quarter decreased to $50.4 million versus $61.2 million, while operating margins declined to 9.4 percent from 11.0 percent for the same quarter in 2005.
Stronger sales in Mercurys international operations during the quarter helped to offset lower year-over-year domestic sales, particularly in the outboard category, which was down double digits for the quarter, McCoy explained. Segment results reflect both the tough operating climate and the effect of reducing production rates in some product areas during the quarter. We will continue to adjust production rates as needed to manage pipeline inventories through the model year. Operating margins were adversely affected by lower sales along with lower fixed-cost absorption on reduced production.
 
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment. Fitness equipment sales increased 7 percent in the third quarter of 2006 to $136.6 million, up from $127.4 million in the year-ago quarter. Fitness segment operating earnings for the quarter totaled $12.6 million, down from $14.2 million in the third quarter of 2005, and operating margins were 9.2 percent compared with 11.1 percent a year ago.
The sales gain was driven primarily by a double-digit increase in international sales, McCoy said. Margins in Europe are lower than in the United States, which, along with a mix shift to lower-margin strength equipment and higher research and development spending for new products, led to the decline in operating margins.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the third quarter of 2006 totaled $113.4 million, up 1 percent compared with $111.9 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings decreased in the third quarter to $3.1 million versus $5.7 million, and operating margins were 2.7 percent compared with 5.1 percent in 2005.
Sales gains posted by bowling retail centers offset a single-digit decline in billiards products, which is also affected by lower discretionary spending by its customers, McCoy said. Costs for moving certain manufacturing operations to Mexico contributed to the segments lower operating earnings for the quarter. Our transition of bowling ball manufacturing to Reynosa, Mexico, is almost complete, and, as previously announced, we are beginning the move of Valley-Dynamo coin-operated billiards table manufacturing to an adjacent location in Reynosa.
 
Nine-Month Results
For the nine months ended Sept. 30, 2006, the company had net sales from continuing operations of $4,294.2 million, up 2 percent from $4,225.2 million for the first three quarters of 2005. Excluding contributions from acquired businesses, sales were down 3 percent. Operating earnings totaled $310.7 million for the first nine months of 2006, down from $369.1 million for the corresponding period in 2005, and operating margins were 7.2 percent versus 8.7 percent a year ago.
Net earnings from continuing operations for the first nine months of 2006 totaled $219.0 million, or $2.30 per diluted share, compared with $287.4 million, or $2.90 per diluted share, for the same period in 2005. Results for the first nine months of 2006 include $0.25 per diluted share of tax-related benefits recorded in the current and earlier quarters of the year. Results for the first three quarters of 2005 include the $0.14 per diluted share tax benefit recorded in the third quarter and an after-tax gain of $31.5 million, equivalent to $0.32 per diluted share, recorded in the first quarter on the sale of MarineMax, Inc., stock.
For the first nine months of 2006, the company reported a net loss from discontinued operations of $31.9 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, compared with net earnings of $9.7 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, for the comparable period a year ago.
 
Looking Ahead
The decline in retail demand for marine products we experienced in the first half of 2006 continued into the third quarter with retail demand down in the high-single digits, which has resulted in an increase in pipeline inventories. At quarter end there were 27 weeks of supply of boats and 20 weeks of supply of engines, up from 22 weeks for boats and 19 weeks for engines a year ago, McCoy said. As we have said, managing pipelines is essential in a cyclical, as well as a seasonal, business. We are now in the off-season, and we cant rely solely on retail demand to rebalance the pipeline. So, we are planning further production cuts to manage pipelines for the 2007 model year, which runs through June 30 next year. We are estimating that our 2006 earnings from continuing operations will be in the range of $2.40 to $2.46 per share, excluding non-recurring tax benefits. That compares with the $3.13 per share we reported in 2005 from continuing operations, excluding non-recurring tax benefits and the gain on the MarineMax stock sale. The year-over-year decline in earnings is primarily due to reduced sales, a mix shift to lower-margin products, and the effect of fixed-cost absorption from production cuts needed to adjust pipeline inventories. Our 2006 estimate also assumes that Congress extends the research and development tax credit retroactive to the first of the year, which would reduce our effective tax rate for the full year to about 31 percent, excluding tax-related benefits. Should Congress fail to take action, our earnings estimate range would be adversely affected by about $0.06 per share.
As we go forward, we will continue to execute relentlessly against our five key strategies: get the product right, get the distribution right, be best cost in our industries, be global, and attract and retain talent, McCoy added. We cant control market conditions, but we will take actions necessary to operate our businesses in the most efficient manner possible. In doing so, we will achieve our long-term value creation objectives and better position the company to benefit our shareholders when industry conditions improve.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; competition in the consumer electronics markets; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the ability to successfully complete announced divestitures; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2005 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2006.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.2
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Court Lake Forest, IL 60045
Telephone 847.735.4700 Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
 
 
  
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill. Oct. 25, 2006 -
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that Cammie W. Dunaway, chief marketing officer of Yahoo!, has been elected to Brunswicks board of directors, effective immediately. Dunaways election brings the number of board members to 12, ten of whom are independent directors.
A seasoned executive with more than 20 years experience, Dunaway, 44, joined Yahoo! in 2003. She is responsible for leading Yahoo!s worldwide branding efforts as well as driving the companys product marketing initiatives. Dunaways work at Yahoo!, including the companys ten year anniversary campaign in 2005, has won numerous awards
.
Yahoo! was just named marketer of the year by the Direct Marketing Association and
Advertising Age
recently named Dunaway as one of its 100 Top Marketers, citing her work in bringing widespread industry recognition to Yahoo!. Prior to joining Yahoo!, Dunaway spent 13 years with Frito-Lay, a part of PepsiCo, supervising prominent brands such as Doritos, Cheetos and Ruffles. She holds a B.S. in business administration from the University of Richmond in Virginia and an MBA from Harvard Business School, Cambridge, Mass.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors;
Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20061109125223.txt.gz
TIME:20061109125223
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
          
On November 9, 2006, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) committed to a restructuring plan to reduce costs and improve general operating efficiencies through global work force reductions, the consolidation of certain boat manufacturing facilities, sales offices and distribution warehouses, and realignment of distribution for our bowling products business. Brunswick expects to incur pre-tax charges for severance and facility consolidation and closure costs in the range of approximately $25 to $28 million, of which approximately 80 percent will be incurred in the fourth quarter of 2006.
In connection with these actions, Brunswick expects to incur cash severance charges of approximately $11 million to $12 million, cash facility closure charges of approximately $2 million to $3 million and approximately $7 million of non-cash asset impairment charges during the fourth quarter of 2006. The residual $5 million to $6 million of restructuring charges to be incurred in 2007 relate to cash expenditures for severance and the remaining facility closure actions.
The news release announcing these actions is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
Statements made in this Current Report on Form 8-K that are forward-looking involve risks and uncertainties and are indicated by words such as "estimates," "expects" and other similar words or phrases. These uncertainties include, but are not limited to, the execution of the restructuring plan, economic conditions, product demand, competitive products and pricing, availability of products, the regulatory environment and other risks described in filings with the SEC such as Brunswick's most recent Forms 10-K and 10-Q. 
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
2
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
3
EXHIBIT INDEX
 
4

Exhibit 99.1
 
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Court Lake Forest, IL 60045
Telephone 847.735.4700 Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill. Nov. 9, 2006 -
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that it is taking a series of actions to cut costs, better utilize overall capacity and improve general operating efficiencies.
Given current market conditions, we have planned for flat to declining production volumes in 2007. With that assumption, we must take appropriate actions to cut costs and capitalize on the productivity improvements we are realizing. This will create headroom in our cost structure so that we can continue to invest in strategic initiatives critical to achieving our long-term objectives and to help mitigate the effect of inflation on our costs, explained Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. We have undertaken a review of our manufacturing footprint as well as carefully scrutinized all processes and activities throughout our organization with an eye toward not only how we perform our tasks, but the benefit of the tasks performed. We are taking advantage of the more productive work processes we have introduced and employed in the past few years, along with ongoing integration efforts, to improve operations across the entire organization.
Our cost-reduction efforts include consolidating certain boat manufacturing facilities, sales offices and distribution warehouses, and making reductions in our global work force. In recent years, a large part of our strategic focus in marine has been to acquire a wide selection of products and services that will enable our dealers to provide unmatched customer service to virtually every type of boater, McCoy added. This included buying boat brands and establishing the industrys leading and most efficient boat parts and accessories (P&A) business. Now with the domestic acquisition phase largely complete and our integration efforts well under way, we are increasingly turning our attention toward how to best manage and employ the assets we have assembled to provide high-quality, innovative products at competitive prices.
The consolidation of boat production will affect Lund-Canada in Steinbach, Manitoba, and US Marine in Cumberland, Md. Lund boat manufacturing will be transferred to its plant in New York Mills, Minn., with Lund-Canadas sales, marketing and customer service functions remaining in Steinbach. US Marine will transfer production of certain Bayliner runabouts from one of its two Cumberland, Md., plants to its operations in Pipestone, Minn. Cumberlands remaining plant will continue to produce Trophy boats. A phased shutdown of the Steinbach and Cumberland facilities will commence in the current quarter and be completed in 2007.
In addition to the boat plant closures, we will be realigning distribution for our bowling products business, streamlining some sales operations and eliminating select positions throughout our company; cutting across all functions and all levels. All of these actions combined will result in a reduction of 430 hourly and salaried production employees and 215 salaried positions in various corporate and division staff functions out of the companys worldwide work force of 28,500. The work force reductions will take place between now and the middle of next year, McCoy added.
The company said that severance, asset write-downs and other costs associated with the plant closures and distribution realignment will reduce operating earnings by approximately $25 million to $28 million. Approximately 80 percent of these costs will affect the fourth quarter of 2006, with the balance being recognized in 2007. The companys previously announced 2006 earnings estimate of $2.40 to $2.46 per share does not include any expenses associated with these cost-reduction efforts. The company added that anticipated savings of approximately $26 million in 2007 due to these actions will support continued investments in strategic initiatives as well as to help offset the effect of inflation on wages, benefits, insurance and health care costs, and higher material, energy and other operating expenses expected next year.
As we look ahead, we will continue to identify additional opportunities, and take the appropriate actions, to ensure that we operate our business as efficiently as possible, while building long-term value in the company during a period of weak market conditions for marine products, McCoy added.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; competition in the consumer electronics markets; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the ability to successfully complete announced divestitures; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2005 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2006.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20061211095448.txt.gz
TIME:20061211095448
EVENTS:	Material Impairments	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Material Impairments
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 2.06 Material Impairments.
On April 27, 2006, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick or the Company) announced its decision to sell substantially all of its Brunswick New Technologies (BNT) business unit. On December 6, 2006, Brunswicks management concluded that, based on
an increasingly competitive marketplace's impact on BNTs operating results
(primarily in the portable navigation device segment in Europe) and discussions with potential acquirers of all or part of the BNT business, the
proceeds of any sale of BNT are not expected to equal or exceed the Company's net investment in BNT
. Accordingly, the Company expects to recognize a non-cash impairment charge in the amount of $70 million to $95 million. This impairment charge will be recorded in the quarter ending December 31, 2006.
Reference is made to Brunswicks news release dated December 11, 2006, which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated by reference.
 
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
 
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3
EXHIBIT INDEX:
4

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today announced that it is facing increasingly challenging market conditions in the highly competitive portable navigation device (PND) segment, which is affecting the operating performance of its Brunswick New Technologies (BNT) unit and Brunswicks ability to dispose of BNT at or above book value. In April 2006, Brunswick announced its intent to sell BNT, which includes fleet management, marine electronics and PND products sold under the Navman, Northstar and MX Marine brands.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Dec. 11, 2006
BNT is an amalgamation of electronics businesses primarily based on GPS technologies, explained Dustan E. McCoy, Brunswick chairman and chief executive officer. As we announced earlier this year, we no longer view ownership of BNT as a strategic imperative and choose to free up resources to more intently focus on our core business segments - marine, fitness, bowling and billiards - and long-term strategic objectives.
Increased competition and pricing pressures in the PND market segment are adversely affecting the operating results of BNTs PND business in the important fourth quarter holiday selling season. Based on the performance of this operation and very recent discussions with potential buyers, the company has concluded that proceeds from the sale of BNT will be less than its book value. These conditions will result in a non-cash asset impairment charge estimated in the range of $70 million to $95 million in the fourth quarter, primarily driven by the PND business.
Over the past two months, we have experienced a significant change in the market dynamics for PND products, primarily in Europe where Navman holds the number-three market share position, McCoy continued. While weve said all year that the market is becoming increasingly competitive, in November alone we witnessed an even greater level of price discounting, which has adversely affected our PND business unit.
Nevertheless, we are continuing with the sales process for the PND business as well as the marine electronics and fleet management units, the latter two of which continue to perform at or above expected levels, McCoy said.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; competition in the consumer electronics markets; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the ability to successfully complete announced divestitures; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2005 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2006.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20070118170845.txt.gz
TIME:20070118170845
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 5.02(e) Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) has entered into new Terms and Conditions of Employment (the "Officer Terms") with certain of its officers, including its named executive officers other than Dustan E. McCoy, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer: Peter G. Leemputte, Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer; Peter B. Hamilton, Vice Chairman and President - Brunswick Boat Group; Patrick C. Mackey, Vice President and President - Mercury Marine Group; and Marschall I. Smith, Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary. The Officer Terms supersede all existing severance, change in control, and indemnification agreements with these officers, but do not alter existing levels of salary and benefits or the other elements of compensation, except for certain benefits provided upon termination. In a Current Report on Form 8-K dated September 18, 2006, Brunswick previously announced that it had entered into new Terms and Conditions of Employment with Mr. McCoy and had adopted new standard Officer Terms for other officers of Brunswick. The form of Officer Terms attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K reflects certain modifications to, and supersedes, the form of September 18, 2006.
 
The Officer Terms describe each officers salary, bonus plan participation and other benefits. The Officer Terms also incorporate the provisions of existing indemnification agreements.
 
Brunswicks officers are employees at will until employment terminates in accordance with the Officer Terms. Each officer is entitled to receive severance benefits upon termination in certain circumstances specified in the Officer Terms.
 
Prior to a change in control, an officer will be entitled to specified severance benefits if employment is terminated by the officer for good reason or by Brunswick other than for cause or long-term disability. The terms good reason, cause and long-term disability are defined in the Officer Terms. If there is a qualifying termination of employment prior to a change in control, the officer will be entitled to a severance payment equal to 1.5 times the officers annual base salary, along with an amount at the discretion of the Chief Executive Officer based on the officers target annual bonus under the Brunswick Performance Plan (BPP). The officer is also entitled to, among other things, (i) the continuation, or a cash payment in lieu of continuation, of certain other benefits and perquisites for up to 18 months, including retirement benefits, financial planning and excess liability insurance, and (ii) treatment of all outstanding equity incentive awards in accordance with their terms.
 
After a change in control, an officer will be entitled to specified severance benefits if employment is terminated by the officer for good reason or by Brunswick other than for cause or long-term disability. If there is any such termination following a change in control, the officer will be entitled to a severance payment equal to three times the sum of the officers annual base salary and the officers target bonuses under the BPP and the Strategic Incentive Plan. The officer is also entitled to, among other things, (i) the continuation, or a cash payment in lieu of continuation, of certain other benefits and perquisites for up to 36 months, including retirement benefits, financial planning and excess liability insurance, and (ii) vesting of all outstanding equity incentive awards, with performance-based awards deemed to have been earned at the maximum level.
 
2
In addition, the Officer Terms provide for gross-ups relating to certain taxes that may be incurred in connection with payments under the Officer Terms.
 
In the case of Mr. Hamilton, he remains entitled to retiree medical benefits and a service credit of 12.5 years for purposes of determining his supplemental retirement benefits. This credit is in respect of service with a previous employer, and is carried forward from a prior agreement. The credit is subject to an offset for the pension earned at the previous employer.
 
The definition of a change in control includes: (i) the acquisition of 25 percent or more of the outstanding voting stock of Brunswick; (ii) the failure of the incumbent Board of Directors to constitute a majority of Brunswicks Board of Directors, excluding new directors who (a) are approved by a vote of at least 50 percent of the members of the incumbent Board of Directors and (b) did not join the Board following an actual or threatened contested election of directors; (iii) a merger, reorganization or consolidation of Brunswick with another entity, or a sale of substantially all of its assets, unless after such transaction (a) Brunswicks shareholders continue to own at least 60 percent of the voting stock outstanding, (b) no person owns more than 25 percent of Brunswicks voting stock, and (c) the members of the incumbent Board of Directors still constitute a majority of the Board of Directors; or (iv) a complete liquidation or dissolution of Brunswick.
 
The Officer Terms require each officer to agree to certain confidentiality, non-competition and non-solicitation provisions, and to sign a general release.
 
The foregoing description of the Officer Terms is a summary of their material terms, does not purport to be complete, and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the form of Officer Terms filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this report and incorporated by reference herein.
 
 
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits:
 
3
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
4
EXHIBIT INDEX:
5

Exhibit 10.1
 
These TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT (the Agreement) made in Lake County, Illinois, as of January ___, 2007 (the Effective Date), between Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation with its headquarters at 1 N. Field Court, Lake Forest, Illinois, 60045 (the Company), and ____________________ (the Executive).
WHEREAS, since ___________________, the Executive has been employed by the Company, pursuant to an Indemnification Agreement dated ___________________, and an Executive Severance and Change of Control Agreement dated __________________ (collectively, the Initial Agreement); and
WHEREAS, the Company desires to be assured of the Executives experience, skills, knowledge, and background for the benefit of the Company, and the efficient achievement of the long-term strategy of the Company, and is therefore willing to continue the Executives employment upon the terms and conditions, and in consideration of the compensation and benefits, provided herein; and
WHEREAS, as is the case with many publicly held corporations, a change in control might occur and such possibility may result in the departure or distraction of key management personnel to the detriment of the Company and its stockholders; and
WHEREAS, the Company desires to take appropriate steps to reinforce and encourage the continued attention and dedication of members of management, including the Executive, to their assigned duties without distraction arising from the possibility of a change in control of the Company; and
WHEREAS, the Company desires to have the Executive agree to provisions relating to noncompetition and nonsolicitation and certain other provisions contained herein, and the Executive is willing to agree to such provisions in consideration for the additional severance benefits to which he may become entitled under the terms of this Agreement.
THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the agreements of the parties described below, the parties agree that the Initial Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to provide as follows (it being understood that this Agreement supersedes the Initial Agreement in whole and is the controlling agreement between the parties):
1.
  
Definitions
. For purposes of this Agreement, capitalized terms used in this Agreement shall have the meanings indicated in Appendix I to this Agreement.
 
2.
  
Employment and Duties
.
 
(a)
  
Position
. The Company hereby agrees to employ the Executive, and the Executive hereby agrees to serve the Company, under the title of __________________________. The Executive shall have such authority, duties, and responsibilities as are commensurate with such position on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, and shall directly report to the _________________________.
(b)
  
Performance of Duties
. Subject to the provisions of Section 6, below, Executive shall diligently perform his duties as ___________________________ or as may otherwise be directed by the Chief Executive Officer, and agrees to use his reasonable best efforts to perform his duties faithfully and efficiently.
(c)
  
Other Duties; Related Companies
. The Executive agrees to serve, as requested, as an officer or director of any Related Company, and shall receive no additional compensation for such service.
3.
  
Agreement Term
. The term of this Agreement (the Term) shall begin on the Effective Date and shall continue until terminated in accordance with Section 14 below. The Company shall employ the Executive for a period of time beginning on the Effective Date and continuing for as long as the Executive retains the confidence of the Chief Executive Officer, it being the express understanding that the Executive is an employee at will, subject only to the protections provided by the specific terms of this Agreement. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, the Chief Executive Officer may remove the Executive as ____________________________ and assign him to other duties within the Company or terminate his employment.
4.
  
Executives Compensation and Benefits
. As remuneration to the Executive for his services to the Company hereunder, the Company shall compensate the Executive as provided in this Section 4 during the Term. Executive acknowledges and agrees that Section 15 of this Agreement is expressly applicable to any form of compensation or benefit provided to Executive.
(a)
  
Base Salary
. The Executives annual base salary (Base Salary) shall be $_______________ commencing on the Effective Date and, except as it may be modified in accordance with this Section 4 by action of the Committee, continuing throughout the Term. The Base Salary shall be payable in conformity with the Companys then-current payroll practices, as modified from time to time. The Base Salary will be reviewed annually during the Term in accordance with Companys usual salary review process for executive officers. Effective as of the date of any adjustment in the Executives Base Salary, the Base Salary as so adjusted shall be considered the new Base Salary for all purposes of this Agreement. Any adjustments in Base Salary shall be determined by the Committee and communicated by memorandum to the Executive from the Chief Executive Officer. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement.
 
(b)
  
Brunswick Performance Plan
. For each calendar year during the Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in the Brunswick Performance Plan (BPP) and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee (Annual Bonus). During the Term, the Executives target Annual Bonus for each full calendar year shall be determined by the Committee in accordance with the terms of the BPP, as in effect from time to time (Target Annual Bonus). During the Term, the performance goals to be achieved, and the extent to which those goals have been achieved for purposes of calculating the amount of the actual payment as a percentage of the Target Annual Bonus, will be determined by the Committee or as delegated to the Chief Executive Officer. The amount of any award under BPP shall be reviewed and approved by the Committee and communicated by memorandum to the Executive from the Chief Executive Officer. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement. Executive acknowledges and agrees that the payment of the Annual Bonus is subject to the Companys stock ownership guidelines for corporate officers, as in effect from time to time, pursuant to which Executive is currently required to own _________ shares of Company stock.
(c)
  
Strategic Incentive Plan
. During the Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in the Brunswick Strategic Incentive Plan (SIP) and any and all successor or replacement plans, as may be determined by the Board or the Committee (SIP Bonus). During the Term, the Executives target SIP Bonus for each full calendar year shall be determined by the Committee in accordance with the terms of the SIP, as in effect from time to time (Target SIP Bonus). During the Term, the performance goals to be achieved, and the extent to which those goals have been achieved for purposes of calculating the amount of the actual payment as a percentage of the SIP Bonus, will be determined by the Committee or as delegated to the Chief Executive Officer. The amount of any award under SIP shall be reviewed and approved by the Committee and communicated by memorandum to the Executive from the Chief Executive Officer. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement. Executive acknowledges and agrees that the payment of the SIP Bonus is subject to the Companys stock ownership guidelines for corporate officers, as in effect from time to time, pursuant to which Executive is currently required to own _________ shares of Company stock.
(d)
  
Equity-Based Awards
. For each calendar year during the Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in and receive equity-based awards under the Companys 2003 Stock Incentive Plan, and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee (collectively, Incentive Plan). Any such future awards when made will be set forth in a memorandum to the Executive from the Chief Executive Officer. Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement.
(e)
  
Financial Counseling Services
. The Executive shall be entitled to receive financial counseling services from a qualified provider of financial counseling services selected by the Company. The Company shall pay the financial counseling service provider directly. The Executive shall be responsible for any Income Tax due on imputed income for financial counseling services.
 
(f)
  
Health and Welfare Benefits
. The Executive shall be entitled to participate in all Company-sponsored health and welfare benefits offered to similarly situated senior executives, including health, dental, vision, term life insurance (except for the basic life insurance component thereof) and annual executive physical examination, and any and all successor or replacement benefits as may be determined by the Board or the Committee.
(g)
  
Executive Life Insurance
. The Executive shall be entitled to participate in the Companys life insurance plan for senior executives (formerly the Split Dollar Life Insurance Plan) under the terms and conditions described in a Memorandum dated ___________________ and incorporated herein by reference.
(h)
  
Vacation
. The Executive shall earn pro rata four (4) weeks of paid vacation each calendar year, to be earned and taken as generally provided for other similarly situated senior executives of the Company. Earned but unused vacation shall be paid upon termination. The Executive shall also be entitled to such personal days and paid holidays as are generally available to other similarly situated senior executives of the Company.
(i)
  
Deferred Compensation Plans
. The Executive shall be entitled to participate in the Brunswick Rewards Plan, the Companys 2005 Automatic Deferred Compensation Plan, its 2005 Elective Deferred Incentive Compensation Plan, and its Restoration Plan, and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee.
(j)
  
Retirement Plans
. Executive is entitled to any vested benefits he currently holds under the Brunswick Pension Plan for Salaried Employees (Pension Plan) and the
Brunswick Supplemental Pension Plan (Supplemental Plan) including, without limitation, those rights set forth in Section 6(f), below
.
(k)
  
Expenses
. The Executive shall be entitled to receive prompt reimbursement for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by the Executive in connection with the performance of his duties hereunder, in accordance with Company policies for similarly situated senior executives.
(l)
  
Aircraft and Boat Usage; Product Programs; Excess Liability
. The Executive shall be entitled to (i) use of the Companys aircraft and watercraft, (ii) excess liability coverage, (iii) obtain Company products under the Executive Product Program, and (iv) make purchases through the Employee Purchase Program, in accordance with the terms and conditions in effect from time to time.
 
5.
  
Restrictive Covenants
.
 
The Executive acknowledges that during employment with the Company or a Related Company, the Executive has and will acquire, develop and have access to confidential and proprietary information that belongs to the Company or the Related Company. This information takes years and extensive resources to develop, is valuable to the Company or the Related Company and provides the Company or the Related Company with a competitive edge. In consideration of employment or continued employment, Executive knowingly and voluntarily agrees to the following restrictions and further acknowledges and agrees that they are reasonably designed to protect the Company or the Related Company interests and good will, and will not unduly restrict Executives post-employment activities.
(a)
  
Noncompetition; Nonsolicitation; Nondisparagement
. The following provisions shall apply:
(i.)
  
During the Executives employment and during the eighteen (18) month period immediately following termination of Executives employment (regardless of the reason for the termination of employment), without the prior written consent of the Company, (i) the Executive shall not directly or indirectly be employed or retained by, or render any services for, or be financially interested in any manner, in any person, firm or corporation engaged in any business which is then materially competitive in any way with any business in which the Company or any Related Company was engaged (including any program of development or research) (a Competitive Activity) during the Executives employment; (ii) the Executive shall not divert or attempt to divert any business from the Company or a Related Company; (iii) the Executive shall not disturb or attempt to disturb any business relationships of the Company or any Related Company; and (iv) the Executive shall not assist any person in any way to do, or attempt to do, anything prohibited by the preceding clauses (i), (ii) and (iii).
(ii.)
  
In furtherance of Section 5(a)(i) above, the Executive shall promptly notify the Company through the Companys General Counsel and Chief Human Resources Officer (or their respective representatives), in advance in writing (which shall include a description of the proposed activity) of his intention to engage in any activity which could reasonably be deemed to be subject to the noncompetition provision set forth in Section 5(a)(i). The Companys General Counsel or Chief Human Resources Officer (or one of their respective representatives) shall respond to the Executive in writing within thirty (30) calendar days indicating its approval or objections to the Executives engagement in the activity; provided, however, that if the Companys General Counsel or Chief Human Resources Officer (or one of their respective representatives) does not respond to or request additional information from the Executive within such thirty (30) day period, the Companys approval shall be deemed to be granted. If the Executive fails to notify the Company of his intended activity in advance, the Company shall retain all its rights of objections. Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed as preventing the Executive from investing his personal assets in any business that competes with the Company, in such form or manner as will not require any services on the part of the Executive in the operation or affairs of the business in which such investments are made, but only if the Executive does not own or control more than two percent of any class of the outstanding stock of such business.
 
(iii.)
  
For the eighteen (18) month period following termination of Executives employment with the Company, the Executive shall not, without the prior written consent of the Company, (A) solicit, recruit or hire any individual who is employed by the Company or any Related Company (or was so employed within 180 calendar days prior to the Executives solicitation, recruitment or hiring), (B) solicit or encourage any employee of the Company or any Related Company to terminate or refrain from renewing or extending such employment or to become employed by or become a consultant to any other individual or entity other than the Company or a Related Company, or (C) initiate discussion with any such employee for any such purposes or authorize or knowingly cooperate with the taking of any such actions by any other individual or entity; provided, however, that nothing herein shall prohibit the Executive from generally advertising for personnel not specifically targeting any executive or other personnel of the Company.
(iv.)
  
During the Executives employment with the Company and thereafter, Executive will not make any comment or statement or engage in any other behavior that in any way disparages or is otherwise detrimental to the reputation and goodwill of the Company, any Related Company, or any director, officer, executive, or agent of the Company or any Related Company;
provided
,
however
, that nothing herein shall be interpreted as prohibiting Executive from making truthful statements, including statements of opinion, to Company directors, officers, auditors or regulators or when required by a court or other body having jurisdiction to require such statements.
(b)
  
Confidentiality
. The following provisions shall apply:
(i.)
  
Except as may be required by the lawful order of a court or agency of competent jurisdiction, or except to the extent that the Executive has express written authorization from the Company, he will keep secret and confidential all Confidential Information (as defined below), and not disclose the same, either directly or indirectly, to any other person, firm, or business entity, or use it in any way. The Executive agrees that, to the extent that any court or agency seeks to have the Executive disclose Confidential Information, he shall promptly inform the Company, and he shall take such reasonable steps to prevent disclosure of Confidential Information until the Company has been informed of such required disclosure, and the Company has an opportunity to respond to such court or agency. To the extent that the Executive obtains information on behalf of the Company or a Related Company that may be subject to attorney-client privilege as to the Company or an affiliates attorneys, the Executive shall take reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of such information and to preserve such privilege.
(ii.)
  
Upon his termination of employment with the Company for any reason, the Executive shall promptly return to the Company any keys, credit cards, passes, confidential documents and material, or other property belonging to the Company, and shall return all writings, files, records, correspondence, notebooks, notes and other documents and things (including any copies or electronic versions thereof) containing Confidential Information or relating to the business or proposed business of the Company or any Related Company or containing any trade secrets relating to the Company or any Related Company, except any personal diaries, calendars, rolodexes or personal notes or correspondence.
 
(iii.)
  
For purposes of this Agreement, the term Confidential Information means all non-public information concerning the Company and any Related Company that was acquired by or disclosed to the Executive during the course of his employment with the Company or a Related Company, or during discussions between the Executive and the Company or any Related Company following his termination of employment arising out of his employment or this Agreement, including, without limitation: (A) all of the Companys or any Related Companys trade secrets as that term is used in the Illinois Trade Secrets Act (or, if that Act is repealed, the Uniform Trade Secrets Act upon which the Illinois Trade Secrets Act is based); (B) any non-public information regarding the Companys or a Related Company's directors, officers, employees, customers, equipment, processes, costs, operations and methods, whether past, current or planned, as well as knowledge and data relating to business plans, marketing and sales information originated, owned, controlled or possessed by the Company or a Related Company; and (C) information regarding litigation and threatened litigation involving or affecting the Company or a Related Company.
(c)
 
Assistance with Claims
. The Executive agrees that, consistent with the Executives business and personal affairs, during and after his employment by the Company, he will assist the Company and any Related Company in the defense of any claims or potential claims that may be made or threatened to be made against any of them in any action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (a Proceeding), and will assist the Company and any Related Company in the prosecution of any claims that may be made by the Company or any Related Company in any Proceeding, to the extent that such claims may relate to the Executives employment or the period of the Executives employment by the Company. Executive agrees, unless precluded by law, to promptly inform the Company if Executive is asked to participate (or otherwise become involved) in any Proceeding involving such claims or potential claims. Executive also agrees, unless precluded by law, to promptly inform the Company if Executive is asked to assist in any investigation (whether governmental or private) of the Company or any Related Company (or their actions), regardless of whether a lawsuit has then been filed against the Company or any Related Company with respect to such investigation. The Company agrees to reimburse Executive for all of Executives reasonable out-of-pocket expenses associated with such assistance, including travel expenses and any attorneys fees and shall pay a reasonable per diem fee for Executives service.
(d)
 
The payments, benefits, and other entitlements under this Agreement are being made in consideration of, among other things, the obligations of this Section 5 and, in particular, compliance with Sections 5(a) and (b) of this Agreement;
provided
,
however
, that all such payments, benefits, or other entitlements pursuant to Section 6 of the Agreement are subject to and conditioned upon the Executives entering into the Release and Agreement referred to in Section 6(h) of this Agreement.
 
(e)
 
Remedies
.
(i)
 
The Executive acknowledges that the Company would be irreparably injured by any violation of this Section 5.
(ii)
 
In the event of any material breach by the Executive of the provisions of Sections 5(a) or (b) (A) the Company shall be relieved of all obligations to make any further payments to the Executive pursuant to Sections 4 and 6 of this Agreement or otherwise under any incentive compensation plan of the Company or a Related Company, (B) all outstanding equity-based awards held by the Executive shall be immediately forfeited and (C) subject to the following provisos, the Executive will be required to pay the Company, in cash, within five (5) business days after written demand is made therefor by the Company, an amount equal to any gain realized as a result of the exercise or vesting of equity awards during the period commencing twelve months prior to the date that the material breach began and ending on the date of payment;
provided
,
however
, that no forfeiture, cancellation, or repayment shall take place with respect to any payments, benefits, or entitlements under this Agreement or any other award agreement, plan, or practice, unless the Company shall have first given the Executive written notice of its intent to so forfeit, cancel, or require repayment and the Executive has not, within thirty (30) calendar days after such notice has been given, ceased such impermissible Competitive Activity or other activity in violation of this Agreement; and
provided further
,
however
, that such prior notice procedure shall not be required with respect to (A) a Competitive Activity or violation of Section 5(b) of this Agreement which the Executive initiated after the Company had informed the Executive in writing that it believed such activity violated this Agreement or the Companys noncompetition guidelines, or (B) any Competitive Activity regarding products or services which are part of a line of business which the Executive knew or should have known represented more than five percent (5%) of the Companys consolidated gross revenues for its most recently completed fiscal year at the time the Executives employment is terminated.
 
(iii.)
 
Executive
agrees that (A) the Company, in addition to any other remedies available to it for a breach or threatened breach of Sections 5(a) or (b), shall be entitled to a preliminary injunction, temporary restraining order, or other equivalent relief, restraining the Executive from any actual or threatened breach of this Section 5, and (B) if a bond is required to be posted in order for the Company to secure an injunction or other equitable remedy, the parties agree that said bond need not be more than a nominal sum.
If a final and non-appealable judicial determination is made that any of the provisions of this Section 5 constitutes an unreasonable or otherwise unenforceable restriction against the Executive, the provisions of this Section 5 will not be rendered void but will be deemed to be modified to the minimum extent necessary to remain in force and effect for the greatest period and to the greatest extent that such court determines constitutes a reasonable restriction under the circumstances. Moreover, notwithstanding the fact that any provision of this Section 5 is determined not to be specifically enforceable, the Company will nevertheless be entitled to recover monetary damages as a result of the Executives breach of such provision.
 
6.
  
Termination Provisions
.
 
(a)
  
Severance Benefits
. Prior to a change in control, if the Company terminates the Executives employment for any reason other than Long-Term Disability or Cause, or if the Executive resigns for Good Reason, subject to Section 6(h), the Executive shall be entitled to:
(i.)
  
Severance payments in an aggregate amount equal to the sum of (x) one and one-half (1.5) times Executives then-current Base Salary (disregarding any reduction in salary made in contemplation of such termination of employment), (y) one and one-half (1.5) times the Companys profit-sharing, 401(k) match and other Company contributions made on behalf of the Executive to the Companys tax-qualified and nonqualified defined contribution plans during the twelve (12) month period prior to the date of termination, and (z) such amount, if any, as may be determined by the Chief Executive Officer in his sole discretion based on the Executives Target Annual Bonus under the BPP (Total Severance Payment). In the event that the Total Severance Payment becomes due to the Executive under this Agreement, subject to Section 7, such payment shall be made in equal installments over the eighteen (18) month period following the date that the release described in Section 6(h) becomes effective and irrevocable (the Release Effective Date). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, in the event that the Executive will attain age 65 prior to the eighteen (18) month anniversary of the date of termination, the Total Severance Payment shall be reduced to a level determined by multiplying the amount of such payment by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full months between the date of termination and the date the Executive will attain age 65 (and the numerator will not be reduced to reflect any six (6) month delay in payment that may be required pursuant to Section 7), and the denominator of which shall be eighteen (18). In addition, the period during which the Executive will receive installment payments with respect to the Total Severance Payment will also be reduced accordingly.
(ii.)
  
If such termination occurs prior to the payment of the Executives Annual Bonus payable with respect to the immediately preceding calendar year and/or SIP Bonus payable with respect to the most recently completed performance period (as that term is defined in SIP), payment of such Annual Bonus and/or SIP Bonus for such period(s), in the amount(s), and at such time(s), as he would otherwise have been entitled under the terms of the BPP and the SIP, as applicable, had employment not terminated.
(iii.)
  
All outstanding stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock units, restricted shares and other equity-based awards (the Equity Incentives) held by the Executive shall be governed by the terms and conditions of the equity compensation plans and award agreements pursuant to which they were granted.
 
(iv.)
  
The Executive shall be entitled to Company-provided continuation of medical, dental, vision and prescription coverage, but not Long-Term Disability coverage (the Benefits) (on either an insured or a self-insured basis, in the sole discretion of the Company) for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents (as determined under the terms of the Companys health and welfare benefit plans in effect as of the date of termination), on substantially the same terms of such coverage that are in existence immediately prior to the Executives date of termination (subject to commercial availability of such coverage), until the earlier of: (A) the date on which the Executive becomes employed by another employer, or (B) the eighteen (18) month anniversary of the Executives date of termination;
provided
,
however
, that such coverage shall run concurrently with any coverage available to the Executive and his Eligible Dependents under COBRA; and
provided further
,
however
, that the Executive shall immediately notify the Company if he becomes covered under Medicare or another employers group health plan, at which time the Companys provision of medical coverage for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents at the subsidized rate will cease. During the continuation period, the Executive shall also continue to receive financial counseling and excess liability insurance in accordance with the Companys policy in effect on the date of termination
, as may be modified by the Company from time to time during the continuation period
. The Executive shall not be entitled to any other perquisites, (except as otherwise explicitly provided in the applicable perquisite plan or policy or in this Agreement), and his right to an executive physical examination, use of Corporate aircraft/watercraft, and participation in the Companys product purchase programs shall terminate on the date of termination. In lieu of continuing financial counseling and excess liability insurance, the Company may, in its discretion, make a cash payment to the Executive of equal value. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 6(a)(iv), in the event the Executive attains age 65 prior to the eighteen (18) month anniversary of his date of termination, the benefits provided for in this Section 6(a)(iv) shall cease on the date the Executive attains age 65;
provided
,
however
, that the Executive shall be entitled to a minimum of twelve (12) months of financial planning; and
provided further
,
however
, that if the commencement of benefits under this Section 6(a)(iv) is delayed by six (6) months as a result of Section 7, the Executive shall continue to receive the benefits under this Section 6(a)(iv) following attainment of age 65 solely during the period necessary to avoid a reduction in benefits as a result of the six (6) month delay.
(b)
  
Change in Control Benefits
. After a Change in Control, if the Company terminates the Executives employment for any reason other than Cause or Long-Term Disability, or if the Executive resigns for Good Reason, subject to Section 6(h), the Executive shall be entitled to:
 
(i.)
  
Change in Control payments in a lump sum in an aggregate amount equal to three (3) times the sum of (w) the Executives then-current Base Salary (disregarding any reduction in salary made after the Change in Control or in contemplation of the Change in Control), (x) the Executives Target Annual Bonus for the year of termination or, if greater, the Target Annual Bonus for the year in which the Change in Control occurred, (y) the Executives targeted bonus under the SIP for the period that ended most recently prior to the Change in Control, and (z) the Companys profit-sharing, 401(k) match and other Company contributions made on behalf of the Executive to the Companys tax-qualified and nonqualified defined contribution plans during the twelve (12) months prior to the date of termination (Total Change in Control Payment). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, in the event that the Executive will attain age 65 prior to the third (3
rd
) anniversary of the date of termination, the Total Change in Control Payment shall be reduced to a level determined by multiplying the amount of such payment by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full months between the date of termination and the date the Executive will attain age 65 (and the numerator will not be reduced to reflect any six (6) month delay in payment that may be required pursuant to Section 7), and the denominator of which shall be thirty-six (36).
(ii.)
  
If such termination occurs prior to the payment of the Executives Annual Bonus payable with respect to the immediately preceding calendar year and/or SIP Bonus payable with respect to the most recently completed performance period (as that term is defined in SIP), payment of such Annual Bonus and/or SIP Bonus for such period(s), in the amount(s), and at such time(s), as he would otherwise have been entitled under the terms of the BPP and the SIP, as applicable, had employment not terminated.
(iii.)
  
Notwithstanding the terms and conditions of the equity compensation plans and award agreements pursuant to which outstanding awards were granted, upon termination of the Executives employment, all Equity Incentives awards held by the Executive will become fully vested and, if applicable, immediately exercisable, and will remain outstanding pursuant to their terms. All performance-based awards shall be deemed to have been earned at performance maximum levels.
(iv.)
  
The Executive shall be entitled to Company-provided continuation of Benefits (on either an insured or a self-insured basis, in the sole discretion of the Company) for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents, on substantially the same terms of such coverage that are in existence immediately prior to the Executives date of termination (subject to commercial availability of such coverage), until the earlier of: (A) the date on which the Executive becomes employed by another employer, or (B) the third anniversary of the Executives date of termination;
provided
,
however
, that such coverage shall run concurrently with any coverage available to the Executive and his Eligible Dependents under COBRA; and
provided further
,
however
, that the Executive shall immediately notify the Company if he becomes covered under Medicare or another employers group health plan, at which time the Companys provision of medical coverage for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents at the subsidized rate will cease. During the continuation period, the Executive shall also continue to receive financial counseling and excess liability insurance in accordance with the Companys policy in effect on the date of termination
, as may be modified by the Company from time to time during the continuation period
. The Executive shall not be entitled to any other perquisites, (except as otherwise explicitly provided in the applicable perquisite plan or policy or in this Agreement) and his right to an executive physical examination, use of Corporate aircraft/watercraft, and participation in the Companys product purchase programs shall terminate on the date of termination. In lieu of continuing financial counseling and excess liability insurance, the Company may, in its discretion, make a cash payment to the Executive of equal value. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 6(b)(iv), in the event the Executive attains age 65 prior to the third (3
rd
) anniversary of his date of termination, the benefits provided for in this Section 6(b)(iv) shall cease on the date the Executive attains age 65;
provided
,
however
, that the Executive shall be entitled to a minimum of twelve (12) months of financial planning; and
provided further
,
however
, that if the commencement of benefits under this Section 6(b)(iv) is delayed by six months as a result of Section 7, the Executive shall continue to receive the benefits under this Section 6(b)(iv) following attainment of age 65 solely during the period necessary to avoid a reduction in benefits as a result of the six (6) month delay.
 
(c)
  
Benefits Upon Termination Due to Death or Long-Term Disability
. If, at any time during the Term, the Executives employment terminates as a result of the Executives death or Long-Term Disability, the Executive or her estate (as applicable) shall be entitled to:
(i.)
  
Payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination and any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination;
(ii.)
  
Such amount, if any, as may be determined by the Chief Executive Officer in his sole discretion based on the Executives Target Annual Bonus under the BPP.
(iii.)
  
If such termination occurs prior to the payment of the Executives Annual Bonus payable with respect to the immediately preceding calendar year and/or SIP Bonus payable with respect to the most recently completed performance period (as that term is defined in SIP), payment of such Annual Bonus and/or SIP Bonus for such period(s), in the amount(s), and at such time(s), as she would otherwise have been entitled under the terms of the BPP and the SIP, as applicable, had employment not terminated.
(iv.)
  
Continuation of the ability of the Executive or the Executives beneficiaries (as applicable) to exercise all outstanding awards granted to the Executive under the Incentive Plan that became vested and exercisable on or prior to such date of termination in accordance with the terms and conditions of such grants.
(d)
  
Termination for Cause
. In the event the Executives employment is terminated for Cause at any time during the Term, the Executive shall not receive any payments, benefits, or other amounts provided by this Agreement, other than payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination and for payment of any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination (but shall still be subject to the restrictive covenants set forth in Section 5 of this Agreement). The Executive shall remain entitled to all benefits under the Companys tax-qualified retirement plans and shall remain eligible for certain benefits under other employee benefit plans in each case subject to, and in accordance with, the terms of such plans. Provided that the activity, facts, or circumstances that precipitated the for Cause determination were not (i) the result of Executives bad faith, or (ii) undertaken without a reasonable belief by the Executive that she was acting in the best interests of the Company or as required by applicable law, the Executives employment may not be terminated for Cause prior to advance written notice to the Executive containing reasonable detail of the activity, facts, or circumstances constituting Cause for termination, the actions that the Executive must take to cease such activity or cure such facts and circumstances, and a reasonable amount of time (not to exceed thirty (30) calendar days) for the Executive to effectuate such cure. All determinations relating to a for Cause termination shall be made by the Company in its sole discretion.
 
(e)
  
Termination Due to Voluntary Resignation Without Good Reason
. In the event the Executive voluntarily resigns without Good Reason during the Term, the Executive shall not be entitled to any payments, benefits or other amounts under this Agreement, other than payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination and for payment of any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination (but shall still be subject to the restrictive covenants set forth in Section 5 of this Agreement). The Executive shall remain entitled to all benefits under the Companys tax-qualified retirement plans and shall remain eligible for certain benefits under other employee benefit plans in each case subject to, and in accordance with, the terms of such plans.
(f)
  
Additional Severance Benefits
. In addition to any rights to which the Executive may be entitled under Sections 6(a) through 6(e), above, in the event that the Executives employment is terminated:
(i)
 
during the Term (y) by the Company, and such termination is other than for Cause, death or Long-Term Disability, or (z) by the Executive for Good Reason, subject to Section 6(h), and the Executive is an active participant in the Pension Plan at the time of termination or immediately prior to the date of the Change in Control, the Executive shall be entitled to a lump sum cash payment equal to
the actuarial equivalent of the difference between (x) the pension benefits the Executive would have accrued under the Pension Plan and the Supplemental Plan, if on the date of such termination of employment, the Executive had an additional eighteen (18) months of service (if the Executive is entitled to severance benefits under Section 6(a)(i)) or an additional three (3) years of service (if the Executive is entitled to severance benefits under Section 6(b)(i)), at the Executive's Rate of Compensation, and had been eighteen (18) months older (if the Executive is entitled to severance benefits under Section 6(a)(i)) or three (3) years older (if the Executive is entitled to severance benefits under Section 6(b)(i)), and (y) the pension benefits the Executive actually accrued under the Pension Plan and the Supplemental Plan as of the date of termination of employment (as increased by Section 6(f)(ii)). Such actuarial equivalence shall be determined on the basis of the rates, tables and factors in effect under the Pension Plan on the date of termination for purposes of determining optional forms of payment;
provided
,
however
, that the interest rate or rates to be used for such purpose shall be the interest rate or rates which would be used as of the date of termination of employment by the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation ("PBGC") for purposes of determining the present value of the Executive's benefits under the Pension Plan if the Pension Plan had terminated on the date of such termination of employment with insufficient assets to provide benefits guaranteed by the PBGC on that date; and
provided further
,
however
, that notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, in the event that the Executive will attain age 65 prior to the eighteen (18) month anniversary of the date of termination (if the Executive is entitled to severance benefits under Section 6(a)(i)), or the third (3
rd
) anniversary of the date of termination (if the Executive is entitled to severance benefits under Section 6(b)(i)), the lump sum cash payment payable according to this Section 6(f)(iii) shall be reduced to a level determined by multiplying the amount of such payment by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full months between the date of termination and the date the Executive will attain age 65 (and the numerator will not be reduced to reflect any six (6) month delay in payment that may be required pursuant to Section 7), and the denominator of which shall be eighteen (18) (if the Executive is entitled to severance benefits under Section 6(a)(i)) or thirty-six (36) (if the Executive is entitled to severance benefits under Section 6(b)(i)).
 
(ii)
 
during the Term (y) by the Company, and such termination is other than for Cause, death or Long-Term Disability, or (z) by the Executive for Good Reason, subject to Section 6(h), the Executive shall be entitled to the services of a Company-paid and Company-approved outplacement or career transition consultant in accordance with the Companys current practices for senior executives in effect as of the date of termination;
provided
,
however
, that commencement of such transition counseling services, if desired, must begin prior to the first (1
st
) anniversary of the date of termination.
(g)
  
Notification Requirements for Termination for Good Reason
.
(i.)
  
In the event the Executive determines that Good Reason exists to terminate his employment with the Company, the Executive shall notify the Company in writing of the specific event, within sixty (60) calendar days after the date that the Executive becomes aware of the occurrence of such event, and such notice shall also include the date on which the Executive will terminate employment with the Company, which date shall be no earlier than fifteen (15) calendar days after the date of such notice;
provided
,
however
, that the Chief Executive Officer, in his sole discretion, may relieve the Executive of his duties effective immediately upon the Companys receipt of notice provided pursuant to this Section 6(g).
(ii.)
  
Within thirty (30) calendar days after the Companys receipt of such written notice, the Company shall notify the Executive that it agrees or disagrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Companys determination whether it agrees or disagrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason shall be reasonable, based on all the relevant facts and circumstances. The arbitrator in any arbitration proceeding initiated pursuant to Section 13 of this Agreement, in which the existence of Good Reason is an issue, shall be expressly empowered and directed to review, de novo, the facts and circumstances claimed by the Executive to constitute Good Reason.
(iii.)
  
In the event the Company notifies the Executive that it agrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason, the Company, in its sole discretion, shall either (y) undertake to cure the circumstances that gave rise to Good Reason within thirty (30) calendar days of the Companys response to Executive under Section 6(g)(ii), above, or (z) advise the Executive that his employment with the Company shall terminate on his date of termination as determined under Section 6(g)(i), above. In the event that the Executive and the Company do not agree that the action undertaken by the Company cures the circumstances that gave rise to Good Reason, the Executive shall be entitled to pursue the arbitration procedures set out in Section 13 of this Agreement. If the Executives claim in arbitration is ultimately concluded in the Executives favor, the Executive shall retain the right to receive the payments and benefits under this Agreement.
If
, during the two-year period following a Change in Control,
the Company attempts to cure the circumstances giving rise to Good Reason, the Company shall have the burden of proof to establish that such circumstances have been cured.
 
(iv.)
  
In the event the Company notifies the Executive that it disagrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason, the Executive may terminate his employment on the date specified in the notice (or such earlier date as determined by the Chief Executive Officer in his sole discretion or such later date as the Executive and the Company may mutually agree in writing) or may elect to continue his employment by so notifying the Company in writing. In either event, the Executive shall be entitled to pursue the arbitration procedures set out in Section 13 of this Agreement. If the Executives claim in arbitration is ultimately concluded in the Executives favor, the Executive shall retain the right to receive the payments and benefits under this Agreement.
If
, during the two-year period following a Change in Control,
the Company disputes the existence of Good Reason, the Company shall have the burden of proof to establish that Good Reason does not exist.
(v.)
  
Notwithstanding the date on which the Executives termination occurs following the completion of the steps set forth in this Section 6(g),
so long as an event that constitutes Good Reason occurs during the Term and the Executive delivers the written notice of termination for Good Reason to the Company at any time prior to the expiration of the Term, for purposes of the payments, benefits and other entitlements set forth in this Section 6, the termination of the Executives employment pursuant thereto shall be deemed to be a resignation for Good Reason during the Term.
 
(h)
  
Conditional Payments
. Any payments or benefits made pursuant to this Section 6 will be subject to and conditioned upon (i) Executives compliance with the provisions, restrictions, and limitations of Section 5 of this Agreement, but not otherwise subject to offset or mitigation, (ii) the Executives signing and not revoking (following his date of termination), and the Companys receipt of, a Release and Agreement releasing the Company, Related Companies, and their respective directors, officers, employees and agents (Released Parties) from any and all claims and liabilities, and promising, to the fullest extent allowed by law, never to sue any of the Released Parties (such Release and Agreement shall be in the form set forth in Appendix III), and (iii) the Companys receipt of the Executives resignation from all offices, directorships, and fiduciary positions with the Company, its Related Companies, and their respective employee benefit plans.
7.
  
Section 409A of the Code
. It is intended that the provisions of this Agreement comply with Section 409A of the Code, and all provisions of this Agreement shall be construed and interpreted in a manner consistent with Section 409A of the Code. In particular, if necessary to avoid imposition of penalties and additional taxes under Section 409A of the Code (the Section 409A Tax), notwithstanding the timing of payment provided in any other Section of this Agreement, the timing of any amounts payable pursuant to this Agreement shall be subject to a six (6) month delay in a manner consistent with Section 409A(a)(2)(B)(i) of the Code. I
n the case of a series of payments, the first payment shall include the amounts the Executive would have been entitled to receive during the six (6) month waiting period.
From and after the Effective Date and for the remainder of the Term, (a) the Company shall administer and operate this Agreement and any nonqualified deferred compensation plan (as defined in Section 409A of the Code) (and any other arrangement that could reasonably be expected to constitute such a plan) in which the Executive participates and the Executives rights and benefits hereunder and thereunder in compliance with Section 409A of the Code and any rules, regulations or other guidance promulgated thereunder as in effect from time to time, (b) in the event that the Company determines that any provision of this Agreement or any such plan or arrangement does not comply with Section 409A of the Code or any such rules, regulations or guidance and that the Executive may become subject to a Section 409A Tax, the Company shall amend or modify such provision to avoid the application of such Section 409A Tax, and (c) in the event that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the Executive is subject to a Section 409A Tax with respect to any such provision, the Company shall indemnify and hold the Executive harmless against all taxes (and any interest or penalties imposed with respect to such taxes) imposed as a result of the Companys failure to comply with the preceding clause (a) of this Section 7. The provisions of Sections 10(c), (d) and (e) shall apply mutatis mutandis to any claim by the IRS that, if successful, would give rise to indemnification by the Company under this Section 7.
8.
  
Legal Fees
. In the event that it shall be necessary or desirable for the Executive to retain legal counsel or incur other costs and expenses in connection with enforcement of the Executives rights under this Agreement, the Company shall pay (or the Executive shall be entitled to recover from the Company, as the case may be) his reasonable attorneys fees and cost and expenses in connection with enforcement of his rights (including the enforcement of any arbitration award in court), (a) if the action relates to the Executive's employment with the Company or a Related Company during a period ending prior to a Change in Control, only if a final decision in connection with a material issue of the litigation (or arbitration) is issued in the Executives favor by an arbitrator or a court of competent jurisdiction, and (b) if the action relates to the Executive's employment with the Company or a Related Company during a period following a Change in Control or during a period that both precedes and follows a Change in Control, regardless of the final outcome, unless, in the case of this clause (b), the arbitrator or court shall determine that under the circumstances recovery by the Executive of all or a part of any such fees and costs and expenses would be unjust.
9.
  
Indemnification
. The Executive shall be entitled to indemnification by the Company under the Indemnification Terms and Conditions described in Appendix IV to this Agreement.
 
10.
  
Excise Tax
.
(a)
  
Excise Tax Adjustment Payment Calculation
. If any element of compensation or benefit provided to the Executive under the terms of this Agreement or under any other plan, program, policy, or other arrangement, either alone or in combination with other elements of compensation and benefits paid or provided to such Executive, constitutes an excess parachute payment, as that term is defined in Section 280G of the Code and the regulations thereunder (Potential Parachute Benefit), and subjects such Executive to the excise tax pursuant to Section 4999 of the Code, and any interest and penalties thereon (collectively, the Excise Tax), then the Executive shall be entitled, subject to Section 10(f), to an additional lump-sum cash payment from the Company (the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment), subject to mandatory withholding, in an amount equal to the Excise Taxes (including the Excise Tax attributable to the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to the Potential Parachute Benefit) plus any Income Taxes and any interest and penalties thereon attributable to the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment. For purposes of calculating an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to the Executive in any year, it shall be assumed that the Executive is subject to Income Taxes at the highest marginal Federal and applicable state and local income tax rates, respectively, for the year in which the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment is paid. Also, the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to the Executive shall reflect the Federal tax benefits attributable to the deduction of applicable state and local income taxes
, taking into account limitations applicable to individuals subject to Federal income tax at the highest marginal rate
.
(b)
  
Independent Firm
. All determinations required to be made under this Section 10, including whether and when an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment is required and the amount of such Excise Tax Adjustment Payment and the assumptions utilized in arriving at such determinations, shall be made by an independent accounting or consulting firm chosen by the Company (the Firm). The Firm shall provide detailed supporting calculations to the Company and to the Executive within thirty (30) business days after the receipt of notice from the Company or the Executive that there has been a Potential Parachute Benefit provided to which these Excise Tax provisions apply (or such earlier time as requested by the Company). Any Excise Tax Adjustment Payment shall be paid by the Company to the Executive within fifteen (15) business days after the Companys receipt of the Firms determination.
(i.)
  
If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an IRS proceeding, or in the opinion of independent counsel agreed upon by the Company and the Executive, that the Excise Tax payable by the Executive on the Potential Parachute Benefit is less than the amount initially taken into account under Section 10(a) for purposes of calculating the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to such Potential Parachute Benefit, the Firm shall recalculate the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to reflect the actual Excise Tax. Within thirty (30) business days following the Executives receipt of notice of the results of such recalculation from the Firm and/or the Company, the Executive shall repay to the Company the excess of the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment.
(ii.)
  
If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an IRS proceeding, or in the opinion of an independent counsel agreed upon by the Company and the Executive, that the Excise Tax payable by the Executive on the Benefit is more than the amount initially taken into account under Section 10(a) for purposes of calculating the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to such Potential Parachute Benefit, the Firm shall recalculate the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to reflect the actual Excise Tax. Within thirty (30) business days following the Companys receipt of notice of the results of such recalculation from the Firm, the Company shall pay to the Executive the excess of the recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment.
(iii.)
  
All fees and expenses of the Firm and any independent counsel shall be borne solely by the Company.
(c)
  
Notice
. The Executive shall notify the Company in writing of any written claim by the IRS that, if successful, would require the payment by the Company of an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment or the recalculation of an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment. The notification shall apprise the Company of the nature of such claim, including (i) a copy of the written claim from the IRS, (ii) the identification of the element of compensation and/or benefit that is the subject of such IRS claim, and (iii) the date on which such claim is requested to be paid. Such notification shall be given as soon as practicable, but no later than ten (10) business days after the Executive actually receives notice in writing of such claim. The failure of the Executive to properly notify the Company of the IRS claim (or to provide any required information with respect thereto) shall not affect any rights granted to the Executive under this Section 10, except to the extent that the Company is materially prejudiced in the challenge to such claim as a direct result of such failure.
(d)
  
Payment
. Within ten (10) business days following receipt of such written notification by the Executive of such IRS claim, the Company shall pay to the Executive an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment, or the excess of a recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment, as applicable, related to the element of compensation and/or benefit which is the subject of the IRS claim. Within ten (10) business days following such payment to the Executive, the Executive shall provide to the Company written evidence that he or she has paid the claim to the IRS (the United States Treasury).
(e)
  
Contest
. If the Company notifies the Executive in writing, within sixty (60) business days following receipt from the Executive of notification of the IRS claim, that it desires to contest such claim, the Executive shall:
(i.)
  
Give the Company any information reasonably requested by the Company relating to such claim;
(ii.)
  
Take such action in connection with contesting such claim as the Company shall reasonably request in writing from time to time including, without limitation, accepting legal representation with respect to such claim by an attorney selected by the Company and reasonably acceptable to the Executive;
(iii.)
  
Cooperate with the Company in good faith in order to effectively contest such claim; and
(iv.)
  
Permit the Company to participate in any proceedings relating to such claim if the Company elects not to assume and control the defense of such claim;
provided
,
however
, that the Company shall bear and pay directly all costs and expenses (including additional interest and penalties) incurred in connection with such contest and shall indemnify and hold harmless the Executive, on an after-tax basis, for any Excise Tax and Income Taxes (including interest and penalties with respect thereto) imposed as a result of such representation and payment of costs and expenses. Without limitation on the foregoing provisions of this Section 10, the Company shall have the right, at its sole option, to assume the control of all proceedings in connection with such contest, in which case it may pursue or forego any and all administrative appeals, proceedings, hearings, and conferences with the taxing authority in respect of such claim, and may direct the Executive to sue for a refund or contest the claim in any permissible manner. The Executive agrees to prosecute such contest, as directed by the Company, to a determination before any administrative tribunal, in a court of initial jurisdiction and in one or more appellate courts, as the Company shall determine; and
provided further
,
however
, that (A) if the Company directs the Executive to pay such claim and sue for a refund, the Company shall advance the amount of such payment to the Executive, on an interest-free basis, and shall indemnify and hold the Executive harmless, on an after-tax basis, from any Excise Tax or income tax (including interest or penalties) imposed with respect to such advance or with respect to any imputed income in connection with such advance and (B) any extension of the statute of limitations relating to payment of tax for the taxable year of the Executive with respect to which such contested amount is claimed to be due is limited solely to such contested amount. Furthermore, the Companys rights to assume the control of the contest shall be limited to issues with respect to which an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment would be payable hereunder, and the Executive shall be entitled to settle or contest, as the case may be, any other issue raised by the IRS or any other taxing authority. To the extent that the contest of the IRS claim is successful, the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to the element of compensation and/or benefit that was the subject of the claim shall be recalculated in accordance with the provisions of Section 10(a).
(f)
 
Limitation on Potential Parachute Benefit
. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 10, if it shall be determined (by the reasonable computation of the Firm, which determination shall be certified by the Firm and set forth in a certificate delivered to Executive) that the aggregate amount of the Potential Parachute Benefits that, but for this Section 10(f), would be payable to Executive, does not exceed 110% of the greatest amount of Potential Parachute Benefits that could be paid to Executive without giving rise to any liability for Excise Taxes in connection therewith (such greatest amount, the Floor Amount), then:
(i) no Excise Tax Adjustment Benefit shall be made to Executive; and
(ii) the aggregate amount of Potential Parachute Benefits payable to Executive shall be reduced (but not below the Floor Amount) to the largest amount which would both (A) not cause any Excise Taxes to be payable by Executive, and (B) not cause any Potential Parachute Benefit to become nondeductible by the Company by reason of Section 280G of the Code (or any successor provision);
provided
,
however
, that in no event shall any such reduction (x) in any way affect any Potential Parachute Benefits that are provided to Executive in any form other than cash, or (y) reduce the aggregate amount of Potential Parachute Benefits that are payable in cash to an amount below the aggregate amount of Income Taxes payable by Executive in respect of all Potential Parachute Benefits received by him (whether in cash or otherwise).
11.
  
Wage Withholding and Reporting
. All taxable payments, reimbursements, benefits, and other amounts payable or provided by the Company pursuant to this Agreement shall be subject to applicable wage withholding of Income Taxes and shall be reported on IRS Form W-2.
12.
  
[Reserved]
13.
  
Dispute Resolution
.
Except as otherwise provided by Section 5(e) (Remedies) above, any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement (or the breach thereof) shall be settled by arbitration in the City of Chicago in accordance with the laws of the State of Illinois by one arbitrator. The arbitrator shall be appointed pursuant to Rule 11 of the American Arbitration Associations Commercial Arbitration Rules, amended and effective September 15, 2005. The arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association, Commercial Arbitration Rules. Judgment upon the award rendered by the arbitrators may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof.
14.
  
Termination Provisions
.
The Term shall automatically terminate upon the Executives attainment of age 65, and may be terminated at any time by the Company upon six (6) months advance written notice to the Executive;
provided
,
however
, that if a Change in Control occurs prior to the expiration of the Term, the Term shall not terminate prior to the second (2
nd
) anniversary of the date on which the Change in Control occurs.
15.
  
Companys Reservation of Rights
. The Company reserves the right to discontinue or modify its compensation, incentive, benefit, and perquisite plans, programs, and practices at any time and from time to time. Moreover, the brief summaries contained herein are subject to the terms of such plans, programs, and practices. For purposes of any and all employee benefit plans, the definition of compensation is as stated in such plans.
The severance benefits payable under Section 6 of this Agreement are in lieu of all other severance benefits which the Executive would otherwise be entitled to receive from the Company and any Related Company, except as may otherwise be provided in a written agreement specifically referencing this Section 15. The Executive acknowledges and agrees that the severance benefits to which the Executive may become entitled under this Agreement are in excess of those which the Executive would be entitled to under the Companys otherwise applicable severance pay plans, and that the Company is agreeing to provide such severance benefits in consideration for the Executives agreement to the terms and conditions of Section 5 of this Agreement.
16.
  
Entire Agreement; Amendments
. This Agreement represents the entire agreement between the Executive and the Company in respect of the subject matter contained herein and supersedes all prior agreements, promises, covenants, arrangements, communications, representations, or warranties, whether oral or written, by any officer, executive, or representative of any party hereto, including, but not limited to, the Initial Agreement. Except as specifically provided in Section 7, no amendments or modifications to this Agreement may be made except in writing signed by the Company (as authorized by the Board) and the Executive.
17.
  
Survivorship
. The respective rights and obligations of the parties hereunder shall survive the expiration of the Term and any termination of the Executives employment to the extent necessary to the intended preservation of such rights and obligations.
18.
  
Notices
. Any notice and all other communications provided for in this Agreement to be given to a party shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given when delivered in person or two (2) business days after being placed in the United States mails by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, duly addressed to the party concerned at the address indicated below or to such changed address as such party may subsequently furnish to the other in writing in accordance herewith, except that notices of change of address shall be effective only upon receipt:
If to the Company:
Brunswick Corporation
1 N. Field Court
Lake Forest, IL 60045
Attn: Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
If to the Executive:
at the last address filed with the Company
19.
  
Severability
. The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement. If any provision of this Agreement shall be held invalid or unenforceable in part, the remaining portion of such provision, together with all other provisions of this Agreement, shall remain valid and enforceable and continue in full force and effect to the fullest extent consistent with law. In furtherance and not in limitation of the foregoing, should the duration or geographical extent of, or business activities covered by, any provision of this Agreement be in excess of that which is valid and enforceable under applicable law, then such provision shall be construed to cover only that duration, extent, or activities which may be validly enforced.
20.
  
Headings
. Headings to Sections hereof are for convenience of reference only and shall not be construed to alter or affect the meaning of any provision of this Agreement.
21.
  
Injunctive Relief
. If there is a breach or threatened breach of the provisions of this Agreement, the non-breaching party shall be entitled to an injunction restraining the breaching party from such breach. Nothing herein shall be construed as prohibiting either party from pursuing any other remedies for a breach or threatened breach of this Agreement.
22.
  
No Assignment or Attachment
. Except as required by law, no right to receive payments under this Agreement shall be subject to anticipation, commutation, alienation, sale, assignment, encumbrance, charge, pledge, or hypothecation, or to execution, attachment, levy, or similar process or assignment by operation of law, and any attempt, voluntary or involuntary, to effect any such action shall be null, void, and of no effect;
provided
,
however
, that nothing in this Section 22 shall preclude the assumption of such rights by executors, administrators, or other legal representatives of the Executive or his estate and their assigning any rights hereunder to the person or persons entitled thereto; and
provided further
,
however
, that the Company may not assign this Agreement except in connection with an assignment or disposition of all or substantially all of the assets or stock of the Company or the division, subsidiary, or business unit for which the Executive is providing services under this Agreement or by law as a result of a merger or consolidation.
23.
  
Successors, Assumption of Contract
. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and any
successor
of the Company. The Company will require any successor (whether direct or indirect, by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business and/or assets of the Company to expressly assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent that the Company would be required to perform it if no succession had taken place.
As used in this Agreement, except for purposes of Section 5(a), the term Company shall mean the Company as hereinbefore defined and any successor of the Company and any permitted assignee to which this Agreement is assigned.
24.
  
Work For Hire Acknowledgment; Assignment
. The Executive acknowledges that all of the Executives work on and contributions to the Companys products (the Products) including, without limitation, any and all patterns, designs, and other expressions in any tangible medium (collectively, the Works) are within the scope of the Executives employment and are a part of the services, duties, and responsibilities of the Executive. All of the Executives work on and contributions to the Works will be rendered and made by the Executive for, at the instigation of, and under the overall direction of, the Company, and all of the Executives said work and contributions, as well as the Works, are and at all times shall be regarded as work made for hire as that term is used in the United States copyright laws. Without curtailing or limiting this acknowledgment, the Executive hereby assigns, grants, and delivers exclusively to the Company, as to work on and contribution to the Products pursuant hereto, all rights, titles, and renewals. The Executive will execute and deliver to the Company, or its successors and assigns, such other and further assignments, instruments, and documents as it from time to time reasonably may request for the purpose of establishing, evidencing, and enforcing or defending its complete, exclusive, perpetual, and worldwide ownership of all rights, titles, and interests of every kind and nature whatsoever, including all copyrights, in and to the Works. The Executive hereby constitutes and appoints the Company as his agent and attorney-in-fact, with full power of substitution, to execute and deliver said assignments, instruments, or documents as the Executive may fail or refuse to execute and deliver, this power and agency being coupled with an interest and being irrevocable.
25.
  
Governing Law
. The validity, interpretation, construction, and performance of this Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois, without regard to its choice of laws provisions, for contracts made and to be performed wholly in such state;
provided
,
however
, the rights of the Executive to indemnification under Section 9 shall be governed by the laws of the State of Delaware.
26.
  
Termination of Initial Agreement
. From and after the Effective Date, this Agreement shall supersede any other employment agreement, severance agreement, indemnification agreement and change of control agreement between the parties, including the Initial Agreement.
27.
  
Counterparts
. This
Agreement
may be executed in two (2) or more counterparts, any one of which shall be deemed the original without reference to the others.
IN WITNESS THEREOF, the Executive has hereunto set his hand and the Company has caused these presents to be executed in its name and on its behalf, and its corporate seal to be hereunto affixed, all as of the Effective Date.
 
 
Appendix I
 
 
Definitions
.
Whether a Reduction in Authority or Responsibility of the Executive has occurred shall be determined in accordance with the criteria set forth below in the definition of Reduction in Authority or Responsibility;
provided
,
however
, that (A) a change in the Executives reporting relationship to another executive who is within the same reporting level (as that term is used in the Companys Delegation of Authority Policy or any successor policy); or (B) a reduction in the Executives business units budget or a reduction in the Executives business units head count or number of direct reports, by themselves, shall not constitute Good Reason.
It is intended by this definition that a Change in Control by itself, absent a Reduction in Authority or Responsibility as described above, will not constitute Good Reason.
Appendix II
 
Changes to Base Salary,
BPP Awards, SIP Awards,
And Equity Incentives Awards
Appendix III
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Intending to be legally bound hereby, I execute the foregoing General Release this ______ day of _________________, 20___.
 
 
Appendix IV
 
 
Brunswick Corporation (the Corporation) shall indemnify Executive (hereinafter, Indemnitee) against expenses and costs incurred by Indemnitee in connection with any claims, suits or proceedings arising from his service to the Corporation, to the fullest extent that is lawful in accordance with the following terms and conditions:
1.
Acts and Omissions Covered By This Agreement
. The Corporations agreement to indemnify Indemnitee (Agreement) shall cover any act or omission by an Indemnitee which (i) occurs or is alleged to have occurred by reason of his being or having been an officer or a director, (ii) occurs or is alleged to have occurred before, during or after the time when the Indemnitee served as an officer or a director and (iii) gives rise to, or is the direct or indirect subject of a claim in any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding at any time or times whether during or after his service as an officer or director.
2.
Indemnity
.
3.
Burden of Proof
. Indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification for any act or omission covered in Section 1 of this Agreement. The burden of proof of establishing that Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification because of the failure to fulfill some requirement of Delaware law, the Corporations charter, by-laws, or this Agreement shall be on the Corporation.
4.
  
Notice by Indemnitee
. Indemnitee shall notify the Corporation in writing of any matter with respect to which Indemnitee intends to seek indemnification hereunder as soon as reasonably practicable following the receipt by Indemnitee of written threat thereof;
provided
,
however
, that failure to so notify the Corporation shall not constitute a waiver by Indemnitee of his rights hereunder.
5.
 
Advancement of Expenses
. In the event of any action, suit or proceeding against Indemnitee which may give rise to a right of indemnification from the Corporation pursuant to this Agreement, following written request to the Corporation by the Indemnitee, the Corporation shall advance to Indemnitee amounts to cover expenses incurred by Indemnitee in defending the action, suit or proceeding in advance of final disposition upon receipt of (i) an undertaking by or on behalf of the Indemnitee to repay the amount advanced in the event that it shall be ultimately determined in accordance with Section 3 of this Agreement that he is not entitled to indemnification by the Corporation, and (ii) satisfactory evidence as to the amount of such expenses. Indemnitees written certification together with a copy of the statement paid or to be paid by Indemnitee shall constitute satisfactory evidence unless determined to the contrary in an arbitration proceeding conducted pursuant to Section 8 of this Agreement.
6.
Non-Exclusivity of Right of Indemnification
. The indemnification rights granted to Indemnitee under this Agreement shall not be deemed exclusive of, or in limitation of, any rights to which Indemnitee may be entitled under Delaware law, the Corporations charter or By-laws, any other agreement, vote of stockholders or directors or otherwise.
7.
 
Termination of Agreement and Survival of Right of Indemnification
.
8.
 
Arbitration of all Disputes Concerning Entitlement
. Any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement including, without limitation, the Indemnitees entitlement to indemnification under this Agreement, shall be settled by arbitration in the City of Chicago administered by the American Arbitration Association in accordance with its Commercial Arbitration Rules, and judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof. Interest on any judgment shall be assessed at a rate or rates the arbitrator considers just under the circumstances. If it is necessary or desirable for the Indemnitee to retain legal counsel or incur other costs and expenses in connection with enforcement of his rights under this Agreement, the Corporation shall pay his reasonable attorneys fees and costs and expenses in connection with enforcement of his rights (including the enforcement of any arbitration award in court), regardless of the final outcome, unless the arbitrator determines that under the circumstances recovery by the Indemnitee of all or a part of any such fees and costs and expenses would be unjust.
9.
Governing Law
. The Corporations obligations to indemnify Indemnitee under these terms and conditions shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware without regard to its choice of law provisions.
10.
Severability
. If any provision of this Agreement is determined to be invalid or unenforceable, this invalidity or unenforceability shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provisions of this Agreement, and this Agreement shall be interpreted as though the invalid or unenforceable provision was not part of this Agreement.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20070119152507.txt.gz
TIME:20070119152507
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
As a result of the reorganization of the marine operations of Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) described below in Item 8.01, Peter B. Hamilton will retire as Vice Chairman of the Board of Directors and President - Brunswick Boat Group effective January 31, 2007.
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
On January 18, 2007, Brunswick announced a new organizational structure to advance the integration of its marine operations. Under the new structure, the heads of Brunswicks boat divisions will report to Dustan E. McCoy - Chairman and Chief Executive Officer. In addition, Patrick C. Mackey has been named Executive Vice President of Brunswick and Chief Operating Officer - Marine. Mr. Mackey will continue to serve as President - Mercury Marine Group. In his new role, Mr. Mackey will assume functional responsibility for a range of activities across Brunswicks marine operations.
 
A news release announcing the new organizational structure for Brunswicks marine operations and the retirement of Mr. Hamilton is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1, and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits:
 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3
EXHIBIT INDEX:
4

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Jan. 18, 2007 -
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today a new, streamlined organizational structure to advance the integration of its marine operations.
In our effort to be the best, as well as the largest, marine company in the world, it is important for us to coordinate our efforts to have the best products sold through the best distribution network, the best cost position and a global presence across all of our marine operations. To achieve this goal in a more focused and timely fashion, we are forming a new organizational structure, explained Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.
Under the new structure, the company said that the heads of its boat divisions will report directly to McCoy. In addition, Patrick C. Mackey, 60, has been named executive vice president of Brunswick Corporation and chief operating officer - marine. In this new position, Mackey will have functional responsibility for sourcing, logistics, strategic bill of materials, systems engineering, product platform development, and manufacturing excellence across the companys marine operations. Mackey will continue to serve as president - Mercury Marine Group.
As a result of this reorganization, Peter B. Hamilton, vice chairman of Brunswick Corporation and president - Brunswick Boat Group, will retire from the company at the end of this month. Hamilton has served Brunswick in a number of capacities during his
11 years at the company, including executive vice president and chief financial officer, president - Brunswick Bowling & Billiards and president - Life Fitness Division, before assuming his current role.
I want to thank Peter for his innumerable contributions over the years. He has helped to build Brunswick into the leading company it is today, and all of us in the Brunswick family wish him the best, McCoy added.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20070125093215.txt.gz
TIME:20070125093215
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]    
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]    
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]    
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]    
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 25, 2007, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2006 and the full year. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
 
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswicks management believes that presentation of: (i)
 
diluted earnings per share excluding non-recurring tax benefits in both 2006 and 2005, an investment sale gain in the first quarter of 2005 and impairment charges incurred in the fourth quarter of 2006
; (ii) net sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior years results; and (iii)
Brunswick's effective tax rate excluding the effect of the non-recurring tax benefits and the investment sale provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
2
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits:
 
3
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
4
EXHIBIT INDEX
 
 
5

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Jan. 25, 2007
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today earnings from continuing operations of $0.47 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2006, compared with $0.85 per diluted share for the same quarter a year ago. Results for 2006 include a $0.25 per diluted share tax-related benefit and $0.14 per diluted share for costs associated with restructuring actions announced in November 2006. Results for 2005 include a $0.17 per diluted share tax-related benefit. Excluding the non-recurring tax benefits, earnings for the fourth quarter of 2006 totaled $0.22 per diluted share versus $0.68 per diluted share a year earlier.
Commenting on the quarter, Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy said, We are pleased with our performance in light of the difficult marine market conditions we faced throughout the year. While sales from our marine operations were down 2 percent in their seasonally slow fourth quarter, the decline was partially offset by 9 percent growth from our fitness equipment business and sales gains at our bowling retail centers, which are seasonally stronger at this time of the year. These results demonstrate that we are continuing to make fundamental changes in our operating abilities and are a testament to the strength of our brands, the soundness of our strategy and the talents, abilities and commitment of our employees around the world.
Our balance sheet remained healthy with debt-to-total capital at 28.0 percent at year end, compared with 26.8 percent a year earlier, and cash totaled $283 million, McCoy noted. Our free cash flow from continuing operations for 2006 was $153 million, allowing us the financial flexibility to reinvest in our businesses and add value for our shareholders. For example, in 2006 between dividends and the repurchase of 5.6 million shares, we returned approximately $251 million to shareholders.
Fourth Quarter Results
For the quarter ended Dec. 31, 2006, the company reported net sales from continuing operations of $1,370.8 million, down slightly from $1,381.7 million a year earlier. Excluding incremental sales from acquired businesses, sales declined 2 percent in the quarter. Operating earnings for the fourth quarter of 2006 totaled $30.5 million, as compared with $99.6 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins were 2.2 percent compared with 7.2 percent in the year-ago period. Contributing to the decline in both operating earnings and operating margins was an $18.9 million pre-tax restructuring charge recorded during the quarter for severance costs, asset write-downs and other costs associated with work force reductions, plant shutdowns and distribution realignment actions announced in November 2006.
Net earnings from continuing operations were $44.2 million, or $0.47 per diluted share, down from $83.7 million, or $0.85 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2005. Net earnings per share for the fourth quarter of 2006 included tax-related benefits of $0.25 per diluted share, as well as the aforementioned restructuring charge equivalent to $0.14 per diluted share. The fourth quarter of 2005 included a $0.17 per diluted share tax-related benefit. Excluding tax-related benefits, earnings per diluted share totaled $0.22 and $0.68 for the fourth quarters of 2006 and 2005, respectively.
During the fourth quarter of 2006, the company repurchased approximately 1.0 million shares of its common stock for approximately $32.5 million.
In April 2006, the company announced its decision to pursue the sale of substantially all of its Brunswick New Technologies business unit, which is being accounted for as a discontinued operation. For the fourth quarter of 2006, the company reported a net loss from discontinued operations of $97.4 million, or $1.04 per diluted share, compared with net earnings of $4.6 million, or $0.05 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2005.
In a December 2006 announcement, the company said that proceeds from the sale of BNT were expected to be less than its book value at that time. As a result, the company recorded $85.6 million of asset impairment charges, equivalent to $0.92 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2006.
2006 Results
For the year ended Dec. 31, 2006, the company had net sales from continuing operations of $5,665.0 million, up 1 percent from $5,606.9 million in 2005. Excluding the benefit of acquisitions, sales were down 3 percent. Operating earnings from continuing operations totaled $341.2 million for the year, down from $468.7 million in 2005, and operating margins were 6.0 percent versus 8.4 percent a year ago. For 2006, operating earnings and operating margins were affected by the previously mentioned $18.9 million pre-tax restructuring charge.
Net earnings from continuing operations for 2006 were $263.2 million, or $2.78 per diluted share, compared with $371.1 million, or $3.76 per diluted share, in 2005. Results for 2006 included tax-related benefits of $0.50 per diluted share, as well as the previously mentioned $0.14 restructuring charge. Results for 2005 included tax-related benefits of $0.31 per diluted share and a $0.32 per diluted share gain on the sale of approximately 1.9 million shares of MarineMax, Inc. stock. Excluding the tax-related benefits and the gain on the stock sale, earnings for 2006 totaled $2.28 per diluted share compared with $3.13 per diluted share in 2005.
Tax-related benefits for both 2006 and 2005 were primarily due to the settlement of prior years federal and state tax audits.
For 2006, the company reported a net loss from discontinued operations of $129.3 million, or $1.37 per diluted share, compared with net earnings of $14.3 million, or $0.14 per diluted share for 2005. The net loss for 2006 includes the previously mentioned $85.6 million, or $0.91 per diluted share, of asset impairment charges.
Boat Segment
The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and includes 19 boat brands, as well as a marine parts and accessories business. The Boat segment reported net sales for the fourth quarter of $664.5 million, down 1 percent compared with $671.7 million in the fourth quarter of 2005. Excluding contributions from 2006 acquisitions, Boat segment sales decreased 4 percent in the quarter. Operating earnings for the Boat segment decreased to $9.3 million, down from $30.6 million reported in the fourth quarter of 2005, and operating margins declined to 1.4 percent from 4.6 percent. Approximately $4.2 million of the previously mentioned $18.9 million restructuring charge was recorded in the Boat segment during the fourth quarter of 2006 for plant closures, work force reductions and other cost-cutting measures.
For 2006, Boat segment sales were up 3 percent to $2,864.4 million from $2,783.4 million in 2005. Excluding incremental sales from acquisitions, Boat segment sales were down 4 percent for the year. Operating earnings for the Boat segment were $135.6 million, down from $192.5 million in 2005, and operating margins were 4.7 percent compared with 6.9 percent a year ago.
For the year, our increase in boat sales was completely driven by acquisitions, McCoy explained. During 2006 we acquired Cabo Yachts and Diversified Marine and also had the benefit of a full years ownership of Kellogg Marine and our Triton and HarrisKayot boat brands. The reduction in operating margins was primarily due to lower production in most of our boat brands to manage pipeline inventories and a shift in product mix to lower-margin boats.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, reported net sales of $511.3 million in the fourth quarter of 2006, down 2 percent from $519.8 million in the year-ago fourth quarter. Operating earnings in the fourth quarter declined to $3.8 million versus $33.8 million, and operating margins were 0.7 percent compared with 6.5 percent for the same quarter in 2005. During the fourth quarter of 2006, approximately $9.5 million of the $18.9 million restructuring charge was recorded in the Marine Engine segment, primarily for severance costs.
For the full year, Marine Engine segment net sales were down 1 percent to $2,271.3 million from $2,300.6 million, and operating earnings were $193.8 million versus $250.5 million in 2005. Operating margins decreased for the year to 8.5 percent from 10.9 percent in 2005.
Sales growth for the year was driven by contributions from Mercury Marines non-U.S. markets, McCoy said. Mercurys international sales totaled nearly $822 million in 2006, up from approximately $791 million the previous year. Meanwhile, in our U.S. markets, sterndrive engine sales totaled $554 million for 2006 as compared with $561 million in 2005. The U.S. outboard engine business was off about 10 percent, coming in at $434 million in sales for the year, down from $480 million in 2005, reflecting the difficult U.S. marine market, as well as successful efforts to reduce pipeline inventories. Sales of Mercurys domestic parts and services were up slightly to $353 million versus $352 million in 2006 and 2005, respectively.
The company said that the decrease in segment operating earnings was largely due to fixed-cost absorption as a result of lower production rates to reduce pipeline inventory levels. Other contributing factors were costs to ramp up Asian manufacturing plants, higher research and development expense and the full-year impact of the mix shift to low-emission outboard engines, as well as the previously mentioned restructuring charge.
 
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment. Segment net sales in the fourth quarter of 2006 totaled $192.8 million, up 9 percent from $176.1 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings decreased 5 percent to $28.9 million from $30.4 million, and operating margins were 15.0 percent, down from 17.3 percent in the fourth quarter of 2005.
For 2006, the Fitness segment reported net sales of $593.1 million, up 8 percent from $551.4 million in 2005. Operating earnings in 2006 increased 3 percent to $57.8 million from $56.1 million, and operating margins were 9.7 percent compared with 10.2 percent a year ago.
Sales momentum grew during the year, particularly in the consumer segment where new products such as the popular elliptical line and the T5 and T7 series of treadmills fueled growth in the fourth quarter, McCoy explained. Operating earnings and margins were under some pressure due to higher spending for research and development, the shift in our mix to lower-margin strength equipment and higher freight and installation costs.
 
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables. Segment net sales in the fourth quarter of 2006 totaled $120.1 million, down 5 percent compared with $126.2 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings were $5.6 million in the quarter versus $15.2 million in the comparable quarter in 2005, and operating margins were 4.7 percent compared with 12.0 percent a year ago. During the fourth quarter of 2006, the Bowling & Billiards segment recognized $4.5 million in restructuring charges, primarily for costs associated with distribution realignment activities.
For 2006, the segment reported net sales of $458.3 million, down 1 percent from $464.5 million in 2005. Operating earnings for the year were $22.1 million compared with $37.2 million in 2005, and operating margins were 4.8 percent versus 8.0 percent a year earlier. The decline in operating earnings was primarily due to the aforementioned restructuring charge, costs associated with the transition of bowling ball and coin-operated billiards table production to Mexico, as well as lower gains on the sale of bowling centers.
For the quarter and the year, our bowling retail business benefited from the success of marketing efforts designed to bring more customers into our centers. This resulted in solid sales growth at both our Brunswick Zones, as well as the newer and larger Brunswick Zone XL centers, McCoy said. We plan to open three new Zone XL centers during 2007. Sales of bowling capital equipment were down in the quarter versus a year ago when we had a large shipment to an international customer, which resulted in a difficult year-over-year comparison. Sales of Brunswick billiards products increased due to strong demand for new tables introduced in the second half of the year, offsetting a decline in our Valley-Dynamo coin-operated billiards table segment. The move of coin-operated table manufacturing to Mexico will help us reduce costs in this operation.
Looking Ahead
As we look to 2007, we remain focused on our strategic initiatives, which will serve us well in the long term, McCoy said. Managing pipeline inventories in the near term, however, is important in a cyclical business. There were 34 weeks of supply of boats in the pipeline at year end, up from 31 weeks at the end of 2005, whereas engines were flat at 26 weeks of supply. For our planning purposes, we are not counting on an increase in retail demand this year to reduce field inventories. We are assuming marine retail demand will be down in the low- to mid-single digits. Therefore, we will be reducing production through at least the first half of 2007 to shrink pipelines. Reduced fixed-cost absorption on lower production will adversely affect sales and earnings.
Overall sales are expected to be relatively flat, give or take a couple of percentage points, with declines in our marine operations offset by mid-single digit growth from our fitness and bowling and billiards operations, McCoy added. Operating margins will be adversely affected by lower fixed-cost absorption on reduced production volumes, higher pricing offset by inflationary pressures on raw material costs, increased variable compensation costs, additional restructuring charges and a higher effective tax rate. The midpoint of our earnings estimate assumes operating margins will be down about 100 basis points. For 2007, we are estimating earnings in the range of $1.65 to $2.00 per share. The year-over-year comparisons will be the most difficult in the first quarter as the first part of 2006 was strong relative to the rest of the year. Consequently, our earnings will be more second-half weighted compared with the earnings pattern we would typically see.
Despite the challenges of a soft marine market, we continue to execute against our strategy, emphasizing the critical need to: get the product right, get the distribution right, be best cost in our industries, be global and attract and retain talent, McCoy continued. This has enabled us to grow through the ups and downs of the marine cycles and produce higher peak and trough earnings than in prior cycles. It is the dedication and contributions of our employees around the world that makes that happen.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this press release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this filing. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; competition in the consumer electronics markets; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the ability to successfully complete announced divestitures; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2005 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 30, 2006.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20070314131359.txt.gz
TIME:20070314131359
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On March 13, 2007, Peter Harf informed Dustan E. McCoy, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Brunswick Corporation ("Brunswick"), of his intention to retire from the Brunswick Board of Directors, effective immediately. Dr. Harf had no disagreements with Brunswick on any matter relating to its operations, policies or practices, and is retiring in order to devote more time to his other professional responsibilities. Mr. McCoy joins the Board of Directors of Brunswick in thanking Dr. Harf for his dedicated service and valued contributions to Brunswick over the past eleven years.
 
 
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20070426093939.txt.gz
TIME:20070426093939
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
ITEM 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 26, 2007, Brunswick Corporation announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2007. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its first quarter 2007 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswicks management believes that presentation of: (i) diluted earnings per share for the quarters ended March 31, 2007 and April 1, 2006, excluding non-recurring tax benefits; and (ii) net sales excluding acquisitions not reflected in the prior years results, provide a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
2
ITEM 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits:
 
 
3
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
4
EXHIBIT INDEX:
5

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., April 26, 2007
- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today net earnings from continuing operations of $34.3 million, or $0.38 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2007, compared with net earnings from continuing operations of $74.1 million, or $0.77 per diluted share, for the year-ago quarter. Diluted earnings per share include $0.03 and $0.13 of tax-related benefits in the first quarters of 2007 and 2006, respectively.
Commenting on the first quarter, Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy said, We are pleased with our results for the quarter, demonstrating our ability to produce good earnings despite challenging marine market conditions. Helping to mitigate the effects of a soft domestic marine market were strong sales contributions from our international marine operations and fitness segment, growth in marine parts and accessories, and incremental sales from acquired businesses. Given that we are at the start of the marine selling season, and considering our pipeline inventories and production schedules for the remainder of the year, we are affirming our earnings expectations for 2007, which we have previously stated were in the range of $1.65 to $2.00 per diluted share.
 
First Quarter Results
The company said that sales in the first quarter of 2007 totaled $1,386.1 million, down 2 percent from $1,413.3 million for the year-ago quarter. Excluding sales from businesses acquired subsequent to the first quarter of 2006, sales declined 3 percent quarter-over-quarter. Operating earnings in the first quarter of 2007 totaled $53.0 million, compared with $98.2 million a year ago. The company reported net earnings from continuing operations of $34.3 million, or $0.38 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2007, versus $74.1 million, or $0.77 per diluted share, in the year-ago quarter. Diluted earnings per share include $0.03 and $0.13 of tax-related benefits in the first quarters of 2007 and 2006, respectively.
During the first quarter of 2007, the company repurchased 1.0 million shares of its common stock for approximately $33.4 million. Fully diluted common shares totaled 92.0 million in the first quarter of 2007, compared with 96.6 million shares in the same period of 2006.
Discontinued Operations
In April 2006, the company announced its decision to pursue the sale of substantially all of its Brunswick New Technologies (BNT) business unit, which is being accounted for as a discontinued operation. During the quarter, the company completed the sale of BNTs marine electronics and portable navigation device businesses in separate transactions. Sale of the final piece of BNT, the wireless fleet tracking business, is progressing. For the first quarter of 2007, the company reported net earnings from discontinued operations of $0.12 per diluted share, compared with a loss of $0.07 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2006. Results for 2007 were primarily due to gains on the sale of the two businesses and tax-related benefits.
Boat Segment
The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and produces fiberglass and aluminum boats and marine parts and accessories, as well as offers dealer management systems. The Boat segment reported sales for the first quarter of 2007 of $699.0 million, down 7 percent compared with $751.0 million for the first quarter of 2006. Excluding incremental sales from acquired businesses, segment sales declined 9 percent. Operating earnings were $19.5 million, down from $48.4 million for the quarter, and operating margins were 2.8 percent compared with 6.4 percent in the prior year.
Sales benefited from gains in Boat Group parts and accessories and increased sales outside of the United States, which helped offset declines in domestic boat shipments to reduce pipeline inventories, McCoy explained. Operating earnings were affected by lower sales, reduced fixed-cost absorption from production cuts, costs associated with previously announced restructuring efforts, as well as by increased discounts offered to spur retail demand. At the end of the quarter, boat pipeline inventories stood at 34 weeks of supply compared with 32 weeks of supply a year ago. While up, we are making progress. The two-week inventory build year-over-year was below the three-week build we saw at the end of the December quarter. Pipeline reductions were particularly pronounced in fiberglass boats.
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, reported sales of $572.6 million in the first quarter of 2007, up 3 percent from $555.0 million in the year-ago first quarter. Operating earnings in the first quarter declined to $34.7 million versus $44.9 million, and operating margins were 6.1 percent compared with 8.1 percent for the same quarter in 2006.
Similar to our boat business, the engine segment reported strong sales growth from areas outside the United States as well as from Mercurys parts and accessories business, McCoy explained. These gains helped to offset declines in domestic engine sales, reflecting continuing difficult market conditions. The decline in operating earnings was due in large part to lower fixed-cost absorption resulting from reduced production rates and a shift in product mix. At the end of the quarter there were 31 weeks of supply of engines in the pipeline, up from 28 weeks a year ago. The increase was partially due to higher shipments to customers who made purchases in advance of a systems conversion at Mercury.
 
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment. For the first quarter of 2007, segment sales increased 8 percent to $145.0 million, up from $134.0 million in the year-ago quarter. Segment operating earnings were down 9 percent for the first quarter of 2007, totaling $8.1 million compared with $8.9 million for the year-ago quarter. Operating margins were 5.6 percent versus 6.6 percent a year ago.
Sales growth was driven by strength in international markets, where growth rates exceeded those in the United States, McCoy said. Increased spending on research and development for a number of new products reduced operating earnings in the quarter. These investments, however, will enable Life Fitness to continue to outpace the competition with new and innovative products.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables. Segment sales in the first quarter of 2007 totaled $105.8 million, down from $114.7 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating earnings were $8.3 million in the first quarter versus $12.8 million in the year-ago quarter. Operating margins were 7.8 percent as compared with 11.2 percent in 2006.
The sales decline was primarily in our bowling products and coin-operated billiards businesses. Sales from our retail bowling centers were off slightly due to a fewer number of centers operating than in the year-ago quarter, McCoy said. On a same-center basis, sales increased quarter-over-quarter. We also continued to invest in new Brunswick Zone XL retail bowling centers, and we will add at least three more to our portfolio this year. Operating margins were affected by costs associated with the transition of bowling ball manufacturing from Michigan to Mexico, as well as relocating our commercial billiards table manufacturing from Texas to Mexico.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by our customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the ability to successfully complete announced divestitures; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2006.
 
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity
in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, HarrisKayot, Hatteras, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
.
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data)
(unaudited)
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Selected Financial Information
(in millions)
(unaudited)
Segment Information
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Condensed Balance Sheets
(in millions)
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Condensed Statements of Cash Flows
(in millions)
(unaudited)
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20070614173451.txt.gz
TIME:20070614173451
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On June 14, 2007, Marschall I. Smith resigned as Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of Brunswick Corporation with an effective date of July 2, 2007.
 
 
 
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20070720083919.txt.gz
TIME:20070720083919
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02                      Results of Operation and Financial Condition.
On July 20, 2007, Brunswick Corporation announced its preliminary and unaudited earnings estimate for its second quarter ended June 30, 2007, as well as an update to its earnings estimate for the 2007 year.  The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its preliminary and unaudited earnings estimate for its second quarter ended June 30, 2007, as well as the update to its earnings estimate for 2007 is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 8.01                       Other Events.
The information set forth above in Item 2.02 of this Form 8-K is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01  F
   
   
inancial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3
EXHIBIT INDEX:
4

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
    
 
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today announced it was lowering production of marine products in the second half of 2007 due to continued weakness in retail markets in the United States.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 20, 2007 
Preliminary industry data indicates that retail sales are down by as much as 13 percent in our key category of sterndrive and inboard powered fiberglass boats in the second quarter, which historically represents the strongest period of the selling season, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  In an effort to manage our pipeline inventories, we have been reducing both our production levels and our wholesale shipments of boats.  Through the first half of the year, wholesale shipments have been significantly below levels in the same period a year ago, as well as below 2007 retail sales.  Despite our actions, however, with the anemic retail demand for sterndrive and inboard fiberglass boats we have not made meaningful progress in reducing our pipeline inventories for these products.  We also see no reason to believe that retail trends will reverse in the second half of the year, which is the slowest period for boat sales.  As we go into the 2008 model year, which began July 1, commitments received from our dealers support our view of the retail environment.  To ensure the continued health of the company and that of our distribution network, we are reducing further production levels for both boats and engines.
           The company said it will report its final financial results for the second quarter of 2007 on Thursday, July 26, before the market opens, but expects to report diluted earnings per share from continuing operations of $0.64 to $0.65.  Primarily due to the lower production levels planned for the second half of the year, the company is reducing its earnings estimate for 2007 to a range of $1.20 to $1.35 per diluted share from continuing operations.  This reflects the effect of lower sales and lower fixed-cost absorption from the production cuts, among other factors.  Previously, the company had estimated diluted earnings per share from continuing operations of $1.65 to $2.00 for 2007.
 
 
 
Conference Called Scheduled
The company said a conference call with investors has been scheduled for 10 a.m. CDT today, hosted by McCoy, Peter G. Leemputte, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Kathryn J. Chieger, vice president - corporate and investor relations. The call will be broadcast over the Internet at http://www.brunswick.com .
To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.  Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call 888-730-9138 (passcode: Brunswick).  Callers outside of North America should call +1-773-756-4700 to be connected. These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call. A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Friday, July 27, 2007, by dialing 866-495-2417 if calling from the United States, or by dialing +1-203-369-1755 if calling from outside the United States. The replay will also be available at http://www.brunswick.com .
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of a weak economy and stock market on consumer confidence and thus the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; competitive pricing pressures; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain market share in high-margin products; competition from new technologies; imports from Asia and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to obtain component parts from suppliers; the ability to maintain effective distribution; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by the companys customers; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions; the ability to successfully complete announced divestitures; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to develop product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the impact of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; and the impact of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products. Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2006 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2007.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo, Crestliner, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Valley-Dynamo pool, Air Hockey and foosball tables. For more information, visit .
http://www.brunswick.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20070726083531.txt.gz
TIME:20070726083531
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
Item 2.02                      Results of Operation and Financial Condition.
On July 26, 2007, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2007. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its second quarter 2007 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswicks management believes that presentation of diluted earnings from continuing operations per share for the three and six months ended June 30, 2007 and July 1, 2006, excluding non-recurring tax benefits, provides a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
2
 
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
3
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
4
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
5

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today net earnings from continuing operations of $0.65 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2007, compared with $0.99 per diluted share for the year-ago second quarter.  Net earnings from continuing operations for the second quarter of 2006 include a $0.06 per diluted share benefit from tax-related items.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 26, 2007
We are pleased with our second quarter results given the increasingly difficult economic environment in which consumers are deferring expenditures for large ticket discretionary items, a factor affecting retail demand for marine products in the United States, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  Double-digit sales growth in marine products in non-U.S. markets, boat parts and accessories and commercial fitness equipment helped to offset a 10 percent decline in marine product sales in the United States.
Second Quarter Results
           For the quarter ended June 30, 2007, overall net sales decreased slightly to $1,522.9 million, down from $1,543.1 million a year earlier.  Operating earnings declined to $89.3 million compared with $138.2 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins were 5.9 percent, down from 9.0 percent.  Net earnings from continuing operations totaled $58.9 million, or $0.65 per diluted share, down from $94.5 million, or $0.99 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2006.  In the second quarter of 2006, the company recorded a tax benefit of $0.06 per diluted share.  Debt-to-total capital was 27.4 percent at quarter end as compared with 26.2 percent a year earlier, and cash totaled $278.8 million.
Lower wholesale unit shipments across our marine portfolio, coupled with lower fixed-cost absorption on reduced production and additional funds for retail and dealer promotional support were the primary drivers behind the reduction in operating earnings, McCoy said.
The company said that during the second quarter of 2007, it acquired 1.6 million shares of its common stock for $53.8 million.  Including stock purchases made subsequent to quarter end, 3.0 million shares have been acquired year-to-date for $100.3 million.  The company said it has approximately $266 million remaining under a $500 million repurchase authorization approved by its Board of Directors in 2006.  Diluted shares outstanding averaged 91.0 million in the second quarter of 2007, down from 95.5 million for the second quarter of 2006.
Discontinued Operations
For the second quarter of 2007, the company had net earnings from discontinued operations of $0.4 million, or $0.00 per diluted share, compared with a loss of $11.3 million, or $0.12 per diluted share, for the same period in 2006.  During the second quarter of 2006, the company announced its decision to sell substantially all of its Brunswick New Technologies (BNT) business unit.
Earlier this month, Brunswick announced it has essentially brought the disposition of the key BNT business units to a close with the sale of the BNT fleet management business unit to Navman Wireless Holdings L.P.  Previously, Brunswick had sold the marine electronics portion of BNT to Navico International Ltd., while the personal navigation device business was purchased by MiTAC International Corporation.
 
Boat Segment
The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and produces fiberglass and aluminum boats and marine parts and accessories, as well as offers dealer management systems.  The Boat segment reported net sales for the second quarter of 2007 of $732.8 million, down 5 percent from $769.7 million in the second quarter of 2006.  Operating earnings decreased to $19.3 million from $53.1 million reported in the second quarter of 2006, and operating margins were 2.6 percent, down from 6.9 percent.
Our boat parts and accessories business and boat sales outside the United States were bright spots, each posting double-digit increases in the quarter.  This was more than offset by the decline in boat sales in the U.S., where we continue to contend with a number of factors that have contributed to a challenging marine market.  Higher interest rates, weak housing markets and higher prices for fuel, food and other essentials have continued to erode consumers disposable income.  Further, the depressed housing situation is most pronounced in Florida and California, which are two of the nations largest boating markets, McCoy said.  To manage our pipeline inventories, we have reduced shipments to our dealers; however, fixed-cost absorption on lower production and higher promotional spending to spur demand have had an adverse effect on operating earnings.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, reported net sales of $669.6 million in the second quarter of 2007, slightly higher than the $668.5 million in the year-ago quarter.  Operating earnings in the second quarter decreased to $83.3 million versus $94.7 million, and operating margins declined to 12.4 percent from 14.2 percent for the same quarter in 2006.
Higher segment sales of products outside of the United States, where we reported double-digit sales increases in all regions, helped to offset lower domestic outboard and sterndrive sales, McCoy said.  The adverse effect on operating earnings of fixed-cost absorption on lower production was somewhat offset by improved operating efficiencies resulting from restructuring and cost-reduction efforts.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales increased 11 percent in the quarter to $144.0 million, up from $129.7 million in the year-ago quarter.  Operating earnings for the quarter totaled $7.4 million, flat from the second quarter of 2006, and operating margins decreased 60 basis points to 5.1 percent from 5.7 percent a year ago.
Sales of commercial equipment were up double digits in both the United States and in non-U.S. markets, McCoy explained.  Operating earnings were affected by higher research, development and marketing spending to support a completely new line of cardiovascular products being launched in the second half of the year.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  Segment sales in the second quarter of 2007 totaled $103.2 million, down 6 percent compared with $110.1 million in the year-ago quarter.  For the second quarter, the segment reported an operating loss of $2.7 million versus operating earnings of $0.6 million in the year-ago period.
 We continue to see higher sales from our bowling retail centers, especially at our new, larger Brunswick Zone XLs, McCoy explained. Difficult market conditions for bowling products contributed to the quarterly loss for this segment.  Further, slower-than-anticipated ramp up of production at our bowling ball manufacturing plant in Mexico is also affecting the segments results.
 
Six-Month Results
For the six months ended June 30, 2007, the company had net sales of $2,909.0 million, down 2 percent from $2,956.4 million for the first half of 2006.  Operating earnings totaled $142.3 million for the first half of 2007, down from $236.4 million for the corresponding period in 2006, and operating margins declined to 4.9 percent versus 8.0 percent a year ago.  Net earnings from continuing operations for the first six months of 2007 were $93.2 million, or $1.02 per diluted share, down from $168.6 million, or $1.76 per diluted share, for the same period in 2006.  Results include $0.02 per diluted share and $0.19 per diluted share of tax-related benefits in the first six months of 2007 and 2006, respectively.
Discontinued Operations
For the first half of 2007, the company reported net earnings from discontinued operations of $0.13 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $0.19 per diluted share for the same period in 2006.  The improved performance in 2007 was largely attributable to gains on the sale of BNT business units in the first half of the year.
Looking Ahead
As we look at the second half of 2007, we continue to focus on managing our marine pipeline inventories, McCoy said.  At the end of the 2007 model year on June 30, we had 26 weeks of supply of boats, flat from a year ago, and 26 weeks of supply of engines, up 5 weeks from a year ago, in the pipeline.  We did not have sufficient sell through at retail to bring pipelines down to acceptable levels for this time of the selling season, despite reducing production and wholesale shipments in the quarter.  Therefore, we will be further reducing production through the 2008 model year.  As a result, we estimate that for 2007, we will report net earnings per diluted share from continuing operations in the range of $1.20 to $1.35, as we announced last week.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of (i) the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, and (ii) the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components and raw materials from suppliers; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; and the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2006 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2007.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com.
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data)
(unaudited)
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data)
(unaudited)
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Selected Financial Information
(in millions)
(unaudited)
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
(in millions)
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Condensed Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(in millions)
(unaudited)
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20070801101539.txt.gz
TIME:20070801101539
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02                      Results of Operation and Financial Condition.
On August 1, 2007, Brunswick Corporation (i) announced a jury verdict against Brunswicks Mercury Marine Group for infringement of an Electromotive, Inc. patent, and an award of approximately $3 million in damages to Electromotive, Inc., (ii) provided an update to Brunswicks previously reported net earnings from continuing operations for the second quarter of 2007, and (iii) affirmed its prior earnings estimate for 2007.  The news release issued by Brunswick announcing the jury verdict against its Mercury Marine Group, the update to its previously reported net earnings from continuing operations for the second quarter of 2007, and the affirmation of its earnings estimate for 2007 is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
3
EXHIBIT INDEX:
4

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data)
(unaudited)
 
2
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Consolidated Statements of Income
(in millions, except per share data)
(unaudited)
 
3
 
Brunswick Corporation
Selected Financial Information
(in millions)
(unaudited)
 
4
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
(in millions)
 
5
 
Brunswick Corporation
Comparative Condensed Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(in millions)
(unaudited)
 
6


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20071023110043.txt.gz
TIME:20071023110043
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
On October 23, 2007, the Board of Directors of Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) appointed J. Steven Whisler to the Board of Directors and the Finance Committee of the Board of Directors.  Brunswick is not aware of any transaction requiring disclosure under Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K.
The news release announcing the appointment is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
3
EXHIBIT INDEX:
4

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Brunswick Corporation (NYSE:BC) announced today that J. Steven Whisler, retired chairman and chief executive officer of Phelps Dodge Corporation, has been elected to Brunswicks board of directors, effective immediately.  The election of Whisler, 52, brings the number of board members to 10.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Oct. 23, 2007
Whisler recently retired from Phelps Dodge following its acquisition by Freeport-McMoRan Copper and Gold Inc.  Whisler originally joined Phelps Dodge in 1976, holding a number of positions before being named chairman and chief executive officer in May 2000.  He previously had served as the mining and manufacturing companys president and chief operating officer and as a senior vice president.  He also serves on the boards of Burlington Northern Santa Fe Corporation and U.S. Airways Group Inc.
Whisler holds a B.S. degree in business from the University of Colorado, a J.D. degree from the University of Denver College of Law, an M.S. degree in mineral economics and an honorary D. Sc. degree in engineering from the Colorado School of Mines.  Whisler also attended the Harvard Business Schools Advanced Management Program.  He has been awarded the Colorado School of Mines Distinguished Achievement Medal for career accomplishments, and is a member of the American Mining Hall of Fame.
 
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20071026090728.txt.gz
TIME:20071026090728
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                                Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 26, 2007, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the third quarter of 2007. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its third quarter 2007 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswicks management believes that presentation of diluted earnings per share for the quarters ended September 29, 2007 and September 30, 2006, excluding non-recurring tax benefits and trade name impairment charges, provides a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
3
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 

 
                 
                   
              
 Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today a net loss of $0.27 per diluted share from continuing operations for the third quarter of 2007 due to a $0.47 per diluted share impairment charge described below.  This compares with net earnings from continuing operations of $0.54 per diluted share for the same period in 2006.  Further, results in the third quarters of 2007 and 2006 include tax-related benefits of $0.04 and $0.06 per diluted share, respectively.  Excluding the charge and the tax benefits, Brunswick had net earnings from continuing operations of $0.16 per diluted share in the third quarter of 2007, compared with $0.48 per diluted share in the same period in 2006.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Oct. 26, 2007
Operating results for the quarter were in line with our expectations, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  We continue to report strong sales from our non-U.S. marine operations, marine parts and accessories and fitness equipment business unit, which have helped to offset the steady decline in the marine markets in the United States.  Our challenge under these circumstances is to manage pipeline inventories to maintain the health of our business and that of our dealers, and we are pleased with our efforts.  The activities we have undertaken to manage the pipeline in this environment have adversely affected our performance.  Nevertheless, we continue to expect our earnings for 2007 to fall within the range of $1.20 to $1.30 per diluted share.  
Further, we head into the final quarter of the year in a strong financial position, McCoy said.  Debt-to-total capital was 27.6 percent at quarter end, and our cash balance totaled $327.8 million.  Maintaining significant liquidity remains a high priority during this marine downturn.
 
Third Quarter Results
For the quarter ended Sept. 29, 2007, net sales from continuing operations decreased 1 percent to $1,326.2 million, down from $1,337.8 million a year earlier.  The company had an operating loss of $46.3 million from continuing operations in the third quarter of 2007, compared with operating earnings of $74.3 million in the year-ago third quarter.  The operating loss was the result of a $66.4 million pre-tax impairment charge to write down the trade names of certain outboard boat brands.
Commenting on the charge, McCoy said, This accounting requirement was precipitated largely by the significant decline in retail demand for outboard boats.  Our actions should not be viewed as a commentary on the intrinsic value of the products, or on our strong commitment to this market segment, and our dealers and customers throughout the country.
The companys net loss from continuing operations for the third quarter of 2007 totaled $23.7 million, or $0.27 per diluted share, including the impairment charge of $0.47 per diluted share, compared with net earnings of $50.4 million, or $0.54 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2006.  As stated earlier, both periods include tax-related benefits of $0.04 and $0.06 per diluted share for the third quarters of 2007 and 2006, respectively.
The company said that during the third quarter of 2007, it acquired 1 million shares of its common stock for approximately $28 million.  Since the beginning of the year, approximately 3.6 million shares have been acquired for about $115 million.  Diluted shares outstanding averaged 89.0 million in the third quarter of 2007, down from 93.7 million for the third quarter of 2006.  The company said it had approximately $251 million remaining under a $500 million repurchase authorization.
 
Discontinued Operations
The company reported net earnings from discontinued operations of $25.6 million, or $0.29 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $13.9 million, or $0.15 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2006.  During the quarter, the company sold its fleet management business, which completed the divestiture of its Brunswick New Technologies business unit.  The improved performance for the third quarter of 2007 was attributable to a gain on the sale of the business and tax-related benefits.
 
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, which produces fiberglass and aluminum boats and marine parts and accessories, as well as offers dealer management systems.  The Boat segment reported net sales for the third quarter of 2007 of $613.9 million, down 10 percent compared with $679.2 million in the third quarter of 2006.  The segment had an operating loss of $23.9 million for the third quarter of 2007, excluding the charge discussed above.  This compares with operating earnings of $24.8 million reported in the third quarter of 2006.
Sales for our boat brands were down versus the year-ago quarter, reflecting lower shipments in our efforts to reduce pipeline inventories in light of the weak marine retail environment in the United States, McCoy said.  Our boat parts and accessories business unit, however, posted double-digit sales gains in the quarter.  Along with the impairment charge, the operating loss for the quarter is due to the combined effects of reduced sales, lower fixed-cost absorption on reduced production levels, a significant increase in promotional spending in conjunction with our dealers to drive retail sales, and costs associated with plant closures and the startup of a newly acquired manufacturing facility.
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, reported net sales of $566.7 million in the third quarter of 2007, up 6 percent from $536.5 million in the year-ago quarter.  Operating earnings in the third quarter decreased to $47.5 million versus $50.4 million, while operating margins declined to 8.4 percent from 9.4 percent for the same quarter in 2006.
 Sales growth in the quarter was driven by Mercurys international operations, which were up double digits, along with solid contributions from parts and accessories, McCoy said.  Sales were down single digits for the quarter in our sterndrive engine business, reflecting retail softness in the fiberglass sterndrive category in the United States.  Meanwhile, we did see sales growth in outboard engines, where significant progress has already been made to correct the pipeline.  Operating earnings were adversely affected by a mix shift to lower-margin outboard engines and higher variable compensation costs, which were partially offset by cost savings from restructuring efforts.
McCoy said Brunswick will continue to adjust production rates in both boats and engines as needed to effectively manage pipeline inventories through the 2008 model year, which ends June 30, 2008.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment.  Fitness segment net sales increased 10 percent in the third quarter of 2007 to $150.2 million, up from $136.6 million in the year-ago quarter.  Segment operating earnings for the quarter totaled $11.8 million, down from $12.6 million in the third quarter of 2006, and operating margins were 7.9 percent compared with 9.2 percent a year ago.
The segment reported higher sales of commercial equipment in both the United States and non-U.S. markets, McCoy said.  Our lower operating earnings reflect higher research and development and marketing spending associated with new cardiovascular product introductions, as well as a shift in product mix to lower- margin strength equipment in non-U.S. markets.  We will continue to invest for the future, while seeking to more effectively and economically manufacture and deliver our products throughout the world.
 
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  Segment sales in the third quarter of 2007 totaled $114.6 million, up from $113.4 million in the year-ago quarter.  For the quarter, the segment had an operating loss of $0.2 million, compared with operating earnings of $3.1 million during the same period a year ago.
For the quarter, the segment saw sales gains from retail bowling centers, partially offset by a decline in bowling products, McCoy explained.  Operating earnings were adversely affected by start-up costs associated with the opening of two new Brunswick Zone XL bowling centers, as well as continuing production issues relating to the transition of our bowling ball manufacturing to Mexico.
 
Nine-Month Results
For the nine months ended Sept. 29, 2007, the company had net sales from continuing operations of $4,235.2 million, down from $4,294.2 million for the first three quarters of 2006.  Operating earnings totaled $93.0 million for the first nine months of 2007, including the $66.4 million charge, down from $310.7 million for the corresponding period in 2006, and operating margins were 2.2 percent versus 7.2 percent a year ago.
Net earnings from continuing operations for the first nine months of 2007 totaled $67.5 million, or $0.75 per diluted share, compared with $219.0 million, or $2.30 per diluted share, for the same period in 2006.  Results for the first nine months of 2007 also include the charge of $0.46 per diluted share, recognized in the third quarter.  Results for the first nine months of 2007 and 2006 include $0.06 and a $0.25 per diluted share of tax-related benefits, respectively.  Excluding the charge and tax-related benefits, the company had earnings per diluted share of $1.15 for the first three quarters of 2007 compared with $2.05 per diluted share for the same period in 2006.
 
Discontinued Operations
For the first nine months of 2007, the company reported net earnings from discontinued operations of $37.3 million, or $0.41 per diluted share, as compared with a net loss of $31.9 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, for the comparable period a year ago.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of (i) the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, and (ii) the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components and raw materials from suppliers; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; and the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2006 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2007.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20080122120534.txt.gz
TIME:20080122120534
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
    
On January 22, 2008, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced that Patrick C. Mackey will retire as President, Mercury Marine Group, Chief Operating Officer, Brunswick Marine, and Executive Vice President of Brunswick Corporation, effective March 1, 2008.
A copy of the news release announcing the retirement of Patrick C. Mackey is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d)            Exhibits:
 
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
3
EXHIBIT INDEX:
4

 
 
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE:BC) today announced that Patrick C. Mackey, 61, will retire from the company March 1 after more than seven years of service.  Mackey is president of the Mercury Marine Group, chief operating officer of Brunswicks Marine businesses and a Brunswick executive vice president.
LAKE FOREST, Ill. Jan. 22, 2008 --
An accomplished business leader with more than 35 years of management experience, Mackey joined Brunswick in October 2000 with a personal commitment at that time to lead the Mercury Marine Group for five years.   Mackey quickly developed a strong reputation for building successful relationships within the marine industry, with Mercury dealers, its boat builder partners, and other customers.  Under his leadership, Mercury also galvanized its efforts to imbue the industrys leading marine engine brand with operational excellence and technological advancements.
Pat has been a visionary for our industry who has championed technology, while setting new standards for customer and dealer relations.  I am personally grateful for all that he has done at Mercury, which faced significant challenges when he arrived, said Dustan E. McCoy, Brunswick chairman and chief executive officer.  As all of us at Brunswick have come to expect of Pat, he gave us far more than he promised, both in terms of time and accomplishments.  Through Pats leadership, both Mercury, in particular, and Brunswick as a whole have been strengthened, leaving us very well positioned for the future.
Mercury has been at the forefront of marine-engine manufacturing since the companys inception in 1939.  That tradition carries on today, as Mercury products continue to meet the evolving demands of discriminating and ecology-minded consumers.  Under Mackeys leadership,
J.D. Power and Associates has ranked Mercury Marines OptiMax engine "Highest in Customer Satisfaction with Two-Stroke Outboard Engines," and Mercury MerCruiser engines "Highest in Customer Satisfaction with Sterndrive Engines."
Mackey is a very experienced general manager and international executive, having spent 30 years in a variety of senior roles with E.I. du Pont de Nemours Corporation in Europe.  He also was an executive vice president with Witco Corporation, Greenwich, Conn.
Mark Schwabero, president  Mercury Marine outboard engines, and Kevin S. Grodzki, president  Mercury MerCruiser, will continue to lead their respective businesses, reporting directly to McCoy.
As Pat moves on to the next phase of his life, knowing that Mark and Kevin will continue to provide leadership and direction to the operations each has guided since 2004 ensures that Mercury Marine will continue to set new standards in product innovation and customer service, McCoy concluded.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20080131093530.txt.gz
TIME:20080131093530
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 2.02.                                Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On January 31, 2008, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the fourth quarter and full year 2007. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its fourth quarter and full year 2007 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.  Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswicks management believes that presentation of diluted earnings per share for the quarters and years ended December 31, 2007 and December 31, 2006, excluding special tax items, provides a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
3
EXHIBIT INDEX:
4

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today earnings from continuing operations of $0.14 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2007, compared with $0.47 per diluted share for the same quarter a year ago.  Results for the fourth quarters of 2007 and 2006 include tax-related benefits of $0.05 and $0.25 per diluted share, respectively.  Excluding tax-related benefits, earnings per diluted share totaled $0.09 and $0.22 for the fourth quarters of 2007 and 2006, respectively.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Jan. 31, 2008
Results for the quarter were driven by our Fitness equipment and Bowling & Billiards businesses, which performed well in their seasonally strong period, explained Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  Earnings from these businesses, along with contributions from our Marine Engine segment offset operating losses reported in the Boat segment.  The decline in retail demand for marine products in the United States that we have been experiencing throughout the year, continued in the fourth quarter.  This was offset by continuing strength of markets outside the U.S. for all of our product lines.
 Further, our balance sheet remained healthy with debt-to-total capital at 27.8 percent and cash of $331.4 million at year-end 2007, McCoy noted.  In spite of the difficult marine market conditions, our free cash flow from continuing operations for 2007 was $172.1 million.  This allowed us the financial flexibility to reinvest in our businesses as well as to return $178.4 million to our shareholders through dividends and our share repurchase program in 2007.
 
Fourth Quarter Results
For the quarter ended Dec. 31, 2007, the company reported net sales of $1,436.0 million, up 5 percent from $1,370.8 million a year earlier.  Operating earnings for the fourth quarter of 2007 totaled $14.2 million, as compared with $30.5 million in the year-ago quarter, and operating margins were 1.0 percent compared with 2.2 percent in the year-ago period.  During the quarter, Brunswick reported gains in both sales and operating earnings in all of its segments, with the exception of the Boat segment, reflecting the continuing difficult state of the U.S. boat market.
Net earnings from continuing operations were $12.1 million, or $0.14 per diluted share, down from $44.2 million, or $0.47 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2006.  Net earnings per share for the fourth quarters of 2007 and 2006 include tax-related benefits of $0.05 and $0.25 per diluted share, respectively.  Excluding tax-related benefits, earnings per diluted share totaled $0.09 and $0.22 for the fourth quarters of 2007 and 2006, respectively.
During the quarter, Brunswick acquired 500,000 shares of its common stock for $10.3 million.  In 2007, the company said it purchased 4.1 million shares for about $125.8 million.  Diluted shares outstanding in the fourth quarter of 2007 averaged 88.6 million, down from 93.0 million for the same period in 2006.  The company said it had approximately $240 million remaining under a $500 million repurchase authorization.
For the fourth quarter in 2007, Brunswick reported a net loss from discontinued operations of $0.06 per diluted share as a result of a tax provision adjustment.  This compares with a net loss of $1.04 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2006, which included asset impairment charges equivalent to $0.92 per diluted share.
2007 Results
For the year ended Dec. 31, 2007, the company had net sales of $5,671.2 million, compared with $5,665.0 million in 2006.  Operating earnings from continuing operations totaled $107.2 million for the year, down from $341.2 million in 2006, and operating margins were 1.9 percent versus 6.0 percent a year ago.  For 2007, operating earnings include a $66.4 million pre-tax impairment charge recorded in the third quarter to write down the trade names of certain outboard boat brands.
Net earnings from continuing operations for 2007 were $79.6 million, or $0.88 per diluted share, compared with $263.2 million, or $2.78 per diluted share, in 2006.  Results for 2007 and 2006 include tax-related benefits of $0.11 and $0.50 per diluted share, respectively.  In addition, results for 2007 include the asset impairment charge equivalent to $0.46 per diluted share.  Finally, results for 2007 and 2006 include pre-tax restructuring charges of approximately $22.2 million and $18.9 million, equivalent to $0.17 and $0.14 per diluted share, respectively.
For 2007, largely due to a gain on the sale of its Brunswick New Technologies unit, Brunswick reported net earnings from discontinued operations of $0.36 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $1.37 per diluted share in 2006.
Boat Segment
The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and includes 19 boat brands, as well as a marine parts and accessories business.  The Boat segment reported net sales for the fourth quarter of 2007 of $645.2 million, down 3 percent compared with $664.5 million in the fourth quarter of 2006.  For the fourth quarter of 2007, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $29.9 million, compared with operating earnings of $9.3 million in the year-ago fourth quarter.
For 2007, Boat segment sales were down 6 percent to $2,690.9 million from $2,864.4 million in 2006.  The Boat segment reported an operating loss of $81.4 million for 2007, which included the previously mentioned $66.4 million pre-tax impairment charge recorded in the third quarter to write down the trade names of certain outboard boat brands. The Boat segment had operating earnings of $135.6 million in 2006.
For the year, Boat segment sales benefited from double-digit increases in both its parts and accessories business and sales outside of the United States.  These results helped to mitigate the 10 percent decline in U.S. boat sales in 2007.  Non-U.S. sales benefited from both the weak dollar, as well as from a strong focus on improving our distribution in key international regions.
In 2007, the U.S. boat market continued to be very soft, and preliminary numbers indicate the industry was down about 9 percent in units at retail for the year, McCoy explained.  To address weak retail demand and to maintain the health of our dealer network, we focused on reducing the pipeline, especially for fiberglass boats.  We produced up to 20 percent fewer fiberglass boats in 2007 than in 2006.  Reduced unit production also meant lower fixed-cost absorption, which, along with increased promotional spending to spur retail demand, had an adverse effect on fourth quarter and full-year operating earnings.
We also continued to focus on establishing a smaller, more flexible manufacturing footprint in the U.S., closing four plants in 2007.  While costs associated with realigning manufacturing adversely affect our operating earnings, we will continue to seek opportunities to better leverage our manufacturing capacity in the coming year, McCoy said.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, reported net sales of $548.6 million in the fourth quarter of 2007, up 7 percent from $511.3 million in the year-ago fourth quarter.  Operating earnings in the fourth quarter of 2007 were $21.2 million versus $3.8 million, and operating margins were 3.9 percent compared with 0.7 percent for the same quarter in 2006.  During the fourth quarter of 2006, approximately $9.5 million of restructuring charges were recorded in the Marine Engine segment, largely for severance costs, while the segment had no restructuring charges in the fourth quarter of 2007.
For the full year, Marine Engine segment net sales were up 4 percent to $2,357.5 million from $2,271.3 million, and operating earnings were $183.7 million versus $193.8 million in 2006.  Operating margins were 7.8 percent for the year, down from 8.5 percent in 2006.
For the quarter and the year, double-digit sales gains from markets outside the U.S. fueled growth in the Marine Engine segment, McCoy said.  Mercurys international sales totaled nearly $944 million for the full year in 2007, up 15 percent from approximately $822 million the previous year.  Meanwhile, in our U.S. markets, sterndrive engine sales totaled $526 million for 2007, down from $554 million in 2006.  For 2007, U.S. outboard sales were $425 million, down from $434 million in 2006.  Sales of Mercurys domestic parts and services were up slightly to $358 million in 2007 versus $353 million in 2006.
Mercury Marine continues to do a good job of dealing with the continuing weak marine retail market in the United States.  Mercurys lower U.S. sales were offset by increasing sales outside of the U.S., which accounted for 40 percent of total Marine Engine segment sales in 2007, McCoy explained.  The segment also benefited from its broad efforts to trim costs and improve productivity.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment.  Segment net sales in the fourth quarter of 2007 totaled $214.5 million, up 11 percent from $192.8 million in the year-ago quarter.  Operating earnings increased 12 percent to $32.4 million from $28.9 million, and operating margins were 15.1 percent, up from 15.0 percent in the fourth quarter of 2006.
For 2007, the Fitness segment reported net sales of $653.7 million, up 10 percent from $593.1 million in 2006.  Operating earnings in 2007 increased 3 percent to $59.7 million from $57.8 million, and operating margins were 9.1 percent compared with 9.7 percent a year ago.
Life Fitness capped off a very successful year with solid growth in both sales and operating earnings during the fourth quarter of 2007, seasonally the units strongest quarter of the year, McCoy said.  New products in both the consumer and commercial segments helped spur sales momentum during the quarter as well as the year.  For 2007, operating earnings and operating margins at Life Fitness were under pressure due to higher spending for marketing and research and development to support new product introductions, the shift in our mix to lower-margin strength equipment and competitive pricing in international markets.
 
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  Segment net sales in the fourth quarter of 2007 totaled $123.3 million, up 3 percent compared with $120.1 million in the year-ago quarter.  Operating earnings in the quarter nearly doubled to $11.1 million versus $5.6 million in the comparable quarter in 2006, and operating margins were 9.0 percent compared with 4.7 percent a year ago.
For 2007, the segment reported net sales of $446.9 million, down 2 percent from $458.3 million in 2006.  Operating earnings for the year were $16.5 million compared with $22.1 million in 2006, and operating margins were 3.7 percent versus 4.8 percent a year earlier.
 For the quarter, the segment saw sales gains from both our retail bowling centers and bowling products, McCoy explained.  Operating earnings were aided by cost reductions at both bowling products and billiards, as we begin to more fully realize savings from moving manufacturing of our bowling balls and coin-operated tables to Mexico.  Further, we recently announced that we will have our bowling pins made by a contract manufacturer, which should further reduce our cost structure.
 For the quarter and the year, we continued to see solid performance from both our Brunswick Zones and the Brunswick Zone XL centers, McCoy said.  We opened three new Zone XL centers during 2007, with four more locations planned for 2008.  Our plans are to accelerate the growth of the Brunswick Zone XL concept going forward.
In Conclusion
While 2007 was a difficult year, we continue to fund our operations and pursue our strategic imperatives, while improving our cash flow.  Our balance sheet remains strong, and we will continue to manage our business well during these current economic conditions, McCoy concluded.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of (i) the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, and (ii) the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product
features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components and raw materials from suppliers; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; and the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2006 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 29, 2007.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20080320150855.txt.gz
TIME:20080320150855
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01.                                Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
Brunswick Corporation announced today that it had signed a letter of intent to sell certain assets relating to its Baja boat business to Fountain Powerboat Industries, Inc. and to end production of Baja boats in Bucyrus, Ohio.  In connection with the sale and facility closing, Brunswick has estimated related write-downs, severance and other costs, as described more fully in the attached news release.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
3
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
4
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today announced the signing of a letter of intent to sell certain assets relating to its Baja boat business to Fountain Powerboat Industries, Inc., of Washington, N.C.  Terms of the agreement were not disclosed, and completion of the sale is subject to certain conditions.  In preparation for the transition, Brunswick plans to end production of Baja boats in Bucyrus, Ohio, by the end of May, consistent with the end of the 2008 model year.  As a result of these actions, the company said it estimates that asset write-downs, along with severance and other costs associated with the plant closure, could total between $10 million to $15 million, pre-tax.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., March 20, 2008 
This was a strategic decision to further refine our product portfolio and best focus our resources on brands and marine segments that we believe are core to our success going forward, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  This action in no way reflects upon Baja or the abilities and performance of the Bucyrus work force.  We believe, however, that Baja and its dealers will ultimately benefit from being a part of Fountain Powerboats, a company that, like Baja, is a leader in high-performance boats.
When completed, the closing of the Baja plant will mean a loss of approximately 285 positions. Baja leadership will be working diligently to transfer as many employees as possible and practical to either Fountain or other Brunswick manufacturing facilities.  For those employees who do not have the opportunity or do not wish to transfer, severance will be provided.
 
About Brunswick
 
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20080424090352.txt.gz
TIME:20080424090352
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 2.02.                                Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
 
On April 24, 2008, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2008. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its first quarter 2008 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.  Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow from continuing operations as cash flow from operating and investing activities of continuing operations (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities of continuing operations.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
3
EXHIBIT INDEX:
4

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20080513173729.txt.gz
TIME:20080513173729
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
          
On May 7, 2008, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) decided to cease production of its Bluewater Marine boats, including the Sea Pro, Sea Boss, Palmetto and Laguna brands.  Brunswick expects to incur pretax charges for facility consolidation, asset impairments and write-downs, closure and severance costs in the range of approximately $25 million to $30 million, substantially all of which will be incurred in the second quarter of 2008.
In connection with these actions, Brunswick expects to incur approximately $18 million of non-cash asset write-downs and impairment charges, approximately $3 million of facility closure charges and between $4 million and $9 million of other costs associated with discontinuing production of these brands.
The news release announcing these actions is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
Statements made in this Current Report on Form 8-K that are forward-looking involve risks and uncertainties and are indicated by words such as "estimates," "expects" and other similar words or phrases. These uncertainties include, but are not limited to, the execution of the restructuring plan, economic conditions and other risks described in filings with the SEC such as Brunswick's most recent Forms 10-K and 10-Q. 
 
Item 9.01    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
   
   
   
 
 
 
 
 
2
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3
 
EXHIBIT INDEX
 
4
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that it will cease production of its Bluewater Marine brands -- including Sea Pro, Sea Boss, Palmetto and Laguna -- with the upcoming 2009 model year, which commences July 1.  As a result of this action, Brunswick will close its production facility in Newberry, S.C., by the end of June.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., May 13, 2008 
The U.S. marine industry has been in a prolonged slowdown since late 2005, driven by an uncertain economy, high fuel prices, the housing slump and other economic factors that have affected consumers confidence and eroded their discretionary spending, explained Dustan E. McCoy, Brunswick chairman and chief executive officer.  As a result, we are assessing the recovery potential for all marine segments in which we participate, their fragmented nature, the costs of our continued presence in certain of them, and the position of our brands.  Our work is ongoing and is focused on developing profitable brand positioning in all segments.  With this action, we believe we will solidify our presence in the highly fragmented saltwater segment by concentrating our efforts and leveraging our resources on such brands as Boston Whaler, Triton, Trophy, and our sportfishing offerings from Hatteras, Cabo and Albemarle, while sharpening our market focus and providing necessary cost reductions.
Brunswick plans to cease production at the Newberry facility by the end of June 2008.  Approximately 175 positions will be affected by this action, and qualifying employees will receive assistance aimed at helping them transition to other employment.
This market-driven action should not be viewed as a reflection on the performance of our employees, McCoy added.  As always, we will work hard with all affectedemployees, dealers, suppliers, communities and consumersto minimize the disruption that this decision may cause.
As a result of these actions, the company said it will record a pretax charge of approximately $25 million to $30 million in the second quarter of 2008 to cover asset write-downs and other costs associated with the plant closure.  Of that total, approximately 75 percent of the charge is non-cash and the remainder is cash.  The company estimates that it will realize annualized pretax savings of approximately $9 million stemming from this decision.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  These uncertainties include, but are not limited to, the execution of the restructuring plan, economic conditions and other risks described in the companys 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 29, 2008.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Baja, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Laguna, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Palmetto, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Savage, Sea Boss, Sea Pro, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com
.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20080626073341.txt.gz
TIME:20080626073341
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities	Material Impairments	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
ITEM: Material Impairments
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
UNITED STATES
________________________
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
        
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
          
On June 25, 2008, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) approved a series of comprehensive cost reduction initiatives designed to improve Brunswicks operational efficiency and profitability.
In connection with the implementation of these initiatives, Brunswick expects to incur aggregate pretax costs and charges totaling $200 million to $220 million.  Of this amount, Brunswick reported approximately $22 million in restructuring charges, and estimated future charges of $29 million, in its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ending March 29, 2008, and announced an estimated $25 million to $30 million of restructuring charges related to the shutdown of the Bluewater Marine Group in the Corporations Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 14, 2008, for a total of between $75 million and $80 million in charges previously disclosed.
The total charges at the lower end of the range include approximately: $76 million of asset write-downs and asset impairments, including approximately $18 million relating to the Valley-Dynamo commercial pool table business, $18 million relating to the Bluewater Marine Group business, and $8 million related to the Baja boat business; $62 million of severance costs; $51 million in costs associated with manufacturing site rationalizations; and $12 million of other costs.
The company estimates that approximately $170 million to $180 million of these charges will be recorded in 2008 (including the $22 million incurred in the first quarter), with the balance in 2009. Of the restructuring costs to be incurred during 2008, just over 50 percent will be cash charges. 
The information included in Item 2.05 above is incorporated herein by reference.
 
The news release announcing these actions is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference.  The information in this Item 7.01 and Exhibit 99.1 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference into any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements regarding Brunswicks future operations and future impairments and charges that Brunswick may incur.  Actual events or results may differ materially from those described herein.  Among the important factors that could cause future events or results to vary are the risks arising from the ability of Brunswick to effect the cost reduction initiatives as planned, the potential for unexpected liabilities related to the disposition of certain assets, and the possibility that the final accounting and valuation of the assets involved could vary from the estimates set forth herein.   Additional factors that might affect these forward-looking statements are described in filings with the SEC such as Brunswick's most recent Forms 10-K and 10-Q. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 
 

 
 
                     
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today a set of comprehensive actions to resize the company to improve profitability during the current downturn in the U.S. marine market, including actions to reduce its fixed-cost structure by $300 million versus 2007 spending levels.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., June 26, 2008
For the past several years, we have been implementing initiatives to fundamentally change our cost structure by reducing our manufacturing footprint, and leveraging purchases of common components and materials across our brands and operations, explained Dustan E. McCoy, Brunswicks chairman and chief executive officer.  In addition, we have addressed the prolonged downturn in the U.S. marine market by continually reducing production rates throughout our marine businesses, divesting under-utilized assets, exiting or divesting certain businesses, eliminating discretionary spending and reducing headcount.  While these efforts have resulted in significant savings, the realities of the current U.S. marine market have caused us to step up the pace and magnitude of these efforts.
Retail unit sales of power boats in the United States have been in decline since late 2005; however, the rate of decline has been accelerating, McCoy added.  Industry retail unit sales were down 13 percent in the fourth quarter of 2007 and down 21 percent in the first quarter of 2008 compared with the respective year-ago quarters.  Further, these reductions were recorded off of an already low base. Total unit sales of power boats in the United States in 2007 were at their lowest in more than 40 years.
An uncertain economy, high fuel and food prices, slumping home sales and values, rising unemployment and other factors continue to erode U.S. consumers confidence and are reducing their ability and desire to purchase discretionary items such as boats, and billiards tables and fitness equipment for their homes, McCoy explained.  For our planning purposes, we are not assuming that these pressures will abate any time soon.  As a result, we are planning for an environment in which the U.S. marine market will be smaller in the near term, and we will resize our company accordingly.  Our objective is to thrive and prosper while the U.S. marine market remains under pressure and to outperform when we see a rebound in demand.
Cost Savings Efforts
Brunswick stated that its $300 million cost savings target will be achieved in part by further shrinking its North American manufacturing footprint. The company plans to have 17 or fewer boat plants by the end of 2009, compared with the 29 it had in 2007.  This will require the closure of four plants in addition to eight plant closures already completed or announced.  Brunswick will also continue its efforts to reduce the complexity of its operations, including reducing the number of models and option packages, focusing on those that are popular and clearly resonate with consumers.  The companys efforts also entail assessing the outlook for continued participation in certain market segments across its operations that may not offer opportunities to generate acceptable levels of profitability.
The company said it will further reduce costs by implementing a new matrix operating model that will more efficiently provide common support functions and administrative services across all Brunswick business units, lowering spending in all functional and operations activities, and reducing its work force.
 
Going Forward
These obviously are hard decisions, dictated by a difficult economy that has both constricted and altered the U.S. marine market, McCoy said.  We have chosen to act now to recast and resize our operations with the objective of being profitable within a smaller marine market.  We are confident that these targeted savings and other changes are realistic and achievable, as well as necessary, to create a leaner organization that will be able to both prosper within these market conditions, as well as take advantage of any uptick in demand.
Our immediate focus remains on managing pipeline inventories at our marine dealers, as well as enhancing our solid liquidity at Brunswick, McCoy said.  We will continue to produce at rates below retail demand to lower pipeline inventories.  A reduction in production rates also results, unfortunately, in the need for fewer workers.  The company said that it had notified employees today that it would be reducing its hourly and salaried work force at certain of its marine plants by 1,000.  Further work force reductions of approximately 1,000 hourly and 700 salaried employees across the companys marine business units and staff functions are contemplated as additional plant closures and consolidations and other cost-cutting measures are completed.
 Maintaining liquidity will continue to be a key priority in these uncertain times, McCoy added.  We are focusing on generating cash through good working capital management, paring inventories and discretionary spending.  Our balance sheet is solid, and we expect to generate positive cash flow benefits in 2008 by further reducing capital spending and from positive contributions from changes in working capital.
Financial Effect
The company said that these actions are estimated to result in restructuring charges in the range of $200 million to $220 million pretax, which includes approximately $75 million of previously announced restructuring charges related to actions taken earlier this year.  The charges primarily consist of asset write-downs and asset impairments, including approximately $18 million relating to the Valley-Dynamo commercial pool table business; severance; and costs associated with manufacturing footprint changes.  The company estimates that 85 percent of these charges will be recorded in 2008, of which about 50 percent will be non-cash.  The company noted that $22 million of the restructuring charges had been recorded in the first quarter of 2008.
Conference Call Today
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT to further discuss these actions. At that time, McCoy will be joined by Peter G. Leempuette, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Kathryn J. Chieger, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
www.br
u
nswick.com
will also be available at .
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (888) 972-9341 (passcode: Brunswick).  Callers outside of North America should call +1 (212) 287-1618 to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT July 3, 2008, by calling 866-420-4829 or 203-369-0791.  The replay
www.brun
s
w
ick.com
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of (i) the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, and (ii) the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in the timeframe and cost anticipated; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components and raw materials from suppliers; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; and the ability to successfully integrate aquisitions.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2007 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 29, 2008.
 
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Savage, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit
www.brunswick.com.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20080723124820.txt.gz
TIME:20080723124820
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
          
On July 22, 2008,
the Board of Directors of Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) elected Anne E. Blec to the Board of Directors and appointed her to the Human Resources and Compensation Committee.  
The news release announcing the election of Ms. Blec to the Brunswick Board of Directors is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
   
   
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3
 
EXHIBIT INDEX
 
4
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20080724085741.txt.gz
TIME:20080724085741
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
        
         
       
          
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                                Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 24, 2008, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2008. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its second quarter 2008 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.  Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow from continuing operations as cash flow from operating and investing activities of continuing operations (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities of continuing operations.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today a net loss of $6.0 million, or $0.07 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2008, compared with net earnings of $56.9 million, or $0.63 per diluted share, from continuing operations for the same period a year ago.  The second quarters of 2008 and 2007 include restructuring charges of $83.1 million, or $0.59 cents per diluted share, and $1.1 million, or $0.01 per diluted share, respectively.  The 2008 charges are primarily for costs associated with previously announced actions aimed at resizing the company and reducing fixed costs by $300 million versus 2007 spending levels by the end of 2009.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 24, 2008
We commend our employees for the strong results that were achieved in the quarter during difficult economic conditions, explained Dustan E. McCoy, Brunswick chairman and chief executive officer.  We believe these results underscore the inherent strengths of our brands, market position and operating and financial management expertise.  They further reflect our employees ability to efficiently operate the business while making progress against restructuring and strategic initiatives designed to benefit Brunswick, our dealers and our shareholders over the long-term.
Second Quarter Results
For the quarter ended June 28, 2008, net sales decreased to $1,485.4 million, down 2 percent from $1,522.9 million a year earlier.  Increased sales of commercial fitness equipment, bowling products and from our retail bowling centers, as well as 19 percent growth in non-U.S. sales, helped offset the decline in sales of marine products in the United States, McCoy explained.
The company had an operating loss of $17.2 million for the second quarter of 2008, which includes the previously mentioned $83.1 million of restructuring charges, compared with operating earnings of $86.3 million in the year-ago quarter, including the $1.1 million of restructuring charges.  The charges in both years were primarily for asset impairments, severance costs and plant shutdown expenses.
For the quarter, the company reported a net loss of $6.0 million, or $0.07 per diluted share, down from net earnings of $56.9 million, or $0.63 per diluted share, from continuing operations for the second quarter of 2007.  Diluted earnings per share for the second quarter of 2008 include restructuring charges of $0.59 per diluted share, as well as tax benefits and a gain on an investment sale totaling $0.04 per diluted share.   Diluted earnings per share for the second quarter of 2007 include $0.01 per diluted share of restructuring charges.
The company continues to generate positive free cash flow, which provides us with significant liquidity and financial flexibility.  At quarter end, we had $393 million of cash, up from $267 million at the end of the last quarter, McCoy said.
Boat Segment
The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and produces fiberglass and aluminum boats and marine parts and accessories, as well as offers dealer management systems.  The Boat segment had net sales for the second quarter of 2008 of $687.9 million, down 6 percent from $732.8 million in the second quarter of 2007.  For the quarter, the segment had an operating loss of $37.7 million, including restructuring charges of $38.2 million, versus operating earnings of $19.3 million, including $1.0 million of restructuring charges, reported in the second quarter of 2007.
 
 
Sales outside of the United States for the segment were up 35 percent in the quarter, which helped offset the effect of both lower unit volume and exiting certain saltwater and high-performance brands, McCoy said.  Sales also benefited from a shift in product mix, higher prices and contributions from Boston Whaler, Hatteras Yachts and several outboard boat brands.  Meanwhile, overall operating earnings for the Boat Group were adversely affected by the restructuring charges, in addition to the effect of reduced fixed-cost absorption on lower production volume.
During the quarter, McCoy noted, Brunswick boat brands continued to solidify their positions in the market, introducing scores of new or updated models and features, including the new SC47, Sealines new flagship sport convertible yacht, at Europes Southampton and Genoa boat shows. The SC47 is among the first new models emanating from Brunswicks platform design initiative, aimed at sharing common below-deck features and equipment, while still providing attractive, market-relevant styling.  Also recently, Sea Rays popular 205 Sport was selected a best buy by , and a dozen Brunswick boat brands were cited as winners of the annual Customer Satisfaction Index industrywide rating by the National Marine Manufacturers Association.
Consumers Digest
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, reported net sales of $643.5 million in the second quarter of 2008, down 4 percent from $669.6 million in the year-ago quarter.  Operating earnings in the second quarter decreased to $54.4 million versus $80.3 million, and operating margins declined to 8.5 percent from 12.0 percent for the same quarter in 2007.
The segment benefited from growth in non-U.S. sales, which were up 10 percent in the quarter, helping to offset the decline in domestic outboard and sterndrive sales, McCoy said.  As in the Boat segment, reduced fixed-cost absorption on lower production, primarily of sterndrive engines, affected operating earnings for the Marine Engine segment.  The segment recorded $17.0 million of restructuring charges in the quarter.
McCoy added that Mercurys new Zeus and Axius propulsion systems continue to gain momentum among boat builders.  Further, Mercury was the only engine manufacturer to have three models  the Verado 175 hp, the 15 hp BigFoot, and the 75 hp OptiMax  cited as a best buy by .
Consumers Digest
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales increased 9 percent in the quarter to $156.9 million, up from $144.0 million in the year-ago quarter.  Operating earnings for the quarter totaled $8.2 million, up from $7.4 million for the second quarter of 2007, and operating margins were 5.2 percent versus 5.1 percent a year ago.
Sales of commercial equipment were up double digits worldwide, as Life Fitness continued to benefit from a number of new products introduced since the beginning of the year, McCoy explained.  The strength in commercial equipment helped to offset a decline in the segments consumer business.  Operating earnings, which included $1.3 million in restructuring charges, improved slightly as efforts to trim costs and improve productivity continued to show results.
McCoy also noted that Life Fitness continues to set the pace in style and innovation in fitness equipment as it received three awards in magazine's 21st annual excellence in design competition. Products from the company's Elevation Series, as well as a new elliptical cross-trainer for the home, were recognized for their innovative design.
appliance DESIGN
 
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  Segment sales in the second quarter of 2008 totaled $110.4 million, up 7 percent compared with $103.2 million in the year-ago quarter.  For the second quarter, the segment had an operating loss of $19.8 million, which included $19.8 million in restructuring charges, versus an operating loss of $2.7 million in the year-ago period.
  For the quarter, bowling retail sales were up in the high-single digits, mostly attributable to Brunswick Zone XL centers opened in 2007 and 2008, McCoy said.  We are also benefiting from higher capital equipment sales, which contributed to the double-digit increase in bowling product sales, as well as continued improvement at our Reynosa, Mexico, bowling ball manufacturing plant.  Billiards sales were under pressure both from the ongoing slump in new housing starts as well as changing dynamics in the market for coin-operated pool tables.  The operating loss in the second quarter of 2008 was primarily due to restructuring charges for asset impairment and other costs associated with the Valley-Dynamo coin-operated pool table operation.
Two additional Zone XL locations began operations this year, and McCoy pointed out that Brunswick Billiards continued to broaden its product line-up by teaming up with Berkline Furniture to create brand-exclusive home theater seating, providing Brunswick with another avenue into the home entertainment category.
 
Six-Month Results
For the six months ended June 28, 2008, the company had net sales of $2,832.2 million, down 3 percent from $2,909.0 million for the first half of 2007.  The company had an operating loss of $6.9 million for the first half of 2008, including $105.3 million of restructuring charges, compared with operating earnings of $139.3 million for the corresponding period in 2007, which includes $8.7 million of restructuring charges.  Net earnings from continuing operations for the first six months of 2008 were $7.3 million, or $0.08 per diluted share, down from $91.2 million, or $1.00 per diluted share, for the same period in 2007.  Results for the first six months of 2008 included $0.74 per diluted share of restructuring charges, an $0.11 per diluted share gain on an investment sale, and $0.02 per diluted share of tax benefits.  Results for the year-ago six month period include $0.06 per diluted share of restructuring charges and $0.02 per diluted share of tax benefits.
Looking Ahead
In addition to our continuing emphasis on introducing new and innovative products across all of our business units, our priorities for the remainder of 2008 are: (1) continuing to lower production levels to achieve reductions in pipeline inventories held by our marine dealers, (2) reducing spending across the company, and (3) implementing the companys resizing and fixed-cost reduction initiatives announced last month, McCoy said.  As we stated in June, most of our fiberglass boat plants will be shut down for one month during the third quarter.  We have also reduced our capital expenditure budget for this year and halted all discretionary spending.  Finally, progress continues on our strategic initiatives.   While we have not provided specific earnings estimates, the magnitude of the scheduled production cuts will result in a loss for the second half of this year.  Nevertheless, given what we know today, we expect to report positive earnings for the full year, excluding restructuring charges.  What we are unable to predict is whether a change in market conditions would necessitate additional production cuts, or the possibility of further write-downs of goodwill or other intangibles.  Heading into the second half, our cash position remains strong, and we are already close to reaching our year-end target of $400 million, which provides us with significant liquidity and financial flexibility.
 
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 9 a.m. CDT to discuss its financial results.  At that time, McCoy will be joined by Peter G. Leemputte, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Kathryn J. Chieger, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
www.br
u
nswick.com
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (888) 820-8951 (passcode: Brunswick Q2).  Callers outside of North America should call +1 (210) 234-0024 to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Thursday, July 31, 2008, by calling (866) 457-5504 or (203) 369-1278.  The replay will also be available at .
www.brun
s
w
ick.com
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of: (i) the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, and (ii) the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in the timeframe and cost anticipated; the ability to amend or maintain credit facilities on terms favorable to the company; the ability of the company's operations to generate expected financial results and levels of cash flow; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within the time and budgets allowed; the success of marketing and cost management programs; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders and their ability to obtain financing for the purchase of company product; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the ability to repay or refinance existing indebtedness when it becomes due; the ability to obtain components and raw materials from suppliers; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; and the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues. Additional factors are included in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2007 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 29, 2008.
 
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Savage, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20080808103650.txt.gz
TIME:20080808103650
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
        
           
        
          
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01.                               Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Brunswick Corporation has entered into Amendment No. 2 (the Amendment) to its Credit Agreement dated as of April 29, 2005 with JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, and the other lenders identified therein (as amended and supplemented from time to time, the Credit Agreement).  The Amendment, a copy of which is attached hereto, provides for the following changes to the Credit Agreement (as more specifically described in the Exhibit hereto):  (1) a reduction in the lending commitment from $650 million to $500 million; (2) an increase in the interest rate, facility fee rate and letter of credit fee rate; (3) an amendment of the leverage ratio (consolidated debt to consolidated EBITDA, adjusted for non-cash charges) covenant, permitting the add-back of certain cash restructuring charges in the calculation of consolidated EBITDA and permitting a higher ratio (3.25 to 1 as opposed to 3.00 to 1) for the first and second fiscal quarters of 2009; and (4) adding two new financial covenants, one establishing minimum consolidated cash requirements at quarter end and the other establishing minimum consolidated EBITDA requirements.
 
(c)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 

EXECUTION COPY
AMENDMENT NO. 2 dated as of August 8, 2008 to the Credit Agreement referred to below (), between BRUNSWICK CORPORATION, the Lenders party to such Credit Agreement executing this Amendment No. 2 on the signature pages hereto and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A, in its capacity as Administrative Agent under such Credit Agreement.
Amendment No. 2
Brunswick Corporation, certain of its Subsidiaries, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, are parties to a Credit Agreement dated as of April 29, 2005 (as modified and supplemented by Amendment No. 1 thereto dated as of April 20, 2006, the letter agreement dated April 4, 2007 and as further modified and supplemented and in effect from time to time, the ).
Credit Agreement
The Borrower (on behalf of itself and the Subsidiary Obligors) and the Lenders party hereto wish now to amend the Credit Agreement in certain respects, and accordingly, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
Section 1.  .  Except as otherwise defined in this Amendment No. 2, terms defined in the Credit Agreement are used herein as defined therein.
Definitions
Section 2.  .  Subject to the satisfaction of the conditions precedent specified in Section 4 hereof but effective as of the date hereof, the Credit Agreement shall be amended as follows:
Amendments
2.01.  .  References in the Credit Agreement (including references to the Credit Agreement as amended hereby) to this Agreement (and indirect references such as hereunder, hereby, herein and hereof) shall be deemed to be references to the Credit Agreement as amended hereby.
References Generally
2.02.  .
Definitions
A.           The following definitions in Section 1.01 of the Credit Agreement shall be deleted in their entirety:   and .
Additional Margin
Commitment Utilization Day
B.           Section 1.01 of the Credit Agreement shall be amended by amending the following definitions (to the extent already included in said Section 1.01) and adding the following definitions in the appropriate alphabetical location (to the extent not already included in said Section 1.01):
 has the meaning set forth in Section 3.06(a).
2007 10-K
 
 means Amendment No. 2 to this Agreement dated as of August 8, 2008.
Amendment No. 2
 has the meaning set forth in Amendment No. 2.
Amendment No. 2 Effective Date
 means, for any day, with respect to any Syndicated Eurocurrency Loan, or with respect to the facility fees or participation fees in respect of Letters of Credit payable hereunder, as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption Eurocurrency Spread, Facility Fee Rate or Letter of Credit Rate, respectively, based upon the ratings by Moodys and S&P, respectively, applicable on such date to the Index Debt:
Applicable Rate
 
 
 
For purposes of the foregoing, (i) if the ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moodys and S&P for the Index Debt shall fall within different Categories that are one Category apart, the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the Category of the higher of the two ratings; (ii) if the ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moodys and S&P for the Index Debt shall fall within different Categories that are more than one Category apart, the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the Category next below that of the higher of the two ratings; (iii) if only one of Moodys and S&P shall have in effect a rating for the Index Debt, the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the Category of such rating; (iv) if neither Moodys nor S&P shall have in effect a rating for the Index Debt (other than by reason of the circumstances referred to in the last sentence of this definition), then the applicable rating shall be determined by reference to Category 7; and (v) if the ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moodys and S&P for the Index Debt shall be changed (other than as a result of a change in the rating system of Moodys or S&P), such change shall be effective as of the date on which it is first announced by the applicable rating agency, irrespective of when notice of such change shall have been furnished by the Company to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to Section 5.01 or otherwise.  Each change in the Applicable Rate shall apply during the period commencing on the effective date of such change and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change.  If the rating system of Moodys or S&P shall change, or if either such rating agency shall cease to be in the business of rating corporate debt obligations, the Company and the Lenders shall negotiate in good faith to amend this definition to reflect such changed rating system or the unavailability of ratings from such rating agency and, pending the effectiveness of any such amendment, the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the rating most recently in effect prior to such change or cessation.
 
2
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make Syndicated Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum aggregate amount of such Lenders Credit Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.09(b), (b) increased from time to time pursuant to Section 2.09(e) or Section 2.13, and (c) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 10.04 (and the Commitment of any Lender shall be deemed to include its Dollar Sub-Commitment and its Multicurrency Sub-Commitment, if any).  The amount of each Lenders Commitment as of the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date is set forth on Schedule 1 to Amendment No. 2.  The aggregate amount of the Total Commitment (including the Total Dollar Sub-Commitment and the Total Multicurrency Sub-Commitment) is $500,000,000 as of the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date.
Commitment
 means, for any period, the sum, for the Company and its Subsidiaries (determined on a consolidated basis without duplication in accordance with GAAP), of the following:  (a) Consolidated Net Income for such period (b) without duplication and to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (i) Consolidated Interest Expense for such period, (ii) income tax expense for such period, (iii) all amounts attributable to depreciation and amortization for such period, (iv) the amount of any restructuring charges to the extent deducted in determining Consolidated Net Income in an aggregate amount not exceeding $70,000,000 through December 31, 2009 and (v) all non-cash charges to the extent deducted in determining Consolidated Net Income, and (c) without duplication and to the extent included in determining such Consolidated Net Income, any non-cash gains for such period.  For the purposes of calculating Consolidated EBITDA for any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters (each, a ) pursuant to any determination of the Leverage Ratio, if during such Reference Period the Company or any Subsidiary shall have made a Material Acquisition, Consolidated EBITDA for such Reference Period shall be calculated after giving   effect thereto as if such Material Acquisition occurred on the first day of such Reference Period.  As used in this definition, Material Acquisition means any acquisition of property or series of related acquisitions of property that (I) constitutes assets comprising all or substantially all of an operating unit of a business or constitutes all or substantially all of the Equity Interests of a Person and (II) involves the payment of consideration by the Company and its Subsidiaries in excess of $50,000,000.
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
minus
Reference Period
pro
forma
3
 
 
 means (a) on the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date, the Lenders having Dollar Sub-Commitments on Schedule 1 to Amendment No. 2 under the heading Dollar Lenders and (b) thereafter, the Lenders from time to time holding Loans made pursuant to Dollar Sub-Commitments or holding Dollar Sub-Commitments, after giving effect to any assignments thereof permitted by Section 10.04(b).
Dollar Lender
 means, as to each Dollar Lender, the obligation of such Dollar Lender to make Syndicated Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum aggregate amount of such Lenders Dollar Credit Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.09 and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 10.04. The amount of each Lenders Dollar Sub-Commitment as of the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date is set forth on Schedule 1 to Amendment No. 2.  The aggregate amount of the Total Dollar Sub-Commitment is $384,615,384.62 as of the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date.
Dollar Sub-Commitment
 means (a) on the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date, the Persons listed on Schedule 1 to Amendment No. 2 and (b) thereafter, any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption or as an Assuming Lender pursuant to Section 2.09(e) or as an Additional Commitment Lender pursuant to Section 2.13, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption.  Unless the context otherwise requires, the term Lenders includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
 means, as of the last day of any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company, the ratio of (a) Consolidated Total Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for such period.
Leverage Ratio
 means (a) on the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date, the Lenders having Multicurrency Sub-Commitments on Schedule 1 to Amendment No. 2 under the heading Multicurrency Lenders and (b) thereafter, the Lenders from time to time holding Loans made pursuant to Multicurrency Sub-Commitments or holding Multicurrency Sub-Commitments, after giving effect to any assignments thereof permitted by Section 10.04(b).  Unless the context otherwise requires, the term Multicurrency Lender includes the Approving Relevant Lenders.
Multicurrency Lender
 means, as to each Multicurrency Lender, the obligation of such Multicurrency Lender to make Syndicated Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit hereunder, in each case, denominated in Dollars or in an Agreed Foreign Currency, expressed as a Dollar amount representing the Dollar Equivalent of the maximum aggregate amount of such Lenders Syndicated Multicurrency Credit Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.09 and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 10.04.  The amount of each Lenders Multicurrency Sub-Commitment as of the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date is set forth on Schedule 1 to Amendment No. 2.  The aggregate amount of the Total Multicurrency Sub-Commitment is $115,384,615.38 as of the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date.
Multicurrency Sub-Commitment
4
 
 
2.03.                      The second recital of the Credit Agreement shall be amended by replacing the reference therein to $650,000,000 with the words , from and after the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date, $500,000,000.
2.04.                      Sections 2.01, 2.08(a) and 2.11(b)(ii)(B) of the Credit Agreement shall each be amended by replacing the references therein to $150,000,000 with the words the Total Multicurrency Sub-Commitment.
2.05.                      Section 2.14(a) of the Credit Agreement shall be amended in its entirety to read as follows:
(a)  .  The Loans constituting each Syndicated ABR Borrowing to the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary Borrower shall bear interest at a rate per annum equal to the Alternate Base Rate.
Syndicated ABR Loans
2.06.                      Section 2.14(c) of the Credit Agreement shall be amended in its entirety to read as follows:
(c)  .  The Loans constituting each Syndicated Eurocurrency Borrowing shall bear interest at a rate per annum equal to the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for the Interest Period for such Borrowing the Applicable Rate.
Syndicated Eurocurrency Loans
plus
2.07.                      Section 3.04 of the Credit Agreement shall be amended by replacing each reference therein to the date December 31, 2005 with December 31, 2007.
2.08.                      Section 3.06 of the Credit Agreement shall be amended by replacing each reference therein to (a) the date December 31, 2005 with December 31, 2007 and (b) the phrase 2005 10-K with 2007 10-K.
2.09.                      Section 5.01(c) of the Credit Agreement shall be amended by replacing the reference therein to Section 6.05 with the words and Sections 6.05, 6.06 and 6.07.
2.10.                      Section 5.01(d) of the Credit Agreement shall be amended by replacing the reference therein to Section 6.05 with the words Sections 6.05, 6.06 or 6.07.
2.11.                      Section 6.05 of the Credit Agreement shall be amended in its entirety to read as follows:
5
 
 
Section 6.05.  
Leverage Ratio
   The Company will not permit the Leverage Ratio as at the last day of any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company ending on or nearest to the date set forth below, to exceed the ratio set forth below opposite such date:
 
 
 
2.12.                      The Credit Agreement shall be amended by inserting at the end of Article VI new Sections 6.06, 6.07 and 6.08 to read as follows:
Section 6.06.  .  The Company will, and will cause its Subsidiaries to, maintain a consolidated balance of cash and Cash Equivalents of at least: (a) as at the last day of each fiscal quarter of the Company ending after the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date and on or prior to December 31, 2009, $250,000,000 on an aggregate basis and (b) as at the last day of each fiscal quarter of the Company ending thereafter, $200,000,000 on an aggregate basis.
Minimum
Consolidated
Cash
Section 6.07.  .  The Company will not permit Consolidated EBITDA as at the last day of each fiscal quarter of the Company ending after the Amendment No. 2 Effective Date for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ending to be less than $200,000,000.
Minimum
EBITDA
Section 6.08.  .  Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Company shall not be required to comply with the provisions of Sections 6.06 and 6.07 at any time after December 31, 2009, with respect to the last day of any fiscal quarter ended after such date, when the Company shall have in effect ratings for the Index Debt as of such date of (a) at least BBB- from S&P and (b) at least Baa3 from Moodys."
Non-Applicability of Certain Covenants after December 31, 2009
6
 
 
Section 3.  .  The Company represents and warrants to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent that (a) the representations and warranties set forth in Article III of the Credit Agreement (as hereby amended), and in each of the other Loan Documents, are true and complete on the date hereof as if made on and as of the date hereof (or, if any such representation or warranty is expressly stated to have been made as of a specific date, such representation or warranty shall be true and correct as of such specific date), and as if each reference in said Article III to this Agreement included reference to this Amendment No. 2 and the Credit Agreement as amended hereby and (b) no Default has occurred and is continuing.
Representations and Warranties
Section 4.  .  The amendments set forth in Section 2 hereof shall become effective as of the date on which the following conditions precedent shall be satisfied (the ):
Conditions Precedent
Amendment No. 2 Effective Date
(a)           .  The Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts of this Amendment No. 2 executed by the Borrower and the Lenders constituting the Required Lenders.
Execution
(b)           .  The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) for the account of each Lender that shall have executed and delivered this Amendment No. 2 prior to 12:00 noon, New York City time, on August 7, 2008, an amendment fee in an amount equal to 0.20% of the sum of such Lenders Commitment on such date (after giving effect to this Amendment No. 2) and (ii) for account of the relevant person all other fees and expenses required to be paid by the Company in connection with Amendment No. 2.
Fees
(c)           .  After giving effect  to the reduction of the Commitments pursuant to this Amendment No. 2, (i) the sum of the Credit Exposures the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Competitive Loans shall not exceed the Total Commitment as so reduced, (ii) the sum of the Dollar Credit Exposure the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Competitive Loans denominated in Dollars shall not exceed the Total Dollar Sub-Commitment as so reduced, (iii) the sum of the Multicurrency Credit Exposures the Dollar Equivalent of the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Competitive Loans denominated in an Agreed Foreign Currency shall not exceed the Total Multicurrency Sub-Commitment as so reduced, (iv) the aggregate amount of the Sub-Commitments shall not exceed the Commitments as so reduced and (v) with respect to any Lender, such Lenders Dollar Credit Exposure and/or Multicurrency Credit Exposure , as applicable, shall not exceed such Lenders Dollar Sub-Commitment and/or Multicurrency Sub-Commitment, as applicable.
Commitment Reduction
plus
plus
plus
(d)           .  The Administrative Agent shall have received such other approvals and documents relating to this Amendment No. 2 and the transactions contemplated hereby as any Lender may, through the Administrative Agent, reasonably request.
Other Items
 
Section 5.  .  Except as herein provided, the Credit Agreement shall remain unchanged and in full force and effect.  This Amendment No. 2 may be executed in any number of counterparts, all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same amendatory instrument and any of the parties hereto may execute this Amendment No. 2 by signing any such counterpart.  This Amendment No. 2 shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the law of the State of New York.
Miscellaneous
7
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment No. 2 to Credit Agreement to be duly executed and delivered as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
8
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
9
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
10
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
11
 
 
 
   
 
 
12
 
SCHEDULE 1
13


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20080815115149.txt.gz
TIME:20080815115149
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 12, 2008, Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") entered into a Purchase Agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, Banc of America Securities LLC and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., as representatives of the several underwriters named therein, with respect to the offering and sale by the Company of $250 million aggregate principal amount of its 9.75% Senior Notes due 2013 (the "Notes") under the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-152620). The Notes were issued pursuant to an Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee. The Purchase Agreement is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
The press release issued by the Company on August 12, 2008, announcing the pricing of the offering, is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
The sale of the Notes closed on August 15, 2008. The form of the Notes is filed as Exhibit 4.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
In connection with the issuance of the Notes, Sidley Austin LLP provided the Company with the legal opinion attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 5.1.
On August 15, 2008, the Company directed The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee, to provide notice to holders of the Company's Floating Rate Notes due 2009 (the "Notes due 2009") of the Company's election to redeem all of the outstanding $250,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of the Notes due 2009 (the "Redemption"). The Notes due 2009 are to be redeemed on September 17, 2008, at the redemption price of 100% of the principal amount thereof in accordance with the terms of the indenture governing the Notes due 2009. The Company intends to use the proceeds from the sale of the Notes and available cash to fund the Redemption.
The description set forth above is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Notice of Redemption, a copy of which is filed herewith as Exhibit 99.3.
 
 
The following exhibits are filed with this Current Report on Form 8-K:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 1.1
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
 
 
August 12, 2008
MERRILL LYNCH & CO.
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated
Banc of America Securities LLC
J.P. Morgan Securities Inc.
as Representatives of the several Underwriters
c/o Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated
4 World Financial Center
New York, New York 10080
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the ""), confirms its agreement with Merrill Lynch & Co., Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated (""), Banc of America Securities LLC ("") and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. ("") and each of the other underwriters named in Schedule A hereto (collectively, the "," which term shall also include any underwriter substituted as hereinafter provided in Section 10 hereof), for whom Merrill Lynch, Banc of America and JPMorgan are acting as representatives (in such capacity, the ""), with respect to the issue and sale by the Company and the purchase by the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, of the respective principal amounts set forth in said Schedule A of $250,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 9.75% Senior Notes due 2013 (the ""). The Securities are to be issued pursuant to an indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987 (the ""), between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee (the ""). The term "," as used herein, includes the Officers' Certificate (as defined in the Indenture) establishing the form and terms of the Securities pursuant to Sections 2.01 and 2.03 of the Indenture.
Company
Merrill Lynch
Banc of America
JPMorgan
Underwriters
Representatives
Securities
Indenture
Trustee
Indenture
The Company understands that the Underwriters propose to make a public offering of the Securities as soon as the Representatives deem advisable after this underwriting agreement (this "") has been executed and delivered.
Agreement
The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") an automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-152620), including the related preliminary prospectus or prospectuses, which registration statement became effective upon filing under Rule 462(e) of the rules and regulations of the Commission (the "") under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "") Such registration statement covers the registration of the Securities under the 1933 Act. The Indenture, which is incorporated by reference in the registration statement, has been qualified under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (the ""). Promptly after execution and delivery of this Agreement, the Company will prepare and file a prospectus in accordance with the provisions of Rule 430B ("") of the 1933 Act Regulations and paragraph (b) of Rule 424 ("") of the 1933 Act Regulations. Any information included in such prospectus that was omitted from such registration statement at the time it became effective but that is deemed to be part of and included in such registration statement pursuant to Rule 430B is referred to as "." Each prospectus used in connection with the offering of the Securities that omitted Rule 430B Information is herein called a "." Such registration statement, at any given time, including the amendments thereto at such time, the exhibits and any schedules thereto at such time, the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act at such time and the documents otherwise deemed to be a part thereof or included therein by the 1933 Act Regulations, is herein called the "." The Registration Statement at the time it originally became effective is herein called the "." The final prospectus in the form first furnished to the Underwriters by the Company for use in connection with the offering of the Securities, including the documents incorporated or deemed incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act at the time of the execution of this Agreement and any preliminary prospectuses that form a part thereof, is herein called the "." For purposes of this Agreement, all references to the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement to any of the foregoing shall be deemed to include the copy filed with the Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval system ("")
Commission
1933 Act Regulations
1933 Act
1939 Act
Rule 430B
Rule 424(b)
Rule 430B Information
preliminary prospectus
Registration Statement
Original Registration Statement
Prospectus
EDGAR
All references in this Agreement to financial statements and schedules and other information which is "contained," "included" or "stated" in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (and all other references of like import) shall be deemed to mean and include all such financial statements and schedules and other information which is or is deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be; and all references in this Agreement to amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to mean and include the filing of any document under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ""), which is or is deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, such preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be.
1934 Act
SECTION 1. .
Representations and Warranties
(a) The Company represents and warrants to each Underwriter as of the date hereof, the Applicable Time referred to in Section 1(a)(2) hereof and as of the Closing Time referred to in Section 2(b) hereof, and agrees with each Underwriter, as follows:
 
(1) . (A) At the time of filing the Original Registration Statement, (B) at the time of the most recent amendment thereto for the purposes of complying with Section 10(a)(3) of the 1933 Act (whether such amendment was by post-effective amendment, incorporated report filed pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the 1934 Act or form of prospectus), (C) at the time the Company or any person acting on its behalf (within the meaning, for this clause only, of Rule 163(c) of the 1933 Act Regulations) made any offer relating to the Securities in reliance on the exemption of Rule 163 of the 1933 Act Regulations and (D) at the date hereof, the Company was and is a "well-known seasoned issuer" as defined in Rule 405 of the 1933 Act Regulations (""), including not having been and not being an "ineligible issuer" as defined in Rule 405. The Registration Statement is an "automatic shelf registration statement," as defined in Rule 405, and the Securities, since their registration on the Registration Statement, have been and remain eligible for registration by the Company on a Rule 405 "automatic shelf registration statement". The Company has not received from the Commission any notice pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) of the 1933 Act Regulations objecting to the use of the automatic shelf registration statement form.
Status as a Well-Known Seasoned Issuer
Rule 405
At the time of filing the Original Registration Statement, at the earliest time thereafter that the Company or another offering participant made a offer (within the meaning of Rule 164(h)(2) of the 1933 Act Regulations) of the Securities and at the date hereof, the Company was not and is not an "ineligible issuer," as defined in Rule 405.
bona fide
(2) . The Company meets the requirements for use of Form S-3 under the 1933 Act. The Original Registration Statement became effective upon filing under Rule 462(e) of the 1933 Act Regulations ("") on July 29, 2008 and any post-effective amendment thereto also became effective upon filing under Rule 462(e). No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued under the 1933 Act and no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, are contemplated by the Commission, and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information has been complied with. In addition, the Indenture has been duly qualified under the 1939 Act.
Registration Statement, Prospectus, Disclosure at Time of Sale and Indenture
Rule 462(e)
Any offer that is a written communication relating to the Securities made prior to the filing of the Original Registration Statement by the Company or any person acting on its behalf (within the meaning, for this paragraph only, of Rule 163(c) of the 1933 Act Regulations) has been filed with the Commission in accordance with the exemption provided by Rule 163 of the 1933 Act Regulations ("") and otherwise complied with the requirements of Rule 163, including without limitation the legending requirement, to qualify such offer for the exemption from Section 5(c) of the 1933 Act provided by Rule 163.
Rule 163
At the respective times the Original Registration Statement and each amendment thereto became effective, at each deemed effective date with respect to the Underwriters pursuant to Rule 430B(f)(2) of the 1933 Act Regulations and at the Closing Time, the Registration Statement complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and
 
the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1939 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission under the 1939 Act (the ""), and did not and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
1939 Act Regulations
Neither the Prospectus nor any amendments or supplements thereto, at the time the Prospectus or any such amendment or supplement was issued and at the Closing Time, included or will include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or will omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Each preliminary prospectus (including the prospectus or prospectuses filed as part of the Original Registration Statement or any amendment thereto) complied when so filed in all material respects with the 1933 Act Regulations and each preliminary prospectus and the Prospectus delivered to the Underwriters for use in connection with this offering was identical to the electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
As of the Applicable Time, neither (x) the Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus(es) (as defined below) issued at or prior to the Applicable Time (as defined below) and the Statutory Prospectus (as defined below), all considered together (collectively, the ""), nor (y) any individual Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus, when considered together with the General Disclosure Package, included any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
General Disclosure Package
As of the time of the filing of the Final Term Sheet, the General Disclosure Package, when considered together with the Final Term Sheet (as defined in Section 3(c)), did not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
As used in this subsection and elsewhere in this Agreement:
"" means 5:30 p.m. on August 12, 2008 or such other time as agreed by the Company and the Representatives.
Applicable Time
"" means any "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433 of the 1933 Act Regulations (""), relating to the Securities that (i) is required to be filed with the Commission by the Company, (ii) is a "road show that is a written communication" within the meaning of Rule 433(d)(8)(i), whether or not required to be filed with the Commission or (iii) is exempt from filing pursuant to Rule 433(d)(5)(i) because it contains a description of the Securities or of the offering that does not reflect the final terms, in each case in the form filed or required to be filed with the Commission or, if not required to be filed, in the form retained in the Company's records pursuant to Rule 433(g).
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
Rule 433
 
"" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is intended for general distribution to prospective investors, as evidenced by its being specified in Schedule B hereto.
Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus
"" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not an Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus.
Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus
"" as of any time means the prospectus relating to the Securities that is included in the Registration Statement immediately prior to that time, including any document incorporated by reference therein and any preliminary or other prospectus deemed to be a part thereof.
Statutory Prospectus
Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the completion of the public offer and sale of the Securities or until any earlier date that the issuer notified or notifies the Representatives as described in Section 3(f), did not, does not and will not include any information that conflicted, conflicts or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, including any document incorporated by reference therein and any preliminary or other prospectus deemed to be a part thereof that has not been superseded or modified.
The representations and warranties in this subsection shall not apply to that part of the Registration Statement which constitutes the Statement of Qualification of the Trustee on Form T-1 under the 1939 Act or to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), in any preliminary prospectus or in the Prospectus (or in any amendment or supplement thereto).
(3) . The documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, at the time they were or hereafter are filed with the Commission, complied and will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations or the 1934 Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (the ""), as applicable, and, when read together with the other information in the Prospectus, (a) at the time the Original Registration Statement became effective, (b) at the earlier of time the Prospectus was first used and the date and time of the first contract of sale of Securities in this offering and (c) at the Closing Time, did not and will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
Incorporated Documents
1934 Act Regulations
(4) . The accountants who certified the financial statements and supporting schedules included in the Registration Statement are independent public accountants as required by the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations.
Independent Accountants
 
(5) . The financial statements, together with the related notes thereto, included in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, present fairly the financial position of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries at the dates indicated and the statement of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries for the periods specified; except as otherwise stated in the Registration Statement, said financial statements have been prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles ("") applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods involved. The supporting schedules, if any, present fairly in accordance with GAAP the information required to be stated therein. The selected financial data included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007 and the summary financial information included in the Prospectus present fairly the information shown therein and have been compiled on a basis consistent with that of the audited financial statements included in the Registration Statement.
Financials Statements
GAAP
(6) . Since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, the General Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, except as otherwise stated therein, (A) there has been no material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business and (B) there have been no transactions entered into by the Company or any of its subsidiaries, other than those in the ordinary course of business, which are material with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
No Material Adverse Change
(7) . The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware with corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Prospectus and to enter into and perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Indenture; and the Company is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
Good Standing of the Company
(8) . Each subsidiary of the Company which is a significant subsidiary (a "") as defined in Rule 405 of the 1933 Act Regulations has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Prospectus and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, whether by reason of the ownership
Good Standing of Subsidiaries
Subsidiary
 
or leasing of property or the conduct of business, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each such Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and nonassessable and is owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity.
(9) . This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
Authorization of Agreement
(10) . Each of the Indenture and each supplement thereto, if any, to the date hereof has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company, has been duly qualified under the 1939 Act, and, assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by the Trustee, constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as enforcement thereof may be subject to (A) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to creditors' rights generally, and (B) general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law); and the Indenture conforms in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus.
Authorization of the Indenture
(11) . The Securities have been duly authorized, and, when executed, authenticated, issued and delivered in the manner provided for in the Indenture and sold and paid for as provided herein, the Securities will constitute legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company, entitled to the benefits of the Indenture and enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except as enforcement thereof may be subject to (A) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to creditors' rights generally, and (B) general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforcement is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law); and the Securities conform in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus.
Authorization of the Securities
(12) . Neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries is in violation of its charter or in default (and, to the knowledge of the Company, no event has occurred, and no circumstances exist, that with the passage of time or giving of notice would constitute a default) in the performance or observance of any material obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which it or any of them may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is subject; and the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Indenture, the issuance and delivery of the Securities and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and therein and compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder and thereunder have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action and will not conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default (or with the passage of time or giving of
Absence of Defaults and Conflicts
 
notice constitute a default) under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries pursuant to, any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which it or any of them may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is subject, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the charter or by-laws of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries or any violation of any applicable law, administrative regulation or administrative or court decree.
(13) . Other than as disclosed in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, there is no action, suit or proceeding before or by any court or governmental agency or body, domestic or foreign, now pending, or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, which is required to be disclosed in the Registration Statement, or which might result in any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, or which might materially and adversely affect the properties or assets thereof or which might materially and adversely affect the consummation of this Agreement or the issuance of the Securities pursuant to the Indenture; all pending legal or governmental proceedings to which the Company or any subsidiary is a party or of which any of their respective property or assets is the subject which are not described in the Registration Statement, including ordinary routine litigation incidental to the business, are, considered in the aggregate, not material; and there are no contracts or documents of the Company or any of its subsidiaries which are required to be filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement by the 1933 Act or by the 1933 Act Regulations which have not been so filed.
Absence of Proceedings
(14) . The Company and the Subsidiaries own or possess, or can acquire on reasonable terms, the patents, patent rights, licenses, inventions, copyrights, know-how (including trade secrets and other unpatented and/or unpatentable proprietary or confidential information, systems or procedures), trademarks, service marks and trade names (collectively, "") presently employed by them in connection with the business now operated by them, and neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries has received any notice or is otherwise aware of any infringement of or conflict with asserted rights of others with respect to any patent and proprietary rights, or of any facts which would render any patent and proprietary rights invalid or inadequate to protect the interest of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries therein, and which infringement or conflict (if the subject of any unfavorable decision, ruling or finding) or invalidity or inadequacy, singly or in the aggregate, would result in any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
Possession of Intellectual Property
patent and proprietary rights
(15) . No filing with, or authorization, approval, consent, license, order, registration, qualification or decree of, any court or governmental authority or agency is necessary or required in connection with the
Absence of Further Requirements
 
consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, except such as have been already obtained or as may be required under the 1933 Act, the 1933 Act Regulations, the 1939 Act, the 1939 Act Regulations or state securities laws.
(16) . The Company and the Subsidiaries possess such certificates, authorities or permits issued by the appropriate state, federal or foreign regulatory agencies or bodies necessary to conduct the business now operated by them, and neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries has received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such certificate, authority or permit which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would materially and adversely affect the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
Possession of Licenses and Permits
(17) . Except as described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, and except as would not, singly or in the aggregate, result in any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, (A) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is in violation of any federal, state, local or foreign statute, law, rule, regulation, ordinance, code, policy or rule of common law or any judicial or administrative interpretation thereof, including any judicial or administrative order, consent, decree or judgment, relating to pollution or protection of human health, the environment (including, without limitation, ambient air, surface water, groundwater, land surface or subsurface strata) or wildlife, including, without limitation, laws and regulations relating to the release or threatened release of chemicals, pollutants, contaminants, wastes, toxic substances, hazardous substances, petroleum or petroleum products, asbestos-containing materials or mold (collectively, "") or to the manufacture, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, disposal, transport or handling of Hazardous Materials (collectively, ""), (B) the Company and its subsidiaries have all permits, authorizations and approvals required under any applicable Environmental Laws and are each in compliance with their requirements, (C) there are no pending or threatened administrative, regulatory or judicial actions, suits, demands, demand letters, claims, liens, notices of noncompliance or violation, investigation or proceedings relating to any Environmental Law against the Company or any of its subsidiaries and (D) there are no events or circumstances that would reasonably be expected to form the basis of an order for clean-up or remediation, or an action, suit or proceeding by any private party or governmental body or agency, against or affecting the Company or any of its subsidiaries relating to Hazardous Materials or any Environmental Laws.
Environmental Laws
Hazardous Materials
Environmental Laws
(18) . The Company and the Subsidiaries have good and sufficient title to all property described or referred to in the Registration Statement as being owned by them, in each case free and clear of all liens, claims, security interests or other encumbrances, with such exceptions as are described or referred to in the Registration Statement or as are not material to the condition, financial or otherwise, or to the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
Title to Property
 
(19) . There are no outstanding loans, advances (except normal advances for business expenses in the ordinary course of business) or guarantees of indebtedness by the Company to or for the benefit of any of the officers or directors of the Company or any of their respective family members, except as disclosed in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus.
Insider Transactions
(20) . There is and has been no failure on the part of the Company or any of the Company's directors or officers, in their capacities as such, to comply in all material respects with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and the rules and regulations promulgated in connection therewith, including Section 402 related to loans and Sections 302 and 906 related to certifications.
Compliance with the Sarbanes Oxley Act
(21) . The Company and its consolidated subsidiaries maintain a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurances that (A) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; (B) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP and to maintain accountability for assets; (C) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (D) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences. Except as described in the Prospectus, since the end of the Company's most recent audited fiscal year, there has been (I) no material weakness in the Company's internal control over financial reporting (whether or not remediated) and (II) no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting.
Accounting Controls and Disclosure Controls
The Company has implemented the "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rules 13a-15 and 15d-15 of the 1934 Act Regulations) required in order for the principal executive officer and principal financial officer of the Company to engage in the review and evaluation process mandated by the 1934 Act Regulations. To the extent required by the 1934 Act Regulations, the Company's "disclosure controls and procedures" are reasonably designed to ensure that all information (both financial and non-financial) required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the 1934 Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations, and that all such information is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure and to make the certifications of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer of the Company required under the 1934 Act with respect to such reports.
(b) Any certificate signed by any officer of the Company and delivered to the Representatives or to counsel for the Underwriters in connection with the offering of the Securities shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company to each Underwriter as to the matters covered thereby.
 
SECTION 2. . On the basis of the representations and warranties contained herein and subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth:
Sale and Delivery to Underwriters; Closing
(a) The Company agrees to sell to each Underwriter, and each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the purchase price set forth in Schedule C, the principal amount of the Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter on Schedule A, plus any additional principal amount of the Securities which such Underwriter may become obligated to purchase pursuant to the provisions of Section 10 hereof.
(b) Payment of the purchase price for, and delivery of certificates for, the Securities shall be made at the date, time and location specified in Schedule C (unless postponed in accordance with the provisions of Section 10) or such other date, time and location as shall be agreed upon by the Representatives and the Company (such time and date of payment and delivery being herein called ""). Unless otherwise specified in Schedule C, payment shall be made to the Company by wire transfer of immediately available funds, against delivery to the Representatives for the respective accounts of the Underwriters of certificates for the Securities to be purchased by them. Certificates for the Securities shall be in such denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request in writing at least two business days prior to the Closing Time. It is understood that each Underwriter has authorized each of the Representatives, for its account, to accept delivery of, receipt for, and make payment of the purchase price for, the Securities which it has agreed to purchase. Merrill Lynch, individually and not as a Representative of the Underwriters, may (but shall not be obligated to) make payment of the purchase price for the Securities to be purchased by any Underwriter whose money has not been received by the Closing Time but such payment shall not relieve such Underwriter from its obligations hereunder. The certificates, which may be in temporary form, for the Securities will be made available for examination and packaging by the Representatives not later than 10:00 a.m. on the last business day prior to the Closing Time.
Closing Time
SECTION 3. . The Company covenants with each Underwriter as follows:
Covenants of the Company
(a) . The Company, subject to Section 3(b), will comply with the requirements of Rule 430B and will notify the Representatives promptly, and confirm the notice in writing, (i) when any post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement or new registration statement relating to the Securities shall become effective, (ii) of the mailing or the delivery to the Commission for filing of any supplement to the Prospectus or any amended Prospectus or any document to be filed pursuant to the 1934 Act which will be incorporated by reference into the Prospectus or the Registration Statement, (iii) of the receipt of any comments from the Commission with respect to the Registration Statement or Prospectus, (iv) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or the filing of a new registration statement relating to the Securities or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or any document incorporated by reference therein or otherwise deemed to be a part thereof or for additional information, (v) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any such new registration statement or any order preventing or suspending the use of any Prospectus or the initiation of any proceedings for any such purpose, or of any examination pursuant to
Compliance with Securities Regulations and Commission Requests; Payment of Filing Fees
 
Section 8(e) of the 1933 Act concerning the Registration Statement, (vi) if the Company becomes the subject of a proceeding under Section 8A of the 1933 Act in connection with the offering of the Securities and (vii) of the suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, or the initiation or threatening of any proceedings for such purpose of which the Company becomes aware. The Company will effect the filings required under Rule 424(b), in the manner and within the time period required by Rule 424(b) (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8)). The Company will use all reasonable efforts to prevent the issuance of any stop order or any order preventing or suspending the use of any Prospectus or suspending such qualification, and, in the event of the issuance of a stop order or any order preventing or suspending the use of any Prospectus or suspending such qualifications, to use all reasonable efforts to promptly obtain the lifting thereof. The Company shall pay the required Commission filing fees relating to the Securities within the time required by Rule 456(b)(1)(i) of the 1933 Act Regulations without regard to the proviso therein and otherwise in accordance with Rules 456(b) and 457(r) of the 1933 Act Regulations (including, if applicable, by updating the "" table in accordance with Rule 456(b)(1)(ii) either in a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement or on the cover page of a prospectus filed pursuant to Rule 424(b)).
Calculation of Registration Fee
(b) . The Company will give the Representatives notice of its intention to file or prepare any amendment to the Registration Statement or new registration statement relating to the Securities or any amendment, supplement or revision to either the preliminary prospectus (including any prospectus included in the Original Registration Statement or amendment thereto at the time it became effective) or the Prospectus, whether pursuant to the 1933 Act, the 1934 Act or otherwise, will furnish the Representatives with copies of any such documents within a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing or use, as the case may be, and will not file or use any such document to which the Representatives or counsel for the Underwriters shall reasonably object. The Company has given the Representatives notice of any filings made pursuant to the 1934 Act or 1934 Act Regulations within 48 hours prior to the Applicable Time; the Company will give the Representatives notice of its intention to make any such filing from the Applicable Time to the Closing Time and will furnish the Representatives with copies of any such documents a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing and will not file or use any such document to which the Representatives or counsel for the Underwriters shall reasonably object. The Company will prepare a final term sheet (the "") reflecting the final terms of the Securities, which shall be in the form set forth in Schedule B, and shall file such Final Term Sheet as an "issuer free writing prospectus" pursuant to Rule 433 prior to the close of business two business days after the date hereof; provided that the Company shall furnish the Representatives with copies of any such Final Term Sheet a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing and will not use or file any such document to which the Representatives or counsel to the Underwriters shall reasonably object.
Filing of Amendments and Exchange Act Documents; Preparation of Final Term Sheet
Final Term Sheet
(c) . The Company will deliver to the Representatives without charge five signed copies of the Original Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto (including exhibits filed therewith or incorporated by reference therein and documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein), duplicates of signed copies of all consents and certificates of experts, and as many conformed copies as the Representatives may reasonably request and will also deliver to the Representatives a conformed copy of the Original Registration Statement as originally filed and of each
Delivery of Registration Statements
 
amendment thereto (without exhibits) for each of the Underwriters. The copies of the Original Registration Statement and each amendment thereto furnished to the Underwriters will be identical to the electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
(d) . The Company has delivered to each Underwriter, without charge, as many copies of each preliminary prospectus as such Underwriter reasonably requested, and the Company hereby consents to the use of such copies for purposes permitted by the 1933 Act. The Company will furnish to each Underwriter without charge, from time to time during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act or the 1934 Act, such number of copies of the Prospectus (as amended or supplemented) as such Underwriter may reasonably request for the purposes contemplated by the 1933 Act or the 1934 Act or the respective applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder. The Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto furnished to the Underwriters will be identical to the electronically transmitted copies thereof filed with the Commission pursuant to EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T.
Delivery of Prospectuses
(e) . The Company will comply with the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations, the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations and the 1939 Act and the 1939 Act Regulations so as to permit the completion of the distribution of the Securities as contemplated in this Agreement and in the Prospectus. If at any time when a prospectus is required by the 1933 Act to be delivered in connection with the sale of the Securities, any event shall occur or a condition shall exist as a result of which it is necessary, in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters or for the Company, to amend the Registration Statement or to amend or supplement the Prospectus in order that the Prospectus shall not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading in the light of the circumstances existing at the time it is delivered to a purchaser, or if it shall be necessary, in the opinion of such counsel, at any such time, to amend the Registration Statement or to file a new registration statement or supplement the Prospectus in order to comply with the requirements of the 1933 Act or the 1933 Act Regulations, the Company will forthwith prepare and file with the Commission, subject to Section 3(b), such amendment, supplement or new registration statement, as the case may be (in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters), as may be necessary to correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance and the Company will furnish to the Underwriters a reasonable number of copies of such amendment or supplement. The Company will use its best efforts to have such amendment or new registration statement declared effective as soon as practicable (if it is not an automatic shelf registration statement with regard to the Securities). If at any time following issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus there occurred or occurs an event or development as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus conflicted or would conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement (or any other registration statement relating to the Securities) or the Statutory Prospectus or any preliminary prospectus or included or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or would omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances prevailing at that subsequent time, not misleading, the Company will promptly notify the Representatives and will promptly amend or supplement, at its own expense, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to eliminate or correct such conflict, untrue statement or omission.
Continued Compliance with Securities Laws
 
(f) . The Company will endeavor, in cooperation with the Underwriters, to qualify the Securities for offering and sale under the applicable securities laws of such states and other jurisdictions of the United States as the Representatives may designate; provided, however, that the Company shall not be obligated to qualify as a foreign corporation in any jurisdiction in which it is not so qualified or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction. In each jurisdiction in which the Securities have been so qualified, the Company will file such statements and reports as may be required by the laws of such jurisdiction to continue such qualification in effect for a period of not less than one year from the effective date of the Registration Statement.
Blue Sky Qualifications
(g) . The Company will timely file such reports pursuant to the 1934 Act as are necessary in order to make generally available to its security holders as soon as practicable an earnings statement for the purposes of, and to provide the benefits contemplated by, the last paragraph of Section 11(a) of the 1933 Act.
Rule 158
(h) . The Company will use the net proceeds received by it from the sale of the Securities in the manner specified in the Prospectus under "Use of Proceeds."
Use of Proceeds
(i) . Until the business day following the Closing Time, the Company will not, without the Representatives' prior written consent, directly or indirectly, sell, offer to sell or announce the offering of, or otherwise dispose of, any debt securities of the Company covered by the Registration Statement or any other registration statement filed under the 1933 Act.
Restriction on Sale of Securities
(j) . The Company, during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act, will file all documents required to be filed with the Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15 of the 1934 Act within the time periods required by the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations.
Reporting Requirements
(k) . The Company represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Representatives, and each Underwriter represents and agrees that unless it obtains the prior consent of the Company and the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Securities that would constitute an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, or that would otherwise constitute a "free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 405, required to be filed with the Commission; provided that the prior written consent of the parties hereto shall be deemed to have been given in respect of the Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectuses included in Schedule B hereto. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Underwriters may convey the information to be included in the Final Term Sheet to be prepared and filed in accordance with Section 3(b) prior to the time the Final Term Sheet is prepared. Any such free writing prospectus consented to by the Company and the Representatives is hereinafter referred to as a "." The Company represents that it has treated or agrees that it will treat each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, and has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including timely filing with the Commission where required, legending and record keeping.
Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses
Permitted Free Writing Prospectus
 
SECTION 4. . The Company will pay all expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, including (i) the printing and filing of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, (ii) the typing, printing and distribution of this Agreement and the Indenture, (iii) the preparation, issuance and delivery of the certificates for the Securities to the Underwriters, including transfer taxes, if any, payable upon the sale, issuance and delivery to the Underwriters of the Securities, (iv) the fees and disbursements of the Company's counsel and accountants, (v) the qualification of the Securities under securities laws in accordance with the provisions of Section 3(g) hereof, including filing fees and the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters in connection therewith and in connection with the preparation of the Blue Sky Survey, (vi) the printing and delivery to the Underwriters of copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, of each preliminary prospectus, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus and of the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto and any costs associated with electronic delivery of any of the foregoing by the Underwriters to investors, (vii) the printing and delivery to the Underwriters of copies of the Blue Sky Survey, (viii) the fees of rating agencies, (x) the fees, if any, of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. and (xi) the fees and expenses of the Trustee, including the fees and disbursements of counsel for the Trustee, in connection with the Indenture.
Payment of Expenses
If this Agreement is terminated by the Representatives in accordance with the provisions of Section 5 or Section 9(a)(i) hereof, the Company shall reimburse the Underwriters for all of their out-of-pocket expenses, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for such Underwriters.
SECTION 5. . The obligations of the several Underwriters hereunder are subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties of the Company contained in Section 1 hereof or in certificates of any officer of the Company or any subsidiary of the Company delivered pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and under the Indenture, and to the following further conditions:
Conditions of Underwriters' Obligations
(a) . At the Closing Time, (i) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued under the 1933 Act or proceedings therefor initiated or threatened by the Commission and any request on the part of the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the satisfaction of counsel for the Underwriters and (ii) the rating assigned by any nationally recognized securities rating agency to any debt securities of the Company as of the date hereof shall not have been lowered since the date hereof and no such agency shall have publicly announced that it has placed any of such debt securities on what is commonly termed a "watch list" for possible downgrading. A prospectus containing the Rule 430B Information shall have been filed with the Commission in the manner and within the time period required by Rule 424(b) (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8)) (or a post-effective amendment providing such information shall have been filed and become effective in accordance with the requirements of Rule 430B). The Company shall have paid the required Commission filing fees relating to the Securities within the time period required by Rule 456(1)(i) of the 1933
Effectiveness of Registration Statement; Filing of Prospectus; Payment of Filing Fee
 
Act Regulations without regard to the proviso therein and otherwise in accordance with Rules 456(b) and 457(r) of the 1933 Act Regulations and, if applicable, shall have updated the "Calculation of Registration Fee" table in accordance with Rule 456(b)(1)(ii) either in a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement or on the cover page of a prospectus filed pursuant to Rule 424(b).
(b) . At the Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received:
Opinion of Counsel for the Company
(1) The favorable opinion, dated as of the Closing Time, of Sidley Austin LLP, counsel to the Company, in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters, to the effect that:
(i) The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware.
(ii) The Securities have been duly authorized for issuance and sale to the Underwriters, and, when issued and delivered by the Company pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, against payment of the consideration set forth herein, will constitute legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company, entitled to the benefits provided by the Indenture, and be enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except to the extent enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by the effect of general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(iii) This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
(iv) The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes a valid and binding instrument of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except to the extent enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent transfer, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws of general applicability relating to or affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and by the effect of general principles of equity (regardless of whether enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(v) The Indenture has been duly qualified under the 1939 Act.
(vi) The Registration Statement is effective under the 1933 Act; any required filing of each prospectus relating to the Securities (including the Prospectus) has been made pursuant to Rule 424(b) in accordance with Rule 424(b); any required filing of each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus has been made pursuant to Rule 433 in accordance with Rule 433; and, to the best of their knowledge and information, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued under the 1933 Act or proceeding therefor initiated or threatened by the Commission.
 
(vii) The Securities conform in all material respects to the description thereof in the Prospectus, and the form of certificate used to evidence the Securities is in due and proper form.
(viii) The Registration Statement (other than the financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included therein or omitted therefrom and other than the documents incorporated by reference therein, as to which such counsel need not express any belief), at the time the Registration Statement became effective, and the Prospectus (other than the financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included therein or omitted therefrom and other than the documents incorporated by reference therein, as to which such counsel need not express any belief), as of the date of the execution of this Agreement, each complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations.
(ix) To the best of their knowledge and information, there are no contracts, indentures, mortgages, loan agreements, notes, leases or other instruments required to be described or referred to in the Registration Statement or to be filed as exhibits thereto other than those described or referred to therein or filed or incorporated by reference as exhibits thereto.
(x) No authorization, approval, consent or order of any court or governmental authority or agency is required in connection with the offering, issuance or sale of the Securities to the Underwriters, except as may be required under the 1933 Act, the 1933 Act Regulations, the 1939 Act, the 1939 Act Regulations or the securities or blue sky laws of any jurisdiction.
(xi) To the best of their knowledge and information, the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Indenture and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and therein and compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder and thereunder will not conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries pursuant to, any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument which was filed as an exhibit to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 or the Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 29, 2008 and June 28, 2008, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws of the Company, or any applicable law, administrative regulation or administrative or court decree.
(xii) Each document filed pursuant to the 1934 Act (other than the financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included therein, as to which no opinion need be rendered) and incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Prospectus complied when so filed as to form in all material respects with the 1934 Act and the 1934 Act Regulations.
 
(2) . The favorable opinion, dated as of the Closing Time, of Lloyd C. Chatfield II, General Counsel to the Company, in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters, to the effect that:
Opinion of General Counsel to the Company
(i) To the best of his knowledge and information, the Company is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise.
(ii) Each Subsidiary has been duly incorporated and is validly existing as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement and, to the best of his knowledge and information, is duly qualified as a foreign corporation to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required, except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect on the condition, financial or otherwise, or the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise; all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each Subsidiary has been duly authorized and validly issued, is fully paid and nonassessable and, to the best of his knowledge and information, is owned by the Company, directly or through subsidiaries, free and clear of any security interest, mortgage, pledge, lien, encumbrance, claim or equity.
(iii) Other than as disclosed in the Registration Statement, to the best of his knowledge and information, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending or threatened which are required to be disclosed in the Registration Statement, and all pending legal or governmental proceedings to which the Company or any subsidiary is a party or to which any of their property is subject which are not described in the Registration Statement, including ordinary routine litigation incidental to the business, are, considered in the aggregate, not material.
(iv) To the best of his knowledge and information, there are no contracts, indentures, mortgages, loan agreements, notes, leases or other instruments required to be described or referred to in the Registration Statement or to be filed as exhibits thereto other than those described or referred to therein or filed or incorporated by reference as exhibits thereto, the descriptions thereof or references thereto are correct, and no default exists in the due performance or observance of any material obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument so described, referred to, filed or incorporated by reference.
 
(v) The Company has corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement and to enter into and perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Indenture.
(vi) To the best of his knowledge and information, the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Indenture and the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and therein and compliance by the Company with its obligations hereunder and thereunder will not conflict with or constitute a breach of, or default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries pursuant to, any contract, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note, lease or other instrument to which the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is a party or by which it or any of them may be bound, or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries is subject, nor will such action result in any violation of the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation or By-laws of the Company, or any applicable law, administrative regulation or administrative or court decree.
(3) . The favorable opinion, dated as of the applicable Closing Time, of Latham & Watkins LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, with respect to the issuance and sale of the Securities, the Indenture, the Registration Statement, the Prospectus (together with any supplement thereto) and other related matters as the Representatives may reasonably require.
Opinion of Counsel for the Underwriters
(4) . In giving their opinions required by subsections (b)(1), (b)(2) and (b)(3), respectively, of this Section, Sidley Austin LLP, Latham & Watkins LLP and Mr. Chatfield shall each additionally state that nothing has come to their attention that has caused them to believe that (i) the Registration Statement (except for financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or omitted therefrom, as to which counsel need make no statement), at the time it became effective or at the date of this Agreement, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, (ii) the Prospectus (except for financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or omitted therefrom, as to which counsel need make no statement), as of the date of the prospectus supplement included in the Prospectus or at Closing Time, included or includes an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or (iii) the General Disclosure Package (except for financial statements and supporting schedules and other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or omitted therefrom, as to which counsel need make no statement), as of the Applicable Time, included an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. With respect to statements contained in the General Disclosure Package, any statement contained in any of the constituent documents shall be deemed to be modified or superseded to the extent that any information contained in subsequent constituent documents modifies or replaces such statement.
Negative Assurances
 
(c) . At the Closing Time there shall not have been, since the date of this Agreement or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus or the General Disclosure Package, any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, and the Representatives shall have received a certificate of the President or a Vice President of the Company and of the chief financial or chief accounting officer of the Company, dated as of such Closing Time, to the effect that (i) there has been no such material adverse change, (ii) the representations and warranties in Section 1 hereof are true and correct with the same force and effect as though expressly made at and as of such Closing Time, (iii) the Company has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to such Closing Time, and (iv) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued, and no proceedings for that purpose have been initiated or are pending or are, to their knowledge, contemplated by the Commission.
Officers' Certificate
(d) . At the time of the execution of this Agreement and at the Closing Time, the Representatives shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP letters, dated such dates, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect that (i) they are independent public accountants with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries within the meaning of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations; (ii) it is their opinion that the financial statements and supporting schedules included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and covered by their opinions therein comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1934 Act and 1934 Act Regulations; (iii) based upon limited procedures set forth in detail in such letters, nothing has come to their attention which causes them to believe that (A) any unaudited financial statements and supporting schedules of the Company and its subsidiaries included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and the Prospectus do not comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of the 1933 Act and the 1933 Act Regulations and the 1934 Act and 1934 Act Regulations or are not presented in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a basis substantially consistent with that of the audited financial statements included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, or (B) at a specified date not more than five days prior to the date of the letters, there has been any change in the capital stock of the Company or any increase in the consolidated long-term debt of the Company and its subsidiaries or any decrease in consolidated net current assets or net assets as compared with the amounts shown in the most recent financial statements included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement or, during the period from the date of the most recent financial statements included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement to a specified date not more than five days prior to the date of the letters, there were any decreases, as compared with the corresponding period in the preceding year, in consolidated revenues, net income or net income per share of the Company and its subsidiaries, except in all instances for changes, increases or decreases which the Registration Statement and the Prospectus disclose have occurred or may occur; and (iv) in addition to the examination referred to in their opinions and the limited procedures referred to in clause (iii) above, they have carried out certain specified procedures, not
Accountant's Comfort Letter
 
constituting an audit, with respect to certain amounts, percentages and financial information which are included in or incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and the Prospectus and which are specified by the Representatives, and have found such amounts, percentages and financial information to be in agreement with the relevant accounting, financial and other records of the Company and its subsidiaries identified in such letters.
(e) . At the Closing Time, counsel for the Underwriters shall have been furnished with such documents and opinions as they may require for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon the issuance and sale of the Securities herein contemplated and related proceedings, or in order to evidence the accuracy of any of the representations or warranties, or the fulfillment of any of the conditions herein contained; and all proceedings taken by the Company in connection with the issuance and sale of the Securities as herein contemplated shall be satisfactory in form and substance to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters.
Additional Documents
(f) . If any condition specified in this Section shall not have been fulfilled when and as required to be fulfilled, this Agreement may be terminated by the Representatives by notice to the Company at any time at or prior to the Closing Time, and such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except as provided in Section 4 and except that the provisions of Sections 1, 6, 7, and 8 hereof shall survive any such termination and remain in effect.
Termination of Agreement
SECTION 6. .
Indemnification
(a) . The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter, its affiliates, as such term is defined in Rule 501(b) under the 1933 Act (each an ""), its selling agents and each person, if any who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act as follows:
Indemnification of Underwriters
Affiliate
(1) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the Rule 430B Information or any other information incorporated by reference therein, if applicable, or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact included in any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), or the omission or alleged omission therefrom of a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
(2) against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, to the extent of the aggregate amount paid in settlement of any litigation, or of any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or of any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission; provided that any such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company; and
 
(3) against any and all expense whatsoever, as incurred (including the fees and disbursements of one counsel chosen by the Representatives), reasonably incurred in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue statement or omission, or any such alleged untrue statement or omission, to the extent that any such expense is not paid under (1) or (2) above;
, , that this indemnity agreement shall not apply to any loss, liability, claim, damage or expense to the extent arising out of any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the Rule 430B Information or any other information incorporated by reference therein, if applicable, or any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
provided
however
(b) . Each Underwriter severally and not jointly agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Company, its directors, each of its officers who signed the Registration Statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense described in the indemnity contained in subsection (a) of this Section, as incurred, but only with respect to untrue statements or omissions, or alleged untrue statements or omissions, made in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto), including the 430B Information or any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or any amendment thereto) or such preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto).
Indemnification of Company, Directors and Officers
(c) . Each indemnified party shall give notice as promptly as reasonably practicable to each indemnifying party of any action commenced against it in respect of which indemnity may be sought hereunder, but failure to so notify an indemnifying party shall not relieve such indemnifying party from any liability hereunder to the extent it is not materially prejudiced as a result thereof and in any event shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have otherwise than on account of this indemnity agreement. In the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(a) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by Merrill Lynch, Banc of America and JPMorgan and, in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 6(b) above, counsel to the indemnified parties shall be selected by the Company. An indemnifying party may participate at its own expense in the defense of any such action; provided, however, that counsel to the indemnifying party shall not (except with the consent of the indemnified party) also be counsel to the indemnified party. In no event shall the indemnifying parties be liable for fees and expenses of more than one counsel (in addition to any local counsel) separate from their own counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or
Actions against Parties; Notification
 
circumstances. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified parties, settle or compromise or consent to the entry of any judgment with respect to any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or any claim whatsoever in respect of which indemnification or contribution could be sought under this Section 6 or Section 7 hereof (whether or not the indemnified parties are actual or potential parties thereto), unless such settlement, compromise or consent includes an unconditional release of each indemnified party from all liability arising out of such litigation, investigation, proceeding or claim and does not include a statement as to or an admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of such indemnified party.
SECTION 7. . If the indemnification provided for in Section 6 hereof is for any reason unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party in respect of any losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the aggregate amount of such losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by such indemnified party, as incurred, (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company, on the one hand, and of the Underwriters, on the other hand, in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, liabilities, claims, damages or expenses, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations.
Contribution
The relative benefits received by the Company, on the one hand, and the Underwriters on the other hand, in connection with the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the total net proceeds from the offering of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement (before deducting expenses) received by the Company and the total underwriting discount received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth on the cover of the Prospectus bear to the aggregate initial public offering price of the Securities as set forth on the cover of the Prospectus.
The relative fault of the Company, on the one hand, and the Underwriters, on the other hand, shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether any such untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or by the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 7 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this Section 7. The aggregate amount of losses, liabilities, claims, damages and expenses incurred by an indemnified party and referred to above in this Section 7 shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in investigating, preparing or defending against any litigation, or any investigation or proceeding by any governmental agency or body, commenced or threatened, or claim whatsoever based upon any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
 
Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7, no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of any such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission.
No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the 1933 Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation.
For purposes of this Section 7, each person, if any, who controls an Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act and each Underwriter's Affiliates and selling agents shall have the same rights to contribution as such Underwriter, and each director of the Company, each officer of the Company who signed the Registration Statement, and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the 1933 Act or Section 20 of the 1934 Act shall have the same rights to contribution as the Company. The Underwriters' respective obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 7 are several in proportion to the principal amount of Securities set forth opposite their respective names in Schedule I hereto and not joint.
SECTION 8. . All representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Agreement or contained in certificates of officers of the Company submitted pursuant hereto shall remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of (i) any investigation made by or on behalf of the Company, or any person controlling the Company, or any Underwriter or its Affiliates or selling agents or any person controlling any Underwriter, its officers or directors, and (ii) delivery of and payment for the Securities.
Representations, Warranties and Agreements to Survive Delivery
SECTION 9. .
Termination
(a) The Representatives may terminate this Agreement, by notice to the Company, at any time at or prior to the Closing Time (i) if there has been, since the time of execution of this Agreement or since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Prospectus (exclusive of any supplement thereto) or the General Disclosure Package, any material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, or in the earnings, business affairs or business prospects of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as one enterprise, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, or (ii) if there has occurred any material adverse change in the financial markets in the United States or the international financial markets, any outbreak of hostilities or escalation thereof or other calamity or crisis or any change or development involving a prospective change in national or international political, financial or economic conditions, in each case the effect of which is such as to make it, in the judgment of the Representatives, impracticable or inadvisable to market the Securities or to enforce contracts for the sale of the Securities, or (iii) if trading in any securities of the Company has been suspended or materially limited by the Commission or the New York Stock Exchange, or if trading generally on
 
the American Stock Exchange or the New York Stock Exchange or in the Nasdaq National Market has been suspended or materially limited, or minimum or maximum prices for trading have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices have been required, by any of said exchanges or by such system or by order of the Commission, the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. or any other governmental authority, or (iv) a material disruption has occurred in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services in the United States, or (v) if a banking moratorium has been declared by federal, New York or Illinois authorities.
(b) If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to this Section, such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party, except to the extent provided in Section 4 hereof. Notwithstanding any such termination, the provisions of Sections 1, 6, 7 and 8 hereof shall remain in effect.
SECTION 10. . If one or more of the Underwriters shall fail at Closing Time to purchase the Securities that it or they are obligated to purchase under this Agreement (the ""), the Representatives shall have the right, within 24 hours thereafter, to make arrangements for one or more of the non-defaulting Underwriters, or any other underwriters, to purchase all, but not less than all, of the Defaulted Securities in such amounts as may be agreed upon and upon the terms herein set forth; if, however, the Representatives shall not have completed such arrangements within such 24-hour period, then:
Default by One or More of the Underwriters
Defaulted Securities
(a) if the number of Defaulted Securities does not exceed 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities to be purchased hereunder, each of the non defaulting Underwriters shall be obligated, severally and not jointly, to purchase the full amount thereof in the proportions that their respective underwriting obligations hereunder bear to the underwriting obligations of all non defaulting Underwriters, or
(b) if the number of Defaulted Securities exceeds 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities to be purchased hereunder, this Agreement shall terminate, without any liability on the part of any non defaulting Underwriter.
No action taken pursuant to this Section shall relieve any defaulting Underwriter from liability in respect of its default.
In the event of any such default which does not result in a termination of this Agreement, either the Representatives or the Company shall have the right to postpone Closing Time for a period not exceeding seven days in order to effect any required changes in the Registration Statement or Prospectus or in any other documents or arrangements.
As used herein, the term "" includes any person substituted for an Underwriter under this Section 10.
Underwriter
SECTION 11. . All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted by any standard form of telecommunication. Notices to the Underwriters shall be directed to the Representatives at Merrill Lynch & Co., 4 World Financial Center, New York, New York 10080, attention of Paul Nagle; Banc of
Notices
 
America Securities LLC, 40 West 57th Street, NY1-040-27-03, New York, New York 10019, (telecopy number (646) 313-4823) Attention: High Grade Transaction Management/Legal; and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., 270 Park Avenue New York, NY 10017, attention of High Grade Syndicate Desk8th floor, Fax No. (212) 834-6081; and notices to the Company shall be directed to it at 1 North Field Ct., Lake Forest, Illinois 60045, attention of Lloyd C. Chatfield II, General Counsel.
SECTION 12. . The Company acknowledges and agrees that (a) the purchase and sale of the Securities pursuant to this Agreement, including the determination of the public offering price of the Securities and any related discounts and commissions, is an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Company, on the one hand, and the several Underwriters, on the other hand, (b) in connection with the offering contemplated hereby and the process leading to such transaction each Underwriter is and has been acting solely as a principal and is not the agent or fiduciary of the Company, or its stockholders, creditors, employees or any other party, (c) no Underwriter has assumed or will assume an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the offering contemplated hereby or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters) and no Underwriter has any obligation to the Company with respect to the offering contemplated hereby except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement, (d) the Underwriters and their respective affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company, and (e) the Underwriters have not provided any legal, accounting, regulatory or tax advice with respect to the offering contemplated hereby and the Company has consulted its own legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate.
No Advisory or Fiduciary Relationship
SECTION 13. . This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) between the Company and the Underwriters, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Integration
SECTION 14. . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Underwriters named herein and the Company and their respective successors. Nothing expressed or mentioned in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give any person, firm or corporation, other than the Underwriters named herein and the Company and their respective successors and the controlling persons and officers and directors referred to in Sections 6 and 7 and their heirs and legal representative(s), any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement or any provision herein contained. This Agreement and all conditions and provisions hereof are intended to be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Underwriters named herein and the Company and their respective successors, and said controlling persons and officers and directors and their heirs and legal representative(s), and for the benefit of no other person, firm or corporation. No purchaser of any of the Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed to be a successor by reason merely of such purchase.
Parties
SECTION 15. .
Governing Law
This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the state of New York applicable to agreements made and to be performed in said State.
 
SECTION 16. .
Time
Time shall be of the essence of this Agreement. Except as otherwise set forth herein, specified times of day refer to New York City time.
SECTION 17. . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
SECTION 18. . The Section headings herein are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
Effect of Headings
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, please sign and return to the Company a counterpart hereof, whereupon this instrument, along with all counterparts, will become a binding agreement between the Underwriters and the Company in accordance with its terms.
 
For themselves and as Representatives of the other Underwriters named in Schedule A attached to the Purchase Agreement.
 
Schedule of Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectuses Included in the General Disclosure Package
 
Filed Pursuant to Rule 433
Registration No. 333-152620
Final Term Sheet
August 12, 2008
 
A securities rating is not a recommendation to buy, sell or hold securities and may be subject to revision or withdrawal at any time.
The Issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the Issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the Issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, the Issuer, any Underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling toll-free to Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith at (866) 500-5408; Banc of America Securities LLC at (800) 294-1322; or J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. at (212) 834-4533.
Any disclaimers or other notices that may appear below are not applicable to this communication and should be disregarded. Such disclaimers or other notices were automatically generated as a result of this communication being sent via Bloomberg or another email system.
Underwriting Agreement dated August 12, 2008
Registration Statement No. 333-152620
 
:
Title, Purchase Price and Description of Securities
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The interest rate payable on the notes will be subject to adjustment from time to time if the rating assigned to the notes is downgraded (or subsequently upgraded) under the circumstances described in the prospectus supplement.
Adjustment begins at Ba2/BB (Moody's/S&P) and is capped at 2.00%.
 
Latham & Watkins LLP
Sears Tower Suite 5800
233 South Wacker Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60606
 
 
1 Chase Manhattan Plaza
New York, NY 10005
ABA# 021000021
Acct#: 05-00259
 
 
 

Exhibit 4.1
Unless this certificate is presented by an authorized representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation ("DTC"), to the Company (as defined below) or its agent for registration of transfer, exchange, or payment, and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.
 
CUSIP No.: 117043 AK 5
1. General
Brunswick Corporation, a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (hereinafter called the "Company", which term shall include any successor corporation as defined in the Indenture referred to on the reverse side hereof), for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or its registered assigns, the principal sum of TWO HUNDRED FIFTY MILLION DOLLARS ($250,000,000) on August 15, 2013 (if such date is not a Business Day, payment of principal on this Note and accrued and unpaid interest thereon will be paid on the next Business Day, provided, however, that no interest on that payment will accrue from and after August 15, 2013 at the principal corporate trust office of the Trustee (as defined below), or at an office or agency maintained by the Company for such purpose, in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois, or in the Borough of Manhattan, The City and State of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment shall be legal tender for the payment of public and private debts, and to pay interest, semiannually on February 15 and August 15 of each year beginning February 15, 2009, on said principal sum in like coin or currency, at the rate per annum specified in the title of this Note, from the next preceding date on which interest has been paid or, if no interest has been paid on the Notes, from August 15, 2008 until payment of said principal sum has been made or duly provided for.
2. Interest
The interest so payable on any February 15 or August 15 will, subject to certain exceptions provided in the Indenture referred to herein, be paid to the person in whose name this Note is registered at the close of business on the February 1 or August 1 next preceding such February 15 or August 15 (whether or not such February 1 or August 1 is a Business Day) at the principal executive offices of the Company and at its offices or agencies in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois and the Borough of Manhattan, The City and State of New York, except that interest may, at the option of the Company, be paid by check mailed to the registered address of such person.
3. Indenture
This Note is one of a duly authorized issue of securities of the Company (herein called the "Securities"), issued and to be issued in one or more series under that certain Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987 (herein called the "Indenture"), between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee (herein called the "Trustee," which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the holders of the Securities and of the terms upon which the Securities are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered. This Note is one of the series of Securities designated on the first page hereof (the Securities of such series being herein called the "Notes").
4. Interest Rate Adjustment
The interest rate payable on the Notes will be subject to adjustments from time to time if either of the Interest Rate Rating Agencies (as defined below) downgrades (or subsequently upgrades) the rating assigned to the Notes, as set forth below.
If the rating of the Notes from either Interest Rate Rating Agency is decreased to a rating set forth in any of the following tables with respect to that Interest Rate Rating Agency, the annual interest rate on the Notes will increase from the interest rate per annum specified in the title of this Note by an amount equal to the percentage set forth opposite that rating:
 
 
If, at any time, the interest rate on the Notes has been adjusted upward as a result of a decrease in a rating by an Interest Rate Rating Agency and that Interest Rate Rating Agency subsequently increases its rating on the Notes to any of the threshold ratings set forth above, the annual interest rate on the Notes will be decreased such that the annual interest rate equals the interest rate per annum specified in the title of this Note plus the percentage set forth opposite the rating in effect immediately following the increase in the table above; that if Moody's (as defined below) or any Substitute Rating Agency (as defined below) subsequently increases its rating on the Notes to "Ba1" (or its equivalent if with respect to any Substitute Rating Agency) or higher and S&P (as defined below) or any Substitute Rating Agency subsequently increases its rating on the Notes to "BB+" (or its equivalent if with respect to any Substitute Rating Agency) or higher, the annual interest rate on the Notes will be decreased to the interest rate per annum specified in the title of this Note.
provided,
 
No adjustment in the interest rate on the Notes shall be made solely as a result of an Interest Rate Rating Agency ceasing to provide a rating. If at any time less than two Interest Rate Rating Agencies provide a rating on the Notes, the Company will use commercially reasonable efforts to obtain a rating on the Notes from another "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), to the extent one exists, and if another nationally recognized statistical rating organization rates the Notes (such organization, a "Substitute Rating Agency"), for purposes of determining any increase or decrease in the annual interest rate on the Notes pursuant to the table above, (1) such Substitute Rating Agency will be substituted for the last Interest Rate Rating Agency to provide a rating on the Notes but which has since ceased to provide such rating, (2) the relative ratings scale used by such Substitute Rating Agency to assign ratings to senior unsecured debt will be determined in good faith by an independent investment banking institution of national standing appointed by the Company and, for purposes of determining the applicable ratings included in the table above with respect to such Substitute Rating Agency, such ratings shall be deemed to be the equivalent ratings used by Moody's and S&P in such table, and (3) the annual interest rate on the Notes will increase or decrease, as the case may be, such that the interest rate equals the interest rate per annum specified in the title of this Note plus the appropriate percentage, if any, set forth opposite the rating from such Substitute Rating Agency in the table above (taking into account the provisions of clause (2) above).
For so long as (1) only one Interest Rate Rating Agency provides a rating on the Notes, any increase or decrease in the interest rate on the Notes necessitated by a reduction or increase in the rating by that Interest Rate Rating Agency shall be twice the applicable percentage set forth in the table above; and (2) no Interest Rate Rating Agency provides a rating on the Notes, the interest rate on the Notes will increase to, or remain at, as the case may be, 2.00% above the interest rate per annum specified in the title of this Note. In no event will (1) the annual interest rate on the Notes be reduced below the interest rate per annum specified in the title of this Note; or (2) the annual interest on the Notes exceed 2.00% above the interest rate per annum specified in the title of this Note.
Each adjustment required by any decrease or increase in a rating set forth above by any Interest Rate Rating Agency shall be made independent of (and in addition to) any and all other adjustments by any other Interest Rate Rating Agency. Any interest rate increase or decrease described above will take effect on the next Business Day following the date such rating change occurs.
The interest rates on the Notes will permanently cease to be subject to any adjustment described above (notwithstanding any subsequent decrease in the ratings by any Interest Rate Rating Agency) if the Notes become rated "Baa1" (or its equivalent) or higher by Moody's (or any Substitute Rating Agency) and "BBB+" (or its equivalent) or higher by S&P (or any Substitute Rating Agency), or one of those ratings if rated by only one Interest Rate Rating Agency, in each case with a stable or positive outlook.
 
Promptly after any change in the interest rate on the Notes as provided above, the Company shall provide the Trustee with an Officers' Certificate stating (1) the rating assigned to the Notes from each Interest Rate Rating Agency, (2) that the interest rate on the Notes has changed in accordance with this Section 4 and setting forth the amount of the related increase or decrease, (3) the new interest rate on the Notes, and (4) the date on which the new interest rate on the Notes shall take effect. The Company shall send a copy of any Officers' Certificate required under this Section 4 to the Trustee via facsimile at (312) 827-8542. The Trustee by written notice to the Company may designate a different facsimile number for delivery of any Officers' Certificate required under this Section 4. A facsimile to the Trustee under this Section 4 shall be deemed to have been delivered as of the date when receipt is acknowledged.
"Interest Rate Rating Agency" means each of Moody's and S&P or, in either case, if applicable, any Substitute Rating Agency.
"Moody's" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc., a subsidiary of Moody's Corporation, and its successors.
"S&P" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Corporation, Inc., and its successors.
5. Optional Redemption
The Company may, at its option, redeem the Notes in whole or in part at any time at a redemption price equal to the greater of (1) 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be redeemed, plus accrued interest to the redemption date, or (2) as determined by the Independent Investment Banker (as defined below), the sum of the present values of the remaining principal amount and scheduled payments of interest on the Notes to be redeemed (not including interest accrued to the redemption date) discounted to the redemption date on a semi-annual basis at the Treasury Rate plus 50 basis points, plus accrued interest to the redemption date. The redemption price will be calculated assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months.
"Treasury Rate" means, with respect to any redemption date, the rate per year equal to the semi-annual equivalent yield to maturity of the Comparable Treasury Issue, calculated on the third Business Day preceding the redemption date, assuming a price for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed as a percentage of its principal amount) equal to the Comparable Treasury Price for that redemption date.
"Comparable Treasury Issue" means the United States Treasury security selected by the Independent Investment Banker as having an actual or interpolated maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes that would be used, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Notes.
"Comparable Treasury Price" means, with respect to any redemption date, (1) the average of the Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations for that redemption date, after excluding the highest and lowest of the Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations, or (2) if the Trustee obtains fewer than four Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations so received.
 
"Independent Investment Banker" means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
"Reference Treasury Dealer" means (1) each of Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, Banc of America Securities LLC, J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. or their affiliates which are primary U.S. government securities dealers and their respective successors, unless any of them ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in New York City (a "Primary Treasury Dealer"), in which case the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer, and (2) one other Primary Treasury Dealer selected by the Company.
"Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations" means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 3:30 p.m., New York City time, on the third Business Day preceding that redemption date.
The Company shall mail notice of any redemption at least 30 days but not more than 60 days before the redemption date to each holder of the Notes to be redeemed. The notice of redemption to each holder will specify, among other items, the redemption price and the principal amount of the Notes held by the holder to be redeemed. Notices of redemption may not be conditional. Unless the Company defaults in payment of the redemption price, on and after the redemption date, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes or portions of the Notes called for redemption. If less than all of the Notes are to be redeemed at any time, the Trustee will select Notes for redemption as follows: (1) if the Notes are listed on any national securities exchange, in compliance with the requirements of such national securities exchange; or (2) if the Notes are not listed on any national securities exchange, on a pro rata basis, by lot or by such method as the Trustee deems fair and appropriate. If any Note is to be redeemed in part only, the notice of redemption that relates to that Note must state the portion of the principal amount thereof to be redeemed. A new Note in principal amount equal to the unredeemed portion of the original Note will be issued in the name of the holder thereof upon cancellation of the original Note. No Notes of $1,000 or less will be redeemed in part.
6. Change of Control
If a Change of Control Triggering Event (as defined below) occurs, unless the Company has exercised its option to redeem the Notes as described under Section 5, each holder of the Notes will have the right to require the Company to purchase some or all of such holder's Notes pursuant to the offer described below (a "Change of Control Offer") at a purchase price equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of Notes repurchased, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date of repurchase (the "Change of Control Payment"), subject to the rights of holders of Notes on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant interest payment date.
Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, or at the Company's option, prior to any Change of Control but after public announcement of the pending Change of Control, the Company will be required to send a notice to each holder of the Notes by first class mail, with a copy to the Trustee. The notice will govern the terms of the Change of Control
 
Offer and will describe, among other things, the transaction that constitutes or may constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and the purchase date. The purchase date will be at least 30 days but no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, other than as may be required by law (a "Change of Control Payment Date"). If the notice is mailed prior to the date of consummation of the Change of Control, the notice will state that the Change of Control Offer is conditioned on the Change of Control occurring on or prior to the Change of Control Payment Date.
Holders of Notes electing to have notes purchased pursuant to a Change of Control Offer will be required to (1) surrender their Notes to the Paying Agent on the address specified in the notice, with the form entitled "Option of Holder to Elect Purchase" on the reverse of the Note completed; or (2) transfer their Notes to the Paying Agent by book-entry transfer pursuant to the applicable procedures of the Paying Agent, prior to the close of business on the third Business Day prior to the Change of Control Payment Date.
The Company will not be required to make a Change of Control Offer upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party purchases all Notes properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer.
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder, to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable, in connection with the repurchase of the Notes as a result of a Change of Control. To the extent that the provisions of any such securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control Offer provisions of the Notes, the Company will comply with those securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control Offer provisions of the Notes by virtue of any such conflict.
For purposes of this Section 6, the following definitions apply:
"Capital Stock" means the capital stock of every class whether now or hereafter authorized, regardless of whether such capital stock shall be limited to a fixed sum or percentage with respect to the rights of the holders thereof to participate in dividends and in the distribution of assets upon the voluntary or involuntary liquidation, dissolution or winding up of such corporation.
"Change of Control" means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) the direct or indirect sale, lease, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or more series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the Company's assets and the assets of the Company's subsidiaries, taken as a whole, to any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act), other than the Company or one of the Company's subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act), becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the Company's outstanding Voting Stock or other Voting Stock into which the Company's Voting
 
Stock is reclassified, consolidated, exchanged or changed, measured by voting power rather than number of shares; (3) the Company consolidates with, or merges with or into, any person, or any person consolidates with, or merges with or into, the Company, in any such event pursuant to a transaction in which any of the Company's outstanding Voting Stock or the Voting Stock of such other person is converted into or exchanged for cash, securities or other property, other than any such transaction where the shares of the Company's Voting Stock outstanding immediately prior to such transaction constitute, or are converted into or exchanged for, a majority of the Voting Stock of the surviving person or any direct or indirect parent company of the surviving person immediately after giving effect to such transaction; (4) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Board of Directors of the Company are not Continuing Directors; or (5) the adoption of a plan relating to the Company's liquidation or dissolution.
"Change of Control Triggering Event" means the Notes cease to be rated Investment Grade (as defined below) by both Rating Agencies (as defined below) on any date during the period (the "Trigger Period") commencing 60 days prior to the first public announcement of the Change of Control or the Company's intention to effect a Change of Control and ending 60 days following consummation of such Change of Control, which Trigger Period will be extended following consummation of a Change of Control for so long as any of the Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering a possible ratings change. Unless at least one Rating Agency is providing a rating for the Notes at the commencement of any Trigger Period, the Notes will be deemed to have ceased to be rated Investment Grade during that Trigger Period. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Change of Control Triggering Event will be deemed to have occurred in connection with any particular Change of Control unless and until such Change of Control has actually been consummated.
"Continuing Directors" means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who: (1) was a member of such Board of Directors on the first date that any of the Notes were issued; or (2) was nominated for election, elected or appointed to such Board of Directors with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors at the time of such nomination, election or appointment (either by a specific vote or by approval of a proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
"Investment Grade" means a rating equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent) by Moody's or BBB- (or the equivalent) by S&P, and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement Rating Agency or Rating Agencies selected by the Company.
"Rating Agencies" means: (1) each of Moody's and S&P; and (2) if any of the Rating Agencies ceases to provide rating services to issuers or investors, and no Change of Control Triggering Event has occurred or is occurring, a "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act that is selected by the Company as a replacement for Moody's or S&P, or both of them, as the case may be.
"Voting Stock" means, with respect to any specified person as of any date, the Capital Stock of such person that is at the time entitled to vote generally in the election of the Board of Directors of such person.
 
7. Transfer; Exchange
Each holder of the Notes shall register the transfer or exchange of Notes in accordance with the Indenture. The Company may require the holders, among other things, to furnish appropriate endorsements and transfer documents and to pay certain transfer taxes or similar governmental charges payable in connection therewith as permitted by the Indenture. The Company shall not be required to exchange or register a transfer of (1) the Notes for a period of 15 days next preceding any selection of Notes to be redeemed, or (2) any Notes selected, called or being called for redemption except, in the case of any Notes to be redeemed in part, the portion thereof not to be so redeemed.
8. Waiver; Supplement
In case an Event of Default (as defined in the Indenture) with respect to the Notes shall have occurred and be continuing, the principal hereof may be declared, and upon such declaration shall become, due and payable, in the manner, with the effect and subject to the conditions provided in the Indenture. The Indenture also provides that, prior to any declaration accelerating the maturity of the Securities of any series, the holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities of such series at the time outstanding may on behalf of the holders of all of the Securities of such series waive any past default or Event of Default under the Indenture and its consequences except a default in the payment of principal of, or premium, if any, or interest on the Securities of such series. Any such consent or waiver by the holder of this Note (unless revoked as provided in the Indenture) shall be conclusive and binding upon such holder and upon all future holders and owners of this Note and any Security which may be issued in exchange or substitution herefor, irrespective of whether or not any notation thereof is made upon this Note or such other Securities.
The Indenture contains provisions permitting the Company and the Trustee, with the consent of the holders of not less than 66 2/3% in aggregate principal amount of the Securities of each series to be affected at the time outstanding, evidenced as provided in the Indenture, to execute supplemental indentures adding any provisions to or changing in any manner or eliminating any of the provisions of the Indenture or of any supplemental indenture or modifying in any manner the rights of the holders of the Securities of such series; provided, however, that no such supplemental indenture shall (i) extend the fixed maturity on any Security of such series, or reduce the rate or extend the time of payment of interest thereon, or reduce the principal amount thereof or any premium thereon, or extend the time of or reduce the amount of any mandatory sinking fund payment, or make the principal of any Security or any premium or interest thereon payable in any coin or currency other than that provided for in the Securities of such series or adversely affect the rights of the Securityholders to institute suit for the enforcement of any payment of principal of or premium, if any, or interest on any Security of such series, in each case without the consent of the holder of each Security so affected, or (ii) reduce the aforesaid percentage of Securities, the holders of which are required to consent to any such supplemental indenture, without the consent of the holders of all Securities of such series then outstanding.
 
9. Miscellaneous
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and interest on this Note at the place, at the respective times, at the rate and in the coin or currency herein prescribed.
The Notes are issued in registered form without coupons in denominations of $1,000 or any integral multiple of $1,000. In the manner and subject to the limitations provided in the Indenture, but without the payment of any service charge, Notes may be exchanged for an equal aggregate principal amount of Notes of other authorized denominations at the principal executive office of the Company or, at the option of the registered holder thereof, at its office or agency maintained for such exchange in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois, or the Borough of Manhattan, The City and State of New York.
The Notes are not entitled to the benefit of, and are not subject to, any mandatory or optional sinking fund.
Except as otherwise provided in this Note, upon due presentment for registration of transfer of this Note at the principal executive offices of the Company or, at the option of the person making presentment for registration of transfer, at its office or agency maintained for such registration in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois or the Borough of Manhattan, The City and State of New York, a new Note or Notes of authorized denomination for any equal aggregate principal amount will be issued to the transferee in exchange herefor, subject to the limitations provided in the Indenture, without charge except for any tax or other governmental charge imposed in connection therewith.
The Company, the Trustee, any paying agent or Authenticating Agent and any Security Registrar may deem and treat the registered holder hereof as the absolute owner of this Note (whether or not this Note shall be overdue and notwithstanding any notation of ownership or other writing hereon) for the purpose of receiving payment hereof or on account hereof, as herein and in the Indenture provided, and for all other purposes, and neither the Company nor the Trustee nor any paying agent nor any Authenticating Agent nor any Security Registrar shall be affected by any notice to the contrary. All such payments shall effectively satisfy and discharge the liability upon this Note to the extent of the sum or sums so paid.
No recourse for the payment of the principal of or interest on this Note, or for any claim based hereon or otherwise in respect hereof, and no recourse under or upon any obligation, covenant or agreement of the Company contained in the Indenture or in any supplemental indenture, or in this Note, or because of the creation of any indebtedness represented hereby, shall be had against any incorporator, stockholder, officer or director as such, past, present or future, of the Company or any successor corporation, either directly or through the Company or any successor corporation, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as a part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
 
This Note shall not be valid or become obligatory for any purpose until the certificate of authentication hereon shall have been signed by the Trustee under the Indenture referred to below.
All capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings ascribed to such terms in the Indenture.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Brunswick Corporation has caused this instrument to be signed in its name by the signature of one of its Vice Presidents and an imprint of its corporate seal to be affixed hereto, and attested by the signature of its Secretary.
Dated: August 15, 2008
 
 
This is one of the Securities of the series designated therein referred to in the within-mentioned Indenture.
 
To assign this Note, fill in the form below:
I or we assign and transfer this Note to
 
and irrevocably appoint agent to transfer this Note on the books of the Company. The agent may substitute another to act for him.
                    
 
 
 
 
 
Sign exactly as your name appears on the other side of this Note.
 
Signatures must be guaranteed by an "eligible guarantor institution" meeting the requirements of the Trustee, which requirements include membership or participation in the Security Transfer Agent Medallion Program ("STAMP") or such other "signature guarantee program" as may be determined by the Registrar in addition to, or in substitution for, STAMP, all in accordance with the United States Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
To: Brunswick Corporation
The undersigned registered owner of this Security hereby acknowledges receipt of a notice from Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") as to the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Company and hereby directs the Company to pay, or cause the Trustee to pay, an amount in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes, or the portion thereof (which is $1,000 principal amount or a multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof) below designated, to be repurchased plus interest accrued to, but excluding, the repurchase date, except as provided in the Indenture.
                                    
Dated:
                    
Signature
                                        
Principal amount to be repurchased (at least $1,000 or a multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof): 
                                                             
Remaining principal amount following such repurchase
                                        
By:
                                        
Authorized Signatory

Exhibit 5.1
 
Brunswick Corporation
1 N. Field Ct.
Lake Forest, Illinois 60045-4811
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We are acting as counsel to Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the ""), in connection with the proposed issuance and sale of $250,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 9.75% Senior Notes due 2013 (the ""), pursuant to the prospectus supplement dated August 12, 2008 (the ""), supplementing the prospectus dated August 11, 2008 (the "") that forms part of the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-152620) (the "") filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ""). As used in this letter, the term "" means the Prospectus Supplement and the Base Prospectus, including the documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Securities Act. The Notes are to be issued under that certain Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987 (the ""), by and between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee (the "").
Company
Notes
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Registration Statement
SEC
Securities Act
Prospectus
Indenture
Trustee
We have examined and relied upon (i) the Prospectus, (ii) the Registration Statement, (iii) the Indenture, (iv) the Notes in global form, (v) the executed Purchase Agreement, dated as of August 12, 2008, by and between the Company and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, Banc of America Securities LLC and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., as representatives of the several underwriters named therein (the ""), (vi) certain resolutions of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "") adopted on February 5, 2008 and July 22, 2008, as certified by the Secretary of the Company on the date hereof as being complete, accurate and in effect, relating to, among other things, the execution and delivery of the Purchase Agreement and the issuance and sale of the Notes (the ""), (vii) certain resolutions of the Finance Committee of the Board adopted on August 6, 2008 and August 12, 2008, as certified by the Secretary of the Company on the date hereof as being complete, accurate and in effect, relating to, among other things, the terms and conditions applicable to the issuance and sale by the Company of the Notes (the ""), (viii) certain minutes of a meeting of the Pricing Committee of the Finance Committee of the
Purchase Agreement
Board
Board Resolutions
Finance Committee Resolutions
Brunswick Corporation
August 15, 2008
Page 2
 
Board, dated as of August 12, 2008 (the ""), and (viii) the officers' certificate, dated as of August 15, 2008, establishing the terms of the Notes pursuant to the Board Resolutions and the Finance Committee Resolutions. We also have examined such records, documents and questions of law, and satisfied ourselves as to such matters of fact, as we have considered relevant and necessary as a basis for the opinion set forth below.
Pricing Committee Resolutions
In rendering the opinion set forth below, we have assumed the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, the genuineness of all signatures, the legal capacity of all natural persons and the conformity with the original documents of any copies thereof submitted to us as certified or photostatic copies or by facsimile or other means of electronic transmission or which we obtained from the Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval System (EDGAR) of the SEC or other internet sites through which documents filed with the SEC can be obtained. With respect to any instrument or agreement executed or to be executed by any party other than the Company, we have assumed, to the extent relevant to the opinion set forth herein, that (i) such other party (if not a natural person) has been duly formed or organized and is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of formation or organization and (ii) such other party has full right, power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under each instrument or agreement to which it is a party and each such instrument or agreement has been duly authorized (if applicable), executed and delivered by, and is a valid, binding and enforceable agreement or obligation, as the case may be, of, such other party.
Based on the foregoing and subject to the qualifications and limitations set forth below, we are of the opinion that the Notes will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms (except to the extent enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent transfer or other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and by the effect of general principles of equity, regardless of whether enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law) when the Notes shall have been duly executed by the Company and authenticated by the Trustee as provided in the Indenture, the Board Resolutions, the Finance Committee Resolutions and the Pricing Committee Resolutions shall have been duly delivered to the purchasers thereof against payment of the agreed consideration therefor.
This opinion letter is limited to the federal laws of the United States of America, the laws of the State of Illinois and the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
We do not find it necessary for the purposes of this opinion letter to cover, and accordingly we express no opinion as to, the application of the securities or blue sky laws of any jurisdiction to sales of the Notes.
 
Brunswick Corporation
August 15, 2008
Page 3
 
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as an Exhibit to the filing by the Company of a Current Report on Form 8-K on the date hereof, which Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement, and to all references to our firm included in or made a part of the Prospectus. In giving such consent, we do not thereby admit that we are in the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act or the related rules or regulations promulgated thereunder.
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
Brunswick Announces $250 Million Debt Offering
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Aug. 12 /PRNewswire-FirstCall/  Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today the offering of $250 million aggregate principal amount of 9.75% Senior Notes due 2013 under a shelf registration statement previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
The company said that it intends to call for redemption its outstanding $250 million principal amount of Floating Rate Notes due July 2009 upon receipt of the net proceeds from the offering.
Merrill Lynch & Co., Banc of America Securities LLC and JPMorgan are acting as joint book-running managers for the offering. A copy of the prospectus supplement relating to the offering has been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission and may be obtained from Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, 4 World Financial Center, Prospectus Department, New York, NY 10080, (212) 449-1000; Banc of America Securities LLC, Prospectus Department, 100 West 33rd St., 3rd Floor, New York, NY 10001, (800) 294-1322; or J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., 270 Park Avenue, New York, NY 10017, Attention: Syndicate Desk, 8th Floor, (212) 834-4533.
This communication shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, nor shall there be any sale of these securities in any state or jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such state or jurisdiction.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; MotoTron electronic controls; Albemarle, Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Savage, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.
SOURCE: Brunswick Corporation
CONTACT: Kathryn Chieger, Vice President, Corporate and Investor
Relations of Brunswick Corporation, +1-847-735-4612
Web site: http://www.brunswick.com

Exhibit 99.2
The expenses to be incurred by the Company relating to the offering of $250,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its Senior Notes due 2013 (the "Notes") under the Company's shelf Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-152620) and a related prospectus supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 13, 2008 are estimated to be as follows:
 

Exhibit 99.3
The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A.
2 North LaSalle Street, Suite 1020
Chicago, Illinois 60602
Attn: Mary A. Callahan
 
Floating Rate Notes due 2009
The undersigned, on behalf of Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation (the ""), hereby exercises the option to call $250,000,000 aggregate outstanding principal amount of its Floating Rate Notes due 2009, CUSIP No. 117043 AJ 8 (the ""), for redemption on September 17, 2008 (the ""), as provided in the Notes and in Article Three of the Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987 (the ""), by and between Company you, as trustee (the ""), relating to the Notes. The redemption price of the Notes shall be equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be redeemed, plus accrued interest thereon to the Redemption Date which has not been paid. In the event the Notes are not presented for redemption by the Redemption Date, they shall not thereafter bear interest.
Company
Notes
Redemption Date
Indenture
Trustee
Pursuant to Article Three, Section 3.02 of the Indenture, the Company hereby instructs the Trustee to send the notice of redemption attached hereto to the holders of the Notes. The notice of redemption should be mailed (first-class, postage prepaid) to the holders of the Notes at their respective addresses as they appear in the registry books no later than August 15, 2008.
On or before the Redemption Date, the Company will deposit with the Trustee an amount of money, sufficient to redeem on such date the Notes at the redemption price together with accrued interest to the Redemption Date.
This notice of redemption and Officers' Certificate is being delivered to you pursuant to Article Three, Section 3.02 of the Indenture. The undersigned is delivering to you contemporaneously herewith, the Officers' Certificate (as defined in the Indenture) required by Section 14.05 of the Indenture and the resolutions of the Board of Directors of the Company authorizing the redemption of the Notes.
the Company has caused the Notice of Redemption and Officers' Certificate to be executed and delivered on and as of the date first written above by its duly authorized officers.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF,
 
 
NOTICE IS HEREBY GIVEN pursuant to Article Three, Section 3.02 of the Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987 (the ""), between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee (the ""), under which Indenture the below listed series of Registered Securities (the "") were issued, that pursuant to the terms of the Indenture and the Notes, such Notes are hereby called for redemption in whole on September 17, 2008 (the ""), at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be redeemed, plus accrued interest thereon up to the Redemption Date which has not been paid. The redemption price will become due and payable on the Redemption Date.
Indenture
Trustee
Notes
Redemption Date
 
NOTICE IS FURTHER GIVEN that due and proper arrangements have been made for providing the Trustee with funds sufficient to pay the principal and interest on above listed Notes due on the Redemption Date. Subject to the deposit of such funds, on and after the Redemption Date, interest on the Notes will cease to accrue.
NOTICE IS FURTHER GIVEN that the payment will be made upon presentation and surrender of the above listed Notes to:
 
Backup withholding at a rate of 28% of gross redemption proceeds of any payment made within the United States may be required by the United States Internal Revenue Code, as amended, unless the Paying Agent has the correct taxpayer identification number (social security or employer identification number) or exemption certificate of the payee. Please furnish a properly completed Form W-9 or exemption certificate or equivalent when presenting your Notes.
 
Dated: August 15, 2008
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20080908161639.txt.gz
TIME:20080908161639
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
          
On September 8, 2008, Brunswick Corporation announced that Peter G. Leemputte had resigned as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Brunswick Corporation.  Mr. Leemputte submitted his resignation on September 3, 2008.  Brunswick announced that it appointed Peter B. Hamilton to the position of Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer effective September 15, 2008.
 
Mr. Hamilton, 61, served as Brunswicks Chief Financial Officer from 1995 to 2000, President  Brunswick Bowling & Billiards from 2000 to 2005, President  Life Fitness Division from 2005 to 2006, and President  Brunswick Boat Group from 2006 to 2007.  He also served as Vice Chairman of the Board of Brunswick from 2000 until his retirement in 2007.  The terms and conditions of Mr. Hamiltons employment have not been finally determined.
 
A copy of the news release announcing the resignation of Peter G. Leemputte and the appointment of Peter B. Hamilton is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
  
   
   
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3
 
EXHIBIT INDEX
 
4
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20081009143559.txt.gz
TIME:20081009143559
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported): October 8, 2008
 
__________________________
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
   
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
          
                
              
                
 
 
 
 
Item 2.05 Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities.
 
 
As previously reported on the Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 26, 2008, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) approved a series of comprehensive cost reduction initiatives designed to reduce its fixed costs by the end of 2009 by at least $300 million compared with 2007 levels.  In connection with the implementation of these initiatives, Brunswick estimated it would incur aggregate pretax costs and charges totaling $200 million to $220 million, of which approximately $180 million were expected to be recorded in 2008 with the balance to be recorded in 2009.
 
In view of the increased decline in the U.S. marine market, on October 8, 2008, Brunswick determined to accelerate the implementation of its initiatives by announcing the closure of three boat manufacturing plants in 2008 and completing the fourth closure by the end of the first quarter of 2009.  The total anticipated charges related to these actions were included in the estimated amounts disclosed in the Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 26, 2008.
 
Brunswick has also determined to halt production in three of its boat manufacturing facilities near Knoxville, Tennessee, beginning the week of October 27, 2008 through the balance of the year.
 
 
Item 2.06 Material Impairments.
 
 
 In accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards (SFAS) No. 142, Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, Brunswick tests its goodwill and other intangible assets for impairment at least annually at the beginning of the fourth quarter of each fiscal year.  Due to the significant downturn in the marine industry, Brunswick determined on October 8, 2008 to record a non-cash impairment charge against its goodwill and trade names of approximately $496 million pretax in the third quarter of 2008.  The impairment charge, which will be taken primarily in the Boat segment, consists of approximately $375 million pretax write down of goodwill and $121 million pretax write down of certain trade names.
   
 
 
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
 
The news release announcing these actions is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference.  The information in this Item 7.01 and Exhibit 99.1 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference into any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements regarding Brunswicks future operations, impairments and charges that Brunswick may incur.  Actual events or results may differ materially from those described herein.  Among the important factors that could cause future events or results to vary are risks arising from Brunswicks ability to effect the cost reduction initiatives as planned, the potential for unexpected liabilities related to the disposition of certain assets, and the possibility that the final accounting and valuation of the assets involved could vary from the estimates set forth herein.  Additional factors that might affect these forward-looking statements are described in filings with the SEC such as Brunswicks most recent Forms 10-K and 10-Q.
   
 
 
 
 
 
its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today announced it will accelerate its previously announced efforts to resize the company and to remove $300 million in fixed costs by the end of 2009.  The company is taking the action in light of extraordinary developments within the global financial markets that are affecting the recreational marine industry.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Oct. 9, 2008
We are living and working in the most turbulent economic times in recent history, commented Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  From the start of the year, weve experienced a 3,500-point drop in the Dow, mortgage and housing crises, record prices for oil, and, now, shrinking credit availability for companies and individuals.  The poor economy and the accompanying weak consumer sentiment have pressured marine markets, eroding the demand for boats and engines these past few months at a swifter pace than originally anticipated.
For the past few years, Brunswick has been implementing a strategy to fundamentally transform the way we design, engineer and manufacture our products; shrink our manufacturing footprint so that each facility produces at higher volumes and lower costs; and reduce our level of fixed costs in our manufacturing operations and within operating expenses.  While these times are unprecedented, they provide an opportunity and mandate, consistent with the pursuit of our strategy, that we step up our efforts to accomplish our restructuring goals, McCoy stated.
Plant closures and furloughs
 
As previously announced, Brunswick had planned to close four boat manufacturing facilities in early 2009, but will now accelerate that process.  Three manufacturing facilities to be permanently closed are located in Pipestone, Minn., Roseburg, Ore., and Arlington, Wash.  A fourth plant, in Navassa, N.C., will be mothballed.
Production of the fiberglass boats manufactured in these plants will be transitioned to other Brunswick facilities.  The company said that these actions will result in the eventual elimination of approximately 1,450 hourly and salaried positions at these facilities, while increasing the efficiency and utilization at the receiving plants.  The Arlington, Navassa and Roseburg shutdowns are expected to be completed by the end of 2008, with the Pipestone shutdown expected to be completed during the first quarter of 2009.
 In these difficult times as we move into the slowest selling season in the marine industry, it is clear that we must aggressively support our dealer network as they cope with the effects of the economic turbulence.  Among the significant actions we can take is to meter the production of boats consistent with demand, which is in a pronounced downturn across all consumer durable industries, including the recreational marine industry, McCoy said.
Brunswick will temporarily suspend production at three of its boat manufacturing facilities near Knoxville, Tenn., beginning the week of October 27 and continuing through the remainder of 2008.  During this period, the transition of boat models from the plants that are closing into these facilities will begin.
 
 
Financial implications
 
Our efforts to reduce production and cut costs have helped to mitigate some of the challenges we have faced in 2008, as well as prepare and position Brunswick to prosper in an improved economic environment, McCoy said.  We remain on target to reduce fixed costs by $300 million by the end of 2009 compared with 2007 spending levels, and expect to exit 2008 with more than $125 million of fixed-cost reductions implemented.  In fact, actions completed or currently under way will deliver about $75 million of cost savings this year.  We also continue our intense focus on liquidity and expect to report cash at the end of the third quarter of approximately $340 million.
 
As noted above, however, we will be closing plants and temporarily suspending production at others, which will result in significantly lower sales in the fourth quarter.  Given the effect of lower fixed-cost absorption on these reduced sales in the remainder of 2008, we are no longer confident of achieving our goal of posting positive earnings for the full year, excluding restructuring and impairment charges.
The company said its estimate of restructuring charges to achieve its cost reduction targets remains in the range of $200 million to $220 million pretax, of which approximately $180 million will be recorded in 2008.  These charges include asset write-downs, severance and facility closing and other costs.  Of the total restructuring costs, approximately half will be cash.
Further, as prescribed by SFAS No. 142, Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, the company concluded that a significant portion of its goodwill and indefinite-lived intangibles was impaired.  Accordingly, the company said it will record non-cash goodwill and trade name impairment charges, associated primarily with certain boat brands, totaling approximately $496 million pretax in the third quarter.
 
 
Conference Call Today
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 3:30 p.m. CDT to further discuss these actions. At that time, McCoy will be joined by Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Kathryn J. Chieger, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
www.brunswick.com
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (888) 787-0200 (passcode: Brunswick).  Callers outside of North America should call  +1 (312) 470-7130 to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Oct. 16, 2008, by calling 866-358-4539 or 203-369-0140 (replay passcode: 3846).  The replay will also be available at .
www.brunswick.com
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of (i) the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, and (ii) the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment and products; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in the timeframe and cost anticipated; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components and raw materials from suppliers; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; and the ability to successfully integrate acquisitions.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2007 and Quarterly Report on Form  10-Q for the quarter ended June 28, 2008.
 
About Brunswick
 
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; Albemarle, Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Savage, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.
   
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20081023090454.txt.gz
TIME:20081023090454
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
        
 
 
 
 
 
    
 
 
 
                          
 
On October 23, 2008, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the third quarter of 2008. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its third quarter 2008 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of income, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow from continuing operations as cash flow from operating and investing activities of continuing operations (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities of continuing operations.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Oct. 23, 2008
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today results for the third quarter of 2008, which include the following:
 
 
The marine market in the United States is becoming increasingly challenging due to difficult economic conditions, financial market upheaval and tightening credit availability, on top of the continuing weak housing market, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  According to preliminary industry statistics in the United States, retail demand for boats in our key fiberglass segments dropped nearly 40 percent in the third quarter versus a year ago, and a slowdown in demand has spread to regions outside of the United States.  Given this environment, limiting our loss from operations to $0.33 per diluted share before charges and ending the quarter with a significant cash balance is commendable and reflects the hard work of individuals across the entire Brunswick organization.  Our cost reduction activities are taking hold and a relentless focus on managing the balance sheet is evident in our results.
Third Quarter Results
 
For the quarter ended Sept. 27, 2008, net sales decreased to $1,038.8 million, down 22 percent from $1,326.2 million a year earlier.  The company had an operating loss of $566.3 million for the third quarter of 2008.  As previously announced, the company concluded that a significant portion of its goodwill and trade names was impaired, as prescribed by SFAS No. 142, Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets.  Accordingly, the company recorded $374.0 million of goodwill and $121.1 million of trade name impairment charges, associated primarily with certain boat brands, in the third quarter of 2008.  Both of these are non-cash charges.  The operating loss in the third quarter also includes $39.1 million of restructuring charges.  In the third quarter of 2007, the company had an operating loss of $46.3 million, which included $66.4 million of trade name impairments and $4.7 million of restructuring charges.
For the third quarter of 2008, the company reported a net loss from continuing operations of $591.4 million, or $6.70 per diluted share, as compared with a net loss of $23.7 million, or $0.27 per diluted share, from continuing operations for the third quarter of 2007.  Diluted earnings per share for the third quarter of 2008 include goodwill and trade name impairment charges of $4.31 per diluted share, restructuring charges of $0.28 per diluted share, and a $1.78 per diluted share charge for special tax items, primarily related to the establishment of a deferred tax valuation allowance resulting from the cumulative losses reported by the company.  Diluted earnings per share for the third quarter of 2007, included $0.47 and $0.03 per diluted share of trade name impairment and restructuring charges, respectively, as well as $0.04 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.
Boat Segment
 
The Brunswick Boat Group comprises the Boat segment and produces fiberglass and aluminum boats and marine parts and accessories, as well as offers dealer management systems.  The Boat segment had net sales for the third quarter of 2008 of $392.5 million, down 36 percent from $613.9 million in the third quarter of 2007.  For the quarter, the segment had an operating loss of $537.4 million, including goodwill and trade name impairment charges of $477.0 million and restructuring charges of $15.8 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $90.3 million, including $66.4 million of trade name impairment charges and $4.1 million of restructuring charges in the third quarter of 2007.
During the quarter, we continued to decrease production throughout our marine operations in an effort to reduce the number of boats held by our dealers, McCoy explained.  This included a month-long furlough, during which we halted production at virtually all of our U.S. fiberglass boat manufacturing plants.  While this was the right thing to do, it resulted in sales for our major fiberglass brands being down 50 percent in the quarter.  Reduced fixed-cost absorption on lower sales adversely affected operating earnings.
While we reduced the number of fiberglass boats held by our dealers by 1,400 during the third quarter, there remain 36 weeks of supply of fiberglass boats in the pipeline, down one week from the end of June 2008, but up nine weeks compared with the end of September last year, McCoy said.  As announced earlier this month, we will begin closing or furloughing seven fiberglass boat plants in the fourth quarter to continue to address the pipeline inventory situation.
Marine Engine Segment
 
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, reported net sales of $448.9 million in the third quarter of 2008, down 21 percent from $566.7 million in the year-ago quarter.  For the third quarter of 2008, the segment had an operating loss of $8.6 million, which includes $4.5 million of trade name impairments and $12.9 million of restructuring charges.  This compares with operating earnings of $47.5 million in the same period of 2007, including $0.6 million of restructuring charges.
Sales were down in all business units in the Marine Engine segment in the quarter, most notably sales of sterndrive and outboard engines in the United States, which were down 39 percent, McCoy said.  Consistent with actions taken in the Boat Group, Mercury also cut production rates and instituted plant furloughs.  Reduced fixed-cost absorption on lower sales had an adverse effect on operating earnings.
Fitness Segment
 
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales increased 8 percent in the quarter to $161.6 million, up from $150.2 million in the year-ago quarter.  Operating earnings for the quarter totaled $10.3 million, down from $11.8 million for the third quarter of 2007, and operating margins were 6.4 percent versus 7.9 percent a year ago.  The Fitness segment recorded $0.8 million in restructuring charges during the third quarter of 2008.
 Commercial equipment sales, which account for about 90 percent of Life Fitness business, were strong in all regions during the third quarter.  This helped offset the drop in sales of consumer products in the United States, McCoy said.  Operating earnings were down during the quarter, reflecting higher material prices and increased freight costs due to fuel surcharges from suppliers.  These higher costs were partially offset by a reduction in operating expenses, as Life Fitness continues efforts to focus on reducing costs and improving productivity.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
 
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of the Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  Segment sales in the third quarter of 2008 totaled $111.1 million, down 3 percent compared with $114.6 million in the year-ago quarter.  For the third quarter, the segment had an operating loss of $10.4 million, which includes $13.6 million of goodwill and trade name impairments, and $1.8 million of restructuring charges.  This compares with an operating loss of $0.2 million in the year-ago period.
  For the quarter, sales declines were most prevalent within our billiards operation, where consumers continue to defer purchases of discretionary products.  Further, the industry is facing an overall decline in the coin-operated pool table market, McCoy explained.  In an effort to address these concerns, we have implemented several cost-cutting and staff reduction moves in our bowling and billiards operations.
For the quarter, bowling retail sales were down in the low-single digits, in part because there were fewer centers in operation versus a year ago, as six older centers were closed when their leases expired during the second quarter of 2008.  However, revenues from a growing number of Brunswick Zone XLs helped to mitigate the effect of this reduction, McCoy added.  Bowling capital equipment sales were up in the mid-teens for the quarter, benefiting from new center and modernization activity both within and outside of the United States.
 
Nine-Month Results
 
For the nine months ended Sept. 27, 2008, the company had net sales of $3,871.0 million, down 9 percent from $4,235.2 million for the first nine months of 2007.  The company had an operating loss of $573.2 million for the first three quarters of 2008, including $511.1 million of non-cash goodwill and trade name impairment charges and $128.4 million of restructuring charges.  This compares with operating earnings of $93.0 million for the corresponding period in 2007, which included $66.4 million of trade name impairment charges and $13.4 million of restructuring charges.
For the first nine months of 2008, the company had a net loss from continuing operations of $584.1 million, or $6.62 per diluted share, which includes $4.43 per diluted share of goodwill and trade name impairment charges, $0.90 per diluted share of restructuring charges, an $0.11 per diluted share gain on an investment sale, and a $1.76 per diluted share charge for special tax items, primarily related to the establishment of a deferred tax valuation allowance.  This compares with net earnings from continuing operations of $67.5 million, or $0.75 per diluted share, for the same period in 2007, which included $0.46 per diluted share of trade name impairment charges, $0.09 per diluted share of restructuring charges, and a $0.06 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.
 
Conference Call Scheduled
 
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT to discuss its financial results.  At that time, McCoy will be joined by Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Kathryn J. Chieger, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
.  To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at
www.br
u
nswick.com
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (888) 820-8951 (passcode: Brunswick Q3).  Callers outside of North America should call +1 (210) 234-0024 to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Oct. 30, 2008, by calling (866) 447-7329 or (203) 369-1160.  The replay will also be available at .
www.brun
s
w
ick.com
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of (i) the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, and (ii) the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in the timeframe and cost anticipated; the ability to successfully complete the disposition of non-core assets; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components and raw materials from suppliers; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; and the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2007 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 28, 2008.
About Brunswick
 
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; Albemarle, Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, rnvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Savage, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20081030165236.txt.gz
TIME:20081030165236
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
___________________________________
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): October 29, 2008
 
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 As previously disclosed in the Companys Current Report on Form 8-K filed on September 8, 2008, Brunswick Corporation (the Company) appointed Peter B. Hamilton its Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, effective September 15, 2008.
   
 On September 15, 2008 Mr. Hamilton received an award of 60,000 performance shares under the Brunswick 2003 Stock Incentive Plan (the Plan).  In addition, on October 28, 2008 the Compensation Committee of the Companys Board of Directors granted Mr. Hamilton 100,000 stock appreciation rights under the Plan.  The value of the stock appreciation rights is based upon the fair market value of the stock on November 3, 2008.  The award vests and becomes exercisable the earlier of (i) the third anniversary following grant, so long as Mr. Hamilton is employed by us as of that date; (ii) termination due to Mr. Hamiltons death or disability; or (iii) a change in control (as defined in the Plan).
   
 On October 29, 2008, the Company entered into Terms and Conditions of Employment (the CFO Terms) with Mr. Hamilton.  Mr. Hamilton was previously employed by the Company from 2000 to 2007 pursuant to Terms and Conditions of Employment, dated as of January 18, 2007 (the Prior Agreement).  The CFO Terms supersede the Prior Agreement.
   
 Pursuant to the CFO Terms, the Company agrees to employ Mr. Hamilton, and Mr. Hamilton agrees to serve, as the Companys Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, reporting directly to the Companys Chief Executive Officer.  Pursuant to the CFO Terms, Mr. Hamilton shall be entitled to an annual base salary of $535,000, subject to adjustment as determined by the Compensation Committee of the Companys Board of Directors (the Committee).  In addition, Mr. Hamilton shall be entitled to participate in the Brunswick Performance Plan (BPP), with a target bonus determined by the Committee, and shall also be eligible for grants of equity-based awards under the Companys 2003 Stock Incentive Plan, as determined by the Committee or the Board of Directors.  Mr. Hamilton shall also be eligible for other benefits to which executive officers of the Company are entitled, including health and welfare benefits and participation in the Companys deferred compensation plans.
   
 The CFO Terms provide that certain benefits that Mr. Hamilton became entitled to receive as a result of his prior employment with the Company shall not be reduced or impaired as a result of his employment pursuant to the CFO Terms.  Specifically, the CFO Terms provide that Mr. Hamilton will continue to receive the pension benefits he accrued during his previous employment with the Company and that his rights with respect to post-retirement medical benefits, stock options and stock appreciation rights and split dollar life insurance that relate to his prior employment shall not be affected by his reemployment pursuant to the CFO Terms.
   
 Mr. Hamilton is an at will employee and shall not be entitled to any severance benefits pursuant to the CFO Terms, except in the event that his employment is terminated by the Company without cause or for good reason following a change in control of the Company (each, as defined in the CFO Terms).  In such a case, except as set forth below, Mr. Hamilton will be entitled to a lump-sum severance payment equal to three times the sum of (i) his annual base salary, (ii) the larger of his targeted annual bonus under the BPP for the year of termination or the year in which the change in control occurs, (iii) if termination occurs on or prior to December 31, 2010, his targeted bonus under the Companys Strategic Incentive Plan for the 2005-2006 period, and (iv) an amount equal to the contributions made to the Companys 401(k) plan and any non-qualified defined contribution plans by the Company on Mr. Hamiltons behalf during the one-year period prior to his termination.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, if Mr. Hamilton will attain age 65 prior to the third anniversary of termination, then his severance benefits will be reduced so that he will not be entitled to severance benefits for the period that follows his attainment of age 65.  In the event of termination of Mr. Hamiltons employment under circumstances that entitle him to severance, Mr. Hamilton would also be entitled to accelerated vesting of his outstanding equity-based awards and up to three years of continued health and welfare benefits (but not beyond his 65th birthday).  The CFO Terms provide that in order for Mr. Hamilton to become entitled to the foregoing payments and benefits, he must execute a general release of claims in favor of the Company.  The CFO Terms also provide that Mr. Hamilton will be entitled to indemnification from the Company in the event that he becomes subject to certain excise taxes or other penalties.
   
 The CFO Terms provide that in the event that Mr. Hamiltons employment terminates for any reason, he will be subject to certain restrictive covenants.  Specifically, for a period of 18 months following termination of his employment, Mr. Hamilton will be prohibited from competing with the Company and from soliciting or hiring its employees.   Furthermore, except with respect to specific situations Mr. Hamilton will be prohibited from making any statement that is required to protect the Companys confidential information.  The CFO Terms provide that in the event that Mr. Hamilton materially breaches any of the foregoing obligations, in addition to any other remedies that the Company may have, the Companys obligations to provide him with payments and benefits will cease, his outstanding equity awards will be immediately forfeited and he will be required to repay the Company for any severance he has received and any amounts he realized with respect to equity-based awards at any time during the period beginning one year prior to the date his employment terminates.
   
 The CFO Terms will terminate automatically when Mr. Hamilton attains age 65.  In addition, the CFO Terms may be terminated by the Company at any time upon six months notice, provided that in the event of a change in control, the CFO Terms may not be terminated for a period of two years thereafter.
   
 The foregoing description of the CFO Terms is a summary of their material terms, does not purport to be complete, and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the CFO Terms filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this report and incorporated by reference herein.
   
 
 
      
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX
 
 
4

EXHIBIT 10.1
 
 
These TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT (the Agreement) made in Lake County, Illinois, as of October 29, 2008 (the Effective Date), between Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation with its headquarters at 1 N. Field Court, Lake Forest, Illinois, 60045 (the Company), and Peter B. Hamilton (the Executive).
 
 
 
A.
 
WHEREAS, the Executive was previously employed by the Company, pursuant to Terms and Conditions of Employment, dated as of January 18, 2007, and Attachment A to the Executive Severance Benefits and Change in Control Agreement, dated November 1, 2000 (such Terms and Conditions of Employment and such Attachment A, collectively, the Initial Agreement); and
 
B.
 
WHEREAS, the Executive rejoined the Company, effective September 15, 2008, to serve as its Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer;
 
C.
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to be assured of the Executives experience, skills, knowledge, and background for the benefit of the Company, and the efficient achievement of the long-term strategy of the Company, and is therefore willing to employ the Executive upon the terms and conditions, and in consideration of the compensation and benefits, provided herein; and
 
D.
 
WHEREAS, as is the case with many publicly held corporations, a change in control might occur and such possibility may result in the departure or distraction of key management personnel to the detriment of the Company and its stockholders; and
 
E.
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to take appropriate steps to reinforce and encourage the continued attention and dedication of members of management, including the Executive, to their assigned duties without distraction arising from the possibility of a change in control of the Company; and
 
F.
 
WHEREAS, the Company desires to have the Executive agree to provisions relating to noncompetition and nonsolicitation and certain other provisions contained herein, and the Executive is willing to agree to such provisions in consideration for the additional severance benefits to which he may become entitled under the terms of this Agreement.
 
G.
 
THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the agreements of the parties described below, this Agreement supersedes the Initial Agreement in whole and is the controlling agreement between the parties:
 
1.
 
  For purposes of this Agreement, capitalized terms used in this Agreement shall have the meanings indicated in Appendix I to this Agreement.
Definitions
.
 
2.
 
.
Employment and Duties
 
(a)
 
.  The Company hereby agrees to employ the Executive, and the Executive hereby agrees to serve the Company, under the title of Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  The Executive shall have such authority, duties, and responsibilities as are commensurate with such position on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, and shall directly report to the Chief Executive Officer.
Position
 
(b)
 
.  Subject to the provisions of Section 6, below, Executive shall diligently perform his duties as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer or as may otherwise be directed by the Chief Executive Officer, and agrees to use his reasonable best efforts to perform his duties faithfully and efficiently.
Performance of Duties
 
(c)
 
.  The Executive agrees to serve, as requested, as an officer or director of any Related Company, and shall receive no additional compensation for such service.
Other Duties; Related Companies
 
3.
 
The term of this Agreement (the Term) shall begin on the Effective Date and shall continue until terminated in accordance with Section 14 below.  The Company shall employ the Executive for a period of time beginning on the Effective Date and continuing for as long as the Executive retains the confidence of the Chief Executive Officer, it being the express understanding that the Executive is an employee at will, subject only to the protections provided by the specific terms of this Agreement.  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, the Chief Executive Officer may remove the Executive as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer and assign him to other duties within the Company or terminate his employment.
Agreement Term
.  
 
 
 
4.
 
As remuneration to the Executive for his services to the Company hereunder, the Company shall compensate the Executive as provided in this Section 4 during the Term.  Executive acknowledges and agrees that Section 15 of this Agreement is expressly applicable to any form of compensation or benefit provided to Executive.
Executives Compensation and Benefits
.  
 
 (a)
   
 
.  The Executives annual base salary (Base Salary) shall be $535,000 commencing on the Effective Date and, except as it may be modified in accordance with this Section 4 by action of the Committee, continuing throughout the Term.  The Base Salary shall be payable in conformity with the Companys then-current payroll practices, as modified from time to time.  The Base Salary will be reviewed annually during the Term in accordance with Companys usual salary review process for executive officers.  Effective as of the date of any adjustment in the Executives Base Salary, the Base Salary as so adjusted shall be considered the new Base Salary for all purposes of this Agreement.  Any adjustments in Base Salary shall be determined by the Committee and communicated by memorandum to the Executive from the Chief Executive Officer.  Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement.
Base Salary
 
(b)
 
.  For each calendar year during the Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in the Brunswick Performance Plan (BPP) and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee (Annual Bonus).  During the Term, the Executives target Annual Bonus for each full calendar year shall be determined by the Committee in accordance with the terms of the BPP, as in effect from time to time (Target Annual Bonus).  During the Term, the performance goals to be achieved, and the extent to which those goals have been achieved for purposes of calculating the amount of the actual payment as a percentage of the Target Annual Bonus, will be determined by the Committee or as delegated to the Chief Executive Officer.  The amount of any award under BPP shall be reviewed and approved by the Committee and communicated by memorandum to the Executive from the Chief Executive Officer, and shall be paid to the Executive in accordance with the terms of the BPP.  Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement.  Executive acknowledges and agrees that the payment of the Annual Bonus is subject to the Companys stock ownership guidelines for corporate officers, as in effect from time to time, pursuant to which Executive is currently required to own 45,000 shares of Company stock.
Brunswick Performance Plan
 
(c)
 
[Reserved]
 
(d)
 
.  For each calendar year during the Term, the Executive shall be eligible to participate in and receive equity-based awards under the Companys 2003 Stock Incentive Plan, and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee (collectively, Incentive Plan).  Any such future awards when made will be set forth in a memorandum to the Executive from the Chief Executive Officer.  Each such memorandum shall be included in Appendix II of this Agreement and shall form a part of the Agreement.
Equity-Based Awards
 
(e)
 
[Reserved]
 
(f)
 
.  The Executive shall be entitled to participate in all Company-sponsored health and welfare benefits offered to similarly situated senior executives, including health, dental, vision, term life insurance (except for the basic life insurance component thereof) and annual executive physical examination, and any and all successor or replacement benefits as may be determined by the Board or the Committee.
Health and Welfare Benefits
 
(g)
 
[Reserved]
 
(h)
 
.  The Executive shall earn pro rata four (4) weeks of paid vacation each calendar year, to be earned and taken as generally provided for other similarly situated senior executives of the Company.  Earned but unused vacation shall be paid within 30 days after termination of the Executives employment.  The Executive shall also be entitled to such personal days and paid holidays as are generally available to other similarly situated senior executives of the Company.
Vacation
 
(i)
 
.  The Executive shall be entitled to participate in the Brunswick Rewards Plan, its 2005 Elective Deferred Incentive Compensation Plan, and its Restoration Plan, and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee.  Furthermore, to the extent the Executive receives compensation that is subject to deferral pursuant to the Companys 2005 Automatic Deferred Compensation Plan (or any successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee), such compensation shall be deferred automatically thereunder.
Deferred Compensation Plans
 
(j)
 
.  The Executive is currently receiving the pension benefits he accrued during his previous employment with the Company pursuant to the Brunswick Pension Plan for Salaried Employees (Pension Plan) and the Brunswick Supplemental Pension Plan (Supplemental Plan).  During the Executives employment pursuant to this Agreement, the Executive will continue to receive his accrued and vested benefits pursuant to the terms of the Pension Plan and Supplemental Plan.  For the avoidance of doubt, the rights of the Executive pursuant to the Pension Plan and the Supplemental Plan that are accrued and vested as of the date of this Agreement shall not be impaired as a result of the Executives employment hereunder, and the Executives benefits under the Pension Plan and the Supplemental Plan are calculated based on the Executives 25 years of credited service as of January 31, 2007.  During the Term, the Executive shall not accrue any additional benefits under the Pension Plan or the Supplemental Plan, and instead, the Executive shall participate in the Brunswick Rewards Plan and any and all successor or replacement plans as may be determined by the Board or the Committee.
Retirement Plans
 
 
2
 
(k)
 
.  The Executive shall be entitled to receive prompt reimbursement for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by the Executive in connection with the performance of his duties hereunder, in accordance with Company policies for similarly situated senior executives.
Expenses
 
(l)
 
  During the period of the Executives employment hereunder, the Executive shall be entitled to obtain Company products under the Executive Product Program and make purchases through the Employee Purchase Program, in accordance with the terms and conditions in effect from time to time.
Product Programs.
 
5.
 
The Executive acknowledges that during employment with the Company or a Related Company, the Executive has and will acquire, develop and have access to confidential and proprietary information that belongs to the Company or the Related Company.  This information takes years and extensive resources to develop, is valuable to the Company or the Related Company and provides the Company or the Related Company with a competitive edge.  In consideration of employment or continued employment, Executive knowingly and voluntarily agrees to the following restrictions and further acknowledges and agrees that they are reasonably designed to protect the Company or the Related Company interests and good will, and will not unduly restrict Executives post-employment activities.
Restrictive Covenants
.  
 
(a)
 
.  The following provisions shall apply:
Noncompetition; Nonsolicitation; Nondisparagement
 
(i.)
 
During the Executives employment and during the eighteen (18) month period immediately following termination of Executives employment (regardless of the reason for the termination of employment), without the prior written consent of the Company, (i) the Executive shall not directly or indirectly be employed or retained by, or render any services for, or be financially interested in any manner, in any person, firm or corporation engaged in any business which is then materially competitive in any way with any business in which the Company or any Related Company was engaged (including any program of development or research) (a Competitive Activity) during the Executives employment; (ii) the Executive shall not divert or attempt to divert any business from the Company or a Related Company; (iii) the Executive shall not disturb or attempt to disturb any business relationships of the Company or any Related Company; and (iv) the Executive shall not assist any person in any way to do, or attempt to do, anything prohibited by the preceding clauses (i), (ii) and (iii).
 
(ii.)
 
In furtherance of Section 5(a)(i) above, the Executive shall promptly notify the Company through the Companys General Counsel and Chief Human Resources Officer (or their respective representatives), in advance in writing (which shall include a description of the proposed activity) of his intention to engage in any activity which could reasonably be deemed to be subject to the noncompetition provision set forth in Section 5(a)(i).  The Companys General Counsel or Chief Human Resources Officer (or one of their respective representatives) shall respond to the Executive in writing within thirty (30) calendar days indicating its approval or objections to the Executives engagement in the activity; provided, however, that if the Companys General Counsel or Chief Human Resources Officer (or one of their respective representatives) does not respond to or request additional information from the Executive within such thirty (30) day period, the Companys approval shall be deemed to be granted.  If the Executive fails to notify the Company of his intended activity in advance, the Company shall retain all its rights of objections.  Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed as preventing the Executive from investing his personal assets in any business that competes with the Company, in such form or manner as will not require any services on the part of the Executive in the operation or affairs of the business in which such investments are made, but only if the Executive does not own or control more than two percent of any class of the outstanding stock of such business.
 
(iii.)
 
For the eighteen (18) month period following termination of Executives employment with the Company, the Executive shall not, without the prior written consent of the Company, (A) solicit, recruit or hire any individual who is employed by the Company or any Related Company (or was so employed within 180 calendar days prior to the Executives solicitation, recruitment or hiring), (B) solicit or encourage any employee of the Company or any Related Company to terminate or refrain from renewing or extending such employment or to become employed by or become a consultant to any other individual or entity other than the Company or a Related Company, or (C) initiate discussion with any such employee for any such purposes or authorize or knowingly cooperate with the taking of any such actions by any other individual or entity; provided, however, that nothing herein shall prohibit the Executive from generally advertising for personnel not specifically targeting any executive or other personnel of the Company.
 
(iv.)
 
During the Executives employment with the Company and thereafter, Executive will not make any comment or statement or engage in any other behavior that in any way disparages or is otherwise detrimental to the reputation and goodwill of the Company, any Related Company, or any director, officer, executive, or agent of the Company or any Related Company; , , that nothing herein shall be interpreted as prohibiting Executive from making truthful statements, including statements of opinion, to Company directors, officers, auditors or regulators or when required by a court or other body having jurisdiction to require such statements.
provided
however
 
(b)
 
.  The following provisions shall apply:
Confidentiality
 
(i.)
 
Except as may be required by the lawful order of a court or agency of competent jurisdiction, or except to the extent that the Executive has express written authorization from the Company, he will keep secret and confidential all Confidential Information (as defined below), and not disclose the same, either directly or indirectly, to any other person, firm, or business entity, or use it in any way.  The Executive agrees that, to the extent that any court or agency seeks to have the Executive disclose Confidential Information, he shall promptly inform the Company, and he shall take such reasonable steps to prevent disclosure of Confidential Information until the Company has been informed of such required disclosure, and the Company has an opportunity to respond to such court or agency.  To the extent that the Executive obtains information on behalf of the Company or a Related Company that may be subject to attorney-client privilege as to the Company or an affiliates attorneys, the Executive shall take reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of such information and to preserve such privilege.
 
3
 
(ii.)
 
Upon his termination of employment with the Company for any reason, the Executive shall promptly return to the Company any keys, credit cards, passes, confidential documents and material, or other property belonging to the Company, and shall return all writings, files, records, correspondence, notebooks, notes and other documents and things (including any copies or electronic versions thereof) containing Confidential Information or relating to the business or proposed business of the Company or any Related Company or containing any trade secrets relating to the Company or any Related Company, except any personal diaries, calendars, rolodexes or personal notes or correspondence.
 
(iii.)
 
For purposes of this Agreement, the term Confidential Information means all non-public information concerning the Company and any Related Company that was acquired by or disclosed to the Executive during the course of his employment with the Company or a Related Company, or during discussions between the Executive and the Company or any Related Company following his termination of employment arising out of his employment or this Agreement, including, without limitation:  (A) all of the Companys or any Related Companys trade secrets as that term is used in the Illinois Trade Secrets Act (or, if that Act is repealed, the Uniform Trade Secrets Act upon which the Illinois Trade Secrets Act is based); (B) any non-public information regarding the Companys or a Related Companys directors, officers, employees, customers, equipment, processes, costs, operations and methods, whether past, current or planned, as well as knowledge and data relating to business plans, marketing and sales information originated, owned, controlled or possessed by the Company or a Related Company; and (C) information regarding litigation and threatened litigation involving or affecting the Company or a Related Company.
 
(c)
 
.  The Executive agrees that, consistent with the Executives business and personal affairs, during and after his employment by the Company, he will assist the Company and any Related Company in the defense of any claims or potential claims that may be made or threatened to be made against any of them in any action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (a Proceeding), and will assist the Company and any Related Company in the prosecution of any claims that may be made by the Company or any Related Company in any Proceeding, to the extent that such claims may relate to the Executives employment or the period of the Executives employment by the Company.  Executive agrees, unless precluded by law, to promptly inform the Company if Executive is asked to participate (or otherwise become involved) in any Proceeding involving such claims or potential claims.  Executive also agrees, unless precluded by law, to promptly inform the Company if Executive is asked to assist in any investigation (whether governmental or private) of the Company or any Related Company (or their actions), regardless of whether a lawsuit has then been filed against the Company or any Related Company with respect to such investigation.  The Company agrees to reimburse Executive for all of Executives reasonable out-of-pocket expenses associated with such assistance, including travel expenses and any attorneys fees and shall pay a reasonable per diem fee for Executives service.
Assistance with Claims
 
(d)
 
The payments, benefits, and other entitlements under this Agreement are being made in consideration of, among other things, the obligations of this Section 5 and, in particular, compliance with Sections 5(a) and (b) of this Agreement; , , that all such payments, benefits, or other entitlements pursuant to Section 6 of the Agreement are subject to and conditioned upon the Executives entering into the Release and Agreement referred to in Section 6(h) of this Agreement.
provided
however
 
(e)
 
.
Remedies
 
(i.)
 
The Executive acknowledges that the Company would be irreparably injured by any violation of this Section 5.
 
(ii.)
 
Subject to Section 7, in the event of any material breach by the Executive of the provisions of Sections 5(a) or (b), (A) the Company shall be relieved of all obligations to make any further payments to the Executive pursuant to Sections 4 and 6 of this Agreement (except for payments under Sections 4(j) and 6(f), which shall not be affected) or otherwise under any incentive compensation plan of the Company or a Related Company, (B) all outstanding equity-based awards held by the Executive shall be immediately forfeited, (C) subject to the following provisos, the Executive will be required to pay to the Company, in cash, within five business days after written demand is made therefor by the Company, an amount equal to any payments received by the Executive under Section 6(b) and (D) subject to the following provisos, the Executive will be required to pay the Company, in cash, within five (5) business days after written demand is made therefor by the Company, an amount equal to any gain realized as a result of the exercise or vesting of equity awards during the period commencing twelve months prior to the Executives termination of employment for any reason and ending on the date of payment; , , that no forfeiture, cancellation, or repayment shall take place with respect to any payments, benefits, or entitlements under this Agreement or any other award agreement, plan, or practice, unless the Company shall have first given the Executive written notice of its intent to so forfeit, cancel, or require repayment and the Executive has not, within thirty (30) calendar days after such notice has been given, ceased such impermissible Competitive Activity or other activity in violation of this Agreement; and , , that such prior notice procedure shall not be required with respect to (A) a Competitive Activity or violation of Section 5(b) of this Agreement which the Executive initiated after the Company had informed the Executive in writing that it believed such activity violated this Agreement or the Companys noncompetition guidelines, or (B) any Competitive Activity regarding products or services which are part of a line of business which the Executive knew or should have known represented more than five percent (5%) of the Companys consolidated gross revenues for its most recently completed fiscal year at the time the Executives employment is terminated.
provided
however
provided further
however
 
(iii.)
 
Executive agrees that (A) the Company, in addition to any other remedies available to it for a breach or threatened breach of Sections 5(a) or (b), shall be entitled to a preliminary injunction, temporary restraining order, or other equivalent relief, restraining the Executive from any actual or threatened breach of this Section 5, and (B) if a bond is required to be posted in order for the Company to secure an injunction or other equitable remedy, the parties agree that said bond need not be more than a nominal sum.  If a final and non-appealable judicial determination is made that any of the provisions of this Section 5 constitutes an unreasonable or otherwise unenforceable restriction against the Executive, the provisions of this Section 5 will not be rendered void but will be deemed to be modified to the minimum extent necessary to remain in force and effect for the greatest period and to the greatest extent that such court determines constitutes a reasonable restriction under the circumstances.  Moreover, notwithstanding the fact that any provision of this Section 5 is determined not to be specifically enforceable, the Company will nevertheless be entitled to recover monetary damages as a result of the Executives breach of such provision.
 
4
 
6.
 
.
Termination Provisions
 
(a)
 
[Reserved]
 
(b)
 
.  After a Change in Control, if the Company terminates the Executives employment for any reason other than Cause or Long-Term Disability, or if the Executive resigns for Good Reason, subject to Section 6(h), the Executive shall be entitled to:
Change in Control Benefits
 
(i.)
 
Change in Control payments in a lump sum in an aggregate amount equal to three (3) times the sum of (w) the Executives then-current Base Salary (disregarding any reduction in salary made after the Change in Control or in contemplation of the Change in Control), (x) the Executives Target Annual Bonus for the year of termination or, if greater, the Target Annual Bonus for the year in which the Change in Control occurred,  (y) if the Executives employment terminates on or prior to December 31, 2010, the Executives targeted bonus under the Brunswick Strategic Incentive Plan (SIP) for the 2005-2006 period, and if the Executives employment terminates after December 31, 2010, the amount in this clause (y) shall be zero, and (z) the Companys profit-sharing, 401(k) match and other Company contributions made on behalf of the Executive to the Companys tax-qualified and nonqualified defined contribution plans during the twelve (12) months prior to the date of termination (Total Change in Control Payment).  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, in the event that the Executive will attain age 65 prior to the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of termination, the Total Change in Control Payment shall be reduced to a level determined by multiplying the amount of such payment by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of full months between the date of termination and the date the Executive will attain age 65 (and the numerator will not be reduced to reflect any six (6) month delay in payment that may be required pursuant to Section 7), and the denominator of which shall be thirty-six (36).  The Total Change in Control Payment shall be paid on the date that the release described in Section 6(h) becomes effective and irrevocable (the Release Effective Date).
 
(ii.)
 
If such termination occurs prior to the payment of the Executives Annual Bonus payable with respect to the immediately preceding calendar year, payment of such Annual Bonus for such period, in the amount, and at such time, as he would otherwise have been entitled under the terms of the BPP had employment not terminated.
 
(iii.) Notwithstanding the terms and conditions of the equity compensation plans and award agreements pursuant to which outstanding awards were granted, upon termination of the Executives employment, all outstanding stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock units, restricted shares and other equity-based awards (the Equity Incentives) held by the Executive will become fully vested and, if applicable, immediately exercisable, and will remain outstanding pursuant to their terms.  The treatment of all awards held by the Executive that are subject to performance-based vesting criteria shall be governed by the terms and conditions of the equity compensation plans and award agreements and/or award terms pursuant to which they were granted.
 
(iv.)
 
The Executive shall be entitled to Company-provided continuation of medical, dental, vision and prescription coverage, but not Long-Term Disability coverage (the Benefits) (on either an insured or a self-insured basis, in the sole discretion of the Company) for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents (as determined under the terms of the Companys health and welfare benefit plans in effect as of the date of termination), on substantially the same terms of such coverage that are in existence immediately prior to the Executives date of termination (subject to commercial availability of such coverage), until the earlier of:  (A) the date on which the Executive becomes employed by another employer, or (B) the third anniversary of the Executives date of termination; , , that such coverage shall run concurrently with any coverage available to the Executive and his Eligible Dependents under COBRA; and , , that the Executive shall immediately notify the Company if he and his Eligible Dependents become covered under Medicare or another employers group health plan, at which time the Companys provision of medical coverage for the Executive and his Eligible Dependents will cease.  The Executive shall not be entitled to any other perquisites (except as otherwise explicitly provided in the applicable perquisite plan or policy or in this Agreement).  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 6(b)(iv), in the event the Executive attains age 65 prior to the third anniversary of his date of termination, the benefits provided for in this Section 6(b)(iv) shall cease on the date the Executive attains age 65; , , that if the commencement of benefits under this Section 6(b)(iv) is delayed by six (6) months as a result of Section 7, the Executive shall continue to receive the benefits under this Section 6(b)(iv) following attainment of age 65 solely during the period necessary to avoid a reduction in benefits as a result of the six (6) month delay.
provided
however
provided further
however
provided
however
 
(c)
 
.   If, at any time during the Term, the Executives employment terminates as a result of the Executives death or Long-Term Disability, the Executive or his estate (as applicable) shall be entitled to:
Benefits Upon Termination Due to Death or Long-Term Disability
 
(i.)
 
Payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination (to be paid on the scheduled payment date for such Base Salary) and any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination.
 
(ii.)
 
Subject to Section 6(h), such amount, if any, as may be determined by the Chief Executive Officer in his sole discretion based on the Executives Target Annual Bonus under the BPP (to be paid on the Release Effective Date).
 
(iii.)
 
If such termination occurs prior to the payment of the Executives Annual Bonus payable with respect to the immediately preceding calendar year, payment of such Annual Bonus for such period, in the amount, and at such time, as he would otherwise have been entitled under the terms of the BPP had employment not terminated.
 
5
 
(iv.)
 
Continuation of the ability of the Executive or the Executives beneficiaries (as applicable) to exercise all outstanding awards granted to the Executive under the Incentive Plan that became vested and exercisable on or prior to such date of termination in accordance with the terms and conditions of such grants.
 
(d)
 
.  In the event the Executives employment is terminated for Cause at any time during the Term, the Executive shall not receive any payments, benefits, or other amounts provided by this Agreement, other than payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination (to be paid on the scheduled payment date for such Base Salary), payment of any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination (but shall still be subject to the restrictive covenants set forth in Section 5 of this Agreement) and payments under Sections 4(j) and 6(f).  The Executive shall remain entitled to all benefits under the Companys tax-qualified retirement plans and shall remain eligible for certain benefits under other employee benefit plans, in each case subject to, and in accordance with, the terms of such plans.  Provided that the activity, facts, or circumstances that precipitated the for Cause determination were not (i) the result of Executives bad faith, or (ii) undertaken without a reasonable belief by the Executive that he was acting in the best interests of the Company or as required by applicable law, the Executives employment may not be terminated for Cause prior to advance written notice to the Executive containing reasonable detail of the activity, facts, or circumstances constituting Cause for termination, the actions that the Executive must take to cease such activity or cure such facts and circumstances, and a reasonable amount of time (not to exceed thirty (30) calendar days) for the Executive to effectuate such cure.  All determinations relating to a for Cause termination shall be made by the Company in its sole discretion.
Termination for Cause
 
(e)
 
.  In the event that, during the term the Executive's employment terminates for any reason that is not set forth in the foregoing Section 6(b), (c) or (d) (including, without limitation, termination of the Executive's employment by the Company without Cause, other than during the two-year period following a Change in Control, and the Executive's voluntary resignation, other than a resignation for Good Reason during the two-year period following a Change in Control), in each case, the Executive shall not be entitled to any payments, benefits or other amounts under this Agreement, other than payment of any unpaid Base Salary accrued through the date of termination (to be paid on the scheduled payment date for such Base Salary), payment of any unreimbursed business expenses incurred through the date of termination (but shall still be subject to the restrictive covenants set forth in Section 5 of this Agreement), payments under Section 4(j) and the payments and benefits set forth in Section 6(f) below.  The Executive shall remain entitled to all benefits under the Companys tax-qualified retirement plans and shall remain eligible for certain benefits under other employee benefit plans (including, without limitation, any plans providing for Equity Incentives), in each case subject to, and in accordance with, the terms of such plans.
Termination Without Cause or Due to Voluntary Resignation
 
(f)
 
.  In addition to any rights to which the Executive may be entitled under Sections 6(b) through 6(e), above, during the Executives employment (other than in the case of Section 6(f)(i) below) and in the event the Executives employment is terminated for any reason, the Executive shall be entitled to the following, which, for the avoidance of doubt, shall not be reduced or impaired in any way by the Executive's employment hereunder:
Benefits from Previous Employment
 
(i.)
 
The Executive and, to the extent applicable, the Executives spouse shall be entitled to receive retiree medical benefit coverage, commencing on the date of termination, to the same extent as is applicable in the case of other similarly situated executives leaving the employ of the Company at the time of the Executives date of termination, based on the Executives credited service with the Company at such time, which shall include all service credited to the Executive for purposes of retiree medical benefits as of January 31, 2007 (which, for the avoidance of doubt, is 25 years of credited service) plus any additional service credited to the Executive from September 15, 2008 until the date the Executives employment terminates; , , that in the event of a termination of employment that entitles the Executive to benefits under Section 6(b)(iv) of this Agreement, the provisions of this paragraph shall apply after the period of welfare benefit coverage provided under Section 6(b)(iv).
provided
however
 
(ii.)
 
With respect to stock options and stock appreciation rights outstanding as of January 31, 2007, the Executives employment under this Agreement and any subsequent termination of employment under this Agreement shall not affect the terms and conditions of any such awards, and such awards shall continue in effect as if the Executive had not become employed by the Company, or subsequently terminated employment, hereunder.
 
(iii.)
 
The Executive shall be entitled to participate in the Companys life insurance plan for senior executives (formerly the Split Dollar Life Insurance Plan) and receive payments of $130,935 in 2009, 2010 and 2011 under the terms and conditions described in a Memorandum dated February 19, 2003 and incorporated herein by reference.
 
(g)
 
.
Notification Requirements for Termination for Good Reason
 
(i.)
 
In the event the Executive determines that Good Reason exists to terminate his employment with the Company, the Executive shall notify the Company in writing of the specific event, within sixty (60) calendar days after the date that the Executive becomes aware of the occurrence of such event, and such notice shall also include the date on which the Executive will terminate employment with the Company, which date shall be no earlier than sixty (60) calendar days after the date of such notice and no later than the second anniversary of the date of the occurrence of the event giving rise to Good Reason; , , that the Chief Executive Officer, in his sole discretion, may relieve the Executive of his duties effective immediately upon the Companys receipt of notice provided pursuant to this Section 6(g).
provided
however
 
 
6
 
(ii.)
 
Within thirty (30) calendar days after the Companys receipt of such written notice, the Company shall notify the Executive that it agrees or disagrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Companys determination whether it agrees or disagrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason shall be reasonable, based on all the relevant facts and circumstances.  The arbitrator in any arbitration proceeding initiated pursuant to Section 13 of this Agreement, in which the existence of Good Reason is an issue, shall be expressly empowered and directed to review, de novo, the facts and circumstances claimed by the Executive to constitute Good Reason.
 
(iii.)
 
In the event the Company notifies the Executive that it agrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason, the Company, in its sole discretion, shall either (y) undertake to cure the circumstances that gave rise to Good Reason within thirty (30) calendar days of the Companys response to Executive under Section 6(g)(ii), above, or (z) advise the Executive that his employment with the Company shall terminate on his date of termination as determined under Section 6(g)(i), above.  In the event that the Executive and the Company do not agree that the action undertaken by the Company cures the circumstances that gave rise to Good Reason, the Executive shall be entitled to pursue the arbitration procedures set out in Section 13 of this Agreement.  If the Executives claim in arbitration is ultimately concluded in the Executives favor, the Executive shall retain the right to receive the payments and benefits under this Agreement.  If, during the two-year period following a Change in Control, the Company attempts to cure the circumstances giving rise to Good Reason, the Company shall have the burden of proof to establish that such circumstances have been cured.
 
(iv.)
 
In the event the Company notifies the Executive that it disagrees with the Executives determination that the event specified in the Executives notice constitutes Good Reason, the Executive may terminate his employment on the date specified in the notice (or such earlier date as determined by the Chief Executive Officer in his sole discretion or such later date as the Executive and the Company may mutually agree in writing) or may elect to continue his employment by so notifying the Company in writing.  In either event, the Executive shall be entitled to pursue the arbitration procedures set out in Section 13 of this Agreement.  If the Executives claim in arbitration is ultimately concluded in the Executives favor, the Executive shall retain the right to receive the payments and benefits under this Agreement.  If, during the two-year period following a Change in Control, the Company disputes the existence of Good Reason, the Company shall have the burden of proof to establish that Good Reason does not exist.
 
(v.)
 
Notwithstanding the date on which the Executives termination occurs following the completion of the steps set forth in this Section 6(g), so long as an event that constitutes Good Reason occurs during the Term and the Executive delivers the written notice of termination for Good Reason to the Company at any time prior to the expiration of the Term, for purposes of the payments, benefits and other entitlements set forth in this Section 6, the termination of the Executives employment pursuant thereto shall be deemed to be a resignation for Good Reason during the Term.
 
(h)
 
.  Subject to Section 7, any payments or benefits made pursuant to this Section 6 (other than pursuant to Section 6(f)) will be subject to and conditioned upon the Executives compliance with the provisions, restrictions and limitations of Section 5 of this Agreement, but not otherwise subject to offset or mitigation.  In addition, unless (i) effective on the date of termination, the Executive resigns from all offices, directorships and fiduciary positions with the Company and (ii) on or prior to the sixtieth (60th) day following the date of termination, (A) the Executive or the Executives estate (as applicable) shall have signed, and the Company shall have received, a Release and Agreement releasing the Company, Related Companies, and their respective directors, officers, employees and agents (Released Parties) from any and all claims and liabilities, and promising to the fullest extent allowed by law, never to sue any of the Released Parties (such Release and Agreement shall be in the form set forth in Appendix III) and (B) such Release and Agreement shall have become irrevocable, (x) no payment shall be paid or made available to the Executive under Section 6(b)(i), (y) no unvested Equity Incentive shall become vested pursuant to Section 6(b)(iii) and instead, all then unvested Equity Incentives shall be immediately forfeited, and (z) the Company shall be relieved of all obligations to make any further payments, or provide or make available any Benefits, to the Executive pursuant to Section 6(b)(iv) and (b) the Executive shall be required to repay the Company, in cash, within five (5) business days after written demand is made therefor by the Company, an amount equal to the value of any Benefits received by the Executive pursuant to Section 6(b)(iv).
Conditional Payments
 
7.
 
The provisions of this Section 7 shall apply notwithstanding any provision in this Agreement to the contrary.
Section 409A of the Code
.  
 
(a)
 
.  It is intended that the provisions of this Agreement comply with Section 409A of the Code, and all provisions of this Agreement shall be construed and interpreted in a manner consistent with the requirements for avoiding taxes or penalties under Section 409A of the Code.
Intent to Comply with Section 409A of the Code
 
(b)
 
.  If, at the time of the Executives separation from service (within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code), (i) the Executive shall be a specified employee (within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code and using the identification methodology selected by the Company from time to time) and (ii) the Company shall make a good faith determination that an amount payable under this Agreement or any other plan, policy, arrangement or agreement of or with the Company or any Related Company (this Agreement and such other plans, policies, arrangements and agreements, the Company Plans) constitutes deferred compensation (within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code) the payment of which is required to be delayed pursuant to the six (6)-month delay rule set forth in Section 409A of the Code in order to avoid taxes or penalties under Section 409A of the Code, then the Company (or a Related Company, as applicable) shall not pay any such amount on the otherwise scheduled payment date but shall instead accumulate such amount and pay it, without interest, on the first day of the seventh (7th) month following such separation from service.
Six-Month Delay of Certain Payments
 
7
 
(c)
 
.  Except as permitted under Section 409A of the Code, any deferred compensation (within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code) payable to or for the benefit of the Executive under any Company Plan may not be reduced by, or offset against, any amount owing by the Executive to the Company or any Related Company.
Prohibition of Offsets
 
(d)
 
.  From and after the Effective Date and for the remainder of the Term, (i) the Company shall administer and operate this Agreement and any nonqualified deferred compensation plan (as defined in Section 409A of the Code) (and any other arrangement that could reasonably be expected to constitute such a plan) in which the Executive participates and the Executives rights and benefits hereunder and thereunder in compliance with Section 409A of the Code and any rules, regulations or other guidance promulgated thereunder as in effect from time to time, (ii) in the event that the Company determines that any provision of this Agreement or any such plan or arrangement does not comply with Section 409A of the Code or any such rules, regulations or guidance and that the Executive may become subject to additional taxes and penalties under Section 409A of the Code (Section 409A Tax), the Company shall amend or modify such provision to avoid the application of such Section 409A Tax but only to the minimum extent necessary to avoid the application of such Section 409A Tax and only to the extent that the Executive would not, as a result, suffer (A) any reduction in the total present value of the amounts otherwise payable to the Executive (determined without application of the Section 409A Tax), or the benefits otherwise to be provided to the Executive, by the Company, (B) any material increase in the risk of the Executive not receiving such amounts or benefits which he would have received without the application of the Section 409A Tax and any amendment pursuant to this Section 7 or (C) unless the Executive otherwise expressly consents in writing, any significant reduction in the Executives legal rights under this Agreement or any Company Plan, and (iii) in the event that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the Executive is subject to a Section 409A Tax with respect to any such provision, the Company shall indemnify and hold the Executive harmless against all taxes (and any interest or penalties imposed with respect to such taxes) imposed as a result of the Companys failure to comply with clause (i) of this Section 7(d).   The provisions of Sections 10(c), (d), (e) and (f) shall apply mutatis mutandis to any claim by the IRS that, if successful, would give rise to indemnification by the Company under this Section 7(d).
Amendment of Deferred Compensation Plans; Indemnification for Section 409A Taxes
 
(e)
 
.  Any amounts payable to the Executive in respect of indemnification pursuant to Section 7(d) for the Section 409A Tax or the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment pursuant to Section 10(a) shall be paid to the Executive as soon as practicable after the applicable liability is incurred, but in any event not later than the last day of the calendar year after the calendar year in which the Executive remits the applicable taxes, interest or penalties to the applicable taxing authority, in accordance with Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-3(i)(1)(v) or any successor thereto.  Furthermore, any amounts that the Executive becomes entitled to receive in respect of costs and expenses incurred in connection with a contest relating to Section 7(d) or 10(e) shall be paid to the Executive as soon as practicable after the applicable cost is incurred, but in any event not later than the later of (i) the last day of the calendar year after the calendar year in which the Executive remits the underlying taxes to the applicable taxing authority and (ii) the last day of the calendar year after the calendar year in which the applicable contest is concluded.
Payment Schedules Relating to Tax Indemnification
 
(f)
 
.  For purposes of Section 409A of the Code, each installment payment to the Executive provided for in this Agreement or any Company Plan shall be deemed to be a separate payment within the meaning of Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-2(b)(iii) or any successor thereto.
Designation of Installments as Separate Payments
 
(g)
 
.  Except as specifically permitted by Section 409A of the Code, the benefits and reimbursements, including for legal fees, provided to the Executive under this Agreement and any Company Plan during any calendar year shall not affect the benefits and reimbursements to be provided to the Executive under the relevant section of this Agreement or Company Plan in any other calendar year and the right to such benefits and reimbursements cannot be liquidated or exchanged for any other benefit, in accordance with Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-3(i)(1)(iv) or any successor thereto.  Furthermore, reimbursement payments shall be made to the Executive as promptly as practicable following the date that the applicable expense is incurred, but in any event not later than the last day of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the underlying fee, cost or expense is incurred.
Timing of Reimbursement Payments and Other Benefits
 
8.
 
In the event that it shall be necessary or desirable for the Executive to retain legal counsel or incur other costs and expenses in connection with enforcement of the Executives rights under this Agreement, the Company shall pay (or the Executive shall be entitled to recover from the Company, as the case may be) his reasonable attorneys fees and cost and expenses incurred prior to the tenth anniversary of the expiration of the Term in connection with enforcement of his rights (including the enforcement of any arbitration award in court), (a) if the action relates to the Executives employment with the Company or a Related Company during a period ending prior to a Change in Control, only if a final decision in connection with a material issue of the litigation (or arbitration) is issued in the Executives favor by an arbitrator or a court of competent jurisdiction, and (b) if the action relates to the Executives employment with the Company or a Related Company during a period following a Change in Control or during a period that both precedes and follows a Change in Control, regardless of the final outcome, unless, in the case of this clause (b), the arbitrator or court shall determine that under the circumstances recovery by the Executive of all or a part of any such fees and costs and expenses would be unjust.
Legal Fees
.  
 
9.
 
The Executive shall be entitled to indemnification by the Company under the Indemnification Terms and Conditions described in Appendix IV to this Agreement.
Indemnification
.  
 
 
8
 
10.
 
.
Excise Tax
 
(a)
 
.  If any element of compensation or benefit provided to the Executive under the terms of this Agreement or under any other plan, program, policy, or other arrangement, either alone or in combination with other elements of compensation and benefits paid or provided to such Executive, constitutes an excess parachute payment, as that term is defined in Section 280G of the Code and the regulations thereunder (Potential Parachute Benefit), and subjects such Executive to the excise tax pursuant to Section 4999 of the Code, and any interest and penalties thereon (collectively, the Excise Tax), then the Executive shall be entitled, subject to Section 10(f), to an additional lump-sum cash payment from the Company (the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment), subject to mandatory withholding, in an amount equal to the Excise Taxes (including the Excise Tax attributable to the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to the Potential Parachute Benefit) plus any Income Taxes and any interest and penalties thereon attributable to the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment.  For purposes of calculating an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to the Executive in any year, it shall be assumed that the Executive is subject to Income Taxes at the highest marginal Federal and applicable state and local income tax rates, respectively, for the year in which the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment is paid.  Also, the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to the Executive shall reflect the Federal tax benefits attributable to the deduction of applicable state and local income taxes, taking into account limitations applicable to individuals subject to Federal income tax at the highest marginal rate.
Excise Tax Adjustment Payment Calculation
 
(b)
 
.  All determinations required to be made under this Section 10, including whether and when an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment is required and the amount of such Excise Tax Adjustment Payment and the assumptions utilized in arriving at such determinations, shall be made by an independent accounting or consulting firm chosen by the Company (the Firm).  The Firm shall provide detailed supporting calculations to the Company and to the Executive within thirty (30) business days after the receipt of notice from the Company or the Executive that there has been a Potential Parachute Benefit provided to which these Excise Tax provisions apply (or such earlier time as requested by the Company).  Any Excise Tax Adjustment Payment shall be paid by the Company to the Executive within fifteen (15) business days after the Companys receipt of the Firms determination.
Independent Firm
 
(i.)
 
If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an IRS proceeding, or in the opinion of independent counsel agreed upon by the Company and the Executive, that the Excise Tax payable by the Executive on the Potential Parachute Benefit is less than the amount initially taken into account under Section 10(a) for purposes of calculating the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to such Potential Parachute Benefit, the Firm shall recalculate the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to reflect the actual Excise Tax.  Within thirty (30) business days following the Executives receipt of notice of the results of such recalculation from the Firm and/or the Company, the Executive shall repay to the Company the excess of the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment.
 
(ii.)
 
If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an IRS proceeding, or in the opinion of an independent counsel agreed upon by the Company and the Executive, that the Excise Tax payable by the Executive on the Potential Parachute Benefit is more than the amount initially taken into account under Section 10(a) for purposes of calculating the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to such Potential Parachute Benefit, the Firm shall recalculate the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment to reflect the actual Excise Tax.  Within thirty (30) business days following the Companys receipt of notice of the results of such recalculation from the Firm, the Company shall pay to the Executive the excess of the recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment.
 
(iii.)
 
All fees and expenses of the Firm and any independent counsel shall be borne solely by the Company.
 
(c)
 
.  The Executive shall notify the Company in writing of any written claim by the IRS that, if successful, would require the payment by the Company of an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment or the recalculation of an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment.  The notification shall apprise the Company of the nature of such claim, including (i) a copy of the written claim from the IRS, (ii) the identification of the element of compensation and/or benefit that is the subject of such IRS claim, and (iii) the date on which such claim is requested to be paid.  Such notification shall be given as soon as practicable, but no later than ten (10) business days after the Executive actually receives notice in writing of such claim.  The failure of the Executive to properly notify the Company of the IRS claim (or to provide any required information with respect thereto) shall not affect any rights granted to the Executive under this Section 10, except to the extent that the Company is materially prejudiced in the challenge to such claim as a direct result of such failure.
Notice
 
(d)
 
.  Within ten (10) business days following receipt of such written notification by the Executive of such IRS claim, the Company shall pay to the Executive an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment, or the excess of a recalculated Excise Tax Adjustment Payment over the initial Excise Tax Adjustment Payment, as applicable, related to the element of compensation and/or benefit which is the subject of the IRS claim.  Within ten (10) business days following such payment to the Executive, the Executive shall provide to the Company written evidence that he has paid the claim to the IRS (the United States Treasury).
Payment
 
9
 
(e)
 
.  If the Company notifies the Executive in writing, within sixty (60) business days following receipt from the Executive of notification of the IRS claim, that it desires to contest such claim, the Executive shall:
Contest
 
(i.)
 
Give the Company any information reasonably requested by the Company relating to such claim;
 
(ii.)
 
Take such action in connection with contesting such claim as the Company shall reasonably request in writing from time to time including, without limitation, accepting legal representation with respect to such claim by an attorney selected by the Company and reasonably acceptable to the Executive;
 
(iii.)
 
Cooperate with the Company in good faith in order to effectively contest such claim; and
 
(iv.)
 
Permit the Company to participate in any proceedings relating to such claim if the Company elects not to assume and control the defense of such claim;
 
, , that the Company shall bear and pay directly all costs and expenses (including additional interest and penalties) incurred in connection with such contest and shall indemnify and hold harmless the Executive, on an after-tax basis, for any Excise Tax and Income Taxes (including interest and penalties with respect thereto) imposed as a result of such representation and payment of costs and expenses.  Without limitation on the foregoing provisions of this Section 10, the Company shall have the right, at its sole option, to assume the control of all proceedings in connection with such contest, in which case it may pursue or forego any and all administrative appeals, proceedings, hearings, and conferences with the taxing authority in respect of such claim, and may direct the Executive to sue for a refund or contest the claim in any permissible manner.  The Executive agrees to prosecute such contest, as directed by the Company, to a determination before any administrative tribunal, in a court of initial jurisdiction and in one or more appellate courts, as the Company shall determine; and , , that (A) if the Company directs the Executive to pay such claim and sue for a refund, the Company shall advance the amount of such payment to the Executive, on an interest-free basis, and shall indemnify and hold the Executive harmless, on an after-tax basis, from any Excise Tax or income tax (including interest or penalties) imposed with respect to such advance or with respect to any imputed income in connection with such advance and (B) any extension of the statute of limitations relating to payment of tax for the taxable year of the Executive with respect to which such contested amount is claimed to be due is limited solely to such contested amount.  Furthermore, the Companys rights to assume the control of the contest shall be limited to issues with respect to which an Excise Tax Adjustment Payment would be payable hereunder, and the Executive shall be entitled to settle or contest, as the case may be, any other issue raised by the IRS or any other taxing authority.  To the extent that the contest of the IRS claim is successful, the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment related to the element of compensation and/or benefit that was the subject of the claim shall be recalculated in accordance with the provisions of Section 10(a).
provided
however
provided further
however
 
(f)
 
.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 10, if it shall be determined (by the reasonable computation of the Firm, which determination shall be certified by the Firm and set forth in a certificate delivered to Executive) that the aggregate amount of the Potential Parachute Benefits that, but for this Section 10(f), would be payable to Executive, does not exceed 110% of the greatest amount of Potential Parachute Benefits that could be paid to Executive without giving rise to any liability for Excise Taxes in connection therewith (such greatest amount, the Floor Amount), then:
Limitation on Potential Parachute Benefit
 
(i)
 
no Excise Tax Adjustment Benefit shall be made to Executive;
 
and
 
(ii)
 
the aggregate amount of Potential Parachute Benefits payable to Executive shall be reduced (but not below the Floor Amount) to the largest amount which would both (A) not cause any Excise Taxes to be payable by Executive, and (B) not cause any Potential Parachute Benefit to become nondeductible by the Company by reason of Section 280G of the Code (or any successor provision); provided, however, that in no event shall any such reduction (x) in any way affect any Potential Parachute Benefits that are provided to Executive in any form other than cash, or (y) reduce the aggregate amount of Potential Parachute Benefits that are payable in cash to an amount below the aggregate amount of Income Taxes payable by Executive in respect of all Potential Parachute Benefits received by him (whether in cash or otherwise).
 
11.
 
All taxable payments, reimbursements, benefits, and other amounts payable or provided by the Company pursuant to this Agreement shall be subject to applicable wage withholding of Income Taxes and shall be reported on IRS Form W-2.
Wage Withholding and Reporting
.  
 
12.
 
[Reserved]
 
13.
 
Except as otherwise provided by Section 5(e) (Remedies) above, any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement (or the breach thereof) shall be settled by arbitration in the City of Chicago in accordance with the laws of the State of Illinois by one arbitrator.  The arbitrator shall be appointed pursuant to Rule 11 of the American Arbitration Associations Commercial Arbitration Rules, amended and effective September 15, 2005.  The arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association, Commercial Arbitration Rules.  Judgment upon the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof.
Dispute Resolution
.  
 
10
 
14.
 
  The Term shall automatically terminate upon the Executives attainment of age 65, and may be terminated at any time by the Company upon six (6) months advance written notice to the Executive; provided, however, that if a Change in Control occurs prior to the expiration of the Term, the Term shall not terminate prior to the second (2) anniversary of the date on which the Change in Control occurs.
Termination Provisions
.
nd
 
15.
 
  The Company reserves the right to discontinue or modify its compensation, incentive, benefit, and perquisite plans, programs, and practices at any time and from time to time.  Moreover, the brief summaries contained herein are subject to the terms of such plans, programs, and practices.  For purposes of any and all employee benefit plans, the definition of compensation is as stated in such plans.  The severance benefits payable under Section 6 of this Agreement (except for those provided under Section 6(f)) are in lieu of all other severance benefits which the Executive would otherwise be entitled to receive from the Company and any Related Company, except as may otherwise be provided in a written agreement specifically referencing this Section 15.  The Executive acknowledges and agrees that the severance benefits to which the Executive may become entitled under this Agreement are in excess of those which the Executive would be entitled to under the Companys otherwise applicable severance pay plans, and that the Company is agreeing to provide such severance benefits in consideration for the Executives agreement to the terms and conditions of Section 5 of this Agreement.
Companys Reservation of Rights
.
 
16.
 
This Agreement represents the entire agreement between the Executive and the Company in respect of the subject matter contained herein and supersedes all prior agreements, promises, covenants, arrangements, communications, representations, or warranties, whether oral or written, by any officer, executive, or representative of any party hereto, including, but not limited to, the Initial Agreement.  Except as specifically provided in Section 7, no amendments or modifications to this Agreement may be made except in writing signed by the Company (as authorized by the Board or the Committee) and the Executive.
Entire Agreement; Amendments
.
 
17.
 
The respective rights and obligations of the parties hereunder shall survive the expiration of the Term and any termination of the Executives employment to the extent necessary to the intended preservation of such rights and obligations.
Survivorship
.  
 
18.
 
Any notice and all other communications provided for in this Agreement to be given to a party shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given when delivered in person or two (2) business days after being placed in the United States mails by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, duly addressed to the party concerned at the address indicated below or to such changed address as such party may subsequently furnish to the other in writing in accordance herewith, except that notices of change of address shall be effective only upon receipt:
Notices
.  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
19.
 
  The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this Agreement shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision of this Agreement.  If any provision of this Agreement shall be held invalid or unenforceable in part, the remaining portion of such provision, together with all other provisions of this Agreement, shall remain valid and enforceable and continue in full force and effect to the fullest extent consistent with law.  In furtherance and not in limitation of the foregoing, should the duration or geographical extent of, or business activities covered by, any provision of this Agreement be in excess of that which is valid and enforceable under applicable law, then such provision shall be construed to cover only that duration, extent, or activities which may be validly enforced.
Severability
.
 
20.
 
  Headings to Sections hereof are for convenience of reference only and shall not be construed to alter or affect the meaning of any provision of this Agreement.
Headings
.
 
21.
 
  If there is a breach or threatened breach of the provisions of this Agreement, the non-breaching party shall be entitled to an injunction restraining the breaching party from such breach.  Nothing herein shall be construed as prohibiting either party from pursuing any other remedies for a breach or threatened breach of this Agreement.
Injunctive Relief
.
 
 
11
 
22.
 
  Except as required by law, no right to receive payments under this Agreement shall be subject to anticipation, commutation, alienation, sale, assignment, encumbrance, charge, pledge, or hypothecation, or to execution, attachment, levy, or similar process or assignment by operation of law, and any attempt, voluntary or involuntary, to effect any such action shall be null, void, and of no effect; , , that nothing in this Section 22 shall preclude the assumption of such rights by executors, administrators, or other legal representatives of the Executive or his estate and their assigning any rights hereunder to the person or persons entitled thereto; and , , that the Company may not assign this Agreement except in connection with an assignment or disposition of all or substantially all of the assets or stock of the Company or the division, subsidiary, or business unit for which the Executive is providing services under this Agreement or by law as a result of a merger or consolidation.
No Assignment or Attachment
.
provided
however
provided further
however
 
23.
 
  This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and any successor of the Company.  The Company will require any successor (whether direct or indirect, by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business and/or assets of the Company to expressly assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent that the Company would be required to perform it if no succession had taken place.  As used in this Agreement, except for purposes of Section 5(a), the term Company shall mean the Company as hereinbefore defined and any successor of the Company and any permitted assignee to which this Agreement is assigned.
Successors, Assumption of Contract
.
 
24.
 
  The Executive acknowledges that all of the Executives work on and contributions to the Companys products (the Products) including, without limitation, any and all patterns, designs, and other expressions in any tangible medium (collectively, the Works) are within the scope of the Executives employment and are a part of the services, duties, and responsibilities of the Executive.  All of the Executives work on and contributions to the Works will be rendered and made by the Executive for, at the instigation of, and under the overall direction of, the Company, and all of the Executives said work and contributions, as well as the Works, are and at all times shall be regarded as work made for hire as that term is used in the United States copyright laws.  Without curtailing or limiting this acknowledgment, the Executive hereby assigns, grants, and delivers exclusively to the Company, as to work on and contribution to the Products pursuant hereto, all rights, titles, and renewals.  The Executive will execute and deliver to the Company, or its successors and assigns, such other and further assignments, instruments, and documents as it from time to time reasonably may request for the purpose of establishing, evidencing, and enforcing or defending its complete, exclusive, perpetual, and worldwide ownership of all rights, titles, and interests of every kind and nature whatsoever, including all copyrights, in and to the Works.  The Executive hereby constitutes and appoints the Company as his agent and attorney-in-fact, with full power of substitution, to execute and deliver said assignments, instruments, or documents as the Executive may fail or refuse to execute and deliver, this power and agency being coupled with an interest and being irrevocable.
Work For Hire Acknowledgment; Assignment
.
 
25.
 
  The validity, interpretation, construction, and performance of this Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois, without regard to its choice of laws provisions, for contracts made and to be performed wholly in such state; , , the rights of the Executive to indemnification under Section 9 shall be governed by the laws of the State of Delaware.
Governing Law
.
provided
however
 
26.
 
  From and after the Effective Date, this Agreement shall supersede any other employment agreement, severance agreement, indemnification agreement and change of control agreement between the parties, including the Initial Agreement.
Termination of Initial Agreement
.
 
27.
 
  This Agreement may be executed in two (2) or more counterparts, any one of which shall be deemed the original without reference to the others.
Counterparts
.
 
IN WITNESS THEREOF, the Executive has hereunto set his hand and the Company has caused these presents to be executed in its name and on its behalf, and its corporate seal to be hereunto affixed, all as of the Effective Date.
 
 
12
 
 
 
Definitions.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ii
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Whether a Reduction in Authority or Responsibility of the Executive has occurred shall be determined in accordance with the criteria set forth below in the definition of Reduction in Authority or Responsibility; , , that (A) a change in the Executives reporting relationship to another executive who is within the same reporting level (as that term is used in the Companys Delegation of Authority Policy or any successor policy); or (B) a reduction in the Executives business units budget or a reduction in the Executives business units head count or number of direct reports, by themselves, shall not constitute Good Reason.
provided
however
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
iii
 
 
 
It is intended by this definition that a Change in Control by itself, absent a Reduction in Authority or Responsibility as described above, will not constitute Good Reason.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
iv
 
 
 
 
 
 
Appendix III
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Intending to be legally bound hereby, I execute the foregoing General Release this _____ day of ________________, 20___.
 
 
Witness
 
 
Brunswick Corporation (the Corporation) shall indemnify Executive (hereinafter, Indemnitee) against expenses and costs incurred by Indemnitee in connection with any claims, suits or proceedings arising from his service to the Corporation, to the fullest extent that is lawful in accordance with the following terms and conditions:
1.             The Corporations agreement to indemnify Indemnitee (Agreement) shall cover any act or omission by an Indemnitee which (i) occurs or is alleged to have occurred by reason of his being or having been an officer or a director, (ii) occurs or is alleged to have occurred before, during or after the time when the Indemnitee served as an officer or a director and (iii) gives rise to, or is the direct or indirect subject of a claim in any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding at any time or times whether during or after his service as an officer or director.
Acts and Omissions Covered By This Agreement.
2.           
Indemnity.
 
 
 
 
3.             Indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification for any act or omission covered in Section 1 of this Agreement.  The burden of proof of establishing that Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification because of the failure to fulfill some requirement of Delaware law, the Corporations charter, by-laws, or this Agreement shall be on the Corporation.
Burden of Proof.
4.             Indemnitee shall notify the Corporation in writing of any matter with respect to which Indemnitee intends to seek indemnification hereunder as soon as reasonably practicable following the receipt by Indemnitee of written threat thereof; , , that failure to so notify the Corporation shall not constitute a waiver by Indemnitee of his rights hereunder.
Notice by Indemnitee.
provided
however
5.             In the event of any action, suit or proceeding against Indemnitee which may give rise to a right of indemnification from the Corporation pursuant to this Agreement, following written request to the Corporation by the Indemnitee, the Corporation shall advance to Indemnitee amounts to cover expenses incurred by Indemnitee in defending the action, suit or proceeding in advance of final disposition upon receipt of (i) an undertaking by or on behalf of the Indemnitee to repay the amount advanced in the event that it shall be ultimately determined in accordance with Section 3 of this Agreement that he is not entitled to indemnification by the Corporation, and (ii) satisfactory evidence as to the amount of such expenses.  Indemnitees written certification together with a copy of the statement paid or to be paid by Indemnitee shall constitute satisfactory evidence unless determined to the contrary in an arbitration proceeding conducted pursuant to Section 8 of this Agreement.
Advancement of Expenses.
 
 
6.             The indemnification rights granted to Indemnitee under this Agreement shall not be deemed exclusive of, or in limitation of, any rights to which Indemnitee may be entitled under Delaware law, the Corporations charter or By-laws, any other agreement, vote of stockholders or directors or otherwise.
Non-Exclusivity of Right of Indemnification.
7.           
Termination of Agreement and Survival of Right of Indemnification.
 
 
8.             Any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement including, without limitation, the Indemnitees entitlement to indemnification under this Agreement, shall be settled by arbitration in the City of Chicago administered by the American Arbitration Association in accordance with its Commercial Arbitration Rules, and judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof.  Interest on any judgment shall be assessed at a rate or rates the arbitrator considers just under the circumstances.  If it is necessary or desirable for the Indemnitee to retain legal counsel or incur other costs and expenses in connection with enforcement of his rights under this Agreement, the Corporation shall pay his reasonable attorneys fees and costs and expenses incurred prior to the tenth anniversary of the expiration of the Term (as defined in the Terms and Conditions of Employment agreement between the Corporation and the Indemnitee, dated as of October 29, 2008) in connection with enforcement of his rights (including the enforcement of any arbitration award in court), regardless of the final outcome, unless the arbitrator determines that under the circumstances recovery by the Indemnitee of all or a part of any such fees and costs and expenses would be unjust.
Arbitration of all Disputes Concerning Entitlement.
9.             The Corporations obligations to indemnify Indemnitee under these terms and conditions shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware without regard to its choice of law provisions.
Governing Law.
10.           If any provision of this Agreement is determined to be invalid or unenforceable, this invalidity or unenforceability shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provisions of this Agreement, and this Agreement shall be interpreted as though the invalid or unenforceable provision was not part of this Agreement.
Severability.
 
 
2


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20081219152356.txt.gz
TIME:20081219152356
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 19, 2008, Brunswick Corporation (the Company) entered into the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (the Amended Credit Agreement) with the subsidiaries party thereto, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.  The Amended Credit Agreement amends and supplements the Companys existing Credit Agreement, dated as of April 29, 2005, by, among other things:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Amended Credit Agreement is attached as Exhibit 10.1.  The foregoing description of the Amended Credit Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Amended Credit Agreement, which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
The information set forth above under Item 1.01 is hereby incorporated by reference into this Item 2.03.
 
 
The news release announcing this matter is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.  The information in this Item 7.01 and Exhibit 99.1 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference into any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Statements made in this Current Report on Form 8-K that are forward-looking involve risks and uncertainties and are indicated by words such as may, expects and other similar words or phrases. Actual events or results may differ materially from those described herein.  These uncertainties include, but are not limited to, future economic conditions and other risks described in filings with the SEC such as Brunswicks most recent Forms 10-K and 10-Q. 
 
(d)           Exhibits.
 
 
3
 
 
 
 
4
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
5
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
- i - -
 
 
 
 
- ii - -
 
 
 
 
- iii - -
 
 
 
- iv - -
Table of Contents
 
This AMENDED AND RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT (this ), dated as of April 29, 2005, as amended and restated as of December 19, 2008, among BRUNSWICK CORPORATION, certain SUBSIDIARIES of Brunswick Corporation that may be SUBSIDIARY BORROWERS party hereto, certain SUBSIDIARIES of Brunswick Corporation and BRUNSWICK CORPORATION that shall be GUARANTORS party hereto, the LENDERS party hereto, JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent, J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES INC. and RBS SECURITIES CORPORATION, as Joint Lead Arrangers, J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES INC., RBS SECURITIES CORPORATION, BANC OF AMERICA SECURITIES LLC, SUNTRUST ROBINSON HUMPHREY, INC. and WELLS FARGO SECURITIES, LLC, as Joint Bookrunners, JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A. and THE ROYAL BANK OF SCOTLAND PLC, as Syndication Agents, and BANK OF AMERICA, N.A., SUNTRUST BANK and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Documentation Agents.
Agreement
 
WHEREAS, Brunswick Corporation and certain subsidiaries of Brunswick Corporation as subsidiary account parties and/or subsidiary borrowers entered into the Credit Agreement, dated as of April 29, 2005 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified prior to the date hereof, the ), with the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
Existing Credit Agreement
 
WHEREAS, the parties hereto have agreed to amend and restate the Existing Credit Agreement as provided in this Agreement, which Agreement shall become effective upon the satisfaction of certain conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.01 hereof; and
 
WHEREAS, it is the intent of the parties hereto that this Agreement not constitute a novation of the obligations and liabilities existing under the Existing Credit Agreement that remain outstanding or evidence repayment of any of such obligations and liabilities and that this Agreement amend and restate in its entirety the Existing Credit Agreement and re-evidence the obligations of the Borrowers outstanding thereunder;
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the above premises, the parties hereto hereby agree that on the Effective Date (as defined below) the Existing Credit Agreement shall be amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
 
The parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
 
 
 
SECTION 1.01 
   
.  As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
 
 means, individually and collectively, any Account referred to in the Security Agreement.
Account
 
 means any Person obligated on an Account.
Account Debtor
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 means, with respect to any Eurocurrency Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to (a) the Eurocurrency Rate for such Interest Period (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate for such Interest Period.
Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate
multiplied by
 
 means JPMCB, in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder, and its successors in such capacity.
Administrative Agent
 
 means an account designated by the Administrative Agent in a notice to the Company, the relevant Loan Party (if other than the Company) and the Lenders.
Administrative Agents Account
 
 means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
 
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the BAC Joint Venture shall be deemed an Affiliate of the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Affiliate
provided
 
 means, individually and collectively, the Administrative Agent, the Syndication Agents and the Documentation Agents.
Agents
 
 has the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Agreement
 
 means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate for such day 0.50% and (c) the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for a one month Interest Period on such day, without any adjustment for rounding, (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) plus 1%, provided that, for the avoidance of doubt, the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on (or on any successor or substitute page of such page) at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day.  Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
plus
Reuters BBA Libor Rates Page 3750
 
 shall mean Pounds Sterling, euro or any other freely tradeable and convertible currency other than Dollars in which the Issuing Lender is willing to issue a Letter of Credit.
Alternative Currency
 
 means, for any day, with respect to the commitment fees payable hereunder, the applicable rate per annum set forth below, based upon the daily average Commitment Utilization Percentage during the most recent fiscal quarter of the Company:
Applicable Commitment Fee Rate
 
 
- 2 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 
For purposes of the foregoing, the Applicable Commitment Fee Rate shall be determined as of the end of each fiscal quarter of the Company.
 
 means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the Total Commitment represented by such Lenders Commitments; that if the Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Total Commitment most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments.
Applicable Percentage
provided
 
 means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to (i) with respect to any ABR Loan, 3.50% and (ii) with respect to any Eurocurrency Loan, 4.00%.
Applicable Rate
 
 means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
 
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 10.04), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of Exhibit A or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
 
 means, on any date, the sum of (i) an amount equal to (A) 50% of Cumulative Available EBITDA of the Company and its Subsidiaries (if such amount is positive) and (B) 100% of Cumulative Available EBITDA of the Company and its Subsidiaries (if such amount is negative), in each case for the period from January 1, 2009 until the last day of the then most recent fiscal quarter for which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) and (ii) the amount of any capital contributions made in cash to, or any proceeds of an equity issuance (other than proceeds of Disqualified Stock) received by, the Company from and including the Business Day immediately following the Effective Date through and including such date.
Available Amount
 
 means (a) the Bowling Assets, (b) the Headquarters and (c) Foreign Receivables, assets of Foreign Holdcos and assets of Loan Parties that are located outside the United States or Canada at foreign branches of such Loan Parties.
Available Collateral
 means, for any period, Consolidated EBITDA for such period minus the sum for such period, for the Company and its Subsidiaries (determined on a consolidated basis without duplication in accordance with GAAP), of the following: (a) Capital Expenditures paid in cash during such period (other than those financed with Indebtedness (other than Revolving Loans) or with the proceeds of sale and leaseback transactions), (b) income tax paid in cash net of refunds received during such period, (c) Consolidated Interest Expense for such period and (d) the total amount of cash restructuring charges added back pursuant to clause (b)(iv) of the definition of Consolidated EBITDA in determining Consolidated EBITDA for such period.
Available EBITDA
 
 
- 3 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means the lesser of (a) up to 60%, as determined by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, of the following amount: the Loan Parties Eligible Finished Goods Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first-out basis) or market value), any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto; and (b) the product of up to 85% multiplied by the Net Orderly Liquidation Value percentage identified in the most recent Inventory appraisal provided to the Administrative Agent in accordance with the terms hereof multiplied by the following amount: the Loan Parties Eligible Finished Goods Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first-out basis) or market value), any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto.
Available Finished Goods Inventory
minus
minus
 means the lesser of (a) up to 60%, as determined by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, of the following amount: the Loan Parties Eligible Raw Materials Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first-out basis) or market value) any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto; and (b) the product of up to 85% of the Net Orderly Liquidation Value percentage identified in the most recent Inventory appraisal provided to the Administrative Agent in accordance with the terms hereof multiplied by the following amount: the Loan Parties Eligible Raw Materials Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first-out basis) or market value), any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto.
Available Raw Materials Inventory
minus
minus
 means, at any time, the Total Commitment then in effect the Credit Exposure of all Lenders at such time; , that in calculating the Credit Exposure of all Lenders for the purpose of determining the Available Revolving Commitment pursuant to Section 2.12(a), the aggregate principal amount of Swingline Loans then outstanding shall be deemed to be zero.
Available Revolving Commitment
minus
provided
 
 means the lesser of (a) up to 60%, as determined by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, of the following amount: the Loan Parties Eligible WIP Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first out basis) or market value), any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto; and (b) the product of up to 85% of the Net Orderly Liquidation Value percentage identified in the most recent Inventory appraisal provided to the Administrative Agent in accordance with the terms hereof multiplied by the following amount: the Loan Parties Eligible WIP Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first-out basis) or market value), any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto.
Available WIP Inventory
minus
minus
 
 means, at any time, an amount in Dollars equal
Availability
to the sum of (a) (i) the lesser of (A) the Total Commitment and (B) the Borrowing Base
minus
(ii) the Credit Exposure of all Lenders, and (b) the aggregate amount of cash and Cash Equivalents of the Loan Parties maintained as of the date as of which such Borrowing Base was determined in accounts with the Administrative Agent or any Lender or any Affiliate thereof that in each case are subject to Deposit Account Control Agreements or Securities Account Control Agreements, other than any Collateral Deposit Account or Lock Box subject to a Lock Box Agreement.
 
 
- 4 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Commitment Termination Date and the date of termination of the Commitments.
Availability Period
 
 means Brunswick Acceptance Company, LLC, a joint venture company (a majority of the Equity Interests of which is owned on the Effective Date by General Electric  Commercial Finance or one of its Subsidiaries and the remainder thereof by the Company and/or any Subsidiary of the Company).  The BAC Joint Venture existing on the Effective Date may be replaced by a joint venture between the Company or one of its Subsidiaries and a financing party with the consent of the Required Lenders.  In such event, then  shall mean such replacement joint venture from and after its inception and the terms BAC Joint Venture Obligations and BAC LLC Agreement shall have correlative meanings in respect of the organizational documents and contractual obligations of such replacement joint venture.
BAC Joint Venture
BAC Joint Venture
 
 means any and all agreements, undertakings, arrangements and other Contractual Obligations of the Company and its Subsidiaries to make loans or advances, or guarantee the obligations of, or purchase or otherwise acquire any capital stock, obligations or other securities of, make any capital contribution to, or otherwise invest in, the BAC Joint Venture.
BAC Joint Venture Obligations
 
 means that certain Limited Liability Company Agreement, dated as of October 24, 2002, between Brunswick Financial Services Corporation and CDF Ventures, LLC, as amended through the date hereof.
BAC LLC Agreement
 
 means each and any of the following bank services provided prior to or after the date hereof to any Loan Party by any Lender or any of its Affiliates: (a) commercial credit cards, (b) stored value cards, (c) purchasing cards and cardless e-payables services and (d) treasury, depositary or cash management services (including, without limitation, controlled disbursement, automated clearinghouse transactions, return items, overdrafts, and interstate depository network services) or any similar transactions.
Banking Services
 
 of the Loan Parties means any and all obligations of the Loan Parties, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor) in connection with Banking Services.
Banking Services Obligations
 
 means the provisions of Title 11 of the United States Code, 11 U.S.C.  101 , as amended, or any similar federal or state law for the relief of debtors.
Bankruptcy Code
et
seq
 
 means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America (or any successor thereto).
Board
 
 means any of the Company and the Subsidiary Borrowers, as the context may require, and  means all of the foregoing.
Borrower
Borrowers
 
 
- 5 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means all unpaid principal of and accrued and unpaid interest on the Loans (or which would have accrued but for the commencement of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), all LC Exposure, all accrued and unpaid fees and all expenses, reimbursements, indemnities and other obligations of the Borrowers to any Secured Party or any indemnified party, whether direct or indirect, absolute or contingent, due or to become due, or now existing or hereafter incurred, which may arise under, out of, or in connection with, the Loan Documents, any Letter of Credit, any Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement or any other document made, delivered or given in connection with any of the foregoing, in each case whether on account of principal, interest, reimbursement obligations, fees, indemnities, costs, expenses or otherwise (including, without limitation, all fees and disbursements of counsel to the Secured Parties).
Borrower Obligations
 
 means (a) all Revolving Loans of the same Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurocurrency Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect, (b) a Swingline Loan and (c) a Protective Advance.
Borrowing
 
 means,
Borrowing Base
(i) prior to the Trigger Date, $250,000,000, and
(ii) on and after the Trigger Date, the sum of:
(a) up to 85% of the following amount: the Loan Parties Eligible Accounts at such time, the Dilution Reserve, any other Reserve applicable to Eligible Accounts,
minus
minus
plus
(b) the sum of (x) Available Finished Goods Inventory, (y) Available Raw Materials Inventory and (z) Available WIP Inventory,
plus
(c) the Equipment Component,
less
(d) without duplication of other Reserves included in the foregoing components of the Borrowing Base, Reserves established by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion.
The Administrative Agent may, in its Permitted Discretion and based on new information or a change in circumstances, adjust Reserves or reduce one or more of the other elements used in computing the Borrowing Base, with any such changes to be effective 3 Business Days after delivery of notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders.  The Borrowing Base at any time shall be determined by reference to the most recent Borrowing Base Certificate delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(f) or 4.01(r), as applicable.
 means a certificate, signed and certified as accurate and complete by a Financial Officer, in substantially the form of Exhibit F or another form which is acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion.
Borrowing Base Certificate
 
 
- 6 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means the items described on Schedule 5.01(g).
Borrowing Base Supplemental Documentation
 
 means a request by any Borrower for a Borrowing of Revolving Loans in accordance with Section 2.03.
Borrowing Request
 
 means all the retail bowling centers of the bowling retail business of the Company and its Subsidiaries that are owned by Leiserv, Inc. and its Subsidiaries.
Bowling Assets
 
 means the Companys business operations in the bowling and billiards industries.
Bowling & Billiards Division
 
 means any day (a) on which commercial banks are not authorized or required by law to close in New York City and/or (b) if such day relates to a borrowing of, a payment or prepayment of principal of or interest on, a continuation or conversion of or into, or the Interest Period for, a Eurocurrency Borrowing (or any notice with respect thereto), that is also a day on which dealings in deposits denominated in Dollars are carried out in the London interbank market.
Business Day
 
 means, for any period, with respect to any Person, the aggregate of all expenditures by such Person and its Subsidiaries for the acquisition or leasing (pursuant to a Capital Lease) of fixed or capital assets or additions to equipment (including replacements, capitalized repairs and improvements during such period) that should be capitalized under GAAP on a consolidated balance sheet of such Person and its Subsidiaries; , , that Capital Expenditures for the Company and the Subsidiaries shall not include:
Capital Expenditures
provided
however
 
(a)           expenditures to the extent they are made with proceeds of the issuance of Equity Interests of the ,
Company
 
(b)           expenditures with proceeds of insurance settlements, condemnation awards and other settlements in respect of lost, destroyed, damaged or condemned assets, equipment or other property; that such expenditure is not made during a Cash Dominion Period,
provided
 
(c)           interest capitalized during such period to the extent included in Consolidated Interest Expense,
 
(d)           expenditures that are accounted for as capital expenditures of such Person and that actually are paid for by a third party (excluding the or any Subsidiary thereof) and for which neither the nor any Subsidiary has provided or is required to provide or incur, directly or indirectly, any consideration or obligation to such third party or any other Person (whether before, during or after such period),
Company
Company
 
(e)           the book value of any asset owned by such Person prior to or during such period to the extent that such book value is included as a capital expenditure during such period as a result of such Person reusing or beginning to reuse such asset during such period without a corresponding expenditure actually having been made in such period,
 
 
- 7 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(f)            the purchase price of equipment purchased during such period to the extent the consideration therefor consists of any combination of (i) used or surplus equipment traded in at the time of such purchase and (ii) the proceeds of a concurrent sale of used or surplus equipment, in each case, in the ordinary course of business; that such purchase is not made during a Cash Dominion Period, and
provided
 
(g)           the consideration paid in respect of a Permitted Acquisition.
 
 means, as applied to any Person, any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, by that Person as lessee that, in conformity with GAAP, is, or is required to be, classified and accounted for as a capital lease on a balance sheet of such Person.
Capital Lease
 
 of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any Capital Lease, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
 
 means a period, at any time after the earlier of (i) the Trigger Date and (ii) January 31, 2009, commencing when Availability becomes less than the greater of (x) 25% of the Total Commitments and (y) $100,000,000 (or, prior to the Trigger Date, $50,000,000) for three consecutive Business Days; that the Cash Dominion Period shall be discontinued if Availability ceases to be less than the applicable level for sixty consecutive days; , however, that a Cash Dominion Period may be discontinued no more than twice in any period of twelve consecutive months.
Cash Dominion Period
provided
provided further
 
 means:
Cash Equivalents
 
(a)
 
  
direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America (or by any agency thereof to the extent such obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America), in each case maturing within 24 months from the date of acquisition thereof;
 
(b)
 
  
investments in commercial paper maturing within 270 days from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, the highest credit rating obtainable from S&P or from Moodys;
 
(c)
 
  
investments in certificates of deposit, bankers acceptances, time deposits and eurodollar time deposits maturing within 13 months from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank which has consolidated assets as determined in accordance with GAAP of not less than $10,000,000,000;
 
(d)
 
  
fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (c) above; and
 
 
- 8 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(e)
 
  
money market funds that (i) comply with the criteria set forth in SEC Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940, (ii) except with respect to the BlackRock Liquidity Funds TempCash Institutional Fund (TMCXX), are rated AA- or higher by S&P and Aa3 or higher by Moodys and (iii) have portfolio assets of at least $1,000,000,000.
 
 means (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of the Exchange Act and the rules of the SEC thereunder as in effect on the date hereof), of Equity Interests representing more than 30% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests of the Company; (b) with respect to a tender offer (for which a filing has been made with the SEC which purports to comply with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules of the SEC thereunder as in effect on the date hereof) made for Equity Interests of the Company, which tender offer has not been negotiated and approved by the board of directors of the Company, the earlier of (i) any Business Day during such tender offer when the Person or group making such tender offer owns, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, and/or has accepted for payment Equity Interests representing 25% or more of the aggregate voting power represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests of the Company and (ii) three Business Days before such tender offer is to terminate unless the tender offer is withdrawn first if the Person or group making such tender offer could own, by the terms of the tender offer plus any Equity Interests owned by such Person or group, Equity Interests representing 50% or more of the aggregate voting power representing by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests of the Company when such tender offer terminates; (c) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of the Company by Persons who were neither (i) nominated by the board of directors of the Company nor (ii) appointed by directors so nominated; (d) the acquisition of direct or indirect Control of the Company by any Person or group; (e) the Company shall cease to own, free and clear of all Liens or other encumbrances (other than Liens created pursuant to any Loan Document), 100% of the outstanding voting Equity Interests of the Borrowers (other than the Company) on a fully diluted basis (other than any directors qualifying shares of any Borrower); or (f) a Specified Change of Control.
Change in Control
 
 means (a) the adoption of any law, rule,  regulation, treaty, protocol, practice or concession after the date of this Agreement, (b) any change in any law, rule, regulation, practice or concession or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the date of this Agreement or (c) compliance by any Lender or any Issuing Lender (or, for purposes of Section 2.15(b), by any lending office of such Lender or such Issuing Lender or by such Lenders or such Issuing Lenders holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the date of this Agreement.
Change in Law
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are Revolving Loans, Swingline Loans or Protective Advances.
Class
 
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
 
 
- 9 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means, at any time, any and all property of any Loan Party, now existing or hereafter acquired, that at such time is subject to a security interest or Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (on behalf of the Secured Parties) pursuant to the Collateral Documents in order to secure the Secured Obligations.
Collateral
 
 means any landlord waiver or other agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, between the Administrative Agent and any third party (including any bailee, consignee, customs broker, or other similar Person) in possession of any Collateral or any landlord of any Loan Party for any real property where any Collateral is located, as such landlord waiver or other agreement may be amended, restated, or otherwise modified from time to time.
Collateral Access Agreement
 
 means, individually and collectively, each Security Agreement and each other document granting a Lien upon the Collateral as security for payment of the Secured Obligations.
Collateral Deposit Account
 means any Collateral Deposit Account referred to in the Security Agreement.
 
Collateral Document
 
 means, individually and collectively, each Collection Account referred to in the Security Agreement.
Collection Account
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit, Protective Advances and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum possible aggregate amount of such Lenders Credit Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.09(b) and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 10.04.  The amount of each Lenders Commitment as of the Effective Date is set forth on Schedule 1.01A. The aggregate amount of the Commitments is $400,000,000 as of the Effective Date.
Commitment
 
 means (a) May 5, 2012 (or, if such date is not a Business Day, on the immediately preceding Business Day), (b) with respect to any Lender for whom an alternative Commitment Termination Date appears beside its name on Schedule 1.01A, such specified date (or, if such date is not a Business Day, on the immediately preceding Business Day), or (c) in the case of either clause (a) or (b), any earlier date on which the Commitments are reduced to zero or otherwise terminated pursuant to the terms hereof.
Commitment Termination Date
 
 means, on any date, the percentage equivalent to a fraction (a) the numerator of which is the and (b) the denominator of which is the Total Commitment (or, on any day after termination of the Commitments, the Total Commitment in effect immediately preceding such termination).
Commitment Utilization Percentage
Credit Exposure of all Lenders
 
 means Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation.
Company
 
 
- 10 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means, for any Test Period, the sum, for the Company and its Subsidiaries (determined on a consolidated basis without duplication in accordance with GAAP), of the following: (a) Consolidated Net Income for such period (b) without duplication and to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income for such period, the sum of (i) interest expense for such period, (ii) income tax expense for such period, (iii) all amounts attributable to depreciation and amortization for such period, (iv) the amount of any cash restructuring charges to the extent deducted in determining Consolidated Net Income in an aggregate amount not exceeding (x) $70,000,000 through September 30, 2008 and (y) an additional $35,000,000 during the period commencing October 1, 2008 and ending December 31, 2009, (v) all non-cash charges to the extent deducted in determining Consolidated Net Income and (vi) any extraordinary losses or charges, and (c) without duplication and to the extent included in determining such Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (i) interest income derived from the investment of cash and Cash Equivalents, (ii) any extraordinary income or gains, (iii) income tax credits (to the extent not netted from income tax expense) and (iv) any non-cash gains for such period (d) any cash payments made during such period in respect of items added back in a prior period in determining Consolidated EBITDA pursuant to clause (b)(v) above subsequent to the fiscal quarter in which the relevant non-cash charges were reflected as a charge in the statement of Consolidated Net Income. For the purposes of calculating Consolidated EBITDA for any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters (each, a ) pursuant to any determination of the Leverage Ratio or the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio, (i) if during such Reference Period the Company or any Subsidiary shall have made a Material Acquisition, Consolidated EBITDA for such Reference Period shall be calculated after giving effect thereto as if such Material Acquisition occurred on the first day of such Reference Period and (ii) if during such Reference Period the Company or any Subsidiary shall have made a Material Disposition, the Consolidated EBITDA for such Reference Period shall be reduced by an amount equal to the Consolidated EBITDA (if positive) attributable to the property that is the subject of such Material Disposition for such Reference Period (as determined by the Company in its reasonable good faith business judgment) or increased by an amount equal to the Consolidated EBITDA (if negative) attributable thereto for such Reference Period. As used in this definition,  means any acquisition of property or series of related acquisitions of property that (I) constitutes assets comprising all or substantially all of an operating unit of a business or constitutes all or substantially all of the Equity Interests of a Person and (II) involves the payment of consideration by the Company and its Subsidiaries in excess of $10,000,000; and  means any Disposition of property or series of related Dispositions of property that yields gross proceeds to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in excess of $10,000,000, that a Disposition of property or series of related Dispositions of property that yields gross proceeds to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of less than $10,000,000 shall constitute a Material Disposition in the event that such Disposition or series of Dispositions is of property of a business that has been treated as a discontinued operation for accounting purposes; , , that a discontinued operation (other than a discontinued operation that has been sold) that constitutes a Material Disposition will not be given the effect described above for purposes of calculating Consolidated EBITDA pursuant to any determination of the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
minus
minus
Reference Period
pro
forma
Material Acquisition
Material Disposition
provided
provided
further
pro
forma
 
 means, for any Test Period, for the Company and its Subsidiaries (determined on a consolidated basis without duplication in accordance with GAAP), total interest expense (including the interest component of any payments in respect of Capital Lease Obligations) in respect of all outstanding Indebtedness accrued or capitalized during such period, in each case, to the extent paid in cash during such period (including all commissions, discounts and other fees and charges owed with respect to letters of credit and bankers acceptance financing and net costs under Swap Agreements entered into to hedge interest rates to the extent such net costs are allocable to such period in accordance with GAAP, but excluding (i) the upfront costs associated with refinancing the Existing 2011 Notes to the extent such payments constitute interest expense in accordance with GAAP, (ii) any gain or loss realized with respect to the termination in August 2008 of Swap Agreements that hedged interest rates on the potential issuance of Indebtedness and (iii) fees and expenses associated with the Commitments and Loans under this Agreement).
Consolidated Interest Expense
 
 
- 11 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means, for any period, the net income or loss of the Company and its Subsidiaries (determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP) for such period; that there shall be excluded (a) the income (or deficit) of any Person accrued prior to the date it becomes a Subsidiary of the Company or is merged into or consolidated with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (b) the income (or deficit) of any Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company) in which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has an ownership interest, except to the extent that any such income is actually received by the Company or such Subsidiary in the form of dividends or similar distributions, and (c) the undistributed earnings of any Subsidiary of the Company to the extent that the declaration or payment of dividends or similar distributions by such Subsidiary is not at the time permitted by the terms of any Contractual Obligation (other than under any Loan Document) or any organizational or governing documents, any law, treaty, rule or regulation or any determination of an arbitrator or a court or other Governmental Authority, in each case applicable to such Subsidiary.
Consolidated Net Income
provided
 
 means, as of any date, without duplication, the aggregate principal amount of all Indebtedness for Borrowed Money of the Company and its Subsidiaries at such date (determined on a consolidated basis without duplication in accordance with GAAP) (to the extent otherwise included in the calculation of Consolidated Total Indebtedness) Indebtedness in respect of the Existing 2011 Notes to the extent the Existing 2011 Notes shall have been defeased or discharged in accordance with the Existing Notes Indenture or otherwise cash collateralized on terms and conditions satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Consolidated Total Indebtedness
minus
 
 means, as to any Person, any provision of any security issued by such Person or of any agreement, instrument or other undertaking to which such Person is a party or by which it or any of its property is bound.
Contractual Obligation
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.09.
Contributing Party
 
 means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether by contract or otherwise.  and  have meanings correlative thereto.  Solely for purposes of the definition of Affiliate,  shall also mean the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to vote 10% or more of the securities having ordinary voting power for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of a Person.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
Control
 
 means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the outstanding principal amount of such Lenders Revolving Loans, LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure at such time an amount equal to its Applicable Percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Protective Advances outstanding at such time.
Credit Exposure
plus
 
 means, for any period, Available EBITDA for such period, taken as a single accounting period.  Cumulative Available EBITDA may be a positive or negative amount.
Cumulative Available EBITDA
 
 
- 12 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means inventory repurchase and recourse obligations, including any obligation of the Company or any Subsidiary to repurchase products of the Company and its Subsidiaries or to purchase or repurchase receivables created in connection with the sale of products or related services of the Company and its Subsidiaries under any customer finance program, in each case incurred in the ordinary course of business and as described in the Companys annual audited financial statements.
Customer Finance Program Obligations
 
 means any event or condition which constitutes an Event of Default or which upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
 
 means any Lender, as determined by the Administrative Agent, that has (a) failed to fund any portion of its Loans or participations in Letters of Credit, Swingline Loans or Protective Advances within three Business Days of the date required to be funded by it hereunder, (b) notified any Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank, the Swingline Lender or any Lender in writing that it does not intend to comply with any of its funding obligations under this Agreement or has made a public statement to the effect that it does not intend to comply with its funding obligations under this Agreement or under other agreements in which it commits to extend credit, (c) failed, within three Business Days after a request by the Administrative Agent, to confirm that it will comply with the terms of this Agreement relating to its obligations to fund prospective Loans and participations in then outstanding Letters of Credit, Swingline Loans and Protective Advances, (d) otherwise failed to pay over to the Administrative Agent or any other Lender any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder within three Business Days of the date when due, unless the subject of a good faith dispute, or (e) (i) become or is insolvent or has a parent company that has become or is insolvent or (ii) become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee or custodian appointed for it, or has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment or has a parent company that has become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee or custodian appointed for it, or has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment.
Defaulting Lender
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.19(b).
Departing Lender
 
 means, individually and collectively, each Deposit Account Control Agreement referred to in the Security Agreement.
Deposit Account Control Agreement
 
 means the Designation Letter entered into by the Company and a wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary of the Company pursuant to Section 2.21(b)(i) pursuant to which such Subsidiary shall (subject to the terms and conditions of Section 2.21) be designated as a Subsidiary Borrower, substantially in the form of Exhibit B or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Designation Letter
 
 means, without duplication, with respect to any period, the aggregate amount of all deductions, credit memos, returns, adjustments, allowances, bad debt write-offs and other non-cash credits which are recorded to reduce accounts receivable in a manner consistent with current and historical accounting practices of the Loan Parties.
Dilution Factors
 
 
- 13 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means, at any date, the amount (expressed as a percentage) equal to (a) the aggregate amount of the applicable Dilution Factors for the 12 most recently ended fiscal months by (b) total gross sales of the Loan Parties for the 12 most recently ended fiscal months.
Dilution Ratio
divided
 
 means, at any date, the applicable Dilution Ratio by the Eligible Accounts on such date; provided that at all times that the Dilution Ratio is less than 5.0%, the Dilution Reserve shall be zero.  The Dilution Reserve shall be the only Reserve with respect to the Dilution Factors.
Dilution Reserve
multiplied
 
 means any sale, lease, license, transfer, assignment or other disposition of all or any portion of the business, assets, rights, revenues or property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (including any Equity Interests owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries).
Disposition
 
 means, with respect to any Person, any Equity Interests of such Person which, by its terms, or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is putable or exchangeable, or upon the happening of any event, matures or is mandatorily redeemable (other than solely for Equity Interests that are not Disqualified Stock), other than as a result of a change of control or asset sale, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, or is redeemable at the option of the holder thereof (other than as a result of a change of control or asset sale to the extent the terms of such Equity Interests provide that such Equity Interests shall not be required to be repurchased or redeemed until the Commitment Termination Date has occurred or such repurchase or redemption is otherwise permitted by this Agreement (including as a result of a waiver hereunder)), in whole or in part, in each case prior to the date that is 91 days after the Commitment Termination Date hereunder; that if such Equity Interests are issued to any plan for the benefit of employees of the Company or its Subsidiaries or by any such plan to such employees, such Equity Interests shall not constitute Disqualified Stock solely because it may be required to be repurchased by the Company or its Subsidiaries in order to satisfy applicable statutory or regulatory obligations.
Disqualified Stock
provided
 
 means, individually and collectively, Bank of America, N.A., Suntrust Bank and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, in their capacity as Documentation Agents.
Documentation Agents
 
 means, on any Business Day with respect to any amount denominated in an Alternative Currency, the amount of Dollars that would be required to purchase such amount of such Alternative Currency based upon the spot selling rate at which JPMCB London offers to sell such Alternative Currency for Dollars in the London foreign exchange market at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such Business Day for delivery two Business Days later.
Dollar Equivalent
 
 or  refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
Dollars
$
 
 means any Subsidiary that is organized under the laws of any jurisdiction within the United States of America.
Domestic Subsidiary
 
 
- 14 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means the date on which the conditions specified in Section 4.01 are satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 10.02).
Effective Date
 
 means, at any time, the Accounts of any Loan Party, other than any Account:
Eligible Accounts
(a)           which is not subject to a first priority perfected security interest in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties);
(b)           which is subject to any Lien other than (i) a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) and (ii) a Permitted Encumbrance which does not have priority over the Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties);
(c)           (i) with respect to which the scheduled due date is more than 90 days after the original invoice date (other than (A) Accounts having extended payment terms which are reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent in an amount not to exceed $5,000,000 in the aggregate at any time outstanding, and (B) Accounts in respect of which the Account Debtor has provided a letter of credit reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent), (ii) which is unpaid more than 90 days after the date of the original invoice therefor (other than the Accounts described in the parenthetical in clause (i) above) or more than 60 days after the original due date (other than Accounts related to the Fitness Division (other than any such Account owed by the government of the United States, or any department, agency, public corporation, or instrumentality thereof) in an amount not to exceed $5,000,000 in the aggregate at any time outstanding which may remain unpaid for up to 120 days after the date of the original invoice therefor or up to 90 days after the original due date), or (iii) which has been written off the books of the applicable Loan Party or otherwise designated as uncollectible (in determining the aggregate amount from the same Account Debtor that is unpaid hereunder there shall be excluded the amount of any net credit balances relating to Accounts due from an Account Debtor which are unpaid more than 90 (or, to the extent provided above, 120) days from the date of invoice or more than 60 (or, to the extent provided above, 90) days from the due date);
(d)           which is owing by an Account Debtor for which more than 50% of the Accounts owing from such Account Debtor and its Affiliates are ineligible hereunder by reason of paragraph (c) above;
(e)           other than a Specified Account, which is owing by an Account Debtor to the extent the aggregate amount of Accounts owing from such Account Debtor and its Affiliates to all Loan Parties exceeds 10% of the aggregate amount of Eligible Accounts of all Loan Parties; that Specified Accounts will not qualify as Eligible Accounts pursuant to this paragraph (e) to the extent they exceed the greater of 20% of the aggregate amount of Eligible Accounts of all Loan Parties and $25,000,000;
provided
 
 
- 15 - -
Table of Contents
 
(f)           with respect to which any covenant, representation, or warranty contained in this Agreement or in any applicable Security Agreement has been breached or is not true, in each case in any material respect;
(g)           which (i) does not arise from the sale of goods or performance of services in the ordinary course of business, (ii) is not evidenced by an invoice or other documentation reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent which has been sent to the Account Debtor, (iii) represents a progress billing, (iv) is contingent upon any Loan Partys completion of any further performance, (v) represents a sale on a bill-and-hold, guaranteed sale, sale-and-return, sale on approval, consignment, cash-on-delivery or any other repurchase or return basis or (vi) relates to payments of interest or service or finance charges (it being understood that any asset subject to a progress billing or sold on a bill-and-hold or cash-on-delivery basis shall continue to be treated as Eligible Inventory, provided that it otherwise qualifies as such, notwithstanding that it may no longer be inventory for GAAP purposes);
 
(h)           for which the goods giving rise to such Account have not been shipped to the Account Debtor (it being understood that any such asset shall continue to be treated as Eligible Inventory, provided that it otherwise qualifies as such, notwithstanding that it may no longer be inventory for GAAP purposes) or for which the services giving rise to such Account have not been performed by the applicable Loan Party or which is otherwise recorded as deferred revenue or if such Account was invoiced more than once;
(i)           with respect to which any check or other instrument of payment has been, to the knowledge of a Financial Officer, returned uncollected for any reason;
(j)           which is owed by an Account Debtor which has (i) applied for or has been the subject of a petition or application for, suffered, or consented to the appointment of any receiver, custodian, trustee, administrator, liquidator or similar official for such Account Debtor of its assets, (ii) has had possession of all or a material part of its property taken by any receiver, custodian, trustee or liquidator, (iii) filed, or had filed against it, under any Insolvency Laws, any assignment, application, request or petition for liquidation, reorganization, compromise, arrangement, adjustment of debts, stay of proceedings, adjudication as bankrupt, winding-up, or voluntary or involuntary case or proceeding (other than post-petition Accounts entitled to administrative expense or equivalent priority under applicable Insolvency Laws), (iv) admitted in writing its inability, or is generally unable, to pay its debts as they become due, (v) become insolvent, or (vi) ceased operation of its business;
 
provided
that the Administrative Agent shall
 
include Accounts from such Account Debtors to the extent that such Accounts are fully
backed
by letters of credit
acceptable to the
Administrative Agent
in its Permitted Discretion;
(k)           which is owed by any Account Debtor which, to the knowledge of a Financial Officer, has sold all or substantially all of its assets;
 
 
- 16 - -
Table of Contents
 
(l)           which is owed by an Account Debtor which (i) does not maintain its chief executive office in the United States or Canada or (ii) is not organized under any applicable law of the United States, any state of the United States or the District of Columbia, Canada, or any province of Canada unless, in any such case, such Account is backed by a letter of credit acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
(m)           which is owed in any currency other than Dollars;
(n)           which is owed by (i) the government (or any department, agency, public corporation, or instrumentality thereof) of any country other than the United States unless such Account is backed by a letter of credit acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, or (ii) the government of the United States, or any department, agency, public corporation, or instrumentality thereof, unless the Federal Assignment of Claims Act of 1940, as amended (31 U.S.C.  3727 . and 41 U.S.C.  15 .), has been complied with; that the Administrative Agent may in its Permitted Discretion waive such compliance with respect to such Accounts in an aggregate amount of up to $5,000,000 at any time outstanding;
et
seq
et
seq
provided
(o)           which is owed by any Affiliate, employee, officer or director of any Loan Party;
(p)           which is owed by an Account Debtor or any Affiliate of such Account Debtor to which any Loan Party is indebted, but only to the extent of such indebtedness or is subject to any security, deposit, progress payment, unapplied cash, retainage or other similar advance made by or for the benefit of an Account Debtor, in each case to the extent thereof;
(q)           which is subject to any counterclaim, deduction, defense, setoff or dispute but only to the extent of any such counterclaim, deduction, defense, setoff or dispute;
(r)           which is evidenced by any promissory note, judgment, chattel paper, or instrument;
(t)           with respect to which the applicable Loan Party has made any agreement with the Account Debtor for any reduction thereof, other than discounts and adjustments given in the ordinary course of business, or any Account which was partially paid and the applicable Loan Party created a new receivable for the unpaid portion of such Account;
(u)           which does not comply in all material respects with the requirements of all applicable laws and regulations, whether federal, provincial, territorial, state or local, including without limitation the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, the Federal Truth in Lending Act and Regulation Z of the Board;
 
 
- 17 - -
Table of Contents
 
(v)           which is for goods that have been sold under a purchase order or pursuant to the terms of a contract or other agreement or understanding (written or oral) that indicates or purports that any Person other than a Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries has an ownership interest in such goods, or which indicates any party other than any of the Loan Parties as payee or remittance party;
(w)           which was created on cash on delivery terms;
(x)           which is governed by the laws of any jurisdiction other than the United States, any state thereof or the District of Columbia, Canada or any province of Canada;
provided
that the Administrative Agent shall
 
include
such
Accounts to the extent
that they
are fully
backed
by letters of credit
acceptable to the
Administrative Agent
in its Permitted Discretion;
(y)           which was acquired or originated by any Person acquired after the date hereof (until such time as diligence in respect of such Person and such Accounts satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion has been completed); that the Administrative Agent may in its Permitted Discretion include such Accounts in an aggregate amount of up to $5,000,000 prior to completion of such diligence;
provided
(z)           which is an Account to be sold pursuant to a definitive agreement or which is subject to a permitted receivables financing, unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
(aa)           which is owed by an Account Debtor in respect of which, to the knowledge of a Financial Officer, the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has received notice of proceedings or actions which are threatened or pending against such Account Debtor in respect of such Account which would reasonably be expected to result in any material adverse change in such Account Debtors financial condition; or
(bb)           which is an Account repurchased by the applicable Loan Party pursuant to the recourse provisions of any permitted receivables financing, unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion.
In determining the amount of an Eligible Account, the face amount of an Account may, in the Administrative Agents Permitted Discretion, be reduced by, without duplication, to the extent not reflected in such face amount, (i) the amount of all sales, advances or prepayments, accrued and actual discounts (including early pay discounts), claims, rebates, credits or credits pending, promotional program allowances, price adjustments, finance charges or other allowances (including any amount that any Loan Party may be obligated to rebate to an Account Debtor pursuant to the terms of any agreement or understanding (written or oral)) and (ii) the aggregate amount of all cash received in respect of such Account but not yet applied by such Loan Party to reduce the amount of such Account.  Standards of eligibility may be made more restrictive (and such increased restrictiveness subsequently reversed in whole or part) from time to time solely by the Administrative Agent in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion and based on new information or a change in circumstances, with any such changes to be effective 5 Business Days after delivery of notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders.
 
 
- 18 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means the equipment owned by a Loan Party and meeting each of the following requirements:
Eligible Equipment
 
(a)           such Loan Party has good title to such equipment;
 
(b)           such Loan Party has the right to subject such equipment to a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent; such equipment is subject to a first priority perfected Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent and is free and clear of all other Liens of any nature whatsoever (except for Permitted Encumbrances which do not have priority over the Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent);
 
(c)           the full purchase price for such equipment has been paid by such Loan Party;
 
(d)           such equipment is located on premises (i) owned by such Loan Party unless such premises are subject to a mortgage or other Lien in favor of any Person other than the Administrative Agent, or (ii) leased by such Loan Party where (x) the lessor has delivered to the Administrative Agent a Collateral Access Agreement or (y) a Reserve for rent, charges, and other amounts due or to become due with respect to such facility has been established by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
 
(e)           such equipment is in good working order and condition (ordinary wear and tear excepted) and is used or held for use by such Loan Party in the ordinary course of business of the Loan Party;
 
(f)           such equipment is not subject to any agreement which restricts the ability of such Loan Party to use, sell, transport or dispose of such equipment or which restricts the Administrative Agent's ability to take possession of, sell or otherwise dispose of such equipment;
 
(g)           such equipment does not constitute fixtures under the applicable laws of the jurisdiction in which such equipment is located; and
 
(h)           such equipment has been appraised to the satisfaction of the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion.
 
 means Eligible Inventory consisting of finished goods available for sale (as determined in a manner acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion and consistent with past practices).
Eligible Finished Goods Inventory
Eligible In-Transit Inventory
means, at any time, without duplication of other Eligible Inventory, Inventory:
           
(a)
for which title
remains with a
Loan Party;
 
 
- 19 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
           
(b)
which is fully
insured
in such amounts, with insurance companies and subject to such deductibles as are satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
 
           
(c)
which is in-transit in the United States (other than Inventory in-transit from Reynosa, Mexico that otherwise constitutes Eligible Inventory pursuant to the parenthetical in clause (g) of the definition of Eligible Inventory) between Loan Parties;
and
 
           
(
d
)
which otherwise would constitute Eligible Inventory.
 
 means, at any time, the Inventory of the Loan Parties, other than any Inventory:
Eligible Inventory
(a)           which is not subject to a first priority perfected Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties);
(b)           which is subject to any Lien other than (i) a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) and (ii) a Permitted Encumbrance which does not have priority over the Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of Secured Parties);
(c)           which, in the Administrative Agents Permitted Discretion, is determined to be slow moving, obsolete, unmerchantable, defective, used (including certified pre-owned), unfit for sale, not salable at prices approximating at least the cost of such Inventory in the ordinary course of business or unacceptable due to age, type, category and/or quantity;
(d)           with respect to which any covenant, representation, or warranty contained in this Agreement or the Security Agreement has been breached or is not true, in each case in any material respect, and which does not conform in all material respects to all standards imposed by any Governmental Authority;
(e)           in which any Person other than the applicable Loan Party shall (i) have any direct or indirect ownership, interest or title to such Inventory or (ii) be indicated on any purchase order or invoice with respect to such Inventory as having or purporting to have an interest therein;
(f)           which constitutes spare or replacement parts (other than those held for sale in the ordinary course of business), subassemblies (other than those which could be sold, or could be included in other Inventory for sale, in the ordinary course of business), packaging and shipping material, manufacturing supplies, samples, prototypes, displays or display items, goods that are returned or marked for return, repossessed goods, defective or damaged goods, goods held on consignment (other than those on consignment with customers and subject to a Collateral Access Agreement which is acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion), or goods which are not of a type held for sale in the ordinary course of business;
 
 
- 20 - -
Table of Contents
 
(g)           which is not located in the United States (other than Inventory located in Reynosa, Mexico with an aggregate gross value not in excess of $10,000,000 at any time outstanding; that such Inventory is relocated to within the United States no more than 120 days after the Effective Date) or is in transit with a common carrier from vendors and suppliers other than Eligible In-Transit Inventory;
provided
(h)           which is located in any location leased by such Borrower unless (i) the lessor has delivered to the Administrative Agent a Collateral Access Agreement, (ii) a Rent Reserve has been established by the Administrative Agent or (iii)
such Inventory is Eligible In-Transit Inventory
;
(i)           which is located in any third party warehouse or other storage facility or is in the possession of a bailee (other than a third party processor) and is not evidenced by a document (other than bills of lading to the extent permitted pursuant to clause (g) above), unless (i) such warehouseman or bailee has delivered to the Administrative Agent a Collateral Access Agreement and such other documentation as the Administrative Agent may require, (ii) a Rent Reserve has been established by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion or (iii) such Inventory is Eligible In-Transit Inventory;
(j)           which is being processed offsite at a third party location or outside processor, or is in-transit to or from said third party location or outside processor (other than Inventory permitted to be included pursuant to paragraph (g) above);
(k)           which is a discontinued product or component thereof unless the Administrative Agent has determined in its Permitted Discretion that such Inventory is Eligible Inventory;
(m)           which is perishable;
(n)           which contains or bears any intellectual property rights licensed to any Loan Party unless the Administrative Agent is satisfied in its Permitted Discretion that upon an Event of Default it may sell or otherwise dispose of such Inventory without (i) the consent of each applicable licensor, (ii) infringing the rights of such licensor, (iii) violating any contract with such licensor, or (iv) incurring any liability with respect to payment of royalties other than royalties incurred pursuant to sale of such Inventory under the current licensing agreement;
(o)           which is not reflected in a current perpetual inventory report of any Loan Party, or a similar report used to track Inventory on hand; or
(q)           which is designated to be returned to a vendor or which is damaged or off-quality or subject to warranty claims or not to customer specifications or which is remanufactured.
 
 
- 21 - -
Table of Contents
 
Standards of eligibility may be made more restrictive (and such increased restrictiveness subsequently reversed in whole or part) from time to time solely by the Administrative Agent in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion and based on new information or a change in circumstances, with any such changes to be effective 5 Business Days after delivery of notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders.
 
 means Eligible Inventory consisting of raw materials (as determined in a manner acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion and consistent with past practices).
Eligible Raw Materials Inventory
 means Eligible Inventory consisting of work-in-process related to the manufacturing of boats (as determined in a manner acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion and consistent with past practices).
Eligible WIP Inventory
 
 means all laws (including common law), rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, or to the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material.
Environmental Laws
 
 means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of the Company or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment, disposal, or arrangement for disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the indoor or outdoor environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
 
 means, at the time of any determination thereof, an amount equal to the lesser of (i) up to 60% of the Net Orderly Liquidation Value of the Loan Parties Eligible Equipment, minus the Equipment Indenture Reserve and any other Reserves related to the Eligible Equipment; and (ii) the Equipment Value Cap; that the Equipment Component shall equal $0 prior to the completion of appraisals, satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, of the Loan Parties Eligible Equipment.
Equipment Component
provided
 
 means, at any time, the amount by which (a) 60% of the Net Orderly Liquidation Value of the Eligible Equipment owned by the Company and Loan Parties that are Restricted Subsidiaries under the Existing Notes Indenture exceeds (b) the amount of the basket provided for in Section 5.05(b) of the Existing Notes Indenture, less the amount of other secured Indebtedness utilizing such basket.
Equipment Indenture Reserve
 
 means the Initial Value amortized ratably on a quarterly basis over a five-year period commencing upon the last day of the first full fiscal quarter completed after the determination thereof.
Equipment Value Cap
 
 
- 22 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest.
Equity Interests
 
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
 
 means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with any Borrower, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code, or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
 
 means (a) any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30 day notice period referred to in Section 4043(c) of ERISA is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any employee pension benefit plan (as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA) of a non-exempt prohibited transaction, as defined in Section 406 of ERISA and Section 4975(f)(3) of the Code; (c) any failure by any Plan to satisfy the minimum funding standard applicable to such Plan (as such term is defined in Section 412 or 430 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA), whether or not waived; (d) the filing pursuant to Section 412 of the Code or Section 303 of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan, the failure to make by its due date a required installment under Section 412(m) or Section 430(j)of the Code with respect to any Plan or the failure of any Loan Party or ERISA Affiliate to make any required contribution to any Multiemployer Plan; (e) the incurrence by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan (other than PBGC premiums due but not delinquent under Section 4007 of ERISA) including, without limitation, the imposition of any Lien in favor of the PBGC or any Plan; (f) the receipt by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a Plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan under Section 4042 of ERISA; (g) a determination that any Plan is in at risk status (within the meaning of Section 430 of the Code or Title IV of ERISA); (h) the incurrence by any Loan Party or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (i) the receipt by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA or in endangered or critical status within the meaning of Section 432 of the Code or Section 305 or Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
 
 means the single currency of Participating Member States of the European Union.
euro
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate.
Eurocurrency
 
 
- 23 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means, with respect to any Eurocurrency Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on (or on any successor or substitute page of such service, or any successor to or substitute for such service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to Dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for Dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period.  In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the  with respect to such Eurocurrency Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which Dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
Eurocurrency Rate
Reuters BBA Libor Rates Page 3750
Eurocurrency Rate
 
 has the meaning set forth in Article VII.
Event of Default
 
 means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time.
Exchange Act
 
 means,  referred to in the Security Agreement.
Excluded Property
Excluded Property
 
 means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Lender or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party hereunder or under any other Loan Document:
Excluded Taxes
 
(a) 
   
income or franchise taxes imposed on (or measured by) such recipients net income by the United States of America (or any political subdivision or state thereof) (each a ), or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender or any Issuing Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located;
U.S. Taxing Authority
 
(b) 
   
any branch profits taxes imposed by any U.S. Taxing Authority or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction described in clause (a) above;
 
(c) 
   
in the case of any Non-U.S. Lender, any U.S. federal withholding tax that is imposed on payments to such Lender to the extent such tax (i) is in effect and would apply as of the date such Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Company under Section 2.19(b)) becomes a party to this Agreement or (ii) relates to such payments that would be made to any new applicable lending office designated by such Lender and is in effect and would apply as of the time of such designation, except in the case of (i) and (ii), (x) to the extent that such Non-U.S. Lenders assignor (if any) was entitled, at the time of assignment (or designation of lending office) to receive additional amounts from the Loan Parties pursuant to Section 2.17, (y) to the extent such withholding tax is imposed as a result of a Change in Law, or (z) to the extent that such withholding tax shall have resulted from the making of any payment by any Loan Party to a location other than the office designated by the Administrative Agent or the relevant Lender for the receipt of payments of the applicable type from such Loan Party;
 
 
- 24 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(d) 
   
any United States federal withholding tax that is attributable to such Non-U.S. Lenders failure to comply with Section 2.17(f).
 
 has the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Existing Credit Agreement
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.06(l).
Existing Letters of Credit
 
 means the Companys outstanding notes issued under the Existing Notes Indenture.
Existing Notes
 
 means the Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987, between the Company and Continental Illinois National Bank and Trust Company of Chicago, as trustee.
Existing Notes Indenture
 
 means the Companys 5.0% Notes due June 1, 2011 issued under the Existing Notes Indenture.
Existing 2011 Notes
 
 means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
 
 means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of the Company.
Financial Officer
 
 means the Companys business operations in the physical fitness equipment industry.
Fitness Division
 
 means, the ratio, determined as of the end of any Test Period, of (a) Consolidated EBITDA Capital Expenditures paid in cash during such Test Period (other than those financed with Indebtedness (other than Revolving Loans) or with the proceeds of sale and leaseback transactions) during such Test Period income tax paid in cash net of refunds received during such Test Period, to (b) Fixed Charges, all calculated for the Company and its Subsidiaries for such Test Period on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
minus
minus
 
 means, with reference to any Test Period, without duplication, Consolidated Interest Expense, scheduled principal repayments of long-term Indebtedness for Borrowed Money of the Company and its Subsidiaries made during such period (including Capital Lease Obligation payments, but excluding repayments made to the Company or any Subsidiary), Restricted Payments paid in cash, dividends or other payments made in cash on account of preferred Equity Interests, cash contributions to any qualified defined benefit pension Plan in excess of the amount of such contributions that was expensed, all calculated for the Company and its Subsidiaries for such Test Period on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Fixed Charges
plus
plus
plus
plus
 
 
- 25 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means each of Brunswick International Ltd., Marine Power International Limited, Marine Power New Zealand Limited, Life Fitness International Sales Inc., Marine Power International Pty. Ltd., Brunswick Marine in EMEA, Inc. and each other Domestic Subsidiary the business of which consists substantially entirely in holding Equity Interests in Foreign Subsidiaries and/or conducting operations through foreign branches.
Foreign Holdco
 
 means a pledge or charge agreement with respect to each portion of the Collateral that constitutes Equity Interests of a Foreign Subsidiary, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Foreign Pledge Agreement
 
 means (a) each account receivable owned by any Foreign Subsidiary or any Foreign Holdco and (b) each account receivable owned by a Loan Party that is owed by a Person that is not organized under any applicable law of the United States, any state of the United States or the District of Columbia, Canada, or any province of Canada.
Foreign Receivables
 
 means any Subsidiary that is not a Domestic Subsidiary.
Foreign Subsidiary
 
 means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
 
 means the government of the United States of America, or of any other nation, or any political subdivision thereof, whether state, provisional, territorial or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
 
 of or by any Person (the ) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the ) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or other obligation; , that the term Guarantee shall not include (i) endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business, (ii) Customer Finance Program Obligations or (iii) the BAC Joint Venture Obligations.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.01.
Guaranteed Obligations
 
 
- 26 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means, at any time, collectively and individually, the Company and each Domestic Subsidiary that has executed this Agreement or has executed a Joinder Agreement and has not been released from the Loan Guaranty.
Guarantor
 
 means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates or fractions, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, urea-formaldehyde insulation, molds, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to, or that could give rise to liability under, any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
 
 means the real property located at 1 N. Field Court, Lake Forest, Illinois 60045.
Headquarters
 
 means, at any date, any Domestic Subsidiary of the Company (other than a Subsidiary Borrower) that, together with its consolidated Subsidiaries, provides less than 5% of the consolidated revenues of, or holds less than 5% of the consolidated assets of, the Company and its Domestic Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis determined in accordance with GAAP; that, the aggregate revenues or assets of all Immaterial Subsidiaries, determined in accordance with GAAP, may not exceed 10% of consolidated revenues or consolidated assets, respectively, of the Company and its consolidated Domestic Subsidiaries, collectively, at any time (and the Company will designate in writing to the Administrative Agent from time to time the Subsidiaries which will cease to be treated as Immaterial Subsidiaries in order to comply with the foregoing limitation).  Each computation of consolidated assets and revenues made in determining whether a Subsidiary is an Immaterial Subsidiary shall exclude all assets consisting of Equity Interests in Foreign Subsidiaries.
Immaterial Subsidiary
provided
 
 means, without duplication, with respect to any Person (including the Company and its Subsidiaries), (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than accounts payable arising in the ordinary course of business which, to the knowledge of a Financial Officer, are not more than 45 days past due or are being disputed in good faith) and other accrued expenses and deferred compensation incurred in the ordinary course of business, (c) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (d) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers acceptances, (e) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (f) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property (including accounts and contract rights) owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed (and in each case valued at the lesser of the amount of such Indebtedness and the fair market value of the assets subject to such Lien), (g) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (h) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit, letters of guaranty that support or secure Indebtedness, surety bonds or similar arrangements, (i) for purposes of Section 7(f) only, all obligations of such Person in respect of Swap Agreements and (j) any other Off-Balance Sheet Liability.  The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such Persons ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor.  The term Indebtedness shall not include Customer Finance Program Obligations.
Indebtedness
 
 
- 27 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means, on any date, the amount of debt of the Company and its Subsidiaries set forth on, or that would be required to be set forth on, the consolidated balance sheet of the Company as of such date in accordance with GAAP.
Indebtedness for Borrowed Money
 
 means Taxes (including Other Taxes) other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.03(b).
Indemnitee
 
 means senior, unsecured, long-term indebtedness for borrowed money of the Company that is not guaranteed by any other Person or subject to any other credit enhancement.
Index Debt
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.12.
Information
 
 means the value of the Loan Parties Eligible Equipment as determined by the appraisals of the Loan Parties Eligible Equipment described in the definition of Equipment Component; that the Initial Value shall not exceed $40,000,000.
Initial Value
provided
 
 means the Bankruptcy Code and any other applicable state, provincial, territorial or federal bankruptcy laws, each as now and hereafter in effect, any successors to such statutes and any other applicable insolvency or other similar law of any jurisdiction, including any law of any jurisdiction permitting a debtor to obtain a stay or a compromise of the claims of its creditors against it and including any rules and regulations pursuant thereto.
Insolvency Laws
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 3.05(b).
Intellectual Property
 
 means a request by any Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing of Revolving Loans in accordance with Section 2.08.
Interest Election Request
 
 means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan), each Quarterly Date, (b) with respect to any Eurocurrency Loan, the last day of each Interest Period therefor and, in the case of any Interest Period for a Eurocurrency Loan of more than three months duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at three-month intervals after the first day of such Interest Period, (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid and (d) with respect to any Loan, the Commitment Termination Date.
Interest Payment Date
 
 means for any Eurocurrency Loan or Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Loan or Borrowing and ending (i) fourteen days thereafter or (ii) on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six (or, with the consent of each Lender, nine or twelve) months thereafter, as specified in the applicable Borrowing Request or Interest Election Request; that (i) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless, in the case of a Eurocurrency Borrowing only, such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day, and (ii) any Interest Period pertaining to a Eurocurrency Borrowing that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period.  For purposes hereof, the date of a Loan initially shall be the date on which such Loan is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Loan, and the date of a Borrowing consisting of Loans that have been converted or continued shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Loans.
Interest Period
provided
 
 
- 28 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means, individually and collectively, Inventory, as referred to in the Security Agreement.
Inventory
 
 means a reserve calculated by the Company and satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion for repurchases of inventory to be made by Loan Parties.
Inventory Buyback Reserve
 
 shall mean reserves against Inventory equal to the sum of the following:
Inventory Reserves
 
(a)           a reserve for shrink, or discrepancies that arise pertaining to inventory quantities on hand between a Borrowers perpetual accounting system, and physical counts of the inventory which will be based on the applicable Loan Partys historical practice and experience and in an amount acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
 
(b)           a reserve determined by the Company in accordance with GAAP and satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion for Inventory that is discontinued, obsolete, slow-moving, unmerchantable, defective or unfit for sale;
 
(c)           a lower of the cost or market reserve for any differences between a Borrowers  actual cost to produce versus its selling price to third parties; and
 
(d)           any other reserve as deemed appropriate by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, from time to time.
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 6.06.
Investment
 
 means JPMCB, The Bank of New York, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association and each other Lender designated by the Company as an Issuing Lender hereunder that has agreed to such designation (and is reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent), each in its capacity as an issuer of one or more Letters of Credit hereunder, and its successors in such capacity as provided in Section 2.06(j), in each case so long as such Person shall remain an Issuing Lender hereunder.  Any Issuing Lender may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of such Issuing Lender, in which case the term Issuing Lender shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Lender
 
 
- 29 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 5.13.
Joinder Agreement
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., a national banking association, in its individual capacity, and its successors.
JPMCB
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.06(k).
LC Collateral Account
 
 means $150,000,000.
LC Commitment
 
 means a payment made by any Issuing Lender pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
 
 means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of any Borrower at such time; that, with respect to any component of any such amount in an Alternative Currency, such amount shall be the Dollar Equivalent thereof.  The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
provided
 
 means (a) on the Effective Date, the Persons listed on Schedule 1.01A hereto and (b) thereafter, any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term Lenders includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
 
 means any letter of credit issued or continued pursuant to this Agreement.
Letter of Credit
 
 means, as of the last day of any Test Period of the Company, the ratio of (a) Consolidated Total Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for such period.
Leverage Ratio
 
 means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
 
 means, collectively, this Agreement, any promissory notes issued pursuant to this Agreement, any Letters of Credit, any Designation Letters and the Collateral Documents.  Any reference in this Agreement or any other Loan Document to a Loan Document shall include all appendices, exhibits or schedules thereto, and all amendments, restatements, supplements or other modifications thereto, and shall refer to this Agreement or such Loan Document as the same may be in effect at any and all times such reference becomes operative.
Loan Documents
 
 
- 30 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means Article IX of this Agreement.
Loan Guaranty
 
 means, individually and collectively, the Company, the other Borrowers, the Companys Domestic Subsidiaries that are Guarantors and any other Person who becomes a party to this Agreement pursuant to a Joinder Agreement and their respective successors and assigns.
Loan Parties
 
 means the loans and advances made by the Lenders to the Borrowers pursuant to this Agreement, including Swingline Loans and Protective Advances.
Loans
 
 means any  referred to in the Security Agreement.
Lock Box
Lock Box
 
 means any  referred to in the Security Agreement.
Lock Box Agreement
Lock Box Agreement
 
 means margin stock within the meaning of Regulations T, U and X of the Board.
Margin Stock
 
 means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, condition, financial or otherwise, prospects or results of operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of any Loan Party to perform any of its obligations under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents to which it is a party, (c) the Collateral, the Administrative Agents Lien (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) on the Collateral or the priority of such Liens, or (d) the rights of or benefits available to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders or any Issuing Lender under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents.
Material Adverse Effect
 
 means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of the Company and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $35,000,000.  For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the  of the obligations of any Person in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that such Person would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
principal amount
 
 means a working capital facility designed to replace the existing receivables sale facility under the BAC Joint Venture and secured only by Mercury-Marine division receivables that are owed by Account Debtors that are organized under any applicable law of the United States, any state of the United States or the District of Columbia and related assets but no other assets.
Mercury Facility
 
 means (including by reference to the Levels described below), any period (a) commencing when Availability is less than:
Minimum Availability Period
 
 
 
- 31 - -
Table of Contents
 
for three consecutive Business Days (or immediately, in the case of Level 1) and (b) ending after Availability is greater than the amounts set forth above (with respect to the applicable Level) for 30 consecutive days.  For the avoidance of doubt, at any time that Availability is equal to or greater than the amounts set forth in Level 2 or Level 3 above, Availability shall also be deemed to be greater than the applicable Level(s) below such Level of Availability and each Minimum Availability Period Level shall include each lesser Level.
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 
 means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA which is contributed to by either the Company or an ERISA Affiliate.
Multiemployer Plan
 
 means, with respect to Inventory or equipment of any Person, the orderly liquidation value thereof as determined in a manner acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion by an appraiser acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, net of all costs of liquidation thereof.
Net Orderly Liquidation Value
 
 means, with respect to any event, (a) the cash proceeds and Cash Equivalents received in respect of such event including (i) any cash received in respect of any non-cash proceeds (including any cash payments received by way of deferred payment of principal pursuant to a note or installment receivable or purchase price adjustment receivable or otherwise, but excluding any interest payments), but only as and when received, (ii) in the case of a casualty, insurance proceeds and (iii) in the case of a condemnation or similar event, condemnation awards and similar payments, net of (b) the sum of (i) all reasonable fees and out-of-pocket expenses paid to third parties (other than Affiliates) in connection with such event, (ii) in the case of a sale, transfer or other disposition of an asset (including pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction or a casualty or a condemnation or similar proceeding), the amount of all payments required to be made as a result of such event to repay Indebtedness (other than Loans) secured by such asset (so long as such Lien is permitted hereunder) and (iii) the amount of all taxes paid (or reasonably estimated to be payable) and the amount of any reserves established to fund contingent liabilities reasonably estimated to be payable, in each case during the year that such event occurred or the next succeeding year and that are directly attributable to such event (as determined reasonably and in good faith by a Financial Officer).
Net Proceeds
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.02(d).
Non-Consenting Lender
 
 means, at any date, any Subsidiary of the Company (other than a Subsidiary Borrower) that, together with its consolidated Subsidiaries, provides less than 5% of the consolidated revenues of, or holds less than 5% of the consolidated assets of, the Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis determined in accordance with GAAP; that, the aggregate revenues or assets of all Non-Material Subsidiaries, determined in accordance with GAAP, may not exceed 10% of consolidated revenues or consolidated assets, respectively, of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries, collectively, at any time (and the Company will designate in writing to the Administrative Agent from time to time the Subsidiaries which will cease to be treated as Non-Material Subsidiaries in order to comply with the foregoing limitation).
Non-Material Subsidiary
provided
 
 
- 32 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means any Lender or Issuing Lender that is not a United States Person as defined in Section 7701 of the Code.
Non-U.S. Lender
 
 means, with respect to any amount of the Available Amount that is proposed to be applied to a particular use or transaction, that such amount has not previously been (and is not simultaneously being) applied to anything other than that such particular use or transaction.
Not Otherwise Applied
 
 of a Person means any indebtedness, liability or obligation under any so-called synthetic lease transaction entered into by such Person.
Off-Balance Sheet Liability
 
 means any and all present or future stamp, court or documentary Taxes or any other excise, property, intangible, recording, filing or similar Taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made under any Loan Document or from the execution, delivery, performance or enforcement or registration of, or from the receipt or perfection of a security interest under, or otherwise with respect to, any Loan Document.
Other Taxes
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.04(c).
Participant
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.04(c).
Participant Register
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.16.
Patriot Act
 
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
 
 means any acquisition by the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary, whether by purchase, merger or otherwise, of all or substantially all of the assets of, all of the Equity Interests of, or a business line or unit or a division of, any Person; that:
Permitted Acquisition
provided
 
(a)           such acquisition shall be consensual;
 
(b)           such acquisition shall be consummated in accordance with all Requirements of Law, except where the failure to so comply would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(c)           in the case of the acquisition of Equity Interests, all of the Equity Interests (except for any such securities in the nature of directors qualifying shares) acquired or otherwise issued by such Person (or, in the case of an acquisition of a group of companies, the parent company of such group) or any newly formed Subsidiary of any Borrower in connection with such acquisition shall be directly and beneficially owned 100% by the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary; and
 
(d)           in the case of any acquisition in excess of $25,000,000 (whether paid in cash, securities, the assumption of debt or otherwise), the Company shall furnish to the Administrative Agent at least five Business Days prior to such proposed acquisition a certificate from a Financial Officer evidencing compliance with Section 6.06(k), together with such detailed information relating thereto as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request to demonstrate such compliance; and
 
 
- 33 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
, that it is understood that to the extent the assets acquired are to be included in the Borrowing Base, due diligence in respect of such acquired assets satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, in its Permitted Discretion, shall have been completed prior to such inclusion.
provided
further
 
 means a determination made in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable (from the perspective of a secured asset-based lender) business judgment.
Permitted Discretion
 
 means:
Permitted Encumbrances
 
(a) 
   
Liens imposed by law for Taxes, assessments or governmental charges or levies on property that are not yet due and payable or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
 
(b) 
   
carriers, warehousemens, mechanics, materialmens, repairmens, servicemens and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that are not overdue by more than 60 days or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
 
(c) 
   
pledges and deposits (including letters of credit, surety bonds and other escrowed or trust holdings) made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers compensation laws, unemployment, general liability and other insurance, old age pensions and other social security or retirement benefits, or similar laws or regulations;
 
(d) 
   
Liens incurred over cash deposits and other investments to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(e) 
   
judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under clause (j) of Article VII;
 
(f) 
   
easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances or charges on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not materially detract from the value of the affected property or interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Company or any Subsidiary; and
 
(g) 
   
bankers liens and rights of setoff arising by operation of law and contractual rights of setoff or any contractual Liens or netting rights, in each case, in favor of the relevant depository institutions in connection with any cash management services provided to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business;
 
 
- 34 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
provided that the term Permitted Encumbrance shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
 
 means any acquisition that would be a Permitted Acquisition if each reference to Domestic Subsidiary in the definition of Permitted Acquisition were replaced with a reference to Foreign Subsidiary.
Permitted Foreign Acquisition
 
 means sale and leaseback transactions with respect to the property or assets of Foreign Subsidiaries and Foreign Holdcos outside the United States of America.
Permitted Foreign Sale and Leaseback Transactions
 
 means any of one or more receivables financing facilities, as amended, supplemented, modified, extended, renewed, restated, refunded, replaced or refinanced from time to time, the obligations of which are non-recourse (except for Permitted Foreign Securitization Standard Undertakings) to the Company or any Subsidiary (other than any Permitted Foreign Securitization Subsidiary), pursuant to which the Company or any Subsidiary sells accounts, payment intangibles and related assets or interests therein in each case in respect of Foreign Receivables to either (a) a Person that is not a Subsidiary or (b) a Permitted Foreign Securitization Subsidiary that in turn sells its accounts, payment intangibles and related assets to a Person that is not a Subsidiary.
Permitted Foreign Securitization
 
 means any obligation of the Company or any Subsidiary that is a seller of assets in a Permitted Foreign Securitization to repurchase the assets it sold thereunder as a result of a breach of a representation, warranty or covenant or otherwise, including as a result of a receivable or portion thereof becoming subject to any asserted defense, dispute, offset or counterclaim of any kind as a result of any action taken by, any failure to take action by or any other event relating to the seller.
Permitted Foreign Securitization Repurchase Obligation
 
 means representations, warranties, covenants and indemnities entered into by the Company or any Subsidiary that it has determined in good faith to be customary in financings similar to a Permitted Foreign Securitization, including, without limitation, those relating to the servicing of the assets of a Permitted Foreign Securitization Subsidiary, it being understood that any Permitted Foreign Securitization Repurchase Obligation shall be deemed to be a Permitted Foreign Securitization Standard Undertaking.
Permitted Foreign Securitization Standard Undertakings
 
 means any Subsidiary formed solely for the purpose of engaging, and that engages only, in one or more Permitted Foreign Securitizations.
Permitted Foreign Securitization Subsidiary
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 6.04.
Permitted Non-Cash Sales
 
 means sale and leaseback transactions with respect to the Available Collateral.
Permitted Other Sale and Leaseback Transactions
 
 means sale and leaseback transactions with respect to the Available Collateral, provided that all the proceeds of such transactions are applied immediately to redeem (or make subject to cash collateral or escrow arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent pending the redemption of) the Existing 2011 Notes and pay any premiums and any fees and expenses incurred in connection with such redemption.
Permitted Refinancing Sale and Leaseback Transactions
 
 
- 35 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
 
 means any employee pension benefit plan (as defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA), including any employee welfare benefit plan (as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA), any employee pension benefit plan (as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA), and any plan which is both an employee welfare benefit plan and an employee pension benefit plan, and in respect of which any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an employer as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA, except for any Multiemployer Plan.
Plan
 
 means the lawful money of the United Kingdom.
Pounds Sterling
 
 means:
Prepayment Event
 
(a) any sale, transfer or other disposition (including pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction) of any property or asset of any Loan Party, other than dispositions described in 6.04(a), (b), (c), (d), (e) (with respect to Permitted Refinancing Sale and Leaseback Transactions only), (f), (h), (j), (k), (l) or (m);
 
(b) any casualty or other insured damage to, or any taking under power of eminent domain or by condemnation or similar proceeding of, any property or asset of any Loan Party with a fair value immediately prior to such event equal to or greater than $10,000,000; or
 
(c) the incurrence by any Loan Party of any Indebtedness, other than Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01A.
 
 means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMCB as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
 
 means, with respect to any test hereunder in connection with any event, that such test shall be calculated after giving effect on a basis for the period of such calculation to (i) such event as if it happened on the first day of such period or (ii) the incurrence of any Indebtedness by the Company or any Subsidiary and any incurrence, repayment, issuance or redemption of other Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary occurring at any time subsequent to the last day of the Test Period and on or prior to the date of determination, as if such incurrence, repayment, issuance or redemption, as the case may be, occurred on the first day of the Test Period (it being understood that, in connection with any such calculation prior to the delivery of financial statements for the first fiscal quarter ended after the Effective Date, such calculation shall be made in a manner satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion).
Pro Forma Basis
pro
forma
pro
forma
 
 
- 36 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 5.01(e).
Projections
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.04.
Protective Advance
 
 means the last Business Day of March, June, September and December in each year, the first of which shall be the first such day after the date hereof.
Quarterly Dates
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 10.04(b).
Register
 
 means, with respect to any specified Person, such Persons Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Persons Affiliates.
Related Parties
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(b)(ii).
Relevant Jurisdiction
 
 means with respect to any store, docking facility, bowling facility, warehouse distribution center, regional distribution center or depot where any Inventory subject to Liens arising by operation of law is located and with respect to which no Collateral Access Agreement is in effect, a reserve equal to three months rent at such store, warehouse, cross-docking facility, distribution center, regional distribution center or depot.
Rent Reserve
 
 means reports prepared by the Administrative Agent or another Person showing the results of appraisals, field examinations or audits pertaining to the assets of any Loan Party from information furnished by or on behalf of any Loan Party, after the Administrative Agent has exercised its rights of inspection pursuant to this Agreement, which Reports shall be distributed to the Lenders by the Administrative Agent.
Report
 
 means, at any time, Lenders having Commitments representing more than 50% of the Total Commitment at such time; that, for purposes of declaring the Loans to be due and payable pursuant to Article VII, and for all purposes after the Loans become due and payable pursuant to Article VII or the Commitments expire or terminate,  means, Lenders having Credit Exposures representing more than 50% of the total Credit Exposures at such time.
Required Lenders
provided
Required Lenders
 
 means, as to any Person, the Certificate of Incorporation and By Laws or other organizational or governing documents of such Person, and any law, treaty, rule or regulation or determination of an arbitrator or a court or other Governmental Authority, in each case applicable to or binding upon such Person or any of its property or to which such Person or any of its property is subject.
Requirement of Law
 
 means Rent Reserves, Inventory Buyback Reserves and any other reserves which the Administrative Agent deems necessary, in its Permitted Discretion, to maintain (including, without limitation, reserves for accrued and unpaid interest on the Secured Obligations, reserves for consignee's, warehousemens and bailees charges) with respect to the Collateral or any Loan Party.
Reserves
 
 means any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in the Company or any Subsidiary, or any payment (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any such Equity Interests in the Company, or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests in the Company; , , that any payments or issuances pursuant to Section 6.05(g) or (h) or the 2005 Elective Deferred Incentive Compensation Plan shall not constitute Restricted Payments.
Restricted Payment
whether now or hereafter outstanding,
provided
however
 
 
- 37 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans constituting such Borrowing, are made pursuant to Section 2.01.
Revolving
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
 
 means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, together with any successor agency responsible for the administration and enforcement of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended from time to time, and the Exchange Act.
SEC
 
 means the Borrower Obligations and the Guaranteed Obligations.
Secured Obligations
 
 means any of the Agents, the Lenders (and, in the case of any Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement, Affiliates of Lenders) and the Issuing Lenders, as well as any other holder of a Secured Obligation.
Secured Party
 
means, individually and collectively, each "Securities Account Control Agreement" referred to in the Security Agreement.
Securities Account Control Agreement
 
 means that certain Pledge and Security Agreement, dated as of the date hereof, between the Loan Parties party thereto and the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, and any other pledge or security agreement entered into, after the date of this Agreement by any other Loan Party (as required by this Agreement or any other Loan Document for the purpose of creating a Lien on the property of any Loan Party), or any other Person, as the same may be amended, restated or otherwise modified from time to time.
Security Agreement
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(d).
Settlement
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(d).
Settlement Date
 
 means Accounts owing by Account Debtors identified to and approved by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion and which are not unpaid more than 35 days after the date of the original invoice therefor.
Specified Accounts
 
 means a Change of Control (or other defined term having a similar purpose) as defined in the Existing Notes or in any document governing any refinancing thereof.
Specified Change of Control
 
 means a Swap Agreement or agreement with respect to Banking Services with respect to which at or prior to the time that such Swap Agreement is executed or such Banking Services are engaged, each of the Company and the Lender party thereto or its Affiliate (other than JPMCB or any of its Affiliates) shall have delivered a written notice to the Administrative Agent that such transaction has been or will be entered into and that the resulting Swap Obligation or Banking Services Obligation constitutes a Borrower Obligation entitled to the benefits of the Collateral Documents (it being understood that the Company may provide the Administrative Agent with a general, rather than transaction specific, notice to that effect); provided, however, that with respect to Banking Services or Swap Agreements in existence as of the Effective Date, such written notice may be delivered by the Company and the Lender party thereto or its Affiliate within 30 days of the Effective Date.
Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement
 
 
- 38 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means, for the Interest Period for any Eurocurrency Borrowing, a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one the arithmetic mean, taken over each day in such Interest Period, of the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as Eurocurrency Liabilities in Regulation D of the Board).  Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D.  Eurocurrency Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation.  The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
minus
 
 of any Person means any Indebtedness of such Person the payment of which is subordinated to payment of the Secured Obligations to the written satisfaction of the Administrative Agent.
Subordinated Indebtedness
 
 means, with respect to any Person (the ) at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parents consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity of which securities or other ownership interests representing more than 50% of the equity or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held.  Unless otherwise specified, Subsidiary means a Subsidiary of the Company.
Subsidiary
parent
 
 means (a) each wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary of the Company that is listed under the caption Subsidiary Borrowers on the signature pages hereof and (b) each other wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary of the Company that shall become a Subsidiary Borrower pursuant to Section 2.21, in each case so long as such Subsidiary shall remain a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder. 
Subsidiary Borrower
 
 means, at any time, Lenders having Credit Exposure and unused Commitments representing at least 66 2/3% of the sum of the total Credit Exposure and unused Commitments at such time.
Supermajority Lenders
 
 means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Company or the Subsidiaries shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
 
 
- 39 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 of a Person means any and all obligations of such Person, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor), under (a) any and all Swap Agreements, and (b) any and all cancellations, buy backs, reversals, terminations or assignments of any Swap Agreement transaction.
Swap Obligations
 
 means, at any time, the aggregate principal amount of all Swingline Loans outstanding at such time.  The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Exposure
 
 means JPMCB, in its capacity as the lender of Swingline Loans hereunder, and its successors and assigns in such capacity.
Swingline Lender
 
 means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.05.
Swingline Loan
 
 means, individually and collectively, JPMCB and The Royal Bank of Scotland PLC, in their capacity as Syndication Agents.
Syndication Agents
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 3.04(b).
2007 10-K
 
 means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions or withholdings, assessments, fees or other charges imposed by any Governmental Authority including any interest, additions to tax or penalties applicable thereto.
Taxes
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(c).
Termination Letter
 
 means the most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company ended on or prior to such time (taken as one accounting period) in respect of which financial statements for each quarter or fiscal year in such period have been (or were required to be) delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b), as applicable.
Test Period
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 3.04(b).
3Q-2008 10-Q
 
 means, at any date, the amount that would, in conformity with GAAP, be set forth opposite the caption total assets (or any like caption) on a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and the Subsidiaries.
Total Assets
 
 means, at any time, the aggregate amount of the Commitments as in effect at such time.
Total Commitment
 
 means the execution, delivery and performance by the Company, each Subsidiary Borrower and each other Loan Party of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, the creation of the Liens in the Collateral in favor of the Administrative Agent, the borrowing of Loans and other credit extensions, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder.
Transactions
 
 
- 40 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 means the date that the Administrative Agent shall have received and be satisfied in its Permitted Discretion with the Inventory appraisals, field exams and third party confirmatory collateral diligence reports in respect of Inventory specified by the Administrative Agent prior to the Effective Date and performed by the appraisers specified by the Administrative Agent prior to the Effective Date, which date is December 19, 2007.
Trigger Date
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
 
 means, at any time, any Secured Obligations (or portion thereof) that are contingent in nature or unliquidated at such time, including any Secured Obligation that is: (i) an obligation to reimburse a bank for drawings not yet made under a letter of credit issued by it; (ii) any other obligation (including any Guarantee) that is contingent in nature at such time; or (iii) an obligation to provide collateral to secure any of the foregoing types of obligations.
Unliquidated Obligations
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.17(f).
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
 
 means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
 
SECTION 1.02 
   
.  For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Class (e.g., a Revolving Loan), by Type (e.g., a Eurocurrency Loan) or by Class and Type (e.g., a Eurocurrency Revolving Loan).  Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Class (e.g., a Revolving Borrowing or Borrowing of Revolving Loans), by Type (e.g., a Eurocurrency Borrowing) or by Class and Type (e.g., a Eurocurrency Revolving Borrowing or a Eurocurrency Borrowing of Revolving Loans).
Classification of Loans and Borrowings
 
SECTION 1.03 
   
.  The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined.  Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms.  The words include, includes and including shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase without limitation.  The word will shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word shall.  Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Persons successors and assigns, (c) the words herein, hereof and hereunder, and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words asset and property shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.  References to the date hereof and similar locations shall mean the date of the amendment and restatement hereof.
Terms Generally
 
 
- 41 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 1.04 
   
.  Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time;  provided that, if the Company notifies the Administrative Agent that the Company requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or any change in the application of GAAP on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Company that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith.  In the event that historical accounting practices, systems or reserves relating to the components of the Borrowing Base are modified in a manner that is adverse to the Lenders in any material respect, the Borrowers will give the Administrative Agent prompt written notice thereof.  To enable the ready and consistent determination of compliance with the covenants set forth in Article VI, the Company will not change its fiscal year from a fiscal year consisting of four fiscal quarters ending on December 31, each fiscal quarter of which is comprised of three fiscal months consisting of a first fiscal month of four calendar weeks, a second fiscal month of four calendar weeks and a third fiscal month of five calendar weeks.
Accounting Terms; GAAP; Fiscal Year
 
 
SECTION 2.01 
   
.
The Commitments
 
(a) 
   
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender agrees to make Revolving Loans in Dollars to the Company and the Subsidiary Borrowers from time to time during the Availability Period if after giving effect thereto:
 
(i) 
   
such Lenders Credit Exposure would not exceed such Lenders Commitment; and
 
(ii) 
   
the total Credit Exposures would not exceed the lesser of (x) the Total Commitment and (y) the Borrowing Base.
 
(b) 
   
Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow its Revolving Loans.
 
 
- 42 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 2.02 
   
.
Loans and Borrowings
 
(a) 
   
.  Each Revolving Loan to the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower shall be made as part of a Borrowing comprised of Loans of the same Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments.  Each Protective Advance and Swingline Loan shall be made in accordance with Sections 2.04 and 2.05, respectively.  The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder;   that the Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lenders failure to make Loans as required.
Obligations of Lenders
provided
 
(b) 
   
.  Subject to Section 2.14 each Revolving Borrowing by the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in Dollars as the relevant Borrower may request in accordance herewith.  Each Swingline Loan shall be an ABR Loan.  Each ABR Loan (whether a Revolving Loan or a Swingline Loan) shall be denominated in Dollars.
Type of Loans
 
Each Lender at its option may make any Eurocurrency Loan by causing any U.S. or non-U.S. branch or any Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the relevant Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
 
(c) 
   
.  Each Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount of $5,000,000 or a larger multiple of $1,000,000.  Each Revolving ABR Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount equal to $2,500,000 or a larger multiple of $500,000; that an ABR Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the Total Commitment or that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.06(f).  Each Swingline Loan shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $250,000 and not less than $250,000.  Borrowings of more than one Class and Type may be outstanding at the same time;   that there shall not at any time be more than a total of ten Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowings outstanding.
Minimum Amounts; Limitation on Number of Borrowings
provided
provided
 
(d) 
   
.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, neither the Company nor any other Borrower shall be entitled to request (or to elect to convert to or continue as a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing) any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested therefor would end after the Commitment Termination Date.
Limitations on Interest Periods
 
SECTION 2.03 
   
.
Requests for Revolving Borrowings
 
(a) 
   
.  To request a Revolving Borrowing, the Company (on behalf of itself or the relevant Borrower) or the relevant Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone:
Borrowing Requests
 
(i) 
   
in the case of a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing by the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing; or
 
 
- 43 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(ii) 
   
in the case of an ABR Borrowing by the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing.
 
cable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile  to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Company (on behalf of itself or the relevant Borrower) or the relevant Borrower.
Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevo
 
(b) 
   
.  Each telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Sections 2.01 and 2.02:
Content of Borrowing Requests
 
(i) 
   
the name of the relevant Borrower;
 
(ii) 
   
the aggregate amount of the requested Borrowing;
 
(iii)
   
the date of such Borrowing (which shall be a Business Day);
 
(iv)
   
whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurocurrency Borrowing;
 
(v) 
   
in the case of a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing, the initial Interest Period therefor, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period and permitted under Section 2.02(d); and
 
(vi)
 
  
the location and number of the relevant Borrowers account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of Section 2.07.
 
(c) 
   
. Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request for a Borrowing by the Company or a Subsidiary Borrower in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lenders Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
Notice by Administrative Agent; Determination of Lender Ratable Shares
 
(d) 
   
.  With respect to any Borrowing Request in respect of a Revolving Borrowing by the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower:
Failure to Elect
 
(A)
 
if no election as to the Type of such Revolving Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing; and
 
(B) 
   
if no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing,  the applicable Borrower shall be deemed to have requested an ABR Borrowing.
 
SECTION 2.04 
   
.  (a) Subject to the limitations set forth below, the Administrative Agent is authorized by the Borrowers and the Lenders, from time to time in the Administrative Agents sole discretion (but shall have absolutely no obligation), to make Loans to the Company, on behalf of all Lenders, which the Administrative Agent, in its Permitted Discretion, deems necessary or desirable (i) to preserve or protect the Collateral, or any portion thereof, (ii) to enhance the likelihood of, or maximize the amount of, repayment of the Loans and other Borrower Obligations, or (iii) to pay any other amount chargeable to or required to be paid by any of the Borrowers pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, including payments of reimbursable expenses (including costs, fees, and expenses as described in Section 10.03) and other sums payable under the Loan Documents (any of such Loans are herein referred to as Protective Advances); that, the aggregate amount of Protective Advances outstanding at any time shall not (x) at any time exceed $20,000,000 or (y) when added to the total Credit Exposure, exceed the Total Commitment.  Protective Advances may be made even if the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have not been satisfied.  The Protective Advances shall be secured by the Liens in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) in and to the Collateral and shall constitute Borrower Obligations hereunder.  All Protective Advances shall be ABR Borrowings.  The Administrative Agents authorization to make Protective Advances may be revoked at any time by the Required Lenders.  Any such revocation must be in writing and shall become effective prospectively upon the Administrative Agents receipt thereof.  At any time that the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have been satisfied, the Administrative Agent may request the Revolving Lenders to make a Revolving Loan to repay a Protective Advance.  At any other time the Administrative Agent may require the Lenders to fund their risk participations described in Section 2.04(b).
Protective Advances
   
provided
 
 
- 44 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(b) 
   
Upon the making of a Protective Advance by the Administrative Agent(whether before or after the occurrence of a Default), each Lender shall be deemed, without further action by any party hereto, to have unconditionally and irrevocably purchased from the Administrative Agent without recourse or warranty, an undivided interest and participation in such Protective Advance in proportion to its Applicable Percentage.  From and after the date, if any, on which any Lender is required to fund its participation in any Protective Advance purchased hereunder, the Administrative Agent shall promptly distribute to such Lender, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of all payments of principal and interest and all proceeds of Collateral received by the Administrative Agent in respect of such Protective Advance.
 
 
SECTION 2.05 
   
.
Swingline Loans
 
(a)           Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Swingline Lender agrees to make Swingline Loans in Dollars to any Borrower from time to time during the Availability Period if, after giving effect thereto:
 
(i)
 
the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Swingline Loans would not exceed $25,000,000; and
 
(ii)
 
the sum of the total Credit Exposures would not exceed the lesser of (x) the Total Commitment and (y) the Borrowing Base;
 
provided that the Swingline Lender shall not be required to make a Swingline Loan to refinance an outstanding Swingline Loan.  Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrowers may borrow, prepay and reborrow Swingline Loans.
 
 
- 45 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(b) 
   
To request a Swingline Loan, the Company (on behalf of itself or, if applicable, the relevant Borrower) or the relevant Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (confirmed by facsimile), not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the day of a proposed Swingline Loan.  Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify:
 
(i) 
   
the name of the relevant Borrower;
 
(ii) 
   
the date of the requested Swingline Loan (which shall be a Business Day);
 
(iii)
   
the amount of such Swingline Loan; and
 
(iv)
   
the location and number of such Borrowers account to which funds are to be disbursed. The Administrative Agent will promptly advise the Swingline Lender of any such notice received from the Company or the relevant Borrower.  The Swingline Lender shall make each Swingline Loan available to the relevant Borrower in accordance with such request (or, in the case of a Swingline Loan made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.06(f), by remittance to the relevant Issuing Lender) by 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on the requested date of such Swingline Loan.
 
(c) 
   
The Swingline Lender may by written notice given to the Administrative Agent not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on any Business Day require the Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of the Swingline Loans outstanding.  Such notice shall specify the aggregate amount of Swingline Loans in which Lenders will participate.  Promptly upon receipt of such notice, the Administrative Agent will give notice thereof to each Lender, specifying in such notice such Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans.  Each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans.  Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Swingline Loans pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.  Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Swingline Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders.  The Administrative Agent shall notify the Company of any participations in any Swingline Loan acquired pursuant to this paragraph, and thereafter payments in respect of such Swingline Loan shall be made to the Administrative Agent and not to the Swingline Lender.  Any amounts received by the Swingline Lender from the relevant Borrower (or other party on behalf of such Borrower) in respect of a Swingline Loan after receipt by the Swingline Lender of the proceeds of a sale of participations therein shall be promptly remitted to the Administrative Agent; any such amounts received by the Administrative Agent shall be promptly remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Lenders that shall have made their payments pursuant to this paragraph and to the Swingline Lender, as their interests may appear; that any such payment so remitted shall be repaid to the Swingline Lender or to the Administrative Agent, as applicable, if and to the extent such payment is required to be refunded to the relevant Borrower for any reason.  The purchase of participations in a Swingline Loan pursuant to this paragraph shall not relieve the relevant Borrower of any default in the payment thereof.
mutatis mutandis
provided
 
 
- 46 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(d) 
   
The Administrative Agent, on behalf of the Swingline Lender, shall request settlement (a ) with the Lenders on at least a weekly basis or on any earlier date that the Administrative Agent elects, by notifying the Lenders of such requested Settlement by facsimile, telephone, or e-mail no later than 12:00 noon New York City time on the date of such requested Settlement (the ).  Each Lender (other than the Swingline Lender, in the case of the Swingline Loans) shall transfer the amount of such Lenders Applicable Percentage of the outstanding principal amount of the applicable Loan with respect to which Settlement is requested to the Administrative Agent, to such account of the Administrative Agent as the Administrative Agent may designate, not later than 2:00 p.m., New York City time, on such Settlement Date.  Settlements may occur during the existence of a Default and whether or not the applicable conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have then been satisfied.  Such amounts transferred to the Administrative Agent shall be applied against the amounts of the Swingline Lenders Swingline Loans and, together with Swingline Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan, shall constitute Revolving Loans of such Lenders, respectively.  If any such amount is not transferred to the Administrative Agent by any Lender on such Settlement Date, the Swingline Lender shall be entitled to recover such amount on demand from such Lender together with interest thereon as specified in Section 2.07.
Settlement
Settlement Date
 
SECTION 2.06 
   
.
Letters of Credit
 
(a) 
   
.  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, in addition to the Loans provided for herein, from time to time during the Availability Period, a Borrower may request any Issuing Lender to issue Letters of Credit denominated in Dollars or an Alternative Currency for the account of such Borrower.  Each Letter of Credit shall be in such form as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the relevant Issuing Lender in its reasonable determination.  Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including the Dollar Equivalent of Letters of Credit denominated in any Alternative Currency, shall constitute utilization of the Commitments.
General
 
(b) 
   
.  To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), a Borrower shall deliver by hand or facsimile (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the relevant Issuing Lender of such Letter of Credit) to such Issuing Lender and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (d) of this Section), the amount and currency of such Letter of Credit, the name of the account party (which shall be a Borrower or a Subsidiary and a Borrower as co-applicants), the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit.  If requested by such Issuing Lender, such Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on such Issuing Lenders standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit.  In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by a Borrower to, or entered into by a Borrower with, any Issuing Lender relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal or Extension
 
 
- 47 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(c) 
   
.  A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the relevant Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the aggregate LC Exposure shall not exceed the LC Commitment, (ii) if denominated in any Alternative Currency, the aggregate LC Exposure in any Alternative Currency shall not exceed the Dollar Equivalent of $15,000,000, and (iii) the sum of the total Credit Exposures would not exceed the lesser of (x) the Borrowing Base and (y) the Total Commitment.
Limitations on Amounts
 
(d) 
   
.  No Letter of Credit shall have a stated expiry date that is later than the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date twelve months after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, twelve months after the then-current expiration date of such Letter of Credit, so long as such renewal or extension occurs within three months of such then-current expiration date) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Commitment Termination Date.
Expiration Date
 
(e) 
   
.  By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) by the Issuing Lender, and without any further action on the part of the Issuing Lender of such Letter of Credit or the Lenders, the Issuing Lender hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from such Issuing Lender a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lenders Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit.  Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations
 
In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each relevant Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees, upon receipt of a notice as provided for in the final paragraph of Section 2.06(f), to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the relevant Issuing Lender of each Letter of Credit such Lenders Applicable Percentage of the amount of each LC Disbursement, or the Dollar Equivalent of the amount of each LC Disbursement made in an Alternative Currency, made by such Issuing Lender promptly upon the request of such Issuing Lender at any time from the time of such LC Disbursement until such LC Disbursement is reimbursed by the relevant Borrower or at any time after any reimbursement payment is required to be refunded to such Borrower for any reason.  Such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.  Each such payment shall be made in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the relevant Issuing Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders.  Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the relevant Borrower pursuant to the next following paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to such Issuing Lender or, to the extent that the Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse such Issuing Lender, then to such Lenders and such Issuing Lender as their interests may appear.  Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse an Issuing Lender for any LC Disbursement shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the relevant Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
mutatis mutandis
 
 
- 48 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(f) 
   
.  If an Issuing Lender shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the relevant Borrower shall reimburse such Issuing Lender in respect of such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the relevant Borrower receives notice that such LC Disbursement has been made, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the relevant Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time; that the relevant Borrower may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.03 or Section 2.05 that such payment be financed with all or any portion of a Revolving ABR Borrowing or a Swingline Loan, as applicable, in an amount permitted under Section 2.02(c) (in the event that such LC Disbursement was made in an Alternative Currency, such Borrowing Request shall be for the Dollar Equivalent of the amount of such LC Disbursement) and, to the extent so financed, the relevant Borrowers obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting Revolving ABR Borrowing or Swingline Loan (or the applicable portion thereof).  Each such payment shall be made to the Issuing Lender in the currency in which such Letter of Credit is denominated (except that, in the case of any Letter of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency, in the event that such payment is not made to the Issuing Lender within three Business Days of the date of receipt by the relevant Borrower of such notice, upon notice by the Issuing Lender to the Borrower, such payment shall be made in Dollars, in an amount equal to the Dollar Equivalent of the amount of such payment) and in immediately available funds.  Any conversion by the Issuing Lender of any payment to be made by a Borrower in respect of any Letter of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency into Dollars in accordance with this Section 2.06(f) shall be conclusive and binding upon such Borrower and the Lenders in the absence of manifest error; that upon the request of any Lender, the Issuing Lender shall provide to such Lender a certificate including reasonably detailed information as to the calculation of such conversionIf the Borrowers reimbursement of, or obligation to reimburse, any amounts in any Alternative Currency would subject the Administrative Agent, the applicable Issuing Lender or any Lender to any duty, charge or stamp duty, ad valorem charge or similar tax that would not be payable if such reimbursement were made or required to be made in Dollars, the Borrower shall pay the amount of any such duty, charge or tax requested by the Administrative Agent, the relevant Issuing Lender or Lender.
Reimbursement
provided
provided
.  
 
 
- 49 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
If any Borrower fails to make payment when due in respect of any LC Disbursement relating to a Letter of Credit issued for its account, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from such Borrower and such Lenders Applicable Percentage thereof.
 
(g) 
   
.  Each Borrowers obligations to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in Section 2.06(f) shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by any Issuing Lender under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply strictly with the terms of such Letter of Credit, (iv) at any time or from time to time, without notice to any Borrower or any other Person, the time for any performance of or compliance with any of such reimbursement obligations of any other Borrower shall be waived, extended or renewed, (v) any of such reimbursement obligations of any other Borrower shall be amended or otherwise modified in any respect, or the Guarantee of any of such reimbursement obligations or any security therefor shall be released, substituted or exchanged in whole or in part or otherwise dealt with, (vi) any lien or security interest granted to, or in favor of, the Administrative Agent or any of the Lenders as security for any of such reimbursement obligations shall fail to be perfected, (vii) the occurrence of any Default, (viii) the existence of any proceedings of the type described in Section 7(g) or (h) with respect to any other Loan Party, (ix) any lack of validity or enforceability of any of such reimbursement obligations against any other Loan Party, or (x) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the obligations of any Borrower hereunder.
Obligations Absolute
 
Neither the Administrative Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Lenders, nor any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit by the Issuing Lender thereof or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the Issuing Lender of such Letter of Credit; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse such Issuing Lender from liability to any Borrower or to any Lender which has funded its participation hereunder in such Letter of Credit to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Loan Parties and the Lenders to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by any Borrower or any such Lender, as the case may be, that are caused by such Issuing Lenders failure to exercise the standard of care agreed hereunder to be applicable when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof.  The parties hereto expressly agree that such standard of care shall be as follows, and that such Issuing Lender shall be deemed to have exercised such standard of care in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct on its part (as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment):
provided
 
 
- 50 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(i) 
   
an Issuing Lender of a Letter of Credit may accept documents that appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, and may make payment upon presentation of documents that appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit; and
 
(ii)
   
an Issuing Lender of a Letter of Credit shall have the right, in its sole discretion, to decline to accept such documents and to make such payment if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
 
(h) 
   
.  Upon presentation of documents with respect to a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit, each Issuing Lender in respect of such Letter of Credit shall (i) promptly notify the Administrative Agent, the Company and (if different) the relevant Borrower by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of such demand for payment, (ii) promptly following its receipt of such documents, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit and (iii) promptly after such examination notify the Administrative Agent, the Company and (if different) the relevant Borrower by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) whether the Issuing Lender has made or will make an LC Disbursement under such Letter of Credit; that any failure to give or delay in giving any such notice shall not relieve such Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such Issuing Lender and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures
provided
 
(i) 
   
.  If any Issuing Lender shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the relevant Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to, but excluding, the date that such Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, (i) in the case of LC Disbursements made in Dollars, at the rate per annum then applicable to Revolving ABR Loans and (ii) in the case of LC Disbursements made in an Alternative Currency, at the overnight London interbank offered rate for the relevant Alternative Currency determined by the Administrative Agent in good faith plus the rate per annum then applicable to Eurocurrency Borrowings; that, if such Borrower fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to Section 2.06(f), then Section 2.13(c) shall apply.  In the case of LC Disbursements made in an Alternative Currency, the amount of interest due with respect thereto shall be payable in the applicable Alternative Currency; that, if the Borrowers payment obligation with respect to a LC Disbursement made in an Alternative Currency has been converted pursuant to Section 2.06(f) into an obligation to pay the Dollar Equivalent of such amount, then interest payable thereon shall be payable in Dollars in the amount equal to the Dollar Equivalent thereof.  Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of such Issuing Lender, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to Section 2.06(e) to reimburse such Issuing Lender shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
Interim Interest
provided
provided
 
(j) 
   
.  An Issuing Lender may be added, or an existing Issuing Lender may be terminated, under this Agreement at any time by written agreement between the Company, the Administrative Agent and the relevant Issuing Lender.  The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such addition or termination.  At the time any such termination shall become effective, the Borrowers shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the Issuing Lender being terminated pursuant to Section 2.12(b)(i).  From and after the effective date of any such addition, the new Issuing Lender shall have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Lender under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued thereafter.  References herein to the term Issuing Lender shall be deemed to refer to each new Issuing Lender or to any previous Issuing Lender, or to such new Issuing Lender and all previous Issuing Lenders, as the context shall require.  After the termination of an Issuing Lender hereunder, the terminated Issuing Lender shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Lender under this Agreement with respect to any outstanding Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such termination, but shall not be required to issue any new Letters of Credit or to renew or extend any such outstanding Letters of Credit.
Additional Issuing Lenders; Termination of Issuing Lenders
 
 
- 51 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(k) 
   
.  If either (i) an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and the Company receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders (or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated, Lenders with LC Exposure representing more than 50% of the total LC Exposure) demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph or (ii) any of the other provisions of this Agreement require cash collateralization, the Company shall immediately deposit into an account established and maintained on the books and records of the Administrative Agent, which account may be a securities account (within the meaning of Section 8-501 of the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect in the State of New York), in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Secured Parties (the ), an amount in immediately available funds in Dollars equal to 105% of the LC Exposure as of such date any accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such amount shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default described in clause (h) or (i) of Article VII; , , that the portions of such amount attributable to undrawn Letters of Credit issued in an Alternative Currency shall be deposited in the relevant Alternative Currency.  Such deposits shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the LC Exposure under this Agreement and for the payment and performance of the Secured Obligations, and for this purpose the Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over the LC Collateral Account, the LC Collateral Account shall be subject to a Deposit Account Control Agreement, as applicable, and each Borrower hereby grants a security interest to the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties in the LC Collateral Account and in any financial assets (as defined in the Uniform Commercial Code) or other property held therein.  Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent (in accordance with its usual and customary practices for investments of this type) and at the Borrowers risk and reasonable expense, such deposits shall not bear interest.  Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in the LC Collateral Account.  Moneys and financial assets in the LC Collateral Account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the applicable Issuing Lender for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrowers for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of Lenders with LC Exposure representing more than 50% of the total LC Exposure), be applied to satisfy other Secured Obligations.  The Administrative Agent shall cause all such cash collateral (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) to be returned to the Company within three Business Days after (A) in the case of clause (i) above, the applicable Event of Default shall have been cured or waived (so long as no other Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at such time) or (B) in the case of clause (ii) above, such cash collateral shall no longer be required pursuant to the applicable provision hereof.
Cash Collateralization
LC Collateral Account
plus
provided
provided
further
 
 
- 52 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(l) 
   
.  Each of the letters of credit listed on Schedule 2.06(l) shall automatically, and without any action on the part of any Person, be deemed a Letter of Credit issued and continued hereunder as of the Effective Date.
Existing Letters of Credit
 
(m) 
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall determine the Dollar Equivalent of the LC Exposure with respect to Letters of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency as of the end of each fiscal quarter of the relevant Borrower.  If after giving effect to any such determination of the Dollar Equivalent of such LC Exposure, the LC Exposure exceeds 105% of the LC Commitment, the Borrower shall, within five Business Days of receipt of notice thereof from the Administrative Agent setting forth such calculation in reasonable detail, deposit cash collateral in the LC Collateral Account pursuant to Section 2.06 in an amount equal to such excess.
Dollar Equivalent Determination
 
(n) 
   
.  Unless otherwise requested by the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender shall (i) provide to the Administrative Agent copies of any notice received from any Borrower pursuant to Section 2.06(b) no later than the Business Day after receipt thereof and (ii) report in writing to the Administrative Agent (A) on the first Business Day of each week, the activity for each day during the immediately preceding week in respect of Letters of Credit issued by it, including all issuances, extensions, amendments and renewals, all expirations and cancellations and all disbursements and reimbursements, (B) on or prior to each Business Day on which such Issuing Lender expects to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, the date of such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension, whether such Letter of Credit is a trade, financial or performance Letter of Credit, and the aggregate face amount of the Letters of Credit to be issued, amended, renewed or extended by it and outstanding after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (and whether the amount thereof changed), and no Issuing Lender shall be permitted to issue, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit without first obtaining written confirmation from the Administrative Agent that such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension is then permitted by the terms of this Agreement, (C) on each Business Day on which such Issuing Lender makes any LC Disbursement, the date of such LC Disbursement and the amount and currency of such LC Disbursement and (D) on any other Business Day, such other information as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request, including but not limited to prompt verification of such information as may be requested by the Administrative Agent.
Reporting
 
SECTION 2.07 
   
.
Funding of Borrowings
 
(a) 
   
.  Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 1:00 p.m., New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders;   that Swingline Loans shall be made available as provided in Section 2.05.  The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the relevant Borrower by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of such Borrower designated by such Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request; that (i) Revolving ABR Borrowings made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.06(f) shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the relevant Issuing Lender and (ii) a Protective Advance shall be retained by the Administrative Agent.
Funding by Lenders
provided
provided
 
 
- 53 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(b) 
   
.  Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lenders share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the relevant Borrower a corresponding amount.  In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the relevant Lender and the Borrowers agree (jointly and severally with each other Borrower, but severally and not jointly with the applicable Lenders) to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to such Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or (ii) in the case of such Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans.  If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lenders Loan included in such Borrowing.  With respect to any share of a Borrowing not made available by a Lender as contemplated above, if such Lender subsequently pays its share of such Borrowing to the Administrative Agent, then the Administrative Agent shall promptly repay any corresponding amount paid by the relevant Borrower to the Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph (including interest thereon to the extent received by the Administrative Agent); that such repayment to such Borrower shall not operate as a waiver or any abandonment of any rights or remedies of such Borrower with respect to such Lender.
Presumption by the Administrative Agent
provided
 
SECTION 2.08 
   
.
Interest Elections
 
(a) 
   
.  The Loans constituting each Revolving Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request.  Thereafter, the relevant Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a Borrowing of a different Type or to continue such Borrowing as a Borrowing of the same Type and, in the case of a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing, may elect the Interest Period therefor, all as provided in this Section.  A Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the relevant Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing.  This Section shall not apply to Swingline Borrowings or Protective Advances, which may not be converted or continued.
Elections by the Borrowers for Revolving Borrowings
 
 
- 54 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(b) 
   
.  To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Company (on behalf of itself or the relevant Borrower) or the relevant Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if such Borrower were requesting a Revolving Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election.  Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Company (on behalf of itself or the relevant Borrower) or the relevant Borrower.
Notice of Elections
 
(c) 
   
.  Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
Content of Interest Election Requests
 
(i) 
   
the Borrower and the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) of this paragraph shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
 
(ii) 
   
the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)
   
whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurocurrency Borrowing; and
 
(iv)
   
if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurocurrency Borrowing, the Interest Period therefor after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period and permitted under Section 2.02(d).
 
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurocurrency Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrowers shall be deemed to have requested an ABR Borrowing.
 
(d) 
   
.  Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lenders portion of each resulting Borrowing.
Notice by the Administrative Agent to the Lenders
 
(e) 
   
.  If the Company or the relevant Subsidiary Borrower fails to deliver a timely and complete Interest Election Request with respect to a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing by a Borrower prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing.  Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Company and the relevant Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (A) no outstanding Revolving Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing and (B) unless repaid, each Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
Failure to Elect; Events of Default
 
 
- 55 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 2.09 
   
.
Termination and Reduction of the Commitments
 
(a) 
   
.  Unless previously terminated, the Commitments shall terminate on the Commitment Termination Date.
Scheduled Termination
 
(b) 
   
.  The Company may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Commitments; that (i) each reduction of the Commitments shall be in an amount that is $25,000,000 or a larger multiple of $5,000,000; and (ii) the Company shall not terminate or reduce the Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Revolving Loans in accordance with Section 2.11, the sum of the Credit Exposures would exceed the lesser of (x) the Total Commitment and (y) the Borrowing Base.
Voluntary Termination or Reduction
provided
 
(c) 
   
.  The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof.  Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each notice delivered by the Company pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Commitments delivered by the Company may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Company (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied.
Notice of Voluntary Termination or Reduction
provided
 
(d) 
   
.  Any termination or reduction of the Commitments shall be permanent.  Each reduction of the Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments.
Effect of Termination or Reduction
 
SECTION 2.10 
   
.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt
 
(a) 
   
.
Repayment
 
(i) 
   
The Borrowers hereby unconditionally promise to pay to the Administrative Agent (i) for the account of the Lenders the outstanding principal amount of the Revolving Loans on the Commitment Termination Date and (ii) the then unpaid amount of each Protective Advance on the earlier of the Commitment Termination Date and demand by the Administrative Agent. 
 
(ii) 
   
Each Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the Swingline Lender the outstanding amount of each Swingline Loan made to such Borrower on the earlier of the Commitment Termination Date and the fifth Business Day after such Swingline Loan is made; that on each date that a Revolving Borrowing is made to the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower, the Company or such Subsidiary Borrower, as applicable, shall repay all Swingline Loans made to it then outstanding.
provided
 
(b) 
   
.  During any Cash Dominion Period, on each Business Day, the Administrative Agent shall apply all funds credited to any applicable Collection Account as of 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such Business Day (whether or not immediately available) to prepay any Protective Advances that may be outstanding, pro rata, and to prepay the Revolving Loans (including Swingline Loans)(without a corresponding reduction in Commitments) and to cash collateralize outstanding LC Exposure.
Cash Dominion
first
second
 
 
 
- 56 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(c) 
   
.  Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice records evidencing the indebtedness of each Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender to such Borrower, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
Maintenance of Records by Lenders
 
(d) 
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall maintain records in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Class and Type thereof and each Interest Period therefor, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from each Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the relevant Lenders and each such Lenders share thereof.
Maintenance of Records by the Administrative Agent
 
(e) 
   
.  The entries made in the records maintained pursuant to paragraph (c) or (d)  of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such records or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the relevant Borrower to repay the Loans made to such Borrower in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Effect of Entries
prima facie
provided
 
(f) 
   
.  Any Lender may request that Loans made by it to any Borrower be evidenced by a promissory note.  In such event, the relevant Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to such Lender and its registered assigns and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent.  Thereafter, the Loans to such Borrower evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 10.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to such payee and its registered assigns.
Promissory Notes
 
 
SECTION 2.11
 
   
.
Prepayment of Loans
 
(a) 
   
.  Each Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to the requirements of this Section.
Optional Prepayments
 
(b) 
   
.
Mandatory Prepayments
 
(i) 
   
In the event and on such occasion that:
 
(A)
 
the Credit Exposure of any Lender exceeds such Lenders Commitment; or
 
(B)
 
the sum of the total Credit Exposures (including the Dollar Equivalent of any LC Exposure with respect to a Letter of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency) exceeds the lesser of (x) Total Commitment or (y) the Borrowing Base;
 
 
- 57 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
the Borrowers shall promptly prepay the Revolving Loans and/or Swingline Loans in an aggregate amount equal to such excess; that if the aggregate principal amount of Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans then outstanding is less than the amount of such excess (because LC Exposure constitutes a portion thereof), the Borrowers shall, to the extent of the balance of such excess, deposit an amount in cash in the LC Collateral Account.  If the Borrowers are required to provide (and have provided the required amount of) cash collateral pursuant to this Section 2.11(b) and such excess is subsequently reduced, cash collateral in an amount equal to the lesser of (x) any such reduction and (b) the amount of such cash collateral (to the extent not applied as set forth in Section 2.06(k)) shall be returned to the Borrowers within two Business Days after any such reduction.
provided
 
(ii) 
   
.  In the event and on each occasion that, during any Cash Dominion Period, any Net Proceeds are received by or on behalf of any Loan Party in respect of any Prepayment Event, the Borrowers shall, immediately after such Net Proceeds are received by any Loan Party, prepay the Borrower Obligations as set forth in Section 2.11(c) below in an aggregate amount equal to 100% of such Net Proceeds.
Prepayment Event
 
(c) 
   
All such amounts pursuant to Section 2.11(b) shall be applied to prepay the Revolving Loans (including Swingline Loans) without a corresponding reduction in the Total Commitment and to cash collateralize outstanding LC Exposure.  
 
(d) 
   
  The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent (and, in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of any prepayment hereunder:
Notices, Etc.
 
(i) 
   
in the case of prepayment of a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment;
 
(ii) 
   
in the case of prepayment of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 9:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of prepayment; or
 
(iii) 
   
in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date of prepayment.
 
Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date, the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid and, in the case of a mandatory prepayment, a reasonably detailed calculation of the amount of such prepayment; that, if a notice of prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Commitments as contemplated by Section 2.09, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with Section 2.09.  Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Revolving Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of a Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02, except as necessary to apply fully the required amount of a mandatory prepayment.  Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.13 and shall be made in the manner specified in Section 2.18(a).
provided
 
 
- 58 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 2.12 
   
.
Fees
 
(a) 
   
.  The Borrowers agree to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Commitment Fee Rate on the average daily amount of the Available Revolving Commitment of such Lender during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the Commitment Termination Date.  Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the third Business Day of each calendar month and on the Commitment Termination Date, commencing on the first such date to occur after the date hereof.  All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
Commitment Fee
 
(b) 
   
.  The Company agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the Applicable Rate applicable to Eurocurrency Loans on the average daily amount of such Lenders LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lenders Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure.
Letter of Credit Fees
 
(i) 
   
The relevant Borrower with respect to each Letter of Credit agrees to pay to the Issuing Lender of such Letter of Credit (A) a fronting fee, which shall accrue at a rate per annum equal to 0.25% of the average daily amount of the LC Exposure with respect to such Letter of Credit (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the date of issuance of such Letter of Credit to but excluding the date on which there ceases to be any such LC Exposure under such Letter of Credit and (B) such Issuing Lenders standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder.
 
(ii) 
   
Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of each calendar month shall be payable on the third Business Day of each calendar month following such last day, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date; that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand.  Any other fees payable to any Issuing Lender pursuant to clause (B) of paragraph (b)(i) above shall be payable at the times separately agreed upon between the Company or the relevant Borrower and such Issuing Lender or otherwise within 10 days after demand.  All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
provided
 
(c) 
   
.  The Company agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees payable in the amounts and at the times separately agreed upon between the Company and the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Agent Fees
 
 
- 59 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(d) 
   
.  All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in Dollars and immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the relevant Issuing Lender, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders entitled thereto.  Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
Payment of Fees
 
SECTION 2.13 
   
.
Interest
 
(a) 
   
.  The Loans constituting each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan and each Protective Advance) shall bear interest at a rate per annum equal to the Alternate Base Rate the Applicable Rate.
ABR Loans
plus
 
(b) 
   
.  The Loans comprising each Eurocurrency Borrowing shall bear interest at a rate per annum equal to the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing the Applicable Rate.
Eurocurrency Loans
plus
 
(c) 
   
.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by any Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration, by mandatory prepayment or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided above or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% the rate applicable to ABR Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
Default Interest
plus
plus
 
(d) 
   
.  Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and upon termination of the Commitments;   that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of a Revolving ABR Loan prior to the Commitment Termination Date), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Borrowing shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
Payment of Interest
provided
 
(e) 
   
.  All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).  The applicable Alternate Base Rate, Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate or Eurocurrency Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Computation
 
SECTION 2.14 
   
.  If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for any Eurocurrency Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest
 
(a) 
   
the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for such Interest Period; or
 
 
- 60 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(b) 
   
the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders (or Lender) of making or maintaining their respective Loans (or its Loan) included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
 
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders by telephone or facsimile as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Company and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Revolving Borrowing to, or the continuation of any Revolving Borrowing as, a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing shall be ineffective and such Revolving Borrowing (unless prepaid) shall be continued as, or converted to, a Revolving ABR Borrowing and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as a Revolving ABR Borrowing.
 
SECTION 2.15 
   
.
Increased Costs
 
(a) 
   
.  If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs Generally
 
(i) 
   
impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate) or any Issuing Lender; or
 
(ii) 
   
impose on any Lender or any Issuing Lender or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement or Eurocurrency Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
 
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining any Eurocurrency Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan) or to increase the cost to such Lender or such Issuing Lender of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or such Issuing Lender hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Company will pay to such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
 
(b) 
   
.  If any Lender or any Issuing Lender determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lenders or such Issuing Lenders capital or on the capital of such Lenders or such Issuing Lenders holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Lender, to a level below that which such Lender or such Issuing Lender or such Lenders or such Issuing Lenders holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lenders or such Issuing Lenders policies and the policies of such Lenders or such Issuing Lenders holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Company will pay to such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Issuing Lender or such Lenders or such Issuing Lenders holding company for any such reduction suffered.
Capital Requirements
 
 
- 61 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(c) 
   
.  A certificate of a Lender or an Issuing Lender setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or such Issuing Lender or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section shall be delivered to the Company and shall be conclusive absent manifest error.  The Company shall pay such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
Certificates from Lenders
 
(d) 
   
.  Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or any Issuing Lender to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lenders or such Issuing Lenders right to demand such compensation; that the Company shall not be required to compensate a Lender or an Issuing Lender pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than six months prior to the date that such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, notifies the Company of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lenders or such Issuing Lenders intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the six-month period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
Delay in Requests
provided
provided further
 
SECTION 2.16 
   
.  In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurocurrency Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Revolving Eurocurrency Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Eurocurrency Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice is permitted to be revocable under Section 2.11(d) and is revoked in accordance therewith) or (d) the assignment as a result of a request by the Company pursuant to Section 2.19(b) of any Revolving Eurocurrency Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then,  the Company shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event.  In the case of a Eurocurrency Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender attributable to any such event shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be equal to the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest that such Lender would pay for a deposit equal to the principal amount of such Loan for the period from the date of such payment, conversion, failure or assignment to the last day of the then current Interest Period for such Loan (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, the duration of the Interest Period that would have resulted from such borrowing, conversion or continuation) if the interest rate payable on such deposit were equal to the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for such Interest Period, over (ii) the amount of interest that such Lender would earn on such principal amount for such period if such Lender were to invest such principal amount for such period at the interest rate that would be bid by such Lender (or an Affiliate of such Lender) for deposits denominated in Dollars from other banks in the eurocurrency market at the commencement of such period.  A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be delivered to the Company and shall be conclusive absent manifest error.  The Company shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
Break Funding Payments
 
 
- 62 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 2.17 
   
.
Taxes
 
(a) 
   
.  Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party hereunder or under any other Loan Document (including, for these purposes, any such payment made by the Administrative Agent) shall be made free and clear of and without deduction or withholding for any Indemnified Taxes; that if any Indemnified Taxes are required to be withheld or deducted from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, a Lender (or with respect to a Lender treated as a partnership for U.S. federal income tax purposes its direct or indirect partners) or an Issuing Lender (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) such Loan Party shall make such deductions and (iii) such Loan Party shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Payments Free of Taxes
provided
 
(b) 
   
.  In addition, the Loan Parties shall timely pay, or at the option of the Administrative Agent, timely reimburse it for the payment of, any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Payment of Other Taxes
 
(c) 
   
.  Without duplication of the obligations of each Loan Party pursuant to Section 2.17(a) or (b), each Loan Party shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and each Issuing Lender, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes (including Indemnified Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, and any penalties, interest and reasonable out-of-pocket expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority, in each case on or with respect to payments by or on account of any obligations of any Loan Party hereunder or under any other Loan Document.  A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to any Loan Party by a Lender or an Issuing Lender, or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or an Issuing Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Indemnification of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders
 
(d) 
   
.  As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes by a Loan Party to a Governmental Authority, such Loan Party shall deliver to the Administrative Agent for its own account, the account of the relevant Lender or the relevant Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Evidence of Payments
 
(e) 
   
.  Each Lender and Issuing Lender shall, within 10 days after demand therefor, indemnify the Administrative Agent for the full amount of any Taxes and indemnify each Loan Party for the full amount of any Excluded Taxes, in each case, attributable to such Lender that are payable or paid by the Administrative Agent or such Loan Party, as the case may be, and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority.  A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to any Lender by the Administrative Agent or any Loan Party shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Indemnification of the Administrative Agent and the Loan Parties
 
 
- 63 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(f) 
   
.  Any Non-U.S. Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of any applicable withholding tax with respect to payments hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall deliver to the relevant Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate of withholding.  In addition, any Non-U.S. Lender, if requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, shall deliver such other documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent as will enable the Borrower or the Administrative Agent to determine whether or not such Lender is subject to backup withholding or information reporting requirements.  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the preceding two sentences, in the case of any withholding tax other than U.S. federal withholding tax, the completion, execution and submission of such forms shall not be required if in the Non-U.S. Lenders reasonable judgment such completion, execution or submission would subject such Non-U.S. Lender to any material unreimbursed cost or expense or would materially prejudice the legal or commercial position of such Non-U.S. Lender.
Non-U.S. Lenders
 
Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, any Non-U.S. Lender shall, to the extent it is legally entitled to do so, deliver to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Non-U.S. Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the request of the Borrower or the Administrative Agent), whichever of the following is applicable:
 
(i) 
   
duly completed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8BEN claiming eligibility for benefits of an income tax treaty to which the United States of America is a party,
 
(ii) 
   
duly completed copies Foreign of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8ECI,
 
(iii)
   
in the case of a Non-U.S. Lender claiming the benefits of the exemption for portfolio interest under section 881(c) of the Code, (x) a certificate substantially in the Form of Exhibit H to the effect that (i) such Non-U.S. Lender is not (A) a bank within the meaning of section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (B) a 10 percent shareholder of the Borrower within the meaning of section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code, and (C) a controlled foreign corporation described in section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code, and (ii) the interest payments in question are not effectively connected with the United States trade or business conducted by such Lender (a ) and (y) duly completed copies of  Internal Revenue Service Form W-8BEN,
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
 
 
- 64 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(iv)
   
to the extent a Non-U.S. Lender is not the beneficial owner (for example, where the Non-U.S. Lender is a partnership or participating Lender granting a typical participation), an Internal Revenue Service Form W-8IMY, accompanied by a Form W-8ECI, W-8BEN, U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate, Form W-9, and/or other certification documents from each beneficial owner, as applicable; that, if the Non-U.S. Lender is a partnership (and not a participating Lender) and one or more beneficial owners of such Non-U.S. Lender are claiming the portfolio interest exemption, such Non-U.S. Lender may provide a U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate on behalf of each such beneficial owner, or
provided
 
(v) 
   
any other form prescribed by applicable law as a basis for claiming exemption from or a reduction in U.S. federal withholding tax duly completed together with such supplementary documentation as may be prescribed by applicable law to permit the Borrower to determine the withholding or deduction required to be made.
 
Each Lender agrees that if any form or certification it previously delivered by it expires or becomes obsolete or inaccurate in any respect, it shall update such form or certification or promptly notify Borrower and the Administrative Agent in writing of its legal inability to do so.
 
In the event the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender shall become subject to Taxes because of its failure to deliver a form required under this Section, the Company (and, if applicable, the relevant Loan Party) shall take such steps as the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or such Lender, as the case may be, shall reasonably request to assist it to recover such Taxes; that, in the reasonable judgment of the Company (or such Loan Party), such steps shall not subject the Company (or such Loan Party) to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to the Company (or such Loan Party) in any material respect.
provided
 
(g) 
   
.  If the Administrative Agent, a Lender or an Issuing Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Indemnified Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by any Loan Party or with respect to which any Loan Party has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section, it shall pay over such refund to such Loan Party (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by such Loan Party under this Section with respect to the Indemnified Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); that such Loan Party, upon the request of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to such Loan Party (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Lender in the event the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. This Section shall not be construed to require the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its Taxes that it deems confidential) to any Loan Party or any other Person.
Refunds
provided
 
 
- 65 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(h) 
   
.  The agreements in this Section shall survive the termination of this Agreement and the payment of the Loans and all other amounts payable hereunder.
Survival
 
SECTION 2.18 
   
.
Payments Generally; Allocation of Proceeds; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs
 
(a) 
   
.  (i)  Each Loan Party shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or under Section 2.15, 2.16 or 2.17, or otherwise) or under any other Loan Document (except to the extent otherwise provided therein) on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim.  Any amounts received after 12:00 noon, New York City time on any such due date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon.  All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at the Administrative Agents Account, except as otherwise expressly provided in the relevant Loan Document and except payments to be made directly to an Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender as expressly provided herein and payments pursuant to Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 10.03, which shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto.  The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof.  If any payment hereunder shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension.  All payments hereunder shall be made in Dollars.  At all times during a Cash Dominion Period, solely for purposes of determining the amount of Loans available for borrowing purposes, checks (in addition to immediately available funds applied pursuant to Section 2.10(b)) from collections of items of payment and proceeds of any Collateral shall be applied in whole or in part against the Borrower Obligations, on the Business Day after receipt, subject to actual collection.
Payments by Loan Parties
 
(ii)           Prior to any repayment of any Borrowings hereunder (other than the repayment in full of all outstanding Borrowings on the scheduled date of such repayment), the Borrowers shall select the Borrowing or Borrowings to be paid and shall notify the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of such selection not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the scheduled date of such repayment; that each repayment of Borrowings shall be applied to repay any outstanding ABR Borrowings before any other Borrowings.  If a Borrower fails to make a timely selection of the Borrowing or Borrowings to be repaid (in accordance with the immediately preceding sentence) or prepaid (in accordance with Section 2.11(d)), such payment shall be applied, first, to pay any outstanding ABR Borrowings and, second, to other Borrowings in the order of the remaining duration of their respective Interest Periods (the Borrowing with the shortest remaining Interest Period to be repaid first).  Each repayment or prepayment of a Revolving Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in such Borrowing.
provided
 
(iii)           All amounts owing under this Agreement are payable in Dollars, except as expressly provided for herein.
 
 
- 66 - -
Table of Contents
 
(b) 
   
Any proceeds of Collateral or any other amounts received by the Administrative Agent (i) not constituting either (A) a specific payment of principal, interest, fees or other sum payable under the Loan Documents (which shall be applied as set forth herein), (B) a mandatory prepayment (which shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.11) or (C) amounts to be applied from the Collection Account during a Cash Dominion Period (which shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.10(b)) or (ii) after an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent so elects or the Required Lenders so direct, shall be applied ratably , to pay any fees, indemnities, or expense reimbursements including amounts then due to the Administrative Agent and any Issuing Lender from the Borrowers (other than in connection with Banking Services or Swap Obligations), , to pay any fees or expense reimbursements then due to the Lenders from the Borrowers (other than in connection with Banking Services or Swap Obligations), , to pay interest due in respect of the Protective Advances, , to pay the principal of the Protective Advances, , to pay interest then due and payable on the Loans (other than the Protective Advances) or unreimbursed LC Disbursements ratably, , to prepay principal on the Loans (other than the Protective Advances) and unreimbursed LC Disbursements ratably, , to pay an amount to the Administrative Agent equal to one hundred five percent (105%) of the aggregate undrawn face amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit and the aggregate amount of any unpaid LC Disbursements, to be held as cash collateral for such Obligations, , to payment of any amounts owing with respect to Banking Services and Swap Obligations that are Secured Obligations, and , to the payment of any other Secured Obligation due to the Administrative Agent or any Lender by the Borrowers Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, unless so directed by the Company, or unless a Default is in existence, neither the Administrative Agent nor any Lender shall apply any payment which it receives to any Eurocurrency Loan, except (x) on the expiration date of the Interest Period applicable to any such Eurocurrency Loan or (y) in the event, and only to the extent, that there are no outstanding ABR Loans of the same Class and, in any such event, the Borrowers shall pay the break funding payment required in accordance with Section 2.16. The Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall have the continuing and exclusive right to apply and reverse and reapply any and all such proceeds and payments to any portion of the Secured Obligations.
first
second
third
fourth
fifth
sixth
seventh
eighth
ninth
.
 
 
(c) 
   
.  Except to the extent otherwise provided herein:  (i) subject to Section 2.03(c), each Revolving Borrowing shall be made from the relevant Lenders, each payment of commitment fees under Section 2.12 shall be made for the account of the Lenders, and each termination or reduction of the amount of the Commitments under Section 2.09 shall be applied to the respective Commitments of the Lenders, pro rata according to the amounts of their respective Commitments; (ii) subject to Section 2.03(c), each Revolving Borrowing shall be allocated pro rata among the relevant Lenders to such Borrower according to the amounts of their respective Commitments (in the case of the making of Revolving Loans) or their respective Loans that are to be included in such Borrowing (in the case of conversions and continuations of Loans); (iii) each payment or prepayment of principal of Revolving Loans by a Borrower shall be made for the account of the relevant Lenders pro rata in accordance with the respective unpaid principal amounts of the Revolving Loans made to such Borrower held by them; and (iv) each payment of interest on Revolving Loans by a Borrower shall be made for the account of the relevant Lenders pro rata in accordance with the amounts of interest on such Loans then due and payable to the respective Lenders.
Pro Rata Treatment
 
 
- 67 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(d) 
   
.  If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Revolving Loans or participations in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans and accrued interest thereon then due than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by any Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to any Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply).  Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against such Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
Sharing of Payments by Lenders
provided
 
(e) 
   
.  Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Company or the relevant Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of a Lender or an Issuing Lender hereunder that the Company, such Borrower as the case may be, will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Company or such Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the amount due.  In such event, if the Company or such Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the relevant Lenders or the relevant Issuing Lender, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or such Issuing Lender with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the Federal Funds Effective Rate.
Presumptions of Payment
 
(f) 
   
.  If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.06(e), 2.07(b) or 2.18(e), then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lenders obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid.
Certain Deductions by the Administrative Agent
 
 
- 68 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(a) 
SECTION 2.19 
   
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders
.
 
   
.  If any Lender or any Issuing Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if any Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender or any Issuing Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, then such Lender or such Issuing Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans, LC Disbursements or participations in LC Disbursements hereunder (as applicable) or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or Affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender or such Issuing Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.15 or 2.17, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) would not subject such Lender or such Issuing Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender or such Issuing Lender; provided that, upon any such change in any lending office or assignment, such Lender or such Issuing Lender shall provide or cause to be delivered to the Administrative Agent and the Company (and, if applicable, the relevant Subsidiary Borrower) the appropriate forms specified in and to the extent by Section 2.17.  The Company hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender or any Issuing Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Designation of a Different Lending Office
 
(b) 
   
.  If any Lender or any Issuing Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if any Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender, any Issuing Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender or any Issuing Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, then the Company may, at its sole expense and effort, require such Lender or such Issuing Lender or any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender (each a ), upon notice to such Departing Lender and the Administrative Agent, to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 10.04), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender or another Issuing Lender, if a Lender or Issuing Lender accepts such assignment); that (i) the Company shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender and the Swingline Lender (which consent in each case shall not unreasonably be withheld), (ii) the Departing Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans, LC Disbursements and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans (as applicable), accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the relevant Borrower (in the case of all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.15 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.17, such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments.  A Departing Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or such Issuing Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Company to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
Replacement of Lenders or Issuing Lenders
Departing Lender
provided
 
SECTION 2.20 
   
.  If after receipt of any payment which is applied to the payment of all or any part of the Borrower Obligations, the Administrative Agent or any Lender is for any reason compelled to surrender such payment or proceeds to any Person because such payment or application of proceeds is invalidated, declared fraudulent, set aside, determined to be void or voidable as a preference, impermissible setoff, or a diversion of trust funds, or for any other reason, then the Borrower Obligations or part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued and this Agreement shall continue in full force as if such payment or proceeds had not been received by the Administrative Agent or such Lender.  The provisions of this Section 2.20 shall be and remain effective notwithstanding any contrary action which may have been taken by the Administrative Agent or any Lender in reliance upon such payment or application of proceeds.  The provisions of this Section 2.20 shall survive the termination of this Agreement.
Returned Payments
 
 
- 69 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 2.21 
   
.
Designation of Subsidiary Borrowers
 
(a) 
   
.  Subject to the terms and conditions of this Section (including paragraph (b) of this Section), the Company may, at any time or from time to time upon not less than 20 Business Days notice to the Administrative Agent (or such other period which is acceptable to the Administrative Agent), request that a wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary specified in such notice become a party to this Agreement as a Subsidiary Borrower; that each such designation shall be subject to the prior approval of the Administrative Agent (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld).  The Administrative Agent shall upon receipt of such notice from the Company promptly notify each Lender of the Companys designation.  Upon such approval and the satisfaction of the conditions specified in paragraph (b) of this Section, such Subsidiary shall become a party to this Agreement as a Subsidiary Borrower and entitled to borrow Loans on and subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the Lenders of such designation.
Designation of Subsidiary Borrowers
provided
 
(b) 
   
.  The designation by the Company of any wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary as a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder shall not become effective until the date on which the Administrative Agent shall have received each of the following documents (each of which shall be in satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in form and substance):
Conditions Precedent to Designation Effectiveness
 
(i) 
   
.  A Designation Letter, duly completed and executed by the Company and the relevant Subsidiary, delivered to the Administrative Agent at least 5 Business Days before the date on which such Subsidiary is proposed to become a Subsidiary Borrower;
Designation Letter
 
(ii) 
   
.  If requested by the Administrative Agent, a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and dated the date of the related Designation Letter) of counsel to such Subsidiary satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in the jurisdiction in which such Subsidiary is organized (the ), (and the Company and such Subsidiary Borrower hereby and by delivery of such Designation Letter instruct such counsel to deliver such opinion to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent, if such opinion is so requested), as to such other matters as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request (which may include the due incorporation of such Subsidiary under the laws of the Relevant Jurisdiction, the due authorization, execution and delivery by such Subsidiary of such Designation Letter and of any Borrowings to be made by it hereunder, the obtaining of all licenses, approvals and consents of, and the making of all filings and registrations with, any applicable Governmental Authority required in connection therewith (or the absence of any thereof), and the legality, validity and binding effect and enforceability thereof);
Opinion of Counsel
Relevant Jurisdiction
 
 
- 70 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(iii)
   
.  Such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request (including certified copies of the organizational documents of such Subsidiary and of resolutions of its board of directors authorizing such Subsidiary Borrower becoming a Borrower hereunder, and of all documents evidencing all other necessary corporate or other action required with respect to such Subsidiary Borrower becoming party to this Agreement);
Corporate Documents
 
(iv)
   
.  Receipt of such other documents relating thereto as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request, which may include other documents that are consistent with conditions for Subsidiary Borrowers set forth in Section 4.01.
Other Documents
 
(c) 
   
.  The Company may, at any time at which no Loans or any other amounts hereunder or under any other Loan Documents shall be outstanding to any Subsidiary Borrower, terminate such Subsidiary Borrower as a Borrower hereunder by delivering an executed notice thereof (each a ), substantially in the form of Exhibit E, to the Administrative Agent.  Any Termination Letter furnished hereunder shall be effective upon receipt thereof by the Administrative Agent (which shall promptly so notify the relevant Lenders and Issuing Lenders (as applicable)) and all commitments of the relevant Lenders to make Loans to such Subsidiary Borrower and all of rights of such Subsidiary Borrower hereunder shall terminate and such Subsidiary Borrower shall immediately cease to be a Borrower hereunder.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the delivery of a Termination Letter with respect to any Subsidiary Borrower shall not terminate (i) any obligation of such Subsidiary Borrower that remains unpaid at the time of such delivery (including any obligation arising thereafter in respect of such Subsidiary Borrower under Section 2.17) or (ii) the obligations of any other Loan Party under Article IX with respect to any such unpaid obligations.
Termination of Subsidiary Borrowers
Termination Letter
 
SECTION 2.22 
   
.  Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the following provisions shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender:
Defaulting Lenders
 
(a)  if any Swingline Exposure or LC Exposure exists, or any Protective Advance is outstanding, at the time a Lender is a Defaulting Lender, the Borrower shall within one Business Day following notice by the Administrative Agent (i) prepay such Swingline Exposure or, if agreed by the Swingline Lender, cash collateralize the Swingline Exposure of the Defaulting Lender on terms satisfactory to the Swingline Lender, (ii) cash collateralize such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.06(k) for so long as such LC Exposure is outstanding, and (iii) cash collateralize such Defaulting Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Protective Advance; and
 
(b)  the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loan and the Issuing Bank shall not be required to issue, amend or increase any Letter of Credit unless it is satisfied that cash collateral will be provided by the Borrower in accordance with Section 2.22(a).
 
 
- 71 - -
 
 
 
 
Each Loan Party represents and warrants to the Lenders that:
 
SECTION 3.01 
   
.  Each of the Loan Parties and each of their Subsidiaries (other than Immaterial Subsidiaries) is duly organized or incorporated, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization or incorporation and has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted.  Each of the Loan Parties and each of their Subsidiaries (other than Immaterial Subsidiaries) is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required, except where the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Organization; Powers
 
SECTION 3.02 
   
.  The Transactions are within each Loan Partys corporate, limited liability company or other like powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate, limited liability company or other like action and, if required, by all necessary shareholder, member, partner or other like action.  The Loan Documents to which each Loan Party is a party have been duly executed and delivered by such Loan Party and constitute a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Loan Party, enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (a) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws of general applicability affecting the enforcement of creditors rights and (b) the application of general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law). 
Authorization; Enforceability
 
SECTION 3.03 
   
.  The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect, (b) will not (i) violate in any material respect any applicable law or regulation or any order of any Governmental Authority binding upon the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or (ii) violate the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any material indenture, agreement or other instrument binding upon the Company, any Loan Party or any of their Subsidiaries or their assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by any such Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries, and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, except Liens pursuant to the Loan Documents.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts
 
SECTION 3.04 
   
.
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change
 
(a) 
   
.  The Company has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, shareholders equity and cash flows (i) as of and for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007, reported on by its independent public accountants and (ii) as of and for the fiscal quarter and the portion of the fiscal year ended September 30, 2008, certified by its chief financial officer. Except as set forth on , such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP.  Except as set forth on , as of the Effective Date, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any material Guarantee obligations, contingent liabilities and liabilities for taxes, or any long-term leases or unusual forward or long-term commitments, including any interest rate or foreign currency swap or exchange transaction or other obligation in respect of derivatives, that in accordance with GAAP would be required to be disclosed in the most recent financial statements referred to in this paragraph but are not reflected in such financial statements.
Financial Condition
 
Schedule 3.04
Schedule
3.04
 
 
- 72 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(b) 
   
.  Since December 31, 2007, no event, change or condition has occurred that has had, or could reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect, except for matters disclosed in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007 (the ), the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2008 (the ) or the information materials previously made available to the Lenders titled Credit Facility Amendment Request Lenders Call, dated November 18, 2008.
No Material Adverse Effect
2007 10-K
3Q-2008 10-Q
 
SECTION 3.05 
   
.
Properties
 
(a) 
   
.  Each of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries has good and marketable title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all the real and personal property that is material to its business, free of all Liens other than Liens permitted by Section 6.02.
Property Generally
 
(b) 
   
.  Except where such failure would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, each of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, tradenames, domain names, copyrights, patents, technology, trade secrets, know-how and other intellectual property rights (Intellectual Property) material to the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, free and clear of all Liens other than Liens permitted by Section 6.02(b), and the use thereof and the conduct of their business by each of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries does not infringe in any material respect upon the rights of any other Person.  Each such registration and application that is material to the conduct of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole is subsisting, and has not expired or been abandoned or cancelled.
Intellectual Property
 
SECTION 3.06 
   
.
Litigation and Environmental Matters
 
(a) 
   
.  Except as disclosed in the 2007 10-K and the 3Q-2008 10-Q and in Schedule 3.06(a), there are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority now pending against or, to the knowledge of any Loan Party, threatened against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that (i) could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect or (ii) involve this Agreement, any other Loan Document or the Transactions.
Actions, Suits and Proceedings
 
 
- 73 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(b) 
   
.  Except as disclosed in the 2007 10-K and the 3Q-2008 10-Q and in Schedule 3.06(b), and except with respect to any matters that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, registration, exemption, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received notice of any pending or threatened claim with respect to any Environmental Liability and (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
Environmental Matters
 
SECTION 3.07 
   
.  Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is an investment company as defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or is subject to registration under that Act.
Investment Company Act
 
SECTION 3.08 
   
.  Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it (including in its capacity as withholding agent), except (a) Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which such Person has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) where the failure to do so could not reasonably be expected to individually or in the aggregate result in a Material Adverse Effect.  No material Tax liens have been filed and no material claims are being asserted with respect to any Taxes.
Taxes
 
SECTION 3.09 
   
  No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed the fair market value of the assets of such Plan by an amount that could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
.
ERISA
 
SECTION 3.10 
   
.  Each Borrower has disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which it or any of its Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to it, that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  None of the reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of any Loan Party to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or delivered hereunder or thereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished), when taken as a whole, contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that (a) with respect to projected financial information, the Borrowers represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time and (b) it is understood and agreed that uncertainty is inherent in any forecasts or projections and no assurances can be given by the Company of the future achievement of such performance.
Disclosure
provided
 
 
- 74 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 3.11 
   
.  Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is engaged principally, or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose, whether immediate, incidental or ultimate, of buying or carrying Margin Stock, and no part of the proceeds of any extension of credit hereunder will be used to buy or carry any Margin Stock.
Use of Credit
 
SECTION 3.12 
   
.  Each Loan Party and its Subsidiaries are in compliance with all Requirements of Law applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements
 
SECTION 3.13 
   
.  No Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
No Default
 
SECTION 3.14 
   
.  Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Effective Date and on the date of each Borrowing, (i) the fair value of the consolidated assets of the Company, at a fair valuation, exceeds its debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise; (ii) the present fair saleable value of the consolidated property of the Company is greater than the amount that is required to pay the probable liability of its consolidated debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and other liabilities become absolute and matured; (iii) the Company and the Loan Parties, on a consolidated basis, are able to pay their consolidated debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and liabilities become due, absolute and matured; and (iv) the Company does not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct the business in which it is engaged as such business is now conducted and is proposed to be conducted after the Effective Date.
Solvency
 
SECTION 3.15 
   
. 
Security Interest in Collateral
 
(a) 
   
The Security Agreement shall be effective to create in favor of the Administrative Agent for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties (as defined in the Security Agreement) a valid and enforceable security interest in the Collateral (as defined therein) and the proceeds thereof and (i) when the Collateral (as described therein) constituting certificated securities (as defined in the Uniform Commercial Code (as defined in the Security Agreement)) is delivered to the Administrative Agent thereunder together with instruments of transfer duly endorsed in blank, the security interest of the Administrative Agent therein will constitute a perfected Lien on, and security interest in, all right, title and interest of the Grantors (as defined in the Security Agreement) in such Collateral, prior and superior in right to any other Person (subject only to Liens permitted under Section 6.02 which by operation of law or contract would have priority over the Liens securing the Secured Obligations hereunder) (it being understood that no representation is made under this clause (i) as to (A) any such Collateral that is subject to a Foreign Pledge Agreement or (B) the perfection or priority of any Lien to the extent that such perfection or priority is determined under the law of a jurisdiction outside the United States, which are covered by paragraph (b) below), and (ii) when financing statements in appropriate form are filed in the offices specified on Schedule D to the Security Agreement, the security interest of the Administrative Agent will constitute a perfected Lien on and security interest in all right, title and interest of the Grantors (as defined in the Security Agreement) in the other Collateral (as described therein) and the proceeds thereof to the extent perfection can be obtained by filing Uniform Commercial Code financing statements, prior and superior to the rights of any other Person (subject only to Liens permitted under Section 6.02 which by operation of law or contract would have priority over the Liens securing the Secured Obligations hereunder).
 
 
- 75 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(b) 
   
After taking the actions specified for perfection therein, each Foreign Pledge Agreement, when executed and delivered, will be effective under applicable law to create in favor of the Administrative Agent for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties a valid and enforceable security interest in the Collateral subject thereto, and will constitute a perfected Lien on and security interest in all right, title and interest of the Loan Parties in the Collateral subject thereto, prior and superior to the rights of any other Person (subject only to Liens permitted under Section 6.02).
 
SECTION 3.16 
   
.  Each Loan Party has determined that execution, delivery, and performance of this Agreement and any other Loan Documents to be executed by such Loan Party is within its purpose, will be of direct and indirect benefit to such Loan Party, and is in its best interest.
Consideration
 
SECTION 3.17 
   
.  sets forth, as of the Effective Date, (a) a correct and complete list of the name and relationship to the Company of each and all of the Companys Subsidiaries, (b) a true and complete listing of each class of authorized Equity Interests of each Borrower (other than the Company), of which all of such issued shares are validly issued, outstanding, fully paid and non-assessable (to the extent such concepts are applicable), and owned beneficially and of record by the Persons identified on , and (c) the type of entity of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries.  All of the issued and outstanding Equity Interests owned by any Loan Party in its Subsidiaries has been (to the extent such concepts are relevant with respect to such ownership interests) duly authorized and issued and is fully paid and non assessable.
Capitalization and Subsidiaries
Schedule
3.17
Schedule
3.17
 
SECTION 3.18 
   
.  As of the Effective Date, the insurance required under Section 5.05 is in effect and all premiums in respect of such insurance have been paid.  The Borrowers believe that the insurance maintained by or on behalf of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries are adequate.
Insurance
 
SECTION 3.19 
   
.  As of the Effective Date, there are no strikes, lockouts or slowdowns, and no material unfair labor practice charges, against any Loan Party or its Subsidiaries pending or, to the knowledge of the Borrowers, threatened.  The terms and conditions of employment, hours worked by and payments made to employees of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries have not been in material violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act, or any other applicable federal, provincial, territorial, state, local or foreign law dealing with such matters.  All material payments due from any Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries, or for which any claim may be made against any Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries, on account of wages, vacation pay and employee health and welfare insurance and other benefits, have been paid or accrued as a liability on the books of the Loan Party or such Subsidiary.
Employment Matters
 
 
- 76 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 3.20 
   
.  No Mortgage encumbers improved real property that is located in an area that has been identified by the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development as an area having special flood hazards and in which flood insurance has been made available under the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968.
Regulation H
 
SECTION 3.21 
   
.  As of the Effective Date, the Company has heretofore furnished to the Lenders complete and accurate copies of the BAC LLC Agreement, all other material documents relating to the BAC Joint Venture, and all material documents relating to other material floor plan financing and securitization programs, in each case, as amended as of the date hereof.  Each of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders acknowledges that it has been advised of the confidentiality requirements that apply under Article IX of the BAC LLC Agreement and agrees that it will comply in all respects therewith.
Delivery of Certain Documentation
 
SECTION 3.22 
   
Existing Notes Indenture
.  As of the Effective Date, the basket contained in Section 5.05(b) of the Existing Notes Indenture is entirely unutilized.
 
 
 
SECTION 4.01 
   
.  This Agreement shall become effective on the date (the ) on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 10.02):
Effective Date
Effective Date
 
 
(a)
   
.  The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received (i) from the Company, each direct and indirect Domestic Subsidiary of the Company (other than Immaterial Subsidiaries) and the Required Lenders (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) either (x) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (y) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include facsimile transmission of a signed signature page to this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement and (ii) duly executed copies (which may include facsimile transmission of a signed signature page) of the Loan Documents and such other certificates, documents, instruments and agreements as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, including any promissory notes requested by a Lender pursuant to Section 2.10 payable to the order of each such requesting Lender.
Executed Counterparts
 
(b) 
   
.  The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and dated the Effective Date) of Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, counsel to the Loan Parties, substantially in the form of Exhibit C and such other counsel for the Loan Parties satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, and covering such other matters relating to the Loan Parties, this Agreement or the Transactions as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request (and the Company hereby instructs such counsel to deliver such opinion to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent), in each case in form and substance reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
Opinion of Counsel to the Loan Parties
 
 
- 77 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(c) 
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received satisfactory (i) quarterly projections through 2009, (ii) annual projections from 2010 through 2012 and (iii) a consolidated thirteen-week cash flow forecast of the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Financial Projections
 
(d)
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) a certificate of each Loan Party, dated the Effective Date and executed by its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, which shall (A) certify the resolutions of its Board of Directors, members or other body authorizing the execution, delivery and performance of the Loan Documents to which it is a party, (B) identify by name and title and bear the signatures of the Financial Officers and any other officers or managers of such Loan Party authorized to sign the Loan Documents to which it is a party, and (C) contain appropriate attachments, including the certificate or articles of incorporation or organization of each Loan Party certified by the relevant authority of the jurisdiction of organization of such Loan Party and a true and correct copy of its by-laws or operating, management or partnership agreement, and (ii) a long form good standing certificate for each Loan Party from its jurisdiction of organization.
Closing Certificates; Certified Certificate of Incorporation; Good Standing Certificates
 
(e) 
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, signed by a Financial Officer and dated the Effective Date (i) stating that no Default has occurred and is continuing, (ii) stating that the representations and warranties contained in Article III are true and correct as of such date, and (iii) certifying any other factual matters as may be reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent.
No Default Certificate
 
(f) 
   
.  The Lenders and the Agents shall have received all fees required to be paid, and all expenses for which invoices have been presented (including the reasonable fees and expenses of legal counsel), on or before the Effective Date.
Fees
 
(g)
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received the results of a recent lien search in the jurisdictions of organization of the Loan Parties, and such search shall reveal no Liens on any of the assets of the Loan Parties except for Liens permitted by Section 6.02 or to be discharged pursuant to documentation satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Lien Searches
 
(h)
   
.  Each document (including any Uniform Commercial Code financing statement) required by the Collateral Documents or under law or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to be filed, registered or recorded in order to create in favor of the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a perfected Lien on the Collateral described therein, prior and superior in right to any other Person (other than with respect to Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02 which by operation of law or contract would have priority over the Liens securing the Secured Obligations hereunder), shall be in proper form for filing, registration or recordation or the Administrative Agent shall be satisfied with arrangements in respect thereof.
Filings, Registrations and Recordings
 
 
- 78 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(i) 
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) the certificates representing the shares of Equity Interests of Domestic Subsidiaries pledged pursuant to the Security Agreement as of the Effective Date, together with an undated stock power for each such certificate executed in blank by a duly authorized officer of the pledgor thereof and (ii) each promissory note (if any) pledged to the Administrative Agent pursuant to the Security Agreement that is required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to the Security Agreement as of the Effective Date endorsed (without recourse) in blank (or accompanied by an executed transfer form in blank) by the pledgor thereof.
Pledged Stock; Stock Powers; Pledged Notes
 
(j) 
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received each Deposit Account Control Agreement required to be provided pursuant to Section 7.1 of the Security Agreement; that to the extent such agreements are not provided on the Effective Date, such agreements shall be provided to the Administrative Agent within 60 days, or such other period as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its sole discretion, of the Effective Date.
Control Agreements
provided
 
(k)
   
.  On and as of the Effective Date, no Loans shall be outstanding hereunder.
Closing Availability
 
(l) 
   
.  An appraiser satisfactory to the Administrative Agent shall have been engaged and shall have commenced an appraisal of the Loan Parties Inventory and the Administrative Agent shall be reasonably satisfied with the status thereof.
Appraisals
 
(m)         
.  A field examination of the Accounts, Inventory, related working capital matters, financial information and, if requested by the Administrative Agent, the equipment of the Company and its Subsidiaries and of the related data processing and other systems shall have been commenced and the Administrative Agent shall be reasonably satisfied with the status thereof.
Field Examinations
 
(n)
   
.  All governmental and third-party approvals necessary in connection with the financing contemplated hereunder and the continuing operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries (including shareholder and lender approvals, if any) shall have been obtained and shall be in full force and effect, and all applicable waiting periods shall have expired without any action being taken or threatened by any competent authority that would restrain, prevent or otherwise impose burdensome conditions on the financing contemplated hereby.
Governmental and Third-Party Approval
 
(o)
   
.  Brunswick Financial Services Corporation shall have entered into an amendment to or an agreement to amend the BAC LLC Agreement, on terms reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
BAC LLC Agreement Amendment
 
(p)
   
.  All legal (including tax implications) and regulatory matters shall be reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, including but not limited to compliance with all applicable requirements of Regulations U, T and X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
Legal and Regulatory Matters
 
 
- 79 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(q)
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received, for each Subsidiary Borrower designated as a Subsidiary Borrower as of the Effective Date, such documents and certificates required to be delivered under Section 2.21 to the extent such other documents and certificates are not already being delivered hereunder.
Subsidiary Borrowers
 
(r) .  The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) a Borrowing Base Certificate which calculates the Borrowing Base, and supporting information in connection therewith, together with any additional reports with respect to the Borrowing Base as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request and (ii) all Borrowing Base Supporting Documentation, in each case for the month of October 2008.
   
Borrowing Base Documents
 
(s) 
   
.  Each Lender shall have received, at least five Business Days prior to the Effective Date, all documentation and other information required by regulatory authorities with respect to the Loan Parties under applicable know your customer and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including, without limitation, the Patriot Act, that has been requested.
Other Documents
 
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Company and the Lenders of the Effective Date, which must occur on or prior to 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on December 19, 2008, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding.
 
SECTION 4.02 
   
.  The obligation of each Lender to make any Loan, and of the Issuing Lenders to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is additionally subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event
 
(a) 
   
the representations and warranties of the Loan Parties set forth in this Agreement and in the other Loan Documents shall be true and correct on and as of the date of such Loan or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit (or, if any such representation or warranty is expressly stated to have been made as of a specific earlier date, as of such specific date), as applicable;
 
(b) 
   
at the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Loan or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing; and
 
(c) 
   
at the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Loan or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, the total Credit Exposures shall not exceed the lesser of (x) the Total Commitment or (y) the Borrowing Base then in effect.
 
The making of each Loan and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrowers on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this Section.
 
 
 
Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full in cash and all Letters of Credit shall have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each Loan Party executing this Agreement covenants and agrees, jointly and severally with all of the Loan Parties, with the Lenders that:
 
 
- 80 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 5.01 
   
.  The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements; Borrowing Base and Other Information
 
(a) 
   
as soon as available, but in any event within 75 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company (or such lesser number of days within which the Company shall be required to file its Annual Report on Form 10-K for such fiscal year with the SEC), the audited consolidated balance sheet and related statements of income, shareholders equity and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all reported on by independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a going concern or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
 
(b) 
   
as soon as available, but in any event within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Company (or such lesser number of days within which the Company shall be required to file its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for such fiscal quarter with the SEC), the consolidated balance sheet and related statements of income, shareholders equity and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of such fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by a Financial Officer as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
 
(c) 
   
within the time specified for delivery of financial statements under clause (a) or (b) of this Section, (I) a certificate of a Financial Officer certifying, in the case of financial statements delivered pursuant to clause (b) above, (i) as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes, (ii) as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto and (iii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with (x) the last sentence of Section 6.10 and (y) Section 6.11 (to the extent applicable) and (II) if there shall have been any material change in GAAP or in the application thereof that applies to the Company or any Subsidiary since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04(a) (unless such change shall theretofore have been notified under this subclause (II)), a notification from a Financial Officer as to such change, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such notification;
 
 
- 81 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(d) 
   
concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) of this Section, a certificate of the accounting firm that reported on such financial statements stating whether they obtained knowledge during the course of their examination of such financial statements of any Default or Event of Default with respect to Section 6.11 (which certificate may be limited to the extent required by accounting rules or guidelines);
 
(e) 
   
as soon as available, but in any event not more than 30days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, a copy of the plan and forecast (including a projected consolidated and consolidating balance sheet, income statement and funds flow statement in form acceptable to the Administrative Agent) of the Company for each fiscal quarter of the upcoming fiscal year (the ) in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent;
 
Projections
 
(f) 
   
from and after the Trigger Date, as soon as available, but in any event (A) for the month of November 2008, by January 9, 2009, and otherwise (B) within 15 Business Days of the end of each calendar month (or within three Business Days of the end of each week at any time that Availability is less than the greater of (x) 25% of the Total Commitments and (y) $100,000,000), a Borrowing Base Certificate which calculates the Borrowing Base, and supporting information in connection therewith, together with any additional reports with respect to the Borrowing Base as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request; and the Equipment Component of the Borrowing Base shall be updated (i) from time to time upon receipt of periodic valuation updates received from the Administrative Agents asset valuation experts, or (ii) in the event that the aggregate value of such assets is otherwise impaired to the extent that the Net Orderly Liquidation Value of the equipment included in the Collateral would reasonably be expected to be less than 150% of the Equipment Component, as determined in the Administrative Agent's Permitted Discretion;
 
(g) 
   
as soon as available but in any event within 15 Business Days of the end of each calendar month (or within three Business Days of the end of each week at any time during a Level 3 Minimum Availability Period) and at such other times as may be requested by the Administrative Agent, as of the period then ended, all Borrowing Base Supplemental Documentation;
 
(h) 
   
promptly (i) after the filing thereof, copies of all periodic and other reports, periodic and other certifications of the chief executive officer and chief financial officer of the Company, registration statements and other publicly available materials filed by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with the SEC, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of the SEC, or with any national securities exchange (other than any exhibits to any of the foregoing which are too voluminous to furnish and which are made available by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries on such Persons website and any registration statement on Form S-8 or its equivalent) and (ii) after the distribution thereof, copies of all financial statements, reports, proxy statements and other materials distributed by the Company to its shareholders generally;
 
 
- 82 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(i) 
   
promptly after Moodys or S&P shall have announced a change in the rating established or deemed to have been established for the Index Debt, written notice of such rating change;
 
(j) 
   
promptly following receipt thereof, copies of any documents described in Sections 101(k) or 101(l) of ERISA that any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate may request with respect to any Multiemployer Plan; , that if the Loan Parties or any of the ERISA Affiliates have not requested such documents or notices from the administrator or sponsor of the applicable Multiemployer Plan, then, upon reasonable request of the Administrative Agent, the Loan Parties and/or the ERISA Affiliates shall promptly make a request for such documents or notices from such administrator or sponsor and the Borrowers shall provide copies of such documents and notices promptly after receipt thereof; and
provided
 
(k) 
   
promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or compliance with the terms of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request.
 
Financial statements and other documents required to be delivered pursuant to clause (a), (b), (d) or (h) of this Section (to the extent any such financial statements or other documents are included in reports or other materials otherwise filed with the SEC) may be delivered electronically and if so delivered, shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date on which (i) the Company posts such financial statements or other documents, or provides a link thereto, on the Companys website on the Internet or (ii) such financial statements or other documents are posted on the Companys behalf on an Internet or intranet website, if any, to which each Lender and the Administrative Agent have access (whether a commercial, third-party website or whether sponsored by the Administrative Agent); provided that: (i) the Company shall deliver paper copies of such financial statements and other documents to the Administrative Agent or any Lender that requests the Company to deliver such paper copies until a written request to cease delivering paper copies is given by the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be, and (ii) the Company shall notify the Administrative Agent of the posting of any such financial statements and other documents and provide to the Administrative Agent electronic versions (i.e., soft copies) thereof.
 
SECTION 5.02 
   
.  The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender prompt written notice of the following:
Notices of Material Events
 
(a) 
   
the occurrence of any Default or Event of Default;
 
(b) 
   
any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of, or any receipt of any notice of, any governmental investigation or any litigation, arbitration or administrative proceeding commenced or, to the knowledge of a Financial Officer, threatened against any Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries that (i) could reasonably be expected to result in damages in excess of $35,000,000, (ii) seeks injunctive relief, (iii) alleges criminal misconduct by any Loan Party or any of their Subsidiaries, (iv) contests any tax, fee, assessment, or other governmental charge in excess of $35,000,000, or (v) involves any material product recall;
 
 
- 83 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(c) 
   
any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of any Lien (other than Permitted Encumbrances) or claim made or asserted against all or any material portion of the Collateral;
 
(d) 
   
any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of any loss, damage, or destruction to all or any material portion of the Collateral, whether or not covered by insurance;
 
(e) 
   
any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of the occurrence of any ERISA Event or breach of the representations and warranties in Section 3.09 that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events or breaches of such representations and warranties that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries, whether directly or by virtue of their affiliate with any ERISA Affiliate, in an aggregate amount exceeding $35,000,000;
 
(f) 
   
any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of any event, notice or circumstance or any correspondence with any Governmental Authority (including with respect to any release into the indoor or outdoor environment of any Hazardous Material that is required by any applicable Environmental Law to be reported to a Governmental Authority) which could reasonably be expected to lead to (i) any Environmental Liability in excess of $35,000,000, or (ii) any material adverse change in the matter set forth in Schedule 5.02(f);
 
(g) 
   
any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of any default notice received under or with respect to any leased location or public warehouse where Collateral is located that is material to the conduct of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole (which shall be delivered within 5 Business Days after receipt thereof); and
 
(h) 
   
any event or development that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Company setting forth in reasonable detail the nature of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
 
SECTION 5.03 
   
.  Each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, other than in the case of any Immaterial Subsidiary, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and, except where any of the following could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, the rights, qualifications, licenses, permits, privileges, governmental authorizations, intellectual property rights and franchises used or useful in the conduct of its business, and maintain all requisite authority to conduct its business in each jurisdiction in which its business is conducted; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under Section 6.03.
Existence; Conduct of Business
provided
 
 
- 84 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 5.04 
   
.  Each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay or discharge all Material Indebtedness and all other material liabilities, including Taxes before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and such Loan Party or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP or (b) the failure to make payment could not reasonably be expected to individually or in the aggregate result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes and Other Obligations
 
SECTION 5.05 
   
.  Each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, (a) keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted, and (b)  maintain with financially sound and reputable insurance companies having a financial strength rating of at least A- by A.M. Best Company (x) insurance in such amounts (with no greater risk retention) and against such risks (including loss or damage by fire and loss in transit; theft, burglary, pilferage, larceny, embezzlement, and other criminal activities; business interruption; and general liability) and such other hazards, as is customarily maintained by companies of established repute engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations and (y) all insurance required pursuant to the Collateral Documents.  The Loan Parties will furnish to the Lenders, upon request of the Administrative Agent, information in reasonable detail as to the insurance so maintained, which may be a Memorandum of Insurance.  The Loan Parties shall require all such policies to name the Administrative Agent (on behalf of the Agents, the Lenders and the Issuing Lenders) as additional insured or loss payee, as applicable.
Maintenance of Properties; Insurance
 
SECTION 5.06 
   
.  Without limiting Sections 5.10 or 5.11 hereof, each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, (i) keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities and (ii) permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender (including employees of the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any consultants, accountants, lawyers and appraisers retained by the Administrative Agent or any Lender), upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested and all with a representative of the Company present.  The Loan Parties acknowledge that the Administrative Agent, after exercising its rights of inspection, may prepare and distribute to the Lenders certain Reports pertaining to the Loan Parties and their respective Subsidiaries assets for internal use by the Administrative Agent and the Lenders.
Books and Records; Inspection Rights
 
SECTION 5.07 
   
.  (a)  Each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all Requirements of Law applicable to it or its property and all Contractual Obligations, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws and Obligations
 
 
- 85 - -
 
 
(b)
 
The Loan Parties and each of their Subsidiaries shall, and shall take all reasonable efforts to ensure that all of its tenants, subtenants, contractors, subcontractors and invitees shall, (i) be at all times in compliance with all Environmental Laws and (ii) ensure that their assets and operations are in compliance with all Environmental Laws (including with respect to any Hazardous Materials that are discharged, emitted, released, generated, used, stored, managed, transported or otherwise dealt with).  For purposes of this Section 5.07(b), noncompliance with either of subclauses (i) and (ii) shall be deemed not to constitute a breach of this covenant if upon learning of any actual or alleged noncompliance, such Loan Party shall promptly undertake reasonable efforts to achieve compliance and provided that any failure to comply with any of the foregoing could not, either individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 5.08 
   
.  The proceeds of the Loans will be used, and Letters of Credit will be issued, only for general corporate purposes of the Company and its Subsidiaries including acquisitions otherwise permitted hereunder.  No part of the proceeds of any Loan and no Letter of Credit will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations T, U and X as in effect from time to time.
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit
 
SECTION 5.09 
   
.  Each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, promptly from time to time obtain or make and maintain in full force and effect all licenses, consents, authorizations and approvals of, and filings and registrations with, any Governmental Authority from time to time necessary under the laws of the jurisdiction in which each Loan Party is located for the making and performance by each such Loan Parties of the Loan Documents.
Governmental Authorizations
 
SECTION 5.10 
   
.  On no more than two occasions per calendar year, at the request of the Administrative Agent, the Loan Parties will provide the Administrative Agent with appraisals or updates thereof of their Inventory (and, if applicable, their Eligible Equipment) from an appraiser selected and engaged by the Administrative Agent, and prepared on a basis satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, such appraisals and updates to include, without limitation, information required by applicable law and regulations; , that if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, there shall be no limitation on the number of such appraisals.  For purposes of this Section 5.10, it is understood and agreed that a single appraisal may consist of examinations conducted at multiple relevant sites and involve one or more relevant Loan Parties and their assets.  All such appraisals shall be at the sole expense of the Loan Parties.
Appraisals
provided
however
 
SECTION 5.11 
   
.  On no more than two occasions per calendar year, at the request of the Administrative Agent, the Loan Parties will permit, upon reasonable notice, the Administrative Agent to conduct a field examination to ensure the adequacy of Collateral included in the Borrowing Base and related reporting and control systems.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, in addition to the two semi-annual field examinations permitted above, in the event that, at any time after the Trigger Date, Availability is less than $100,000,000 for any period of 30 consecutive days in any calendar year, one additional field examination shall be permitted for such year; , that if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, there shall be no limitation on the number or frequency of field examinations.  For purposes of this Section 5.11, it is understood and agreed that a single field examination may be conducted at multiple relevant sites and involve one or more relevant Loan Parties and their assets.  All such field examinations shall be at the sole expense of the Loan Parties.
Field Examinations
provided
however
 
 
- 86 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 5.12 
   
.  The Borrowers (a) will furnish to the Administrative Agent (for delivery to the Lenders) prompt written notice of any casualty or other insured damage to any material portion of the Collateral or the commencement of any action or proceeding for the taking of any material portion of the Collateral or interest therein under power of eminent domain or by condemnation or similar proceeding and (b) will ensure that the net proceeds of any such event (whether in the form of insurance proceeds, condemnation awards or otherwise) are collected and applied in accordance with the applicable provisions of this Agreement and the Collateral Documents.
Casualty and Condemnation
 
SECTION 5.13 
   
.  (a)  Subject to applicable law, the Borrowers and each Subsidiary that is a Loan Party may at its election cause any of its Subsidiaries, and shall (within 30 days after such formation or acquisition, or determination that such Subsidiary is no longer an Immaterial Subsidiary, or such longer period as may be agreed to by the Administrative Agent) cause each of its Domestic Subsidiaries (other than Immaterial Subsidiaries) formed or acquired after the Effective Date or which ceases to be an Immaterial Subsidiary after the Effective Date, in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, to (A) become a Loan Party by executing the Joinder Agreement set forth as Exhibit G hereto (the ) and (B) to execute and deliver such amendments, supplements or documents of accession to any Collateral Documents as the Administrative Agent deems necessary for such Subsidiary to grant to the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) a perfected first priority security interest in the Collateral described in such Collateral Document with respect to such Subsidiary, subject only to Liens permitted under Section 6.02.  Upon execution and delivery of such documents and agreements, each such Person (i) shall automatically become a Guarantor hereunder and thereupon shall have all of the rights, benefits, duties, and obligations in such capacity under the Loan Documents and (ii) will grant Liens to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties), in any property of such Loan Party which constitutes Collateral.
Additional Collateral; Further Assurances
Joinder Agreement
 
(b) 
   
The Borrowers and each Subsidiary that is a Loan Party will cause (i) 100% of the issued and outstanding Equity Interests of each of its Domestic Subsidiaries and (ii) 65% of the issued and outstanding Equity Interests entitled to vote (within the meaning of Treas. Reg. Section 1.956-2(c)(2)) and 100% of the issued and outstanding Equity Interests not entitled to vote (within the meaning of Treas. Reg. Section 1.956-2(c)(2) in each Foreign Subsidiary directly owned by a Borrower or any Domestic Subsidiary to be subject at all times to a first priority, perfected Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Loan Documents as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request.
 
(c) 
   
Without limiting the foregoing, each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, execute and deliver, or cause to be executed and delivered, to the Administrative Agent such documents, agreements and instruments, and will take or cause to be taken such further actions (including the filing and recording of financing statements, fixture filings, mortgages, deeds of trust and other documents and such other actions or deliveries of the type required by Section 4.01, as applicable), which may be required by law or which the Administrative Agent may, from time to time, reasonably request to carry out the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and to ensure perfection and priority of the Liens created or intended to be created by the Collateral Documents, all at the expense of the Loan Parties.  In addition, each Loan Party will execute and deliver, or cause to be executed and delivered, to the Administrative Agent filings with any governmental recording or registration office in any jurisdiction required by the Administrative Agent, in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion, in order to perfect or protect the Liens of the Administrative Agent granted under any Collateral Document in any Intellectual Property.
 
 
- 87 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(d) 
   
If any material assets (including real estate) are acquired by the Borrowers or any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party after the Effective Date (other than assets constituting Collateral under the Security Agreement that become subject to the Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties upon acquisition thereof), the Borrowers will notify the Administrative Agent and the Lenders thereof, and, if requested by the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders, the Borrowers, pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Loan Documents, will, subject to paragraph (e) below, cause such assets to be subjected to a first priority, perfected Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties, subject only to Liens permitted under Section 6.02, pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Loan Documents and will take, and cause the other Loan Parties to take, such actions as shall be necessary or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to grant and perfect such Liens, including actions described in paragraph (b) of this Section, all at the expense of the Loan Parties.
 
(e) 
   
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement or any Loan Document to the contrary, Excluded Property will be excluded from the requirements of paragraphs (a) through (d) above.  Without limiting the foregoing, (A) none of the following real estate shall be required to be made subject to a mortgage:  (1) real estate included in the Available Collateral, (2) real estate that is not owned by a Loan Party, (3) any property having a fair value less than $10,000,000 so long as the fair value of all property excluded pursuant to this clause (3) does not exceed $50,000,000 in the aggregate, and (4) real estate owned by the Company or by a Loan Party that is a "Restricted Subsidiary" under the Existing Notes Indenture; (B) no Foreign Pledge Agreement shall be required to be delivered except as agreed by the Company and the Administrative Agent in a letter agreement relating to post-closing collateral matters; and (C) no Loan Party shall be required to pledge any Equity Interest in Brunswick Financial Services Corporation and Brunswick Financial Services Corporation shall not be required to become a Loan Party.
 
.  The Company shall determine the aggrregate balance of cash and Cash Equivalents of all Loan Parties in accounts not subject to Deposit Account Control Agreements, Securities Account Control Agreements or other appropriate control agreements in favor of the Administrative Agent in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent at each time when the Company determines account balances for purposes of Borrowing Base reporting, and if such aggregate balance shall at any time of determination exceed $20,000,000 the Company shall promptly eliminate such excess from such accounts or shall within 30 days enter into one or more Deposit Account Control Agreements, Securities Account Control Agreements or other appropriate control agreements in favor of the Administrative Agent in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent so that there shall not thereafter be any such excess.
SECTION 5.14 
   
Deposit Accounts
 
 
- 88 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees, expenses and other amounts payable under any Loan Document have been paid in full in cash and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Loan Parties covenant and agree, jointly and severally, with the Lenders that:
 
SECTION 6.01 
   
Indebtedness; Preferred Stock
 
SECTION 6.01A        
Indebtedness
.  No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, create, incur or suffer to exist any Indebtedness, except:
 
(a) 
   
the Secured Obligations;
 
(b) 
   
Indebtedness existing on the date hereof and set forth on Schedule 6.01A and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness in accordance with clause (f) hereof;
 
(c) 
   
Indebtedness of any Borrower to any Subsidiary or any other Borrower and of any Subsidiary to any Borrower or any other  Subsidiary, that (i) Indebtedness of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to any Borrower or any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.06 and (ii) Indebtedness of any Borrower to any Subsidiary and Indebtedness of any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party to any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be subordinated in bankruptcy to the Secured Obligations on terms reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (it being understood that the Company shall have in place agreements for such subordination within 60 days, or such other period as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its sole discretion, of the Effective Date);
provided
 
(d) 
   
Guarantees by any Borrower of Indebtedness of any Subsidiary or any other Borrower and by any Subsidiary of Indebtedness of any Borrower or any other Subsidiary, that (i) the Indebtedness so Guaranteed is permitted by this Section 6.01A, (ii) Guarantees by any Borrower or any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party of Indebtedness of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.06 and (iii) Guarantees permitted under this clause (d) shall be subordinated to the Secured Obligations of the applicable Subsidiary if, and on the same terms as, the Indebtedness so Guaranteed is subordinated to the Secured Obligations;
provided
 
(e) 
   
Indebtedness of any Borrower or any Subsidiary incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets (whether or not constituting purchase money Indebtedness), including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof; that (i) such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 180 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (e), together with the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated pursuant to clause (i) of Section 6.07, shall not exceed $50,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
 
- 89 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(f) 
   
Indebtedness which represents an extension, refinancing, replacement or renewal of any of the Indebtedness described in clauses (b),(e), (i), (j), (k), or (l) hereof; provided that, (i) the principal amount of such Indebtedness is not increased (except to the extent used to finance accrued interest and premium (including tender or makewhole premiums) thereon and underwriting discounts, defeasance costs, fees, commissions and expenses), (ii) any Liens securing such Indebtedness are not extended to any additional property of any Loan Party or any of their respective Subsidiaries or, if the original Indebtedness was unsecured, then the refinancing, renewal or extension Indebtedness shall be unsecured (other than with Available Collateral), (iii) no Loan Party or Subsidiary of any Loan Party that is not originally obligated with respect to repayment of such Indebtedness is required to become obligated with respect thereto, (iv) such extension, refinancing or renewal does not result in a shortening of the average weighted maturity of the Indebtedness so extended, refinanced or renewed, (v) the terms of any such extension, refinancing, or renewal (taken as a whole) are not more restrictive, taken as a whole, than the terms of this Agreement and (vi) if the Indebtedness that is refinanced, renewed, or extended was subordinated in right of payment to the Secured Obligations, then the terms and conditions of the refinancing, renewal, or extension Indebtedness must include subordination terms and conditions that are at least as favorable to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders as those that were applicable to the refinanced, renewed, or extended Indebtedness;
 
(g) 
   
Indebtedness owed to any Person providing workers compensation, health, disability or other employee benefits or property, casualty or liability insurance, pursuant to reimbursement or indemnification obligations to such Person, in each case incurred in the ordinary course of business;
 
(h) 
   
Indebtedness of any Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of performance bonds, bid bonds, appeal bonds, surety bonds and similar obligations, in each case provided in the ordinary course of business;
 
(i) 
   
Indebtedness of the Company, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary that owns Available Collateral incurred to refinance the Existing 2011 Notes; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (i) shall not exceed the outstanding principal amount of the Existing 2011 Notes plus any accrued interest and premiums and any underwriting discounts, defeasance costs, fees, commissions and expenses reasonably incurred in connection with the refinancing; that immediately after giving pro forma effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing;
provided
provided
further
 
(j) 
   
(i) unsecured subordinated Indebtedness of the Company having no scheduled principal payments or prepayments prior to the Commitment Termination Date; that both immediately before and immediately after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing; and (ii) other unsecured Indebtedness of the Company (including preferred Equity Interests) having no scheduled principal payments or prepayments prior to the Commitment Termination Date; that both immediately before and immediately after giving effect thereto, (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (B) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for the Test Period in effect at the time of the incurrence of such Indebtedness shall be at least 1.25 to 1.00 and (C) after giving effect to the application of the proceeds thereof, no Level 3 Minimum Availability Period shall be in effect; the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this paragraph (j), together with the liquidation value of all preferred Equity Interests (excluding the liquidation value of any preferred Equity Interests issued as pay-in-kind dividends or distributions) of the Company issued pursuant to Section 6.10B after the Effective Date, shall not exceed $250,000,000at any time outstanding;
provided
pro
forma
provided
pro
forma
provided
further
 
 
 
- 90 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(k) 
   
Indebtedness of Foreign Subsidiaries or of Foreign Holdcos and unsecured Guarantees of such Indebtedness by the Company; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this paragraph (k), together with the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated pursuant to clause (iv) of Section 6.07, shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
(l) 
   
Indebtedness of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the date hereof; that (i) such Indebtedness exists at the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such Person becoming a Subsidiary and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (l) shall not exceed $35,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
(m) 
   
Indebtedness arising out of Capital Leases incurred in connection with sale and leaseback transactions permitted by Section 6.07;
 
(n) 
   
Indebtedness arising in respect of the Mercury Facility which shall not exceed $150,000,000 in aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding;
 
(o) 
   
Indebtedness of the Company, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary that owns Available Collateral that is secured by Available Collateral; that the aggregate principal amount of the Indebtedness incurred pursuant to this paragraph (o), together with the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated pursuant to clause (iii) of Section 6.07, shall not to exceed $70,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
(p) 
   
Indebtedness arising out of customer deposits in the ordinary course of business;
 
(q) 
   
Indebtedness with respect to surety bonds and similar arrangements incurred in the ordinary course of business;
 
(r) 
   
Indebtedness arising in connection with any Permitted Foreign Securitization;
 
(s) 
   
Indebtedness of the Company incurred in connection with insurance premium financing arrangements not to exceed $10,000,000 in the aggregate at any time outstanding; and
 
(t) 
   
other Indebtedness not to exceed $10,000,000 at any time outstanding.
 
SECTION 6.01B 
   
Preferred Stock
The Company will not issue any preferred Equity Interests, except preferred Equity Interests the liquidation value of which (excluding the liquidation value of any preferred Equity Interests issued as pay-in-kind dividends or distributions), together with the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness incurred pursuant to Section 6.01A(j), shall not exceed $250,000,000 at any time outstanding, that both immediately before and immediately after giving pro forma effect to any such issuance of preferred Equity Interests, (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (B) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for the Text Period in effect at the time of the issuance of such preferred Equity Interests shall be at least 1.25 to 1.00 and (C) after giving effect to the application of the proceeds thereof, no Level 3 Minimum Availability Period shall be in effect.
. 
provided
 
 
- 91 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 6.02 
   
  No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof except:
.
Liens
 
(a) 
   
Liens created pursuant to any Loan Document;
 
(b) 
   
Permitted Encumbrances;
 
(c) 
   
any Lien on any property or asset of any Borrower or any Subsidiary existing on the date hereof and listed in Schedule 6.02; that (i) no such Lien shall extend to any other property or asset of any Borrower or any Subsidiary and (ii) any such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that are permitted hereby;
provided
 
(d) 
   
Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by any Borrower or any Subsidiary; that (i) such security interests secure Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A(e), (ii) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 180 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement, (iii) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the cost of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets and (iv) such security interests shall not apply to any other property or assets of such Borrower or Subsidiary or any other Borrower or Subsidiary;
provided
 
(e) 
   
any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by any Borrower or any Subsidiary or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary or is merged or consolidated with any Borrower or any Subsidiary after the date hereof prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary or is so merged or consolidated securing Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01A(l); that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition, merger or consolidation or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of such Borrower or Subsidiary or any other Borrower or Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of such acquisition, merger or consolidation or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that are permitted hereby;
provided
 
(f) 
   
interests of a lessor under any Capital Lease entered into in connection with sale and leaseback transactions permitted pursuant to Section 6.07;
 
(g) 
   
Liens granted by a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party in favor of any Borrower or another Loan Party in respect of Indebtedness owed by such Subsidiary;
 
 
- 92 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(h) 
   
Liens on property or assets of Foreign Subsidiaries and Foreign Holdcos outside the United States of America and Liens on Foreign Receivables securing Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A(k);
 
(i) 
   
Liens securing Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A(i); that such Liens are limited to (i) Liens on the Available Collateral and (ii) second priority Liens on the Collateral (subject to the delivery of an intercreditor agreement in form customary for financings of such type and otherwise satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion); Liens securing Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A(o); that such Liens are limited to Liens on the Available Collateral; and Liens on cash and Cash Equivalents securing Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A(p) or (q);
provided
provided
 
(j) 
   
Liens on Mercury-Marine division receivables that are owed by Account Debtors that are organized under any applicable law of the United States, any state of the United States or the District of Columbia and related assets securing the Mercury Facility;
 
(k) 
   
Liens on Foreign Receivables and related assets arising in connection with any Permitted Foreign Securitization;
 
(l) 
   
Liens consisting of rights of first refusal, put/sale options and other customary arrangements with respect to, and restrictions on, the sale, pledge or other transfer of Equity Interests in Persons in which not all the Equity Interests are owned by the Company and its Subsidiaries;
 
(m) 
   
Liens arising from precautionary UCC financing statements or other Lien filings made in respect of any lease or other Disposition permitted by this Agreement;
 
(n) 
   
Liens on rights in respect of insurance premiums paid on behalf of the Company securing Indebtedness permitted pursuant to Section 6.01A(s); and
 
(o) 
   
other Liens securing obligations in an aggregate amount outstanding at any time not in excess of $10,000,000.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, none of the Liens permitted pursuant to this Section 6.02 may at any time attach to any Loan Partys (i) Accounts, other than involuntary Permitted Encumbrances and those permitted under paragraph (a), (c), (e), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k) or (m), (ii) Inventory, other than involuntary Permitted Encumbrances and those permitted under paragraph (a), (c), (e), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k) or (m) above and (iii) assets (other than the Headquarters) to the extent such Liens would constitute a utilization of Section 5.05(b) of the Existing Notes Indenture, other than those permitted under paragraph (a) above.  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement or any Collateral Document (including any provision for, reference to, or acknowledgement of, any Lien), nothing herein and no approval by the Administrative Agent or the Lenders of any Lien (whether such approval is oral or in writing) shall be construed as or deemed to constitute a subordination by the Administrative Agent or the Lenders of any security interest or other right, interest or Lien in or to the Collateral or any part thereof in favor of any Lien or any holder of any Lien.
 
SECTION 6.03 
   
.  (a)  No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing (i) any Borrower (other than the Company) or any Subsidiary of a Borrower may merge into a Borrower in a transaction in which a Borrower is the surviving entity, (ii) any Loan Party (other than a Borrower) may merge into any Loan Party in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Loan Party, (iii) any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party may liquidate or dissolve if the Company determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Company and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders, (iv) any non-Loan Party may merge into, or consolidate with, a Loan Party in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Loan Party and (v) any non-Loan Party may merge into, or consolidate with, another non-Loan Party; that any such merger involving a Person that is not a wholly-owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by Section 6.06.
Fundamental Changes
provided
 
 
- 93 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(b) 
   
No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by any of the Borrowers and their Subsidiaries on the date of execution of this Agreement and businesses reasonably related thereto.
 
SECTION 6.04 
   
.  No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, make any Disposition of its property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired (including receivables and leasehold interests and any Equity Interest owned by it), nor will any Loan Party permit any of its Subsidiaries to issue any additional Equity Interest in such Subsidiary (other than to another Borrower or another Subsidiary in compliance with Section 6.05), except for:
Dispositions
 
(a) 
   
sales, transfers and dispositions of inventory in the ordinary course of business;
 
(b) 
   
Dispositions to any Borrower or any other Subsidiary, provided that any such Dispositions by a Loan Party to a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be deemed to be an Investment and shall be made in compliance with Section 6.06;
 
(c) 
   
Dispositions of accounts receivable in connection with the compromise, settlement or collection thereof in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices;
 
(d) 
   
Dispositions that are Investments permitted by Section 6.06;
 
(e) 
   
sales to effect sale and leaseback transactions permitted by Section 6.07;
 
(f) 
   
Dispositions resulting from any casualty or other insured damage to, or any taking under power of eminent domain or by condemnation or similar proceeding of, any property or asset of any Borrower or any Subsidiary;
 
(g) 
   
Dispositions of assets (other than Equity Interests in a Subsidiary of the Company unless all such Equity Interests in such Subsidiary are sold) that are not permitted by any other paragraph of this Section, that the fair market value of all assets sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of in reliance upon this paragraph (g) shall not exceed $360,000,000 in the aggregate, net of the aggregate fair market value of all assets of the Bowling & Billiards Division and the Fitness Division acquired after September 30, 2008, and, in any fiscal year, shall not exceed $120,000,000 in the aggregate, net of the aggregate fair market value of all assets of the Bowling & Billiards Division and the Fitness Division acquired after September 30, 2008; that (i) no more than $37,000,000 in the aggregate of the assets of the Bowling & Billiards Division, net of the aggregate fair market value of all assets of the Bowling & Billiards Division acquired after September 30, 2008, may be sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of in reliance upon this paragraph (g), and (ii) and no more than $67,000,000 in the aggregate of the assets of the Fitness Division, net of the aggregate fair market value of all assets of the Fitness Division acquired after September 30, 2008, may be sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of in reliance upon this paragraph (g);
provided
provided
further
 
 
- 94 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(h) 
   
Restricted Payments permitted by Section 6.08;
 
(i) 
   
Dispositions listed on Schedule 6.04;
 
(j) 
   
Dispositions of cash and Cash Equivalents in the ordinary course of business or in connection with a transaction otherwise permitted under this Agreement;
 
(k) 
   
Dispositions in connection with a Permitted Foreign Securitization;
 
(l) 
   
Dispositions of receivables, leases and secured loans in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices in connection with customer finance programs; and
 
(m) 
   
Dispositions of Inventory between or among any Borrower and any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices;
 
that all Dispositions permitted hereby (other than those permitted by paragraphs (b) (to the extent the applicable transaction is solely among Loan Parties), and (f), (h) and (m) above) shall be made for fair value and (other than Permitted Non-Cash Sales and other than those permitted by paragraphs (b), (c), (d), (f), (h), (j) and (m)above) for at least 75% cash consideration.   means Dispositions for less than 75% cash consideration that taken together include assets having a fair value (net of liabilities assumed by the purchasers in connection with such Dispositions) of not more than $25,000,000, it being understood that a Disposition shall be deemed to be for 75% cash consideration from and after the date on which the aggregate cash consideration realized in respect of such Disposition (whether through cash payments made in respect of notes taken as initial consideration or cash payments received in respect of a further Disposition of any initial consideration or otherwise) equals or exceeds 75% of the total consideration received in respect thereof.
provided
 
Permitted Non-Cash Sales
 
SECTION 6.05 
   
.  No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, lease or otherwise transfer any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) transactions that are at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to such Borrower or such Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arms-length basis from unrelated third parties, (b) transactions solely between or among any Borrower and any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party not involving any other Affiliate, (c) any loans, advances, Guarantees and other Investments permitted by Section 6.06(b), (c), (d), (f), (i) or (l), (d) any Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01A(b), (c), (d) or, to the extent relating to the foregoing, (f), (e) any Restricted Payment permitted by Section 6.08, (f) loans or advances to employees permitted under Section 6.06, (g) the payment of reasonable fees to directors of any Borrower or any Subsidiary who are not employees of such Borrower or Subsidiary, and compensation and employee benefit arrangements paid to, and indemnities provided for the benefit of, directors, officers or employees of the Borrowers or their Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business, (h) any issuances of securities or other payments, awards or grants in cash, securities or otherwise pursuant to, or the funding of, employment agreements, stock options, equity incentive and stock ownership plans approved by a Borrowers or Subsidiarys board of directors and the 2005 Elective Deferred Incentive Compensation Plan, (i) transactions with the BAC Joint Venture consisting of (x) receivables securitizations entered into in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices (y) cash equity contributions by the Company and/or any Subsidiary to the BAC Joint Venture permitted by Section 6.06(n), (j) transactions arising in connection with any Permitted Foreign Securitization, and (k) sales of Inventory permitted by Section 6.04(m).
Transactions with Affiliates
 
 
- 95 - -
 
 
SECTION 6.06 
   
.  No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a Loan Party and a wholly owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any Equity Interests, evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances or extensions of credit to, Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person constituting a business unit (whether through purchase of assets, merger or otherwise) (each such transaction, an ), except:
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions
Investment
 
(a) 
   
Cash Equivalents;
 
(b) 
   
Investments in existence on the date of this Agreement and described on Schedule 6.06;
 
(c) 
   
intercompany Investments (including intercompany Guarantees of Indebtedness) by the Company in any Subsidiary or by any Subsidiary in the Company or any other Subsidiary; that the aggregate amount of any Investments made after the Effective Date in reliance on this paragraph (c) by Loan Parties in Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties (other than Investments arising as a result of cash management transactions in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices and Guarantees permitted under Section 6.01A(k)) shall not exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding plus, so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect thereto, (i) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (ii) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for the Test Period in effect at the time such Investment is to occur is at least 1.25 to 1.00 (determined on a Pro Forma Basis in respect of the Test Period in effect at such time) and (iii) no Level 3 Minimum Availability Period shall be in effect, an amount not to exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
pro
forma
 
 
- 96 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(d) 
   
Guarantees constituting Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A; that the aggregate amount of any Guarantees incurred in reliance on this paragraph (d) by any Loan Party of any Indebtedness of Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties shall not exceed $10,000,000;
provided
 
(e) 
   
loans or advances made by any Loan Party and the Subsidiaries to their employees on an arms-length basis in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices for travel and entertainment expenses, relocation costs and similar purposes up to a maximum of $10,000,000 in the aggregate at any time outstanding;
 
(f) 
   
notes payable, or stock or other securities issued by Account Debtors to any Loan Party pursuant to negotiated agreements with respect to settlement of such Account Debtors Accounts and other Investments arising in connection with the compromise, settlement or collection of accounts receivable, in each case in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices;
 
(g) 
   
Investments in the form of Swap Agreements permitted by Section 6.12;
 
(
h) 
   
Investments of any Person existing at the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary of the Company or consolidates or merges with the Company or any of the Subsidiaries (including in connection with a Permitted Acquisition) so long as such Investments were not made in contemplation of such Person becoming a Subsidiary or of such merger;
 
(i) 
   
Investments received in connection with the dispositions of assets permitted by Section 6.04;
 
(j) 
   
Investments constituting deposits described in clauses (c) and (d) of the definition of the term Permitted Encumbrances.;
 
(k) 
   
Permitted Acquisitions from and after the Trigger Date, so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Permitted Acquisition, (i) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result therefrom, (ii) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for the Test Period in effect at the time such Permitted Acquisition is to occur shall be at least 1.25 to 1.00 (determined on a Pro Forma Basis in respect of the Test Period in effect at such time), and (iii) no Level 3 Minimum Availability Period shall be in effect;
pro
forma
 
(l) 
   
Guarantees of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of leases (other than Capital Leases) or of other obligations that do not constitute Indebtedness, in each case entered into in the ordinary course of business;
 
(m) 
   
other Investments not otherwise permitted by this Section 6.06 in an aggregate amount in any fiscal year not to exceed (x) when combined with Sections 6.08(a)(v) and 6.08(b)(vi), $5,000,000 plus (y) so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Investment (i) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result therefrom, (ii) the Leverage Ratio for the Test Period in effect at the time such Investment is to occur shall be less than or equal to 2.50 to 1.00 (determined on a Pro Forma Basis in respect of the Test Period in effect at such time) and (iii) no Level 3 Minimum Availability Period shall be in effect, the Available Amount that is Not Otherwise Applied;
pro
forma
 
 
- 97 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(n) 
   
Investments in the BAC Joint Venture (A) existing on the Effective Date, and (B) made after the Effective Date pursuant to the BAC Joint Venture Obligations in accordance with the BAC LLC Agreement as in effect on the Effective Date (or as amended in accordance with Section 6.10); and Investments made in Brunswick Financial Services Corporation to the extent the proceeds thereof are applied to make any such Investment in the BAC Joint Venture;
 
(o) 
   
(i) Investments in the joint ventures identified on Schedule 6.06(o) from and after the Trigger Date in an aggregate amount not to exceed $10,000,000 at any time outstanding; that immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Investment, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result therefrom; (ii) Investments from and after the Trigger Date to acquire minority interests in Foreign Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount not to exceed $10,000,000 at any time outstanding; that immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Investment, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result therefrom; and (iii) additional Investments in joint ventures and Permitted Foreign Acquisitions, in each case, from and after the Trigger Date so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Investment or Permitted Foreign Acquisitions (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result therefrom, (B) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for the Test Period in effect at the time of such Investment is to occur shall be at least 1.25 to 1.00 (determined on a Pro Forma Basis in respect of the Test Period in effect at such time), (C) no Level 3 Minimum Availability Period shall be in Effect, and (D) the aggregate amount of all Investments permitted by this paragraph (o) shall not exceed $30,000,000;
provided
pro
forma
provided
pro
forma
pro
forma
 
(p) 
   
Investments acquired as a result of the performance of Customer Finance Program Obligations and other Investments arising in connection with the compromise, settlement or collection of such Investments in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices; Investments consisting of Indebtedness of customers held pending Disposition pursuant to a customer finance program in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices; and Investments in an aggregate amount not to exceed $5,000,000 at any time outstanding of Blue Water Dealer Services, Inc. consisting of Indebtedness of retail customers held until funded by a retail finance lender;
 
(q) 
   
Investments arising in connection with any Permitted Foreign Securitization;
 
(r) 
   
Investments from and after the Trigger Date to acquire Bowling Assets in an aggregate amount not to exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding; that immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Investment, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result therefrom; and
provided
pro
forma
 
 
- 98 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(s) 
   
other Investments not otherwise permitted by this Section 6.06 in an aggregate amount not to exceed $25,000,000 at any time outstanding.
 
SECTION 6.07 
   
.  No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, whereby it shall sell or transfer any property, real or personal, used or useful in its business, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, and thereafter rent or lease such property or other property that it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property sold or transferred, except for (i) any such sale of any fixed or capital assets by any Borrower or any Subsidiary that is made for cash consideration in an amount not less than the fair value of such fixed or capital asset and is consummated within 180 days after such Borrower or such Subsidiary acquires or completes the construction of such fixed or capital asset, that the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated pursuant to this clause (i), together with the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness incurred under Section 6.01A(e) at any time outstanding, shall not exceed $50,000,000, (ii) Permitted Refinancing Sale and Leaseback Transactions, (iii) Permitted Other Sale and Leaseback Transactions in an aggregate amount, together with the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness incurred under Section 6.01A(o) at any time outstanding, not to exceed $70,000,000 and (iv) Permitted Foreign Sale and Leaseback Transactions in an aggregate amount, together with the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness incurred under Section 6.01A(k) at any time outstanding, not to exceed $100,000,000.
Sale and Leaseback Transactions
provided
 
SECTION 6.08 
   
 
.
Restricted Payments; Certain Payments of Indebtedness
 
(a) 
   
No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, declare or make, or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, or incur any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to do so, except (i) each Loan Party and its Subsidiaries may declare and pay dividends or other distributions with respect to its common Equity Interests payable solely in additional shares of its common Equity Interests, and, with respect to its preferred Equity Interests, payable solely in additional shares of such preferred Equity Interests or in shares of its common Equity Interests, (ii) Subsidiaries may declare and pay dividends ratably with respect to their Equity Interests, (iii) the Company may make Restricted Payments, not exceeding $2,000,000 during any fiscal year, pursuant to and in accordance with stock option plans or other benefit plans for management or employees of the Company and any of its Subsidiaries and for deceased and terminated employees and present and former directors (including their estates), (iv) the Company may declare and pay dividends with respect to any preferred Equity Interests issued pursuant to Section 6.01B and (v) the Company may make other Restricted Payments in an aggregate amount in any fiscal year not to exceed the sum of (x) when combined with Sections 6.06(m) and 6.08(b)(vi), $5,000,000 plus (y) so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Restricted Payment (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (B) the Leverage Ratio for the Test Period in effect at the time such Restricted Payment is to occur shall be less than or equal to 2.50 to 1.00 (determined on a Pro Forma Basis in respect of the Test Period in effect at such time) and (C) no Level 3 Minimum Availability Period shall be in effect, the Available Amount that is Not Otherwise Applied.
pro
forma
 
 
- 99 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(b) 
   
No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, make or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) of or in respect of principal of or interest on any Indebtedness, or any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any Indebtedness, except:
 
(i) 
   
payment of Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents;
 
(ii) 
   
payment of regularly scheduled interest and principal payments as and when due in respect of any Indebtedness, other than payments in respect of the Subordinated Indebtedness prohibited by the subordination provisions thereof;
 
(iii) 
   
 
refinancings of Indebtedness to the extent permitted by Section 6.01A;
 
(iv) 
   
payment of secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the Disposition of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
 
(v) 
   
payment of Indebtedness owed to the Company or any other Loan Party, payment of Indebtedness owed to any Subsidiary arising in respect of cash management transactions in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices, and payment of any Indebtedness owed to any Subsidiary that was originally incurred as a cash management transaction in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices;
 
(vi) 
   
payment of Indebtedness under overdraft facilities and under short-term or demand credit facilities;
 
(vii) 
   
other payments in respect of Indebtedness in an aggregate amount in any fiscal year not to exceed the sum of (x) when combined with Sections 6.06(m) and 6.08(a)(v), $5,000,000 plus (y) so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such payment (A) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (B) the Leverage Ratio for the Test Period in effect at the time such payment is to occur shall be less than or equal to 2.50 to 1.00 (determined on a Pro Forma Basis in respect of the Test Period in effect at such time) and (C) no Level 3 Minimum Availability Period shall be in effect, the Available Amount that is Not Otherwise Applied; and
pro
forma
 
(viii) 
   
repayments or repurchases of the Existing 2011 Notes if, on a Pro Forma Basis after giving effect to such repayment or repurchase (x) no Loans are outstanding, (y) the Company and the other Loan Parties have at least $50,000,000 of cash and Cash Equivalents on hand and (z) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
 
 
- 100 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 6.09 
   
.  No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that prohibits, restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of such Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its property or assets to secure the Secured Obligations, (b) the ability of any Subsidiary to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to any of its Equity Interests or to make or repay loans or advances to, or other Investments in, any Borrower or any other Subsidiary or to Guarantee the Secured Obligations or (c) the ability of any Subsidiary to transfer any of its assets to the Borrowers or any other Subsidiary of the Borrowers; that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by any Loan Document, (ii) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions existing on the date hereof identified on Schedule 6.09 (or to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification thereof, to the extent the scope of any such restriction or condition is not expanded in any material respect), (iii) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to (A) Indebtedness secured by, or sale and leaseback transactions in respect of, Available Collateral, such restrictions apply solely to the assets included in the Available Collateral and the Subsidiaries that own the Available Collateral, (B) any Permitted Foreign Securitization, such restrictions apply solely to the applicable Foreign Receivables and related assets, any applicable Permitted Foreign Securitization Subsidiary and the Subsidiaries that own such Foreign Receivables, or (C) any Indebtedness incurred under Section 6.01A(k), such restrictions apply solely to the applicable Foreign Subsidiary or Foreign Holdco and its Subsidiaries, (iv) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Subsidiary or assets pending such sale, provided such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Subsidiary or assets to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (v) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to (x) the Mercury Facility or any other secured Indebtedness or any sale and leaseback transaction permitted by this Agreement if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the property or assets securing such Indebtedness or (y) any Indebtedness of any Foreign Subsidiary if such restrictions or conditions apply only to property or assets of Foreign Subsidiaries and (v) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to customary provisions in leases restricting the assignment thereof.
Restrictive Agreements
provided
provided
provided
provided
 
SECTION 6.10 
   
.  No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive any of its rights under (a) any agreement relating to any Subordinated Indebtedness, the Existing Notes (including the Existing Notes Indenture), the BAC LLC Agreement or any Indebtedness permitted pursuant to Section 6.01A(i) or (j), or (b) its certificate of incorporation, by-laws, operating, management or partnership agreement or other organizational documents, in each case to the extent any such amendment, modification or waiver would be materially adverse to the Lenders.  For the avoidance of doubt, and without limitation, the following amendments, modifications or waivers of the BAC LLC Agreement shall be deemed not to be materially adverse to the Lenders:  (1) any increase in pricing, (2) any change of the term so long as the term continues to extend beyond the Commitment Termination Date, (3) any change in Customer Finance Program Obligations so long as at the time of such amendment, modification or waiver the aggregate amount of any incremental Customer Finance Program Obligations to be incurred as a result thereof would be permitted under the next succeeding sentence, and (4) any agreement to incur any Indebtedness, to provide any Lien or to make any Investment so long as at the time of such amendment, modification or waiver such Indebtedness, Lien or Investment would be permitted to be incurred under Section 6.01A, 6.02 or 6.04 respectively.  As at the last day of any fiscal quarter of the Company ending after the Effective Date, the aggregate amount of (A) Customer Finance Program Obligations that are inventory repurchase obligations shall not exceed the greater of (x) 25% of the aggregate outstanding amount as of such day of the dealer obligations in respect of products of the Company and its Subsidiaries financed though any customer finance program and (y) $235,000,000, and (B) Customer Finance Program Obligations that are recourse obligations shall not exceed the greater of (x) 40% of the aggregate outstanding amount as of such day of the dealer obligations in respect of products of the Company and its Subsidiaries financed though any customer finance program and (y) $130,000,000.
Amendment of Material Documents; Customer Finance Program Obligations
 
 
- 101 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 6.11 
   
. 
Financial Covenants
 
(a) 
   
.  On or after the Trigger Date, beginning upon the event that Availability is, for 5 consecutive Business Days, less than the greater of (x) 15% of the Total Commitments and (y) $60,000,000 (but beginning immediately in the event that Availability is less than the greater of (x) 12.5% of the Total Commitments and (y) $50,000,000), and ending after Availability is greater than such amounts for 30 consecutive days, the Loan Parties will not permit the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio as at the last day of any Test Period (including the last Test Period prior to the commencement of such Minimum Availability Period for which financial statements for the quarter or fiscal year then ended have been (or were required to be) delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b), as applicable) to be less than 1.10 to 1.00.
Minimum Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
 
(b) 
   
.  At any time prior to the Trigger Date, beginning on the later of (x) January 15, 2009 and (y) the date Loans are first made, and ending on the Trigger Date, the Loan Parties will not permit Consolidated EBITDA as at the last day of each fiscal quarter of the Company ending after the Effective Date for the Test Period of the Company then ending to be less than $140,000,000.
Minimum EBITDA
 
SECTION 6.12 
   
. No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any Swap Agreement, except (a) Swap Agreements entered into to hedge or mitigate risks to which any Borrower or any Subsidiary has actual exposure (other than those in respect of Equity Interests of any Subsidiary of the Company), and (b) Swap Agreements entered into in order to effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of any Borrower or any Subsidiary.
Swap Agreements
 
SECTION 6.13 
   
.  No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, permit the fiscal year of any Loan Party to end on a day other than December 31 or change a Loan Partys method of determining fiscal quarters.
Changes in Fiscal Periods
 
SECTION 6.14
   
 
.  No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any business, either directly or through any Subsidiary, except for those businesses in which the Loan Party and its Subsidiaries are engaged on the date of this Agreement or that are reasonably related thereto.
Lines of Business
 
 
 
If any of the following events () shall occur:
Events of Default
 
(a) 
   
any Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
 
 
- 102 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(b) 
   
any Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement or under any other Loan Document, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days or more;
 
(c) 
   
any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of any Loan Party or any of their Subsidiaries in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or thereof or waiver hereunder or thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or thereof or waiver hereunder or thereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made or furnished;
 
(d) 
   
any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 4.01(j), 5.02(a), 5.03 (with respect to any Loan Partys existence) or 5.08 or Article VI, or, during a Cash Dominion Period, commit a material breach of any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 7.1 of the Security Agreement;
 
(e) 
   
any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in this Agreement (other than those specified in clause (a), (b), (c) or (d) of this Article) or any other Loan Document and such failure shall continue unremedied (i) for a period of 5 or more days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender) if such breach relates to terms or provisions of Section 5.01(f) or 5.01(g), (ii) for a period of 15 or more days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender) if such breach relates to terms or provisions of Section 5.10 or 5.11 or (iii) for a period of 30 or more days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender) if such breach relates to terms or provisions of any other Section of this Agreement or any other Loan Document;
 
(f) 
   
any Loan Party or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness, when and as the same shall become due and payable, or any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (f) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
provided
 
 
- 103 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(g) 
   
an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) bankruptcy, liquidation, winding up, dissolution, reorganization, examination, suspension of general operations or other relief in respect of a Loan Party or any Subsidiary (other than any Non-Material Subsidiary) of a Loan Party or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Insolvency Law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for any Loan Party or any Subsidiary (other than any Non-Material Subsidiary) of any Loan Party or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for a period of 60 or more days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
 
(h) 
   
any Loan Party or any Subsidiary (other than any Non-Material Subsidiary) of any Loan Party shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Insolvency Law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (g) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for any Loan Party or any Subsidiary (other than any Non-Material Subsidiary) of a Loan Party or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
 
(i) 
   
any Loan Party or any Subsidiary (other than any Non-Material Subsidiary) of a Loan Party shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
 
(j) 
   
one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $35,000,000 shall be rendered against any Loan Party or any Subsidiary of any Loan Party or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor to attach or levy upon any assets of any Loan Party or any Subsidiary of any Loan Party to enforce any such judgment;
 
(k) 
   
(i) an ERISA Event shall have occurred, (ii) a trustee shall be appointed by a United States district court to administer any Plan, (iii) the PBGC shall institute proceedings to terminate any Plan(s), (iv) any Loan Party or any of their respective ERISA Affiliates shall have been notified by the sponsor of a Multiemployer Plan that it has incurred or will be assessed Withdrawal Liability to such Multiemployer Plan, or (v) any other event or condition shall occur or exist with respect to a Plan; and in each case in clauses (i) through (v) above, such event or condition, that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(l) 
   
a Change in Control shall occur;
 
 
- 104 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(m) 
   
the Loan Guaranty shall fail to remain in full force or effect with respect to any Guarantor or any action shall be taken by any Guarantor to discontinue or to assert the invalidity or unenforceability of the Loan Guaranty with respect to any Guarantor, or any Guarantor shall deny that it has any further liability under the Loan Guaranty, or shall give notice to such effect, or shall contest the enforceability of the Loan Guaranty;
 
(n) 
   
any Collateral Document shall for any reason fail to create a valid and perfected first priority security interest in any material portion of the Collateral (in the reasonable determination of the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders) purported to be covered thereby, except as permitted by the terms of the Loan Documents, or any material Collateral Document shall fail to remain in full force or effect or any action shall be taken by any Loan Party to discontinue or to assert the invalidity or unenforceability of any material Collateral Document, except in each case for the failure or loss of perfection resulting from the limitations of foreign laws, rules and regulations as they apply to pledges of Equity Interests of Foreign Subsidiaries or from the failure of the Administrative Agent, through no fault of any Loan Party, to maintain possession of certificates delivered to it representing securities pledged under any Collateral Document;
 
(o) 
   
any Loan Party or any Subsidiary of any Loan Party shall (i) be the subject of any proceeding or investigation pertaining to the release of any Hazardous Material into the indoor or outdoor environment, or (ii) violate any Environmental Law, which, in the case of any event described in clause (i) or clause (ii), has resulted in an Environmental Liability in an amount which, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, which Environmental Liability is not properly reserved against, paid, bonded or otherwise discharged within thirty (30) days or which is not being  reasonably contested in good faith; provided that, after taking into account any such reserve, or the terms of any such payment, bond or discharge, or the pendency of any such contestment, such Environmental Liability could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(p) 
   
any of the Existing 2011 Notes shall remain outstanding (and not (i) defeased or (ii) otherwise subject to cash collateral or escrow arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent) on December 31, 2010;
 
(q) 
   
or any Loan Party shall challenge the enforceability of any Loan Document or shall assert in writing, or engage in any action or inaction based on any such assertion, that any Loan Document has ceased to be or otherwise is not valid, binding and enforceable in accordance with its terms; or
 
(r) 
   
the termination or material modification of the financing under the BAC LLC Agreement (other than the receivables sale program of the United States Mercury-Marine division) or any other domestic floor plan financing which reduces the aggregate amount of available domestic floor plan financing if, at any time thereafter prior to the replacement of the applicable floor plan financing, (x) the Company and its Subsidiaries have domestic marine receivables in respect of the sale of finished boat product (other than parts) sold on terms longer than 45 days in an aggregate amount greater than $150,000,000 and (y) Availability is less than $100,000,000;
 
 
- 105 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Borrowers described in clause (g) or (h) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Company (on behalf of itself and all other Loan Parties), take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times: (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Loan Parties accrued hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Loan Parties; in case of any event with respect to the Borrowers described in clause (g) or (h) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Loan Parties accrued hereunder, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Loan Parties.  Upon the occurrence and the continuance of an Event of Default, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, exercise any rights and remedies provided to the Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents or at law or equity, including all remedies provided under the Uniform Commercial Code.
 
 
 
Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Lenders hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent hereunder and under the other Loan Documents and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf, including execution of the other Loan Documents, and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof or thereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
 
The Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such Person and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, invest in and generally engage in any kind of business with the Loan Parties or any Subsidiary of a Loan Party or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
 
 
- 106 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated hereby or by the other Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing as directed by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 10.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to any Loan Party or any Subsidiary of any Loan Party that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity.  The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 10.02) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct.  The Administrative Agent shall not be deemed to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by the Company or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or thereunder or in connection herewith or therewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth herein or therein, (iv) the adequacy, accuracy or completeness of any information (whether oral or written) set forth herein or therein, or in connection herewith or therewith, (v) the validity, enforceability, adequacy, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document, (vi) the creation, perfection or priority of Liens on the Collateral or the existence of the Collateral, or (vii) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
 
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, (i) any representation, notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing or communication believed by it to be genuine and to have been authorized, signed or sent by the proper Person, (ii) any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made or authorized by the proper Person or (iii) any statement made by a director, authorized signatory or employee of any Person regarding any matters which may reasonably be assumed to be within his or her knowledge or within his or her power to verify.  The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
 
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent.  The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties.  The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
 
 
- 107 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
The Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Lenders and the Company.  Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right to appoint a successor with (unless an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing) the prior written consent of the Company (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld).  If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agents resignation shall nonetheless become effective and (1) the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder and (2) the Required Lenders shall perform the duties of the Administrative Agent (and all payments and communications provided to be made by, to or through the Administrative Agent shall instead be made by or to each Lender directly) until such time as the Required Lenders appoint a successor agent as provided for above in this paragraph.  Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges, obligations and duties of the retiring (or retired) Administrative Agent and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder (if not already discharged therefrom as provided above in this paragraph).  The fees payable by the Company to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Company and such successor.  After the Administrative Agents resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and Section 10.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
 
Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement.  Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
 
Each Lender hereby agrees that (a) it has requested a copy of each Report prepared by or on behalf of the Administrative Agent; (b) the Administrative Agent (i) makes no representation or warranty, express or implied, as to the completeness or accuracy of any Report or any of the information contained therein or any inaccuracy or omission contained in or relating to a Report and (ii) shall not be liable for any information contained in any Report; (c) the Reports are not comprehensive audits or examinations, and that any Person performing any field examination will inspect only specific information regarding the Loan Parties and will rely significantly upon the Loan Parties books and records, as well as on representations of the Loan Parties personnel and that the Administrative Agent undertakes no obligation to update, correct or supplement the Reports; (d) it will keep all Reports confidential and strictly for its internal use, and it will not share the Report with any other Person except as otherwise permitted pursuant to Section 10.12 of this Agreement; and (e) without limiting the generality of any other indemnification provision contained in this Agreement, it will pay and protect, and indemnify, defend, and hold the Administrative Agent and any such other Person preparing a Report harmless from and against, the claims, actions, proceedings, damages, costs, expenses, and other amounts (including reasonable attorney fees) incurred by as the direct or indirect result of any third parties who might obtain all or part of any Report through the indemnifying Lender (except as permitted pursuant to Section 10.12 of this Agreement).
 
 
- 108 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
Except as otherwise provided in Section 10.02(b) with respect to this Agreement, the Administrative Agent may, with the prior consent of the Required Lenders (but not otherwise), consent to any modification, supplement or waiver under any of the Loan Documents.
 
Each Lender, Issuing Lender and Agent hereby authorizes and directs the Administrative Agent to enter on its behalf into the intercreditor agreement contemplated by clause (ii) of Section 6.02(i) if the Company shall request that the Administrative Agent do so.
 
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Joint Lead Arrangers, Joint Bookrunners, Syndication Agent and Documentation Agents named on the cover page of this Agreement shall not have any duties or liabilities under this Agreement, except in their capacity, if any, as Lenders.
 
 
 
                               
SECTION 9.01 
   
.  Each Guarantor hereby agrees that it is jointly and severally liable for, and, as primary obligor and not merely as surety, absolutely and unconditionally guarantees to each Secured Party and their respective successors and assigns the prompt payment in full when due (whether by acceleration or otherwise) of the principal of and interest on the Loans made by the Lenders to each Borrower and all reimbursement obligations in respect of LC Disbursements and all interest thereon payable by each Borrower pursuant to this Agreement, and all other amounts from time to time owing to the Secured Parties by each Borrower under this Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents, any Letter of Credit, any Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement, or any other document made, delivered or given in connection with any of the foregoing, in each case whether on account of principal, interest, reimbursement obligations, fees, indemnities, costs, expenses or otherwise (including, without limitation, all fees and disbursements of counsel to the Secured Parties, in each case strictly in accordance with the terms thereof (such obligations being herein collectively called the ).  Each Guarantor hereby further agrees that if any Borrower shall fail to pay in full when due (whether by acceleration or otherwise) any of the Guaranteed Obligations, such Guarantor will promptly pay the same, without any demand or notice whatsoever, and that in the case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, the same will be promptly paid in full when due (whether by acceleration or otherwise) in accordance with the terms of such extension or renewal.
The Guarantee
Guaranteed Obligations
 
 
- 109 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 9.02 
   
.  The Guaranteed Obligations of each Guarantor are absolute and unconditional, irrespective of the value, genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the obligations of the Borrowers under this Agreement, the other Loan Documents or any other agreement or instrument referred to herein, or any substitution, release or exchange of any other guarantee of or security for any of the Guaranteed Obligations, and, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, irrespective of any other circumstance whatsoever that might otherwise constitute a legal or equitable discharge or defense of a surety or guarantor, it being the intent of this Section that the obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall be absolute and unconditional under any and all circumstances.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, it is agreed that the occurrence of any one or more of the following shall not alter or impair the liability of any Guarantor hereunder, which shall remain absolute and unconditional as described above:
itional
Obligations Uncond
 
(i) 
   
at any time or from time to time, without notice to such Guarantor, the time for any performance of or compliance with any of the Guaranteed Obligations shall be extended, or such performance or compliance shall be waived;
 
(ii)
   
any of the acts mentioned in any of the provisions of this Agreement or any other agreement or instrument referred to herein shall be done or omitted;
 
(iii)         
the maturity of any of the Guaranteed Obligations shall be accelerated, or any of the Guaranteed Obligations shall be modified, supplemented or amended in any respect, or any right under this Agreement or any other agreement or instrument referred to herein shall be waived or any other guarantee of any of the Guaranteed Obligations or any security therefor shall be released or exchanged in whole or in part or otherwise dealt with; or
 
(iv)         
any lien or security interest granted to, or in favor of, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or Issuing Lenders or any Lender or Lenders as security for any of the Guaranteed Obligations shall fail to be perfected.
 
Each Guarantor hereby expressly waives diligence, presentment, demand of payment, protest and all notices whatsoever, and any requirement that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender exhaust any right, power or remedy or proceed against any Borrower or Guarantor under this Agreement or any other agreement or instrument referred to herein, or against any other Person under any other guarantee of, or security for, any of the Guaranteed Obligations.
 
Each Guarantor represents and warrants that in executing and delivering this Agreement as guarantor, such Guarantor has (i) without reliance on any Lender, any Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent or any information received from any Lender, any Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent and based upon such documents and information such Guarantor deems appropriate, made an independent investigation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the other Loan Parties, their respective business, assets, operations, prospects and condition, financial or otherwise, and any circumstances which may bear upon such transactions, the other Loan Parties or the obligations and risks undertaken herein with respect to the Guaranteed Obligations; (ii) adequate means to obtain from the other Loan Parties on a continuing basis information concerning the other Loan Parties; (iii) full and complete access to the Loan Documents and any other documents executed in connection with the Loan Documents; and (iv) not relied and will not rely upon any representations or warranties of any Lender, any Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent not embodied herein or any acts heretofore or hereafter taken by any Lender, any Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent (including any review by any Lender, any Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent of the affairs of any other Loan Party).
 
 
- 110 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 9.03 
   
.  The obligations of each Guarantor under this Article shall be automatically reinstated if and to the extent that for any reason any payment by or on behalf of any Borrower in respect of the Guaranteed Obligations is rescinded or must be otherwise restored by any holder of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, whether as a result of any proceedings in bankruptcy or reorganization or otherwise, and such Guarantor agrees that it will indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender and each Lender on demand for all reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable fees of counsel) incurred by the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or such Lender in connection with such rescission or restoration, including any such reasonable costs and expenses incurred in defending against any claim alleging that such payment constituted a preference, fraudulent transfer or similar payment under any bankruptcy, insolvency or similar law.
Reinstatement
 
SECTION 9.04 
   
.  Each Guarantor hereby agrees that until the payment and satisfaction in full of all Secured Obligations and the expiration or termination of all Letters of Credit and all Commitments, it shall not exercise any right or remedy arising by reason of any performance by it of its guarantee in Section 9.01, whether by subrogation or otherwise, against any Loan Party or any other guarantor of any of the Guaranteed Obligations or any security for any of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Subrogation
 
SECTION 9.05 
   
.  Each Guarantor agrees that, as between each Guarantor on the one hand and the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lenders and the Lenders on the other, the obligations of each Borrower under this Agreement may be declared to be forthwith due and payable as provided in Article VII (and shall be deemed to have become automatically due and payable in the circumstances provided in Article VII) for purposes of Section 9.01 notwithstanding any stay, injunction or other prohibition preventing such declaration (or such obligations from becoming automatically due and payable) as against such Borrower and that, in the event of such declaration (or such obligations being deemed to have become automatically due and payable), such obligations (whether or not due and payable by such Borrower) shall forthwith become due and payable by the Guarantors for purposes of Section 9.01.
Remedies
 
SECTION 9.06 
   
.  Each Guarantor hereby acknowledges that the guarantee in this Article constitutes an instrument for the payment of money, and consents and agrees that any Issuing Lender, any Lender or the Administrative Agent, at its sole option, in the event of a dispute by any Guarantor in the payment of any moneys due hereunder, shall have the right to bring motion-action under New York CPLR Section 3213.
Instrument for the Payment of Money
 
SECTION 9.07 
   
.  The guarantee in this Article is a continuing guarantee, and shall apply to all Guaranteed Obligations whenever arising until the expiration or termination of the Commitments and payment in full of the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees and other amounts payable hereunder and the expiration or termination of all Letters of Credit and the reimbursement of all LC Disbursements.
Continuing Guarantee
 
 
- 111 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 9.08 
   
.  In addition to all such rights of indemnity and subrogation as the Guarantors may have under applicable law (but subject to Section 9.10), the Company agrees that (a) in the event a payment in respect of any Guaranteed Obligation or Secured Obligation shall be made by any Guarantor under this Agreement, the Company shall indemnify such Guarantor for the full amount of such payment and such Guarantor shall be subrogated to the rights of the Person to whom such payment shall have been made to the extent of such payment and (b) in the event any assets of any Guarantor shall be sold pursuant to this Agreement or any Collateral Document to satisfy in whole or in part any Guaranteed Obligation or Secured Obligation owed to any Secured Party, the Company shall indemnify such Guarantor in an amount equal to the greater of the book value or the fair market value of the assets so sold.
Indemnity and Subrogation
 
SECTION 9.09 
   
.  Each Guarantor (a ) agrees (subject to Section 9.10) that, in the event a payment shall be made by any other Guarantor hereunder in respect of any Guaranteed Obligation or any assets of any other Guarantor (other than the Company) shall be sold pursuant to any Security Document to satisfy any Secured Obligation owed to any Secured Party and such other Guarantor (the Claiming Party) shall not have been fully indemnified by the Company as provided in Section 9.08, the Contributing Party shall indemnify the Claiming Party in an amount equal to the amount of such payment or the greater of the book value or the fair market value of such assets, as the case may be, in each case multiplied by a fraction of which the numerator shall be the net worth of the Contributing Party on the date hereof and the denominator shall be the aggregate net worth of all the Guarantors (other than the Company) on the date hereof (or, in the case of any Guarantor becoming a party hereto after the date hereof, the date on which it became a Guarantor).  Any Contributing Party making any payment to a Claiming Party pursuant to this Section 9.09 shall (subject to Section 9.10) be subrogated to the rights of such Claiming Party under Section 9.08 to the extent of such payment.
Contribution and Subrogation
Contributing Party
 
SECTION 9.10 
   
.  Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, all rights of the Guarantors under Sections 9.08 and 9.09 and all other rights of the Guarantors of indemnity, contribution or subrogation under applicable law or otherwise shall be fully subordinated to the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Secured Obligations.  No failure on the part of the Company or any Guarantor to make the payments required by Sections 9.08 and 9.09 (or any other payments required under applicable law or otherwise) shall in any respect limit the obligations and liabilities of any Guarantor with respect to its obligations hereunder, and each Guarantor shall remain liable for the full amount of the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder.
Subordination
 
 
- 112 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
SECTION 10.01
   
. (a)  Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by facsimile, as follows:
Notices
 
(i) 
   
if to the Company, to it at 1 N. Field Court, Lake Forest, Illinois 60045, Attention of William Metzger, Vice President and Treasurer (Facsimile No. (847) 735-4359; Telephone No. (847) 735-4364);
 
(ii)
   
if to any other Loan Party, to the Company at the address set forth above (with a copy to such Loan Party at its address (or facsimile number), if any, (x) in the case of any Loan Party party hereto on the Effective Date, provided below its signature hereto (if any) or (y) in the case of any Loan Party that becomes party hereto after the Effective Date, set forth in the Designation Letter to which it is a party (if any);
 
(iii)         
if to the Administrative Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 1111 Fannin, 10 Floor, Houston, Texas 77002-8069, Attention of Loan and Agency Services Group (Telephone No. (713) 750-2199; Facsimile No. (713) 427-6889), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York 10017, Attention of Tony Yung (Facsimile No. (212) 270-6637; Telephone No. (212) 270-0586);
th
 
(iv)         
if to an Issuing Lender, to it at its address (or facsimile number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire;
 
(v)
   
if to the Swingline Lender, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 1111 Fannin Street, 10 Floor, Houston, Texas 77002-8069, Attention of Loan and Agency Services (Telephone No. (713) 750-2199; Facsimile No. (713) 427-6889), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, 270 Park Avenue, New York 10017, Attention of Tony Yung (Facsimile No. (212) 270-6637; Telephone No. (212) 270-0586); and
th
 
(vi)   
  
if to a Lender, to it at its address (or facsimile number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
 
All such notices and other communications (i) sent by hand or overnight courier service, or mailed by certified or registered mail, shall be deemed to have been given when received or (ii) sent by facsimile shall be deemed to have been given when sent, that if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient.
provided
 
(b) 
   
Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; that the foregoing shall not apply to notices to any Lender pursuant to Article II unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and such Lender.  The Administrative Agent or the Company (on behalf of itself and all other Loan Parties) may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.  All such notices and other communications (i) sent to an e-mail address shall be deemed received upon the senders receipt of an acknowledgement from the intended recipient (such as by the return receipt requested function, as available, return e-mail or other written acknowledgement), provided that if not given during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient, and (ii) posted to an Internet or intranet website shall be deemed received upon the deemed receipt by the intended recipient at its e-mail address as described in the foregoing clause (b)(i) of notification that such notice or communication is available and identifying the website address therefor.  Without limiting the foregoing, the Administrative Agent agrees that, unless it shall otherwise advise the Company, notices to be delivered by any Borrower to the Administrative Agent  pursuant to Article II (including any such notices permitted to be given by telephone or facsimile) may be delivered by e-mail transmissions to the Administrative Agent at such e-mail address (or addresses) as the Administrative Agent shall from time to time notify the Company.
provided
provided
 
 
- 113 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(c) 
   
Any party hereto may change its address or facsimile number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto (or, in the case of any such change by a Lender, by notice to the Company and the Administrative Agent). 
 
SECTION 10.02
   
.
Waivers; Amendments
 
(a) 
   
.  No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lenders and the Lenders hereunder are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have.  No waiver of any provision of this Agreement or consent to any departure by any Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Lender may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
No Deemed Waivers; Remedies Cumulative
 
(b)
   
.  Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Company (on behalf of itself and all other Loan Parties) and the Required Lenders or by the Company (on behalf of itself and all other Loan Parties) and the Administrative Agent with the written consent of the Required Lenders; that no such agreement shall
Amendments
provided
 
(i) 
   
increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender;
 
 
- 114 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(ii)
   
reduce the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby;
 
(iii)         
postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby;
 
(iv)         
change Section 2.09(d) without the consent of each Lender affected thereby;
 
(v)
   
change the obligations of the Company pursuant to Article IX;
 
(vi)   
  
change any of the provisions of this Section or the percentage in the definition of the term Required Lenders or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender;
 
(vii)        
change the definition of Borrowing Base or any eligibility criteria incorporated therein that, in each case, have the effect of increasing Availability without the written consent of the Supermajority Lenders;
 
(viii)       
permit any Loan Party to assign its rights hereunder, increase the advance rates set forth in the definition of Borrowing Base, release all or substantially all of the Collateral or, except as otherwise expressly permitted herein, release any material Guarantor from its Loan Guaranty without the consent of each Lender; or
 
(ix)change any of the provisions of Section 2.22 without the written consent of each of the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Banks;
   
 
further that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be.
provided
 
(c)
   
The Lenders hereby irrevocably authorize the Administrative Agent (i) to take all actions specified in Section 10.18 with respect to any termination of the Guarantee of a Guarantor or the release of any Collateral, and (ii) at its option and in its sole discretion, to release any Lien granted to it by any Loan Party on any Collateral that it subsequently determines in accordance the provisions of Section 5.13(e) need not have been made subject to a Lien.  Except as provided in the immediately preceding sentence, the Administrative Agent will not release any Liens on Collateral without the prior written authorization of the Required Lenders (or all of the Lenders as set forth above).  Any such release shall not in any manner discharge, affect, or impair the Secured Obligations or any Liens (other than those expressly being released) upon (or obligations of the Loan Parties in respect of) all interests retained by the Loan Parties, including the proceeds of any sale, all of which shall continue to constitute part of the Collateral.
 
 
- 115 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(d)
   
If, in connection with any proposed amendment, waiver or consent  requiring the consent of each Lender or each Lender affected thereby, the consent of the Supermajority Lenders is obtained, but the consent of other necessary Lenders is not obtained (any such Lender whose consent is necessary but not obtained being referred to herein as a ), then the Borrowers may elect to replace a Non-Consenting Lender as a Lender party to this Agreement, that, concurrently with such replacement, (i) another bank or other entity (other than the Company or any of its Affiliates) which is reasonably satisfactory to the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent shall agree, as of such date, (x) to purchase for cash the Loans and other Borrower Obligations due to the Non-Consenting Lender pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption and to become a Lender for all purposes under this Agreement and to assume all obligations of the Non-Consenting Lender to be terminated as of such date, (y) to comply with the requirements of paragraph (b) of Section 10.04 (with the Borrower or the replacement Lender being responsible for any applicable processing or recordation fee) and (z) to consent to the relevant proposed amendment, and (ii) the Borrowers shall pay to such Non-Consenting Lender in same day funds on the day of such replacement (1) all interest, fees and other amounts then accrued but unpaid to such Non-Consenting Lender by the Borrowers hereunder to and including the date of termination, including without limitation payments due to such Non-Consenting Lender under Sections 2.15 and 2.17, and (2) an amount, if any, equal to the payment which would have been due to such Lender on the day of such replacement under Section 2.16 had the Loans of such Non-Consenting Lender been prepaid on such date rather than sold to the replacement Lender.
Non-Consenting Lender
provided
 
SECTION 10.03
   
.
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
 
(a) 
   
.  The Loan Parties shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Administrative Agent, in connection with the syndication and distribution (including, without limitation, via the internet or through a service such as Intralinks) of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of this Agreement and any other Loan Document or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions hereof or thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by any Issuing Lenders in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement, collection or protection of its rights in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit. Expenses being reimbursed by the Loan Parties under this Section include, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, costs and expenses incurred in connection with:
Costs and Expenses
 
(i)            appraisals and insurance reviews;
 
 
- 116 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(ii)           field examinations and the preparation of Reports based on the fees charged by a third party retained by the Administrative Agent or the internally allocated fees for each Person employed by the Administrative Agent with respect to each field examination, together with the reasonable fees and expenses associated with collateral monitoring services performed by the Specialized Due Diligence Group of the Administrative Agent (and the Loan Parties agree to modify or adjust the computation of the Borrowing Basewhich may include maintaining additional Reserves, modifying the advance rates or modifying the eligibility criteria for the components of the Borrowing Baseto the extent required by the Administrative Agent as a result of any such evaluation, appraisal or monitoring);
(iii)          taxes, fees and other charges for (A) lien and title searches and title insurance and (B) recording the Collateral Documents, filing financing statements and continuations, and other actions to perfect, protect, and continue the Administrative Agents Liens;
 
(iv)          sums paid or incurred to take any action required of any Loan Party under the Loan Documents that such Loan Party fails to pay or take; and
 
(v)           forwarding loan proceeds, collecting checks and other items of payment, and establishing and maintaining the accounts and lock boxes, and costs and expenses of preserving and protecting the Collateral.
(b) 
   
.  The Loan Parties shall, jointly and severally, indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an ), against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of the Loan Documents or any agreement or instrument contemplated thereby, the performance by the parties thereto of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by any Issuing Lender to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials under, at, on or from any property owned, leased or operated by the Loan Parties or any of their Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to the Loan Parties or any of their Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
Indemnification by the Loan Parties
Indemnitee
provided
 
 
- 117 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(c) 
   
.  To the extent that the Loan Parties fail to pay any amount required to be paid by them to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, such Lenders Applicable Percentage (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount; that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such.
Reimbursement by Lenders
provided
 
(d) 
   
  To the extent permitted by applicable law, no Loan Party shall assert, and each hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
Waiver of Consequential Damages, Etc.
 
(e) 
   
.  All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly after written demand therefor.
Payments
 
SECTION 10.04
   
.
Successors and Assigns
 
(a) 
   
.  The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of any Issuing Lender that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) no Loan Party may assign or otherwise transfer any of its respective rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by any Loan Party without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section.  Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of any Issuing Lender that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lenders, the Swingline Lender and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Assignments Generally
 
(b) 
   
. (i)  Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
Assignments by Lenders
 
(A) 
   
the Company, that no consent of the Company shall be required (i) for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund or (ii) if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, for an assignment to any other Person;
provided
 
 
- 118 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(B) 
   
the Administrative Agent; that no consent of the Administrative Agent shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund;
provided
 
(C) 
   
each Issuing Lender; that no consent of any Issuing Lender shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund; and
provided
 
(D) 
   
the Swingline Lender; that no consent of the Swingline Lender shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund.
provided
 
(ii) 
   
Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
 
(A) 
   
except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lenders Commitment or Loans of any Class, the amount of the Commitment or Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Company and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent; that no such consent of the Company shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing;
provided
 
(B) 
   
each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement;
 
(C) 
   
the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500; and
 
(D) 
   
the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire in which the assignee designates one or more credit contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain material non-public information about the Company, the Loan Parties and their Related Parties or their respective securities) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the assignees compliance procedures and applicable laws, including federal, provincial, territorial and state securities laws.
 
(iii)   
  
Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraphs (b)(iv) and (b)(v) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 10.03).  Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 10.04 shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
 
 
- 119 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(iv)         
The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of each Borrower, each Issuing Lender and each Lender, shall maintain at one of its offices in New York City a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of (w) the names and addresses of the Lenders, (x) the designation of any Lender as an Issuing Lender, (y) the Commitment of, and outstanding principal amount of each Loan made by, each Lender and (z) the outstanding amount of each Letter of Credit issued by, and of each unreimbursed LC Disbursement made by, each Issuing Lender (together with a notation of each Lenders participation therein pursuant to Section 2.06(e)), in all cases pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ).  The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Loan Parties, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as an Issuing Lender or a Lender, as the case shall be, hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary.  The Register shall be available for inspection by the Loan Parties, any Issuing Lender and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
 
(v) 
   
Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignees completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in this paragraph (b) and any written consent to such assignment required by this paragraph (b), the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register; that if either the assigning Lender or the assignee shall have failed to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.05, 2.06(e), 2.06(f), 2.07(b), 2.18(d) or 10.03(c), the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information therein in the Register unless and until such payment shall have been made in full, together with all accrued interest thereon.  No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
provided
 
(c) 
   
.   (i)  Any Lender may, without the consent of any Loan Party, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any other Lender, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (a ) in all or a portion of such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (A) such Lenders obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Loan Parties, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lenders and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents.  For the avoidance of doubt, each Lender shall be responsible for the indemnity under Section 2.17(e) with respect to any payments made by such Lender to its Participant(s).  Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 10.02(b) that affects such Participant.  Subject to paragraph (c)(i) of this Section, the Borrowers agree that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits and subject to the limitations of Sections 2.15, 2.16 and 2.17 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section.  To the extent permitted by law, each Participant of which the Company has been given prior written notice also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 10.08 as though it were a Lender, that such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.18(d) and Section 2.19 as though it were a Lender.  Each Lender that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrowers, maintain a register on which it enters the name and address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each Participants interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement (the ).  The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary.
Participations
Participant
provided
provided
provided
Participant Register
 
 
- 120 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(ii)A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.15, 2.16 or 2.17 than the relevant Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Companys prior written consent (not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed); that the Participant complies with all obligations under or relating to Section 2.18(d) and Section 2.19, in all cases as though it were a Lender.
   
provided
 
(d)
   
.  Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any such pledge or assignment to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
Certain Pledges
provided
 
(e)
   
.  Anything in this Section to the contrary notwithstanding, no Lender may assign or participate any interest in any Loan or LC Exposure held by it hereunder to the Company or any of its Affiliates or Subsidiaries without the prior consent of each Lender.
No Assignments to the Company or Affiliates
 
SECTION 10.05
   
.  All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties herein and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document (including the Designation Letters) shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated.  The provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17, 10.03 and 10.12 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the Transactions, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Survival
 
 
- 121 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 10.06
   
.  This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract.  This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract between and among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof.  Except as provided in Section 4.01, this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page to this Agreement by facsimile shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness
 
SECTION 10.07
   
.  Any provision of this any Loan Document held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions thereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability
 
SECTION 10.08
   
.  If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Loan Party against any of and all the Secured Obligations held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under the Loan Documents and although such obligations may be unmatured.  The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff
 
SECTION 10.09
   
.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Judicial Proceedings; Etc
 
(a) 
   
.This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
Governing Law
 
(b) 
   
.  Each of the Loan Parties hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the state of New York, the courts of the United States for the Southern District of New York, and appellate courts from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement of any other Loan Document against any Loan Party or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
Submission to Jurisdiction
 
 
- 122 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
(c) 
   
.  Each of the Loan Parties hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
Waiver of Venue
 
(d) 
   
.  Each Borrower irrevocably designates and appoints CT Corporation System, at its office in New York City, New York, U.S.A., as its authorized agent, to accept and acknowledge on its behalf, service of any and all process which may be served in any suit, action or proceeding of the nature referred to in Section 10.09(b) in any federal or New York State court sitting in New York City.  Each Borrower represents and warrants that such agent has agreed in writing to accept such appointment and that a true copy of such designation and acceptance has been delivered to the Administrative Agent.  Said designation and appointment shall be irrevocable by each such Borrower until all Loans, all reimbursement obligations, interest thereon and all other amounts payable by such Borrower hereunder and under the other Loan Documents shall have been paid in full in accordance with the provisions hereof and thereof and such Borrower shall have been terminated as a Borrower hereunder pursuant to Section 2.21.  If such agent shall cease so to act, each such Borrower covenants and agrees to designate irrevocably and appoint without delay another such agent satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and to deliver promptly to the Administrative Agent evidence in writing of such other agents acceptance of such appointment.
Appointment of Agent for Service of Process
 
(e) 
   
.  Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 10.01.   Each Borrower hereby consents to process being served in any suit, action or proceeding of the nature referred to in Section 10.09(b) in any federal or New York State court sitting in New York City by service of process upon its agent appointed as provided in Section 10.09(d); that, to the extent lawful and possible, notice of said service upon such agent shall be mailed by registered or certified air mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to the Company and (if applicable to) such Borrower at its address set forth in the Designation Letter to which it is a party or to any other address of which such Borrower shall have given written notice to the Administrative Agent (with a copy thereof to the Company).  Each Borrower irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, all claim of error by reason of any such service in such manner and agrees that such service shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon such Borrower in any such suit, action or proceeding and shall, to the fullest extent permitted by law, be taken and held to be valid and personal service upon and personal delivery to such Borrower.  Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
Service of Process
provided
 
 
- 123 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 10.10
   
.  EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY OR THEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY).  EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
 
SECTION 10.11
   
.  Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings
 
SECTION 10.12
   
.  Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lenders and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (i) to its and its Affiliates directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (ii) to the extent requested by any regulatory or self-regulatory authority, (iii) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (iv) to any other party to this Agreement, (v) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or under any other Loan Document or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder, (vi) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this paragraph, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Loan Parties and their respective obligations, (vii) with the consent of the Company or (viii) to the extent such Information (A) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this paragraph or (B) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis from a source other than any Borrower.  For the purposes of this paragraph,  means all information received from the Company or any of its Subsidiaries relating to the Company, its Subsidiaries or their respective business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis prior to disclosure by the Company; that, in the case of information received from the Company after the date hereof, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential.  Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
Confidentiality
Information
provided
 
 
- 124 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
 EACH LENDER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT INFORMATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 10.12 FURNISHED TO IT PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY INCLUDE MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING THE COMPANY AND ITS AFFILIATES AND THEIR RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES, AND CONFIRMS THAT IT HAS DEVELOPED COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES REGARDING THE USE OF MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION AND THAT IT WILL HANDLE SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THOSE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL, PROVINCIAL, TERRITORIAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
 
ALL INFORMATION, INCLUDING REQUESTS FOR WAIVERS AND AMENDMENTS, FURNISHED BY THE BORROWERS OR THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT PURSUANT TO, OR IN THE COURSE OF ADMINISTERING, THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE SYNDICATE-LEVEL INFORMATION, WHICH MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION ABOUT THE COMPANY, THE LOAN PARTIES AND THEIR RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES.  ACCORDINGLY, EACH LENDER REPRESENTS TO THE BORROWERS AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT THAT IT HAS IDENTIFIED IN ITS ADMINISTRATIVE QUESTIONNAIRE A CREDIT CONTACT WHO MAY RECEIVE INFORMATION THAT MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL, PROVINCIAL, TERRITORIAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
 
SECTION 10.13
   
.  The Lenders agree that, as of the Effective Date, the Total Commitment (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement immediately prior to the Effective Date) shall be reduced by $100,000,000 and each Lenders Commitment (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement immediately prior to the Effective Date) shall be reduced by its Applicable Percentage (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement immediately prior to the Effective Date) thereof.  This Agreement constitutes notice thereof and pursuant hereto the requirement contained in Section 2.09(c) of the Existing Credit Agreement that three Business Days (as defined therein) notice of such reduction be given to the administrative agent thereunder is hereby waived.
Reduction of Commitments under Existing Credit Agreement
 
SECTION 10.14
   
.  The respective obligations of the Lenders hereunder are several and not joint and the failure of any Lender to make any Loan or perform any of its obligations hereunder shall not relieve any other Lender from any of its obligations hereunder.  Each Lender hereby represents that it is not relying on or looking to any Margin Stock for the repayment of the Borrowings provided for herein.  Anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, neither any Issuing Lender nor any Lender shall be obligated to extend credit to the Borrowers in violation of any Requirement of Law.
Several Obligations; Nonreliance; Violation of Law
 
 
- 125 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
SECTION 10.15
   
.  In the event of any conflict between the terms of this Agreement and the terms of any other Loan Document, the terms of this Agreement shall, to the extent of such conflict, prevail.
Conflicts
 
SECTION 10.16
   
.  Each Lender hereby notifies the Loan Parties that pursuant to the requirements of the USA PATRIOT Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the ), such Lender may be required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Loan Parties, which information includes the names and addresses of the Loan Parties and other information that will allow such Lender to identify the Loan Parties in accordance with said Act.
USA PATRIOT Act
Patriot Act
 
SECTION 10.17
   
.  Each Subsidiary Borrower party hereto as of the Effective Date, by its signature below, and each Subsidiary Borrower designated after the Effective Date as a Subsidiary Borrower pursuant to Section 2.21, by its acknowledgment to the Designation Letter relating to such Subsidiary Borrower, as applicable:
Appointment of Company as Agent
 
(a) 
   
appoints and authorizes the Company for the purposes of (i) signing documents deliverable by or on behalf of such Subsidiary Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document, (ii) providing notices to or making requests of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender on behalf of such Subsidiary Borrower, (iii) receiving notices and documents from the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender on behalf of such Subsidiary Borrower, and (iv) taking any other action on behalf such Subsidiary Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document, in each case to the extent specifically provided for hereunder or thereunder, and such Subsidiary Borrower agrees to be irrevocably bound by all such actions being taken on behalf of such Subsidiary Borrower by the Company and all such notices received by the Company on behalf of such Subsidiary Borrower; that another Person may be appointed to act in substitution for the Company with the power and authority granted thereto by such
provided
Subsidiary Borrower under this clause (a) so long as such Person shall have been certified as such in a single writing executed by such Subsidiary Borrower and delivered to the Administrative Agent;
 
(b) 
   
authorizes the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender and each Lender to treat (i) each document signed by, each notice given or received by, each document delivered or received by and each request made by the Company on its behalf and (ii) each other action which specifically provides herein or therein that the Company acts on behalf, or at the direction, of such Subsidiary Borrower as if such Subsidiary Borrower (and not the Company) had in fact signed such document, given or received such notice, delivered or received such document, made such request or taken such action; and
 
(c) 
   
acknowledges that the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender and each Lender are relying upon the appointments and authorizations set forth in this Section in connection with the making of their Commitments and credit extensions hereunder.
 
 
- 126 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
In the event the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender reasonably believes that it has received a conflicting notice or instruction from the Company and/or his or her designees, the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or such Lender may refrain from action upon such notice or instruction and shall promptly request the Company for clarification regarding such notice or instruction.
 
SECTION 10.18 
   
.  A Guarantor shall automatically be released from its obligations under the Loan Documents and all security interests in the Collateral of such Guarantor, and in the Equity Interests in such Guarantor, shall be automatically released upon the consummation of any transaction permitted by this Agreement as a result of which such Guarantor ceases to be a Subsidiary.  Upon any sale, lease, transfer or other Disposition by any Guarantor of any Collateral that is permitted under this Agreement to any Person that is not another Guarantor or, upon the effectiveness of any release of the security interest granted hereby in any Collateral pursuant to Section 10.02(c), the security interest in such Collateral shall be automatically released.  Upon the incurrence of any Indebtedness secured by any Available Collateral or the consummation of any sale and leaseback transaction in respect of any Available Collateral, in each case that is permitted by this Agreement, the security interest in such Available Collateral shall be automatically released.  In connection with any termination or release pursuant to this Section, the Administrative Agent, upon receipt of such certificates or other documents reasonably requested by it to confirm compliance with this Agreement, shall promptly execute and deliver to any Guarantor, at such Guarantors expense, all documents that such Guarantor shall reasonably request to evidence such termination or release.
Release of Liens and Guarantees
 
 
- 127 - -
Table of Contents
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
 
[]
Brunswick Corporation Amended and Restated Credit Agreement
 
 
 1

Exhibit 99.1
 
            
            
            
 
 
 
 
            
 
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that it and a group of financial institutions have completed amending the companys revolving credit facility.  In light of the current economic and credit climates, Brunswick had sought various changes to the credit facility to ensure access to this short-term funding source.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Dec. 19, 2008 
 The completion of the amendment is an important step for Brunswick, providing us with liquidity and financial flexibility going forward, explained Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  We believe the amount available under this facility, combined with the cash on our balance sheet as well as recent and future cost savings efforts, should provide us the necessary liquidity to manage effectively through these difficult market and economic conditions.
As part of this amendment, the facility was converted into a secured asset-based facility, and its size was established at $400 million.  Borrowings under the facility are subject to the value of the borrowing base, consisting of certain receivables, inventory, and machinery and equipment of the companys domestic subsidiaries.  The facility contains a minimum fixed-charges coverage covenant, which is effective when borrowings are within $60 million of the total borrowing capacity available under the facility. There are presently no borrowings under the facility; however, there are previously issued letters of credit, which total approximately $88 million.  The amendment to the facility, which remains in place through May 2012, was led by J.P. Morgan Securities Inc.
 
 
(more)
Brunswick Corporation
Dec. 19, 2008
Page 2 of 4
 
This facility is consistent with our current business needs in terms of size and structure, McCoy said.  It provides access to an important source of liquidity, should we need to supplement our own vigorous cash management efforts, to fund anticipated working capital needs going forward.
Additional information concerning the revolving credit facility, including the entire Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, can be found under the related Form 8-K filing.
Joint venture agreement also modified
In addition to this amended credit facility, Brunswick Financial Services has also entered into an agreement with GE Capital Solutions (NYSE: GE) to amend the terms of its joint venture agreement. The amendment is necessitated by the new terms of the revolving credit facility, and will synchronize the key financial covenant in each agreement.  The joint venture, Brunswick Acceptance Company (BAC), began operations in 2003, with the current agreement in place through 2014.   BAC provides wholesale floor plan financing for qualifying Brunswick marine dealers.
Additional Form 8-K filed
The company also announced that it has filed a separate Form 8-K concerning its previously issued financial statements for the three months and nine months ended Sept. 27, 2008 (the "September 27 financials").  In preparing for its year-end 2008 financial statements, the company has determined that it had incorrectly determined the valuation allowance against deferred tax assets when it prepared the September 27 financials and, accordingly, will need to increase its deferred tax valuation allowance as prescribed by the Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 109, Accounting for Income Taxes.  This special tax item is a non-cash charge and did not affect the company's operating loss or operating cash flows for the three months and nine months ended Sept. 27, 2008.  As a result, the company intends to file amended financial statements in a Form 10-Q/A for the three and nine month periods ended Sept. 27, 2008 and Sept. 29, 2007 no later than Jan. 30, 2009.
 
(more)
Brunswick Corporation
Dec. 19, 2008
Page 3 of 4
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  These statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of (i) the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, and (ii) the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in the timeframe and cost anticipated; the ability to successfully complete the disposition of non-core assets; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components and raw materials from suppliers; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; and the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2007 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Sept. 27, 2008.
 
 
(more)
Brunswick Corporation
Dec. 19, 2008
Page 4 of 4
 
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; Albemarle, Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness, Hammer Strength and ParaBody fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20090129095558.txt.gz
TIME:20090129095558
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
        
 
 
 
 
 
    
 
 
 
                          
 
On January 29, 2009, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the fourth quarter and full year 2008. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its fourth quarter and full year 2008 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statements of operations, balance sheets or statements of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.  Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities of continuing operations (excluding acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities. In addition, Brunswicks management believes that presentation of diluted earnings per share for the quarters and years ended December 31, 2008 and December 31, 2007, excluding  goodwill and tradename impairment charges, net of tax; restructuring, exit and other impairment charges, net of tax; NBK investment sale gain, net of tax; the reversal of variable compensation accruals, net of tax; and special tax items, provides a more meaningful comparison to prior results.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20090304120325.txt.gz
TIME:20090304120325
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported): March 3, 2009
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
     
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01.  Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On March 3, 2009, the Company issued a press release announcing its upcoming participation in the Raymond James & Associates 30 Annual Institutional Investors Conference in Orlando, Florida on Tuesday, March 10, 2009. A copy of the press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference to this Item 7.01.
th
 
A live audio Webcast of the presentation will begin at approximately 3:25 p.m. (EDT) on March 10, 2009.  For a limited period following the conference, an archive of the Webcast and slides of the conference presentation will be available to the public beginning Tuesday, March 10, 2009 on the Companys Web site, www.brunswick.com, under the "Investors" tab.
 
In accordance with General Instruction B.2 to the Form 8-K, the information under this Item 7.01 and the press release exhibit to this Form 8-K shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section 18, nor shall such information and exhibit be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Exchange Act or the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"), unless the registrant expressly states that such information and exhibit are to be considered "filed" under the Exchange Act or incorporates such information and exhibit by specific reference in an Exchange Act or Securities Act filing.
 
This current report on Form 8-K, the oral public statements made by any representative of the Company during the Raymond James & Associates 30 Annual Institutional Investors Conference and Webcast and the related presentation materials may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act and Section 21E of the Exchange Act. Such forward-looking statements are based on information currently available to the Companys management and are current only as of the date made. For that reason, undue reliance should not be placed on any such forward-looking statement. Actual results could also differ materially from those anticipated as a result of a number of factors, including, but not limited to, those discussed in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008. The Company assumes no duty or obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, although it may do so from time to time as management believes is warranted. Any such updates or revisions may be made by filing reports with the Securities and Exchange Commission, through the issuance of press releases or by other methods of public disclosure.
th
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy will present at the Raymond James & Associates 30 Annual Institutional Investors Conference in Orlando, Fla.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., March 3, 2009 
th
McCoys presentation will be Webcast live beginning at approximately
3:25 p.m. (EDT) on Tuesday, March 10.  The Webcast can be accessed through the Brunswick Corporation Web site at .  Go to the site at least 15 minutes before the presentation to register, download and install any needed audio software.  Replays will be available on the Brunswick site.
www.brunswick.com
About Brunswick
 
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Teignbridge propellers; Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; IDS dealer management systems; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables; and Dynamo, Tornado and Valley pool tables, Air Hockey and foosball tables.  For more information, visit .
http://www.brunswick.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20090430093544.txt.gz
TIME:20090430093544
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
        
         
       
          
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                                Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 30, 2009, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2009. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its first quarter 2009 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.  Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
3
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
4
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20090505170234.txt.gz
TIME:20090505170234
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
FORM 8-K
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported): May 5, 2009
 
_______________________            
 
                                     
                                                                                                     
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
                 Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                 Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
                     
                  
 
 
 
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
 
 
 
4
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
May 5, 2009
Mr. Peter B. Hamilton
Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Brunswick Corporation
1 N. Field Ct.
Lake Forest, IL 60045
Re:  Amendment to Terms and Conditions of Employment Dated October 29, 2008
Dear Peter:
As we have discussed, this amendment letter (the Amendment) shall constitute an amendment to the Terms and Conditions of Employment (the Agreement) entered into between Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) and you on October 29, 2008, in accordance with Section 16 of the Agreement.
The purpose of this Amendment is to eliminate provisions in the Agreement, including without limitation Section 10, which could entitle you to certain payments from Brunswick in the event that your receipt of any element of compensation or benefit under the Agreement subjects you to excise tax liability.
All capitalized terms used in this Amendment but not otherwise defined herein will have the same meaning as defined in the Agreement, and all section references are to a section of the Agreement, unless otherwise specified.
Accordingly, you and Brunswick hereby agree that, notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in the Agreement:
1.           .  Except as provided in Paragraph 2 of this Amendment, Section 10 of the Agreement will be deleted in its entirety and the following language will be inserted in its place:
Excise Tax
(by the reasonable computation by an independent accounting or consulting firm chosen by the Company (the Firm), which determination shall be certified by the Firm and set forth in a certificate delivered to the Executive) that the aggregate amount of the payments, distributions, benefits and entitlements of any type paid or provided to the Executive under the terms of this Agreement or under any other plan, program, policy, or other arrangement, either alone or in combination with other elements of compensation and benefits paid or provided to the Executive (including any payment, distribution, benefit or entitlement made by any person or entity effecting a Change in Control), in each case, that could be considered parachute payments within the meaning of Section 280G of the Code (such payments, the Parachute Payments) that, but for this Section 10 would be payable to the Executive, exceeds the greatest amount of Parachute Payments that could be paid to the Executive without giving rise to any liability for any excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Code (or any successor provision thereto) or any similar tax imposed by state or local law, or any interest or penalties with respect to such tax (such tax or taxes, together with any such interest or penalties, being hereafter collectively referred to as the Excise Tax), then the aggregate amount of Parachute Payments payable to the Executive shall not exceed the amount which produces the greatest after-tax benefit to the Executive after taking into account any Excise Tax to be payable by the Executive.  For the avoidance of doubt, this provision will reduce the amount of Parachute Payments otherwise payable to the Executive, if doing so would place the Executive in a better net after-tax economic position as compared with not doing so (taking into account the Excise Tax payable in respect of such Parachute Payments).  The Executive shall be permitted to provide to the Company written notice specifying which of the Parachute Payments will be subject to reduction or elimination; , , that to the extent that the Executives ability to exercise such authority would cause any Parachute Payment to become subject to any Section 409A Tax, or if the Executive does not provide the Company with any such written notice, the Company shall reduce or eliminate the Parachute Payments by first reducing or eliminating the portion of the Parachute Payments that are payable in cash and then by reducing or eliminating the non-cash portion of the Parachute Payments, in each case in reverse order beginning with payments or benefits which are to be paid the furthest in time from the date of the Firms determination.  Except as set forth in the preceding sentence, any notice given by the Executive pursuant to the preceding sentence shall take precedence over the provisions of any other plan, arrangement or agreement governing the Executives rights and entitlements to any benefits or compensation.
In the event that it is determined
provided
however
 
 
 
 
2.           .  All references in the Agreement to Section 10 and the Excise Tax Adjustment Payment are hereby deleted; , , that the procedural provisions set forth in Sections 10(c), (d) and (e) of the Agreement will continue to apply to Section 7(d) of the Agreement to the extent applicable to the Section 409A Tax.  Additionally, the definitions of Excise Tax, Excise Tax Adjustment Payment, Firm, Floor Amount and Potential Parachute Benefit in Appendix 1 of the Agreement are hereby deleted.  For the avoidance of doubt, Brunswick shall have no obligation to you with respect to any excise tax obligations or liabilities that may be imposed pursuant to Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in connection with any Parachute Payments.
Cross References
provided
however
3.           .  For the avoidance of doubt, except to the extent expressly modified by this Amendment, all terms of the Agreement will remain in full force and effect following the date of this Amendment.
Full Force and Effect
 
4.           .  The validity, interpretation, construction, and performance of this Amendment shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois, without regard to its choice of laws provisions, for contracts made and to be performed wholly in such state.
Governing Law
 
5.           .  Headings to paragraphs hereof are for convenience of reference only and shall not be construed to alter or affect the meaning of any provision of this Amendment.
Headings
 
6.           .  This Amendment, together with the Agreement and the appendices attached thereto, contains the entire agreement between you and Brunswick concerning the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements, understandings, discussions, negotiations and undertakings, whether written or oral, between you and Brunswick with respect hereto.  You acknowledge and agree that this Amendment constitutes an amendment to the Agreement in respect of your participation and rights to any benefits thereunder.  This Amendment may not be modified or amended except by a writing signed by each of the parties hereto.
Entire Agreement
 
7.           .  This Amendment may be executed in two or more counterparts, any one of which shall be deemed the original without reference to the others.
Counterparts
 
Intending to be legally bound hereby, the parties have executed this Amendment on the dates set forth next to their names below.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20090506145012.txt.gz
TIME:20090506145012
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
FORM 8-K
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported): May 6, 2009
 
_______________________            
 
 
                                     
                                                                                                     
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
                 Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                 Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
                 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
 
 
 
4
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20090604160831.txt.gz
TIME:20090604160831
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 29, 2009, Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") entered into the Business Financing Agreement (the "Agreement") with GE Commercial Distribution Finance Corporation ("GECDF"). The Agreement, an asset based lending facility that totals $100 million, replaces the existing accounts receivable sale program the Company had with Brunswick Acceptance Company, LLC ("BAC"), the financing joint venture between Brunswick Financial Services Corporation, a Brunswick subsidiary, and CDF Ventures, LLC, a subsidiary of GE Capital Corporation. The Agreement is secured by the domestic accounts receivable of Mercury Marine, a division of the Company, which were previously sold to BAC under the receivables sale program.
The Agreement includes provisions, among other things, that:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The description of the Agreement in this Current Report on Form 8-K is qualified in its entirety by the Agreement, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1 and incorporated by reference into this Item 1.01.
 
The information set forth above under Item 1.01 is hereby incorporated by reference into this Item 2.03.
 
The news release announcing this matter is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein. The information in this Item 7.01 and Exhibit 99.1 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference into any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
Date: June 4, 2009
EXHIBIT INDEX: Description of Exhibit
 

Exhibit 10.1
BUSINESS FINANCING AGREEMENT
This Business Financing Agreement (as from time to time amended, "") is between GE Commercial Distribution Finance Corporation (""), with its chief executive office and principal place of business at 5595 Trillium Boulevard, Hoffman Estates, Illinois 60192 and Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation with its chief executive office at 1 N. Field Court, Lake Forest, IL 60045 ("").
Agreement
CDF
Borrower
 
 
"": all accounts, leases, chattel paper, choses in action and instruments, including any lien or other security interest that secures or may secure any of the foregoing, plus all invoices, documents and other records in any form evidencing or relating to any of the foregoing (including without limitation, all invoices, contracts, delivery receipts, bills of lading, other documents and all reports, if any, of Borrower which relate to the foregoing), now owned or hereafter acquired by Borrower which arise from the sale of goods or services to third party customers located in the United States from Borrower's Mercury Marine division, including but not limited to those accounts arising from the sale of Mercury, Mercruiser, High Performance, Motorguide, Mercury Inflatables, or Quicksilver brand marine engines and marine engine parts and accessories, and casting or foundry products and services, but specifically excluding goods and services sold by Attwood Corporation, Land N' Sea Corporation, and Land N' Sea Distributing, Inc.
Accounts
"": a credit facility extended pursuant to this Agreement.
Accounts Receivable Facility
"": means an amount equal to 85% of (a) the total outstanding principal balance of all of Accounts (as updated per (b) below), adjusted for ineligible Accounts as described in Section 3.3 and certified in the Borrowing Base Certificate most recently furnished to Lender as required in Section 3.1, and (b) as such total amount of Accounts in (a) will be adjusted daily pursuant to (i) the reporting provided under Section 3.1 and (ii) collections received by CDF on Accounts.
Borrowing Base
"": shall mean a certificate signed by the Chief Financial Officer of Borrower or a duly authorized officer of Borrower, which shall be provided at the frequency required as per section 3.1, which will: (a) list the value of all Accounts, (b) describe all Accounts created or acquired by Borrower since the last schedule furnished to CDF, (c) list the value of ineligible Accounts and (d) list the loan balance activity since the last Borrowing Base Certificate was submitted by Borrower.
Borrowing Base Certificate
"": means any day the Federal Reserve Bank of Chicago is open for the transaction of business.
Business Day
"": means that certain Amended and Restated Credit Agreement between Borrowers and its lenders dated April 29, 2005, (as such agreement may amended be amended from time to time).
Credit Agreement
"": the events or occurrences enumerated in .
Default
Section 6
"": any individual, association, firm, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust, governmental body, agency or instrumentality whatsoever.
Entity
"": all indebtedness and other obligations of any nature whatsoever of Borrower to CDF and/or to any person that at any time directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with CDF (a ""), which arise under this Agreement and whether for principal, interest, fees, expenses, indemnification obligations or otherwise, and whether such indebtedness or other obligations are existing, future, direct, indirect, acquired, contractual, noncontractual, joint and/or several, fixed, contingent or otherwise.
Obligations
CDF Affiliate
 
"": all security agreements, mortgages, leases, instruments, assignments, documents, guarantees, schedules, certificates, contracts and similar agreements heretofore, now or hereafter executed by Borrower and delivered to CDF or delivered by or on behalf of Borrower to a third party and assigned to CDF by operation of law or otherwise relating to Borrower's Obligations hereunder.
Other Agreements
 
 
 
(i) CDF will provide a temporary seasonal uplift in the size of the Accounts Receivable Facility to Borrower from May 1st through August 31st each year this Agreement is in effect, or for so much of such period as the Agreement may be in effect, (such periods referred to as the "Uplift Periods"), such that the Accounts Receivable Facility shall be increased during such Uplift Periods to ONE HUNDRED TWENTY MILLION DOLLARS ($120,000,000).
 
(i) CDF will provide a temporary overadvance facility to Borrower such that the amount of credit available under the Accounts Receivable Facility shall be equal to the normal Borrowing Base availability limits plus an overadvance facility of $21,500,000, but in no event shall the credit available under the Accounts Receivable Facility exceed the lesser of (a) $100,000,000 (or $120,000,000 during Uplift Periods) , or b) 100% of the total Accounts owned by Borrower (including those repurchased by Borrower from Brunswick Acceptance Company, LLC, but excluding any Crownline and Bentley Accounts);
(ii) CDF will not require any reduction of the overadvance facility for the first 6 months after the date of this Agreement. After six (6) months, CDF will thereafter require a minimum monthly reduction in the overadvance facility of one twelfth of the amount of $21,500,000 during months seven (7) through seventeen (17) after the closing of this Accounts Receivable Facility, with a reduction in full of the remaining overadvance amount at eighteen (18) months after the date of this Agreement.
 
a) The annual interest rate is equal to the One Month LIBOR rate plus four and one quarter percent (4.25%). The applicable One Month LIBOR rate for any month shall be the one month LIBOR rate as published in the "Money Rates" column of the Wall Street Journal on the first Business Day of such month. For purposes of this Agreement, the One Month LIBOR rate shall in no event be less than one percent (1.0%). Such interest will: (i) be computed based on a 360 day year; (ii) will be calculated each day by multiplying the Daily Rate (as defined below) by the Daily Contract Balance (as defined
 
below); and (iii) accrue from the date that CDF makes an advance under the Accounts Receivable Facility until CDF receives the full and final payment of the principal debt which Borrower owes to CDF, subject to the terms of Section 3.8 herein. The "Daily Rate" is the quotient of the applicable annual interest rate in effect for that month as provided herein, divided by 360.
b) Interest is calculated on Daily Contract Balances. The Daily Contract Balance is the amount of the outstanding principal debt which Borrower owes to CDF on the Accounts Receivable Facility at the end of each Business Day, after factoring in new advances and debt repayments received that day under the Accounts Receivable Facility, subject to the terms of Section 3.8 herein.
c) On the first Business Day of each calendar month, CDF will provide such calculations to the Borrower no later than 11:00 a.m. Central time on the billing statement, as described in Section 2.2.
Should Borrower dispute the calculated amount of interest due, CDF and Borrower will expediently work to resolve such dispute, and the amount of interest due will continue to accrue on the previously determined Daily Contract Balance (as defined above), at the then current Daily Rate in effect for such then current month (as defined above), for the number of days elapsed until the parties are in agreement on the amount due, and such payment is effect by Borrower (with the date of payment excluded from that interest period).
 
. There will be a monthly unused line fee applicable to the Accounts Receivable Facility as follows. At the end of each month CDF shall calculate Borrower's Average Daily Contract Balance for such month. If (a) Borrower's average Daily Contract Balance for such month was less than forty million dollars ($40,000,000), and (b) Borrower's average Daily Contract Balances for such month were less than eighty percent (80%) of the end of month Borrowing Base availability for such month, then Borrower shall pay CDF a fee equal to 1.0% per annum of the difference between the average Daily Contract Balances for such month and $40,000,000. Such fee will be due and payable by Borrower each month by the 20th day of the month following such respective monthly period.
Unused Line Fee
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
. Borrower shall comply with the terms of Section 6.11 (a) under that certain Amended and Restated Credit Agreement between Borrowers and its lenders dated April 29, 2005, (as such agreement was amended on December 19, 2008 as filed with Borrower's 8-K filing filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission on or about December 19, 2008, (the "December 19, 2008 "). Any waiver of any such Event of Default under Section 6.11 (a) by the lenders under the December 19, 2008 Credit Agreement will not be binding on the rights of CDF hereunder. Any modification of such minimum fixed charge coverage ratio as described in Section 6.11 (a) of the December 19, 2008 Credit Agreement will not be binding on CDF without its written consent.
Minimum Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
Credit Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
If a dispute shall arise between the parties as to the interpretation of, or the existence or extent of a breach with respect to, any provision contained in this Agreement (but exclusive of disputes with respect to of this Agreement), (all such disputes and failures to agree, the ""), then either party may request, by giving written notice to the other party, that the Chief Executive Officer (or other senior executive officer) of Brunswick and the President (or other senior executive officer) of CDF (the "") confer within ten Business Days regarding the Arbitrable Dispute. The Senior Officers shall confer in good faith and use all reasonable efforts to resolve the Arbitrable Dispute. In the event that business or personal commitments make it unduly burdensome for the Senior Officers to confer within such ten Business Days, the Senior Officers shall cooperate, in good faith, to confer as soon as practicable after such tenth Business Day, and in any event within 20 Business Days of the notice requesting the conference.
Section 9
Arbitrable Disputes
Senior Officers
If the Senior Officers do not resolve the Arbitrable Dispute within ten Business Days (or such later date contemplated by subsection (a) above) after the Arbitrable Dispute has been submitted to them, then the Arbitrable Dispute shall be submitted to arbitration in accordance with the procedures set forth below in this .
Section
A panel of three arbitrators (the "") will be formed no later than fifteen Business Days after the failure of the Senior Officers to resolve the Arbitrable Dispute. In forming the Panel, each party will request an accounting firm of its choice to select an arbitrator, which arbitrator may be (but need not be) a member of such accounting firm. The two arbitrators then will choose a third arbitrator who shall not be affiliated in any manner with the parties. All of the arbitrators shall be generally familiar with the floorplan financing and receivables financing industry.
Panel
Except as otherwise provided herein, the arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association. The Panel shall allow such discovery, submissions and hearings as it determines to be appropriate, giving consideration to the parties' mutual desire for an efficient resolution of the Arbitrable Dispute. After conducting such hearings and reviewing the submissions of the parties, the Panel shall make its decision with respect to the Arbitrable Dispute. The parties shall use reasonable efforts to ensure that any such hearings and review of submissions are completed by the Panel within 45 days of the Panel's formation and that the Panel's decision is made within five Business Days of the completion of such hearings and review, but in no event later than 60 days after the formation of the Panel. The Panel shall have the authority to award relief under legal or equitable principles and to allocate responsibility for the out-of-pocket costs of the arbitration and to award recovery of reasonable attorney's fees and expenses in such manner as is determined to be appropriate. A full and complete record and transcript of the arbitration proceeding shall be maintained. The decision of the Panel shall be in writing accompanied concurrently by a written summary of its conclusions as well as the reasons for its conclusions.
 
Each party shall have ten Business Days to object to the Panel's decision, or any part thereof, by written submission made to the Panel and, if deemed appropriate by the Panel, in a hearing. After such objection, the Panel shall have five Business Days to reconsider and modify the decision, which modification, if any, shall be explained in writing. Thereafter, the decision of the Panel shall be final, binding and non-appealable with respect to the parties and all other persons or entities, including persons or entities which have failed or refused to participate in the arbitration process and shall be reviewable only to the extent provided by law.
The initiation of the dispute resolution procedures in this shall not excuse either party, or any of their respective affiliates, from performing its obligations hereunder. While the dispute procedure is pending, the parties and their respective affiliates shall continue to perform in good faith their respective obligations hereunder, subject to any rights to terminate this Agreement that may be available to the parties.
Section
The provisions of this shall be the exclusive remedy of the parties for all Arbitrable Disputes. The terms of this shall be without prejudice to the rights of each party to obtain recovery from, or to seek recourse against, the other party (or otherwise), in such manner as such party may elect (but subject to hereof), for all claims, damages, losses, costs and matters other than those related to Arbitrable Disputes.
Section
Section
Section 9
The agreement to arbitrate will survive the termination of this Agreement.
 
 
THIS CONTRACT CONTAINS BINDING ARBITRATION, JURY WAIVER AND PUNITIVE DAMAGE WAIVER PROVISIONS.
This Agreement is dated this 29th day of May, 2009.
 
Attach copy of Driver's License or State ID card for parties signing in their individual capacity.
GE COMMERCIAL DISTRIBUTION FINANCE CORPORATION
 
 
List of required Reports:
(due on the next Business Day):
Daily
BAC Invoice Summary Report
MMC AR Daily Sales Summary report
(due each Monday, as of previous Friday end of day, or on next Business Day if such Monday is not a Business Day):
Weekly
Summary AR Aging Report (Weekly)
(due by the 10
Monthly
th
Business Day following the end of Borrower's accounting month end, or on next Business Day if such day is not a Business Day):
Detailed AR Aging Report
Summary A/P Aging/Vendor Report
Sales Journal
Cash Receipts Journal
Credit/Adjustment Journal
Borrowing Base Certificate
(due by 10
Semi-Annually
th
Business Day following the end of Borrower's accounting month end for each June and December, or on next Business Day if such day is not a Business Day):
AR Customer List
 
GE Commercial Distribution Finance Corporation
2300 Windy Ridge Parkway Ste 700
Atlanta, GA 30039
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
The undersigned is a Borrowing Officer under the Credit Agreement and as such is authorized to make and deliver this Advance Request on behalf of Borrower pursuant to Section 3.2 of the Credit Agreement. All capitalized words used herein that are defined in the Credit Agreement have the meanings defined in the Credit Agreement.
Borrower hereby requests that Lender make a Revolving Loan advance of $             to Borrower under the terms of the Credit Agreement on             .
The undersigned hereby certifies that:
 
 
 
Executed this              day of             ,             .
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Court Lake Forest, IL 60045
Telephone 847.735.4700 Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
 
- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that it and GE Commercial Distribution Finance Corporation (GECDF) have entered into an asset-based loan (ABL) facility, secured by the domestic accounts receivable of Mercury Marine, a division of Brunswick. The ABL facility replaces Brunswick's existing accounts receivable sale program, pursuant to which Brunswick had sold the domestic Mercury Marine receivables to Brunswick Acceptance Company, LLC (BAC), a joint venture between Brunswick Financial Services Corporation, a Brunswick subsidiary, and CDF Ventures, LLC, a subsidiary of GE Capital Corporation.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., June 4, 2009
The ABL facility totals $100 million, and includes provisions to increase the size to $120 million to accommodate seasonal fluctuations in receivable balances. On May 29, 2009, the amount outstanding on the ABL facility was $81 million.
Borrowings under the ABL facility will be reported as short-term debt on Brunswick's consolidated balance sheets, with borrowing costs reflected in interest expense. The previous program was structured as a sale of receivables, and consequently, no debt was reflected on the Company's balance sheet. The cost of the previous program was reflected in "other income and expense" as a discount on the sale of receivables. The overall cost of the ABL facility is modestly higher than the previous receivable sale program, and reflects the current lending environment.
 
Brunswick Corporation
June 4, 2009
Page 2 of 2
The ABL facility is committed through the term of the joint venture agreement, and is incremental to the $1.0 billion secured borrowing facility provided by GECDF to BAC. In addition, the change will not otherwise impact the joint venture's inventory floor-plan finance program.
Additional information concerning the ABL facility, including the entire agreement, can be found under the related Form 8-K filing.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products and Brunswick billiards tables. For more information, visit www.brunswick.com.
About GE Capital, Commercial Distribution Finance
GE Capital's Commercial Distribution Finance business is a leading financing provider to manufacturers and their distributors. Programs include inventory and accounts receivable financing, asset-based lending, private label financing, collateral management, e-commerce services and related financial products. Additional information about CDF can be found online at .
www.ge.com/cdf
GE Capital offers consumers and businesses around the globe an array of financial products and services. GE (NYSE: GE) is Imagination at Worka diversified technology, media and financial services company focused on solving some of the world's toughest problems. For more information, visit the company's Web site at .
www.ge.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20090730091633.txt.gz
TIME:20090730091633
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]          Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 30, 2009, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2009. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its second quarter 2009 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. For example, Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
BRUNSWICK REPORTS SECOND QUARTER RESULTS
CASH POSITION INCREASED and PIPELINE INVENTORY REDUCED
AS WEAK MARKET CONDITIONS CONTINUE
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today results for the second quarter of 2009:
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 30, 2009
Global demand for our products continues to be constrained across all of our businesses and is consistent with the trends experienced in the previous two quarters, said Brunswicks Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  We continue to successfully manage our operations for cash and maintain excellent levels of liquidity.  At the end of the second quarter, we had more than $460 million of cash, a $144 million and $102 million increase from year-end and previous quarter levels, respectively.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Our ongoing inventory management and pipeline reduction strategy is to produce fewer units than we are wholesaling, and sell at wholesale at lower levels than our dealers are retailing. This strategy has enabled us to reduce overall marine inventories and has assisted our dealers in reducing the number of boats and engines on their showroom floors. Additionally these efforts have supported our strategy of maintaining the health of our dealers, which was reflected in our second quarter boat repurchase obligations, which remain at manageable levels.
Our focus of reducing overall inventory levels combined with difficult marine market conditions, has resulted in higher discounts and sales incentives to facilitate retail boat sales, leading to increased losses during the quarter. Lower sales levels, reduced fixed-cost absorption and higher pension and bad debt expense were also factors in our reduced earnings. Partially offsetting these factors were cost savings generated from our successful and ongoing fixed-cost reduction activities and lower restructuring, exit and impairment charges, McCoy said.
 
Second Quarter Results
For the second quarter of 2009, the company reported net sales of $718.3 million, down from $1,485.4 million a year earlier.  For the quarter, the company reported an operating loss of $145.4 million, which included $35.5 million of restructuring charges.  In the second quarter of 2008, the company had an operating loss of $17.2 million, which included $83.1 million of restructuring charges.
For the second quarter of 2009, Brunswick reported a net loss of $163.7 million, or $1.85 per diluted share, as compared with a net loss of $6.0 million, or $0.07 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2008.  The diluted loss per share for the second quarter of 2009 included restructuring charges of $0.40 per diluted share and a $0.05 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.  Diluted earnings per share for the second quarter of 2008 included $0.59 per diluted share of restructuring charges, as well as special tax benefits and a gain on an investment sale totaling $0.04 per diluted share.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
On May 29, 2009, the company entered into a new asset-based loan, secured by domestic Mercury Marine trade receivables.  Prior to the second quarter of 2009, these specific receivables had been sold to Brunswick Acceptance Company, the companys financial services joint venture with CDF Ventures, LLC, a subsidiary of GE Capital Corporation, and consequently these trade receivables were not reflected on Brunswicks balance sheet. This transaction did not have a material impact on cash, but resulted in an increase in working capital of approximately $84 million and an increase in short-term debt of approximately $81 million. After adjusting for this transaction, debt balances were flat compared with year-end 2008.
Cash and cash equivalents were $461 million at the end of the second quarter, up $144 million from year-end 2008 levels. The companys increased cash position resulted primarily from a change in certain assets and current liabilities of $214 million and net tax refunds of approximately $78 million, partially offset by net losses experienced in the first half. This change was primarily the result of reductions of the companys inventory and accounts and notes receivable, partially offset by decreased accounts payable and lower accrued expenses.
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine service, parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $415.2 million in the second quarter of 2009, down 43 percent from $723.6 million in the year-ago second quarter.  International sales, which represented 42 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, declined by 45 percent. For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported an operating loss of $7.8 million, including restructuring charges of $9.6 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $58.9 million in the year-ago quarter, including $17.6 million of restructuring charges.
 
 
 
 
 
 Sales were off across all Marine Engine operations, with sterndrive engines experiencing a greater sales decline than outboard engines.  Sales from the segments marine service, parts and accessories businesses, which represented 35 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, were down low single-digits, as boat usage and the purchase of parts and accessories remained relatively stable.
   
           Mercurys manufacturing facilities continued to cut production rates and take plant furloughs during the quarter in response to lower retail demand and to reduce pipeline levels.  Lower sales, reduced fixed-cost absorption on lower production and higher bad debt expense had an adverse effect on operating earnings, which were partially offset by Mercury Marines expense reductions.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group and includes 17 boat brands.  The Boat segment reported net sales for the second quarter of 2009 of $138.8 million, down 77 percent compared with $591.7 million in the second quarter of 2008.   International sales, which represented 49 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 75 percent during the period.  For the second quarter of 2009, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $107.9 million, including restructuring charges of $17.9 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $42.2 million, including restructuring charges of $37.6 million, in the second quarter of 2008.
Boat manufacturing facilities also continued to significantly cut production rates and take plant furloughs during the quarter to address inventory levels held by the company and its dealers.  Lower sales, reduced fixed-cost absorption on lower production and higher discounts and sales incentives on retail sales by dealers had an adverse effect on operating earnings, which were partially offset by the Boat Groups expense reductions.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales in the second quarter of 2009 totaled $105.0 million, down 33 percent from $156.9 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 45 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, declined by 40 percent.   For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $0.2 million, including $0.2 million of restructuring charges.  This compares with operating earnings of $8.2 million, including restructuring charges of $1.3 million in the second quarter of 2008.
Commercial equipment sales, which account for the largest percentage of Fitness segment sales, declined in the quarter as gym and fitness club operators remained cautious about ordering equipment.  Sales of consumer exercise equipment were also down, although at lower rates than sales of commercial equipment.  Operating earnings reflected the unfavorable effect of lower sales, which was partially mitigated by actions taken by Life Fitness to reduce expenses.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards tables and accessories.  Segment sales in the second quarter of 2009 totaled $77.4 million, down 30 percent compared with $110.4 million in the year-ago quarter.  For the quarter, the segment reported an operating loss of $5.9 million, including restructuring charges of $3.2 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $19.8 million, including restructuring charges of $19.8 million in the second quarter of 2008.
Retail bowling equivalent-center sales declined by a low double-digit percentage during the quarter.  The bowling products and billiards businesses experienced greater sales declines, as bowling center operators and retail billiards customers remained cautious about purchases.  Operating losses reflected the unfavorable effect of the reduced sales, which was partially offset by Bowling & Billiards cost reduction activities.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Outlook
We continue to successfully execute our strategy to maintain liquidity without borrowing, take all reasonable actions to protect our dealer network, and position ourselves to take advantage of improvements in economic conditions as they occur, McCoy said.  While the actions undertaken to execute our strategy have negatively affected our sales and earnings in the first half of this year, as they will in the second half, they are purposeful and necessary to position Brunswick for success.  Our $100 million of cash generation in the quarter and $461 million of cash at quarter end, declining inventory in the field and weeks-on-hand in the pipeline, and cost reductions ensure our health and ability to significantly improve sales and margins when the economy and marine markets stabilize.
We plan to end the year with cash in excess of $400 million, dealer pipelines at levels lower than at any time in the past 10 years, a reduction in net fixed costs of $260 million in 2009 alone, and new low-cost products in our marine markets.  In addition, we continue to analyze our manufacturing footprint, brands, models, and cost and operating structure. Our success in navigating through these very difficult market conditions places us in a strong competitive position when economic conditions improve. As such, we are uniquely positioned for continued market leadership in our marine and recreation businesses, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
www.br
u
nswick.com
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call
(800) 369-2064 (passcode: Brunswick Q2).  Callers outside North America should call +1 (517) 308-9313 to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Thursday, Aug. 6, 2009, by calling (800) 891-8253 or (203) 369-3378.  The replay will also be available at .
www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswicks business.   These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in the timeframe and cost anticipated; the ability to successfully complete the disposition of non-core assets; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components and raw materials from suppliers; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; and the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2008 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 4, 2009. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables.  For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(1)
On May 29, 2009, the Company repurchased $84.2 million of accounts receivable from Brunswick Acceptance Company, LLC, the Company's financial services joint venture
with CDF Ventures, LLC, a subsidiary of GE Capital Corporation. Additionally on May 29, 2009, the Company borrowed $81.1 million under a new asset-based lending (ABL)
facility with GE Commercial Distribution Finance
Corporation. As of July 4, 2009, the amount of borrowings outstanding under the ABL facility was $73.9 million.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20090814162324.txt.gz
TIME:20090814162324
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016
On August 11, 2009, Brunswick Corporation (the "") completed an offering of $350 million aggregate principal amount of 11.25 percent senior secured notes due 2016 (the "") at an issue price of 97.036 percent to qualified institutional buyers in accordance with Rule 144A, and to persons outside the U.S. pursuant to Regulation S under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. The new notes are secured by first-priority liens on the Company's headquarters and the domestic retail bowling centers it owns, and by second-priority liens on substantially all of the assets that secure the Company's existing senior secured revolving credit facility on a first-priority lien basis, other than the capital stock and other equity interests of certain subsidiaries (Brunswick Family Boat Co., Inc., Brunswick Bowling and Billiards Corporation and Sea Ray Boats, Inc.) and any asset (such as real estate, machinery, equipment and fixtures) that constitutes "" (in general, a manufacturing plant or other facility of material importance to the business of the Company that is owned by the Company or one of the subsidiaries named above).
Company
Notes
Principal Property
The Company intends to use the net proceeds from the private offering of the new notes primarily to fund a cash tender offer and consent solicitation for its outstanding 5 percent notes due 2011, on the terms and conditions set forth in the offer to purchase and consent solicitation statement dated August 10, 2009, and related letter of transmittal. The tender offer is made only through, and pursuant to the terms of, the offer to purchase and the letter of transmittal. As of July 4, 2009, $150 million aggregate principal amount of the 2011 notes was outstanding. Any proceeds not used to fund the tender offer will be used for general corporate purposes, including the repurchase, redemption, defeasance or repayment of any 2011 notes not purchased in the tender offer, or the escrow of funds to repurchase, redeem, defease or repay any such 2011 notes, or to repurchase, redeem, defease or repay indebtedness of the Company, including the Company's 11.75 percent senior notes due 2013.
The Notes were issued pursuant to an Indenture (the ""), dated as of August 14, 2009, between the Company, the subsidiary guarantors party thereto and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as trustee.
Indenture
The Notes bear interest at a rate of 11.25 percent annum and mature on November 1, 2016. Interest on the Notes will be payable semi-annually on May 1 and November 1 of each year, starting on November 1, 2009.
The Indenture imposes certain limitations on the incurrence of indebtedness by the Company and its subsidiaries, the payment of dividends and other distributions on the capital stock of the Company and its subsidiaries (excepting, among other things, dividends on the Company's common stock of up to $5.0 million per calendar year), the purchase or redemption of capital stock of the Company, certain purchases or redemptions of subordinated obligations or guarantor subordinated obligations, the sale or transfer of assets and capital stock of subsidiaries, certain sale/leaseback transactions involving the Company or its restricted subsidiaries, the issuance or sale of capital stock of restricted subsidiaries, the incurrence of certain liens, future subsidiary guarantors, the business activities and investments of the Company and its subsidiaries and transactions with affiliates, provided, however, that certain of such limitations shall be suspended if the Notes receive a rating of "BBB-" or higher from Standard & Poor's Rating Services (or its successors) and "Baa3" or higher from Moody's Investors Service, Inc. (or its successors), in each case, with a stable or better outlook. In addition, the Indenture limits the ability of the Company and its subsidiaries to enter into agreements that restrict distributions and dividends from subsidiaries.
Prior to November 1, 2013, the Company may redeem some or all of the notes at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date of redemption plus a "make-whole" premium. On or after
November 1, 2013, the Company may redeem some or all of the notes at the following redemption prices (expressed as a percentage of principal amount of the Notes to be redeemed) plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date of redemption, if redeemed during the twelve-month period beginning on November 1 of the years indicated below:
 
In addition, at any time and from time to time, on or prior to November 1, 2012, the Company may redeem up to 35% of the aggregate principal amount of the notes with the net cash proceeds from certain equity offerings at a redemption price equal to 100% of the aggregate principal amount thereof, plus a premium equal to the interest rate per annum, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date of redemption.
The Company is not required to make mandatory redemption payments or sinking fund payments with respect to the Notes.
The Indenture contains customary events of default. If an event of default occurs and is continuing, the trustee or holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Notes then outstanding may declare all the Notes to be due and payable immediately. Certain events of bankruptcy or insolvency are events of default which shall result in the Notes being due and payable immediately upon the occurrence of such events of default.
Upon the occurrence of a change of control (as defined in the Indenture), any holder of Notes will have the right to require the Company to repurchase all or any part of the Notes of such holder at a purchase price in cash equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date of repurchase.
In the event of certain asset dispositions (as defined in the Indenture), the Company will be required to make an offer to all holders to purchase Notes, and, if required by the terms thereof, to the holders of certain indebtedness ranking equally in right of payment to the Notes, at an offer price in cash in an amount equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes and such other indebtedness, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the date of purchase.
The Notes have not been, and will not be, registered under the Securities Act or any state securities laws and, unless so registered, may not be offered or sold in the United States except pursuant to an applicable exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act and applicable state securities laws.
The Indenture and the form of the Notes are filed as Exhibits 4.1 and 4.2 respectively to this Current Report on Form 8-K. The foregoing description of the Indenture and the Notes is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Indenture and the Notes, which are incorporated herein by reference.
First Amendment to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and the Pledge and Security Agreement
On August 11, 2009, the Company entered into the First Amendment (the "") to (i) the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of April 29, 2005, as amended and restated as of December 19, 2008 (the ""), among the Company, the subsidiaries party thereto, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent and (ii) the Pledge and Security Agreement, dated as of December 19, 2008 (the ""), among the Company, the subsidiaries party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
First Amendment
Credit Agreement
Security Agreement
The First Amendment amends and supplements the Credit Agreement and the Security Agreement by, among other things, increasing the amount of permitted secured debt in connection with the refinancing of the Company's 11.750% Senior Notes due 2013 as well as for general corporate purposes.
The First Amendment is attached as Exhibit 10.1. The foregoing description of the First Amendment is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the First Amendment, which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
The information set forth above under Item 1.01 is hereby incorporated by reference into this Item 2.03.
Statements made in this Current Report on Form 8-K that are forward-looking involve risks and uncertainties and are indicated by words such as "may," "expects" and other similar words or phrases. Actual events or results may differ materially from those described herein. These uncertainties include, but are not limited to, future economic conditions and other risks described in filings with the SEC such as Brunswick's most recent Forms 10-K and 10-Q.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX
 

Exhibit 4.1
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
INDENTURE, dated as of August 14, 2009 (this ""), among BRUNSWICK CORPORATION, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (the ""), certain subsidiaries of the Company from time to time parties hereto (the "") and THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, N.A., a national banking association, as trustee (in such capacity, the "") and as collateral agent (in such capacity, the "").
Indenture
Company
Subsidiary Guarantors
Trustee
Collateral Agent
The Company has duly authorized the execution and delivery of this Indenture to provide for the issuance of (i) $350,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016, issued on the date hereof (the ""), (ii) if and when issued, an unlimited principal amount of additional notes having identical terms and conditions as the Initial Notes other than issue date, issue price and the first interest payment date (the "" and, together with the Initial Notes, the "").
Initial Notes
Additional Notes
Securities
Each party agrees as follows for the benefit of the other parties and for the equal and ratable benefit of the Holders of the Securities:
SECTION 1.1. .
Definitions
"1987 Indenture" means the indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee, as amended and supplemented.
"1987 Restricted Subsidiaries" means Brunswick Family Boat Co., Inc., Brunswick Bowling and Billiards Corporation and Sea Ray Boats, Inc.
"2013 Notes" means the 11.75% Senior Notes due 2013 of the Company.
"ABL Agent" means the administrative agent under the ABL Facility.
"ABL Collateral" means the assets that secure the ABL Obligations, certain hedging obligations and all banking services obligations incurred with any lender or its affiliates under the ABL Facility, including, subject to certain exceptions, without limitation the existing and future accounts receivable, inventory, equipment, intellectual property, cash, deposit accounts, chattel paper, investment property, financial instruments, general intangibles, other personal property, future-acquired real properties and the Capital Stock and other equity interests in substantially all directly-held domestic subsidiaries and 65% of the Capital Stock in certain foreign subsidiaries and the proceeds and products of the foregoing of the Company and its domestic subsidiaries that guarantee the ABL Facility, except for the First-Priority Collateral, Excluded Assets, any real property that is owned by the Company or any 1987 Restricted
Subsidiary (with respect to the Company and 1987 Restricted Subsidiaries, to the extent the 1987 Indenture remains in existence) or any real property that has a fair market value less than $10.0 million in an aggregate amount not to exceed $50.0 million. In addition, for as long as the 1987 Indenture remains in effect, the ABL Obligations, certain hedging obligations and all banking services obligations Incurred with any lender or its affiliates under the ABL Facility secured by Liens on any "Principal Property" or shares of Capital Stock of a "Restricted Subsidiary", in each case as defined under the 1987 Indenture, shall not exceed the difference between (i) the maximum amount of obligations that can be secured without requiring any securities issued under such indenture to be ratably secured and (ii) the sum of (A) the amount of debt secured by the Headquarters (and permitted to be so secured under the ABL Facility) to the extent it constitutes "Principal Property" under such indenture and (B) the amount of debt secured by a Lien on the Fond du Lac Facility or the Stillwater Facility (and permitted to be so secured under the ABL Facility) to the extent either such asset subject to such a Lien constitutes "Principal Property" under the 1987 Indenture. The 1987 Indenture defines "Principal Property" to mean any manufacturing plant or other facility of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary (as defined in the 1987 Indenture), whether now owned or hereafter acquired, which, in the opinion of the Board of Directors of the Company, is of material importance to the business conducted by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries (as defined in the 1987 Indenture) as a whole. At any time there are no ABL Obligations outstanding, "ABL Collateral" means the assets that secured the ABL Obligations last outstanding (and any after acquired assets that would have been ABL Collateral had the ABL Obligations remained outstanding).
"ABL Facility" means the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of April 29, 2005, as amended and restated as of December 19, 2008, among the Company, the subsidiary borrowers party thereto, the guarantors party thereto, the lenders parties thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent (or its successor in such capacity), and as it may be amended, supplemented or modified from time to time and any renewal, increase, extension, refunding, restructuring, replacement or refinancing thereof in whole or in part (whether with the original administrative agent and lenders or another administrative agent or agents or one or more other lenders and whether provided under the original ABL Facility or one or more other credit or other agreements or indentures entered into from time to time).
"ABL Obligations" means Indebtedness outstanding under the ABL Facility that is secured by a Permitted Lien described under clause (1) of the definition thereof, and all other Obligations (not constituting Indebtedness) of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor under the ABL Facility.
"Acquired Indebtedness" means, with respect to any Person, Indebtedness (i) of a Person or any of its Subsidiaries existing at the time such Person is merged with or becomes a Restricted Subsidiary or (ii) assumed in connection with the acquisition of assets from such Person, in each case whether or not Incurred by such Person in connection with, or in anticipation or contemplation of, such Person becoming a Restricted Subsidiary or such acquisition, and Indebtedness secured by a Lien encumbering any asset acquired by such specified Person. Acquired Indebtedness shall be deemed to have been Incurred, with respect to clause (i) of the preceding sentence, on the date such Person is merged with or becomes a
 
Restricted Subsidiary and, with respect to clause (ii) of the preceding sentence, on the date of consummation of such acquisition of assets.
"Additional Assets" means:
(1) any property, plant, equipment or other asset (excluding working capital or current assets for the avoidance of doubt) to be used by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary in a Related Business;
(2) the Capital Stock of a Person that becomes a Restricted Subsidiary as a result of the acquisition of such Capital Stock by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary; or
(3) Capital Stock constituting a minority interest in any Person that at such time is or shall thereupon become a Restricted Subsidiary; , that, in the case of clauses (2) and (3) such Restricted Subsidiary is primarily engaged in a Related Business.
provided, however
"Affiliate" of any specified Person means (i) any other Person, directly or indirectly, controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with such specified Person, (ii) any Person who is a director or officer (a) of such Person, (b) of any Subsidiary of such Person or (c) of any Person described in clause (i) above and (iii) any beneficial owner of shares representing 10% or more of the total voting power of the Voting Stock (on a fully diluted basis) of the Company or of rights or warrants to purchase such Voting Stock (whether or not currently exercisable) and any Person who would be an Affiliate of any such beneficial owner pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii). For the purposes of this definition, "control" when used with respect to any Person means the power to direct the management and policies of such Person, directly or indirectly, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise; and the terms "controlling" and "controlled" have meanings correlative to the foregoing. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Person (other than the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company) in whom a Receivables Entity makes an Investment in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction shall be deemed to be an Affiliate of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries solely by reason of such Investment.
"Applicable Premium" means with respect to any Redemption Date, the greater of:
(1) 1.0% of the principal amount of such Security; and
(2) the excess, if any, of (a) the present value as of such Redemption Date of (i) $1,056.25 per $1,000 principal amount of such Security on November 1, 2013 plus (ii) all required interest payments due on such Security through November 1, 2013 (excluding accrued but unpaid interest to the date of redemption), computed using a discount rate equal to the Treasury Rate as of such Redemption Date plus 50 basis points, over (b) the then-outstanding principal of such Security, in each case as calculated by the Company or on behalf of the Company by such Person as the Company shall designate; provided that such calculation shall not be a duty or obligation of the applicable Trustee.
 
"Asset Disposition" means any direct or indirect sale, lease (other than an operating lease entered into in the ordinary course of business), transfer, issuance or other disposition, or a series of related sales, leases, transfers, issuances or dispositions that are part of a common plan, of shares of Capital Stock of a Restricted Subsidiary (other than directors' qualifying shares), property or other assets (each referred to for the purposes of this definition as a "disposition") by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, including any disposition by means of a merger, consolidation or similar transaction.
Notwithstanding the preceding, the following items shall not be deemed to be Asset Dispositions:
(1) a disposition of assets by a Restricted Subsidiary to the Company or by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary to a Wholly-Owned Subsidiary (other than a Receivables Entity); that a disposition of assets that are not First-Priority Collateral may be transferred by a Restricted Subsidiary to the Company or by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary to a Restricted Subsidiary; , , that in the case of a transfer of Collateral to a Subsidiary Guarantor, the transferee shall cause such amendments, supplements or other instruments to be executed, filed and recorded in such jurisdictions as may be required by applicable law to preserve and protect the Lien on the Collateral pledged by or transferred to the transferee, together with such financing statements or comparable documents as may be required to perfect any security interests in such Collateral which may be perfected by the filing of a financing statement or a similar document under the Uniform Commercial Code or other similar statute or regulation of the relevant states or jurisdictions;
provided
provided
further
(2) the sale of Cash Equivalents in the ordinary course of business;
(3) a disposition of inventory in the ordinary course of business;
(4) a disposition of obsolete or worn out equipment or equipment that is no longer useful in the conduct of the business of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries and that is disposed of in each case in the ordinary course of business;
(5) the disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company in a manner permitted pursuant to or any disposition that constitutes a Change of Control pursuant to this Indenture;
Section 4.1
(6) an issuance of Capital Stock by a Restricted Subsidiary to the Company or to a Wholly-Owned Subsidiary (other than a Receivables Entity);
(7) for purposes of only, the making of a Permitted Investment or a disposition subject to ;
Section 3.8
Section 3.4
(8) sales of accounts receivable and related assets or an interest therein of the type specified in the definition of "Qualified Receivables Transaction" to a Receivables
 
Entity and transfers of accounts receivable and related assets or an interest therein of the type specified in the definition of "Qualified Receivables Transaction" by a Receivables Entity in a Qualified Receivables Transaction;
(9) dispositions of assets in a single transaction or a series of related transactions with an aggregate fair market value of less than $1.0 million;
(10) the creation of a Permitted Lien and dispositions in connection with Permitted Liens;
(11) dispositions of receivables in connection with the compromise, settlement or collection thereof in the ordinary course of business or in bankruptcy or similar proceedings and exclusive of factoring or similar arrangements;
(12) the issuance by a Restricted Subsidiary of Preferred Stock that is permitted by ;
Section 3.3
(13) the licensing or sublicensing of intellectual property or other general intangibles and licenses, leases or subleases of other property in the ordinary course of business which do not materially interfere with the business of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries;
(14) to the extent allowable under Section 1031 of the Code, any exchange of like property (excluding any boot thereon) for use in a Related Business;
(15) foreclosure on assets;
(16) any sale of Capital Stock, Indebtedness or other securities of, an Unrestricted Subsidiary; and
(17) solely for the purposes of , dispositions of up to $50.0 million of net book value of assets in a single transaction or a series of related transactions pursuant to restructuring plans that have been initiated or commenced prior to December 31, 2009.
Section 3.8(b)(3)
"Attributable Indebtedness" in respect of a Sale/Leaseback Transaction means, as at the time of determination, the present value (discounted at the interest rate implicit in the transaction) of the total obligations of the lessee for rental payments during the remaining term of the lease included in such Sale/Leaseback Transaction (including any period for which such lease has been extended), determined in accordance with GAAP; , that if such Sale/Leaseback Transaction constitutes a Capitalized Lease Obligation, the amount of Indebtedness represented thereby shall be determined in accordance with the definition of "Capitalized Lease Obligations."
provided, however
"Average Life" means, as of the date of determination, with respect to any Indebtedness or Preferred Stock, the quotient obtained by dividing (1) the sum of the products of
 
the numbers of years from the date of determination to the dates of each successive scheduled principal payment of such Indebtedness or redemption or similar payment with respect to such Preferred Stock multiplied by the amount of such payment by (2) the sum of all such payments.
"BAC Joint Venture" means Brunswick Acceptance Company, LLC, a joint venture company (a majority of the equity interests of which is owned on the Issue Date by General Electric Commercial Finance or one of its Subsidiaries and the remainder thereof by the Company and/or any Subsidiary of the Company). The BAC Joint Venture existing on the Issue Date may be replaced by a joint venture between the Company or one of its Subsidiaries and a financing party without the consent of the Holders if the terms of such joint venture and the related agreements and arrangements shall not materially adversely affect the Company's or any Subsidiary Guarantor's ability to make anticipated principal or interest payments on the Securities or Subsidiary Guarantees, as the case may be (as determined in Good Faith by the Company). In such event, then "BAC Joint Venture" shall mean such replacement joint venture from and after its inception and the terms "BAC Joint Venture Obligations" and "BAC LLC Agreement" shall have correlative meanings in respect of the organizational documents and contractual obligations of such replacement joint venture.
"BAC Joint Venture Obligations" means any and all agreements, undertakings, arrangements and other obligations of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries to make loans or advances, or guarantee the obligations of or purchase or otherwise acquire any Capital Stock, Obligations or other securities of, make any capital contribution to, or otherwise invest in, the BAC Joint Venture.
"BAC LLC Agreement" means that certain limited liability company agreement, dated as of October 24, 2002, between Brunswick Financial Services Corporation and CDF Ventures, LLC, as amended through the Issue Date and as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified in accordance with this Indenture.
"Bank Lender" means the lenders or holders of Indebtedness issued under the ABL Facility or any replacement thereof.
"Board of Directors" means:
(1) with respect to a corporation, the Board of Directors of the corporation or (other than for purposes of determining Change of Control) any committee thereof duly authorized to act on behalf of the Board of Directors with respect to the relevant matter;
(2) with respect to a partnership, the Board of Directors of the general partner of the partnership; and
(3) with respect to any other Person, the board or committee of such Person serving a similar function.
 
"Board Resolution" means a copy of a resolution certified by the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of a company to have been duly adopted by the Board of Directors of such company and to be in full force and effect on the date of such certification, and delivered to the Trustee.
"Borrowing Base" means, as of the date of determination, an amount equal to the sum, without duplication of (1) 80% of the net book value of the Company's and its Restricted Subsidiaries' accounts receivable at such date and (2) 60% of the net book value of the Company's and its Restricted Subsidiaries' inventories at such date. Net book value shall be determined in accordance with GAAP and shall be calculated using amounts reflected on the most recent available balance sheet (it being understood that the accounts receivable and inventories of an acquired business may be included if such acquisition has been completed on or prior to the date of determination); , that (x) the net book value of accounts receivable of any Receivables Entity that secures Indebtedness Incurred under shall be included; that to the extent such accounts receivable are treated as off-balance sheet for accounting purposes, the related Indebtedness is also treated as off-balance sheet and (y) the Floorplan Borrowing Base shall specifically be excluded from calculations of the Borrowing Base.
provided, however
Section 3.3
provided
"Bowling Assets" means all the retail bowling centers of the bowling retail business of the Company and its Subsidiaries that are owned by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries that have a Gross PPE of $0.3 million or more and (2) are located in the United States; that a retail bowling center under development shall not constitute a "Bowling Asset" until such retail bowling center is in operation.
provided
"Business Day" means each day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banking institutions in New York, New York are authorized or required by law or regulation to close.
"Capital Stock" of any Person means (i) with respect to any Person that is a corporation, any and all shares, interests, rights to purchase, warrants, options, participations or other equivalents of or interests in (however designated) equity of such Person, including any Common Stock or Preferred Stock, and (ii) with respect to any Person that is not a corporation, any and all partnership, limited liability company, membership or other equity interests of such Person but in each case excluding any debt securities convertible into such equity.
"Capitalized Lease Obligation" means an obligation that is required to be classified and accounted for as a capitalized lease for financial reporting purposes in accordance with GAAP, and the amount of Indebtedness represented by such obligation shall be the capitalized amount of such obligation at the time any determination thereof is to be made as determined in accordance with GAAP, and the Stated Maturity thereof shall be the date of the last payment of rent or any other amount due under such lease prior to the first date such lease may be terminated without penalty.
"Cash Equivalents" means:
 
(1) U.S. dollars, or in the case of any Foreign Subsidiary, such currencies held by it from time to time in the ordinary course of business;
(2) securities issued or directly and fully guaranteed or insured by the United States Government or any agency or instrumentality of the United States ( that the full faith and credit of the United States is pledged in support thereof), having maturities of not more than one year from the date of acquisition;
provided
(3) marketable general obligations issued by any state of the United States of America or any political subdivision of any such state or any public instrumentality thereof maturing within one year from the date of acquisition and, at the time of acquisition, having a credit rating of "A" or better from either Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, Inc. or Moody's Investors Service, Inc.;
(4) certificates of deposit, time deposits, eurodollar time deposits, overnight bank deposits or bankers' acceptances having maturities of not more than one year from the date of acquisition thereof issued by any commercial bank the long-term debt of which is rated at the time of acquisition thereof at least "A" or the equivalent thereof by Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, Inc., or "A" or the equivalent thereof by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., and having combined capital and surplus in excess of $500 million;
(5) repurchase obligations with a term of not more than seven days for underlying securities of the types described in clauses (2), (3) and (4), entered into with any bank meeting the qualifications specified in clause (4) above;
(6) commercial paper rated at the time of acquisition thereof at least "A-1" or the equivalent thereof by Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, Inc. or "P-1" or the equivalent thereof by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., or carrying an equivalent rating by a nationally recognized Rating Agency, if both of the two named Rating Agencies cease publishing ratings of investments, and in any case maturing within one year after the date of acquisition thereof;
(7) instruments equivalent to those referred to in clauses (1) through (6) of this definition denominated in euros or any foreign currency comparable in credit quality and tenor to those referred to in such clauses and customarily used by corporations for cash management purposes in any jurisdiction outside the United States to the extent reasonably required in connection with any business conducted by any Restricted Subsidiary organized in such jurisdiction; and
(8) interests in any investment company or money market fund that invests 95% or more of its assets in instruments of the type specified in clauses (1) through (7) above.
"Change of Control" means:
 
(1) any "person" or "group" of related persons (as such terms are used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act) becomes the beneficial owner (as defined in Rules 13d-3 and 13d-5 under the Exchange Act, except that such person or group shall be deemed to have "beneficial ownership" of all shares that any such person or group has the right to acquire, whether such right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time), directly or indirectly, of more than 35% of the total voting power of the Voting Stock of the Company or any of its direct or indirect parent entities (or their successors by merger, consolidation or purchase of all or substantially all of their assets);
(2) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Board of Directors of the Company are not Continuing Directors;
(3) the sale, assignment, lease, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole to any "person" (as such term is used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act); or
(4) the adoption by the stockholders of the Company of a plan or proposal for the liquidation or dissolution of the Company.
"Clearstream" means Clearstream Banking, socit anonyme, or any successor securities clearing agency.
"Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
"Collateral" means all property and assets, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, in which Liens are, from time to time, purported to be granted to secure the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees pursuant to the Collateral Documents.
"Collateral Accounts" means any segregated account under the sole control of the Collateral Agent that is free from all other Liens, and includes all cash and Cash Equivalents received by the Trustee or the Collateral Agent from Asset Dispositions of First-Priority Collateral, Recovery Events, foreclosures on or sales of First-Priority Collateral or any other awards or proceeds pursuant to the Collateral Documents, including earnings, revenues, rents, issues, profits and income from the Collateral received pursuant to the Collateral Documents, and interest earned thereon.
"Collateral Agent" means The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., acting in its capacity as collateral agent under the Collateral Documents, or any successor thereto.
"Collateral Documents" means the mortgages, deeds of trust, deeds to secure debt, security agreements, pledge agreements, agency agreements and other instruments and documents executed and delivered pursuant to this Indenture or any of the foregoing, as the same may be amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time and pursuant to which
 
Collateral is pledged, assigned or granted to or on behalf of the Collateral Agent for the ratable benefit of the Holders and the Trustee or notice of such pledge, assignment or grant is given.
"Commodity Agreement" means any commodity futures contract, commodity option, commodity swap agreement, commodity collar agreement, commodity cap agreement or other similar agreement or arrangement entered into by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary designed to protect the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries against fluctuations in the price of commodities actually used in the ordinary course of business of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries.
"Common Stock" means with respect to any Person, any and all shares, interest or other participations in, and other equivalents (however designated and whether voting or nonvoting) of such Person's common stock whether or not outstanding on the Issue Date, and includes, without limitation, all series and classes of such common stock.
"Company" means Brunswick Corporation until a successor replaces it and, thereafter, means such successor.
"Consolidated Coverage Ratio" means as of any date of determination, with respect to any Person, the ratio of (x) the aggregate amount of Consolidated EBITDA of such Person for the period of the most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters ending prior to the date of such determination for which financial statements prepared on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP are available to (y) Consolidated Interest Expense for such four consecutive fiscal quarters, , that:
provided, however
 
(a) has Incurred any Indebtedness since the beginning of such period that remains outstanding on such date of determination or if the transaction giving rise to the need to calculate the Consolidated Coverage Ratio is or includes an Incurrence of Indebtedness, Consolidated EBITDA and Consolidated Interest Expense for such period shall be calculated after giving effect on a basis to such Indebtedness as if such Indebtedness had been Incurred on the first day of such period (except that in making such computation, the amount of Indebtedness under any revolving Debt Facility outstanding on the date of such calculation shall be deemed to be (x) the average daily balance of such Indebtedness during such four fiscal quarters or such shorter period for which such facility was outstanding or (y) if such facility was created after the end of such four fiscal quarters, the average daily balance of such Indebtedness during the period from the date of creation of such facility to the date of such calculation) and the discharge of any other Indebtedness repaid, repurchased, defeased or otherwise discharged with the proceeds of such new Indebtedness as if such discharge had occurred on the first day of such period; or
pro forma
 
(b) has repaid, repurchased, redeemed, retired, defeased or otherwise discharged any Indebtedness since the beginning of the period that is no longer outstanding on such date of determination or if the transaction giving rise to the need to calculate the Consolidated Coverage Ratio includes a discharge of Indebtedness (in each case, other than Indebtedness Incurred under any revolving Debt Facility unless such Indebtedness has been permanently repaid and the related commitment terminated), Consolidated EBITDA and Consolidated Interest Expense for such period shall be calculated after giving effect on a basis to such discharge of such Indebtedness, including with the proceeds of such new Indebtedness, as if such discharge had occurred on the first day of such period;
pro forma
(ii) if since the beginning of such period the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary shall have made any Asset Disposition or disposed of or discontinued (as defined under GAAP) any company, division, operating unit, segment, business, group of related assets or line of business or if the transaction giving rise to the need to calculate the Consolidated Coverage Ratio includes such a transaction:
(a) the Consolidated EBITDA for such period shall be reduced by an amount equal to the Consolidated EBITDA (if positive) directly attributable to the assets that are the subject of such disposition or discontinuation for such period or increased by an amount equal to the Consolidated EBITDA (if negative) directly attributable thereto for such period; and
(b) Consolidated Interest Expense for such period shall be reduced by an amount equal to the Consolidated Interest Expense directly attributable to any Indebtedness of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary repaid, repurchased, redeemed, retired, defeased or otherwise discharged (to the extent the related commitment is permanently reduced) with respect to the Company and its continuing Restricted Subsidiaries in connection with such transaction for such period (or, if the Capital Stock of any Restricted Subsidiary is sold, the Consolidated Interest Expense for such period directly attributable to the Indebtedness of such Restricted Subsidiary to the extent the Company and its continuing Restricted Subsidiaries are no longer liable for such Indebtedness after such sale),
(iii) if since the beginning of such period the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary (by merger or otherwise) shall have made an Investment in any Restricted Subsidiary (or any Person that becomes a Restricted Subsidiary or is merged with or into the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary) or an acquisition of assets, including any acquisition of assets occurring in connection with a transaction causing a calculation to be made hereunder, which constitutes all or substantially all of a company, division, operating unit, segment, business, group of related assets or line of business, Consolidated EBITDA and Consolidated Interest Expense for such period shall be calculated after giving effect thereto (including the Incurrence of any
pro forma
 
Indebtedness) as if such Investment or acquisition occurred on the first day of such period; and
(iv) if since the beginning of such period any Person (that subsequently became a Restricted Subsidiary or was merged with or into the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary since the beginning of such period) shall have Incurred any Indebtedness or discharged any Indebtedness, made any disposition or any Investment or acquisition of assets that would have required an adjustment pursuant to clause (i), (ii) or (iii) above if made by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary during such period, Consolidated EBITDA and Consolidated Interest Expense for such period shall be calculated after giving effect thereto as if such transaction occurred on the first day of such period.
pro forma
If any Indebtedness bears a floating rate of interest and is being given effect, the interest expense on such Indebtedness shall be calculated as if the rate in effect on the date of determination had been the applicable rate for the entire period (taking into account any Interest Rate Agreement applicable to such Indebtedness if such Interest Rate Agreement has a remaining term in excess of 12 months). If any Indebtedness that is being given effect bears an interest rate at the option of the Company, the interest rate shall be calculated by applying such optional rate chosen by the Company. For purposes of this definition, whenever effect is to be given to any calculation under this definition, the calculations shall be determined in good faith by a responsible financial or accounting Officer of the Company; that such calculations are set forth in an Officers' Certificate signed by such Officer stating (i) that such calculations are based on the reasonable good faith beliefs of such Officer executing such Officers' Certificate at the time of such execution and (ii) any related Incurrence of Indebtedness is permitted pursuant to this Indenture.
pro forma
pro forma
pro forma
pro forma
provided
"Consolidated EBITDA" means, with respect to any Person for any period, the Consolidated Net Income of such Person for such period:
(1) increased (without duplication) by the following items to the extent deducted in calculating such Consolidated Net Income:
(a) Consolidated Interest Expense;
plus
(b) Consolidated Income Taxes;
plus
(c) consolidated depreciation expense;
plus
(d) consolidated amortization expense or impairment charges recorded in connection with the application of Financial Accounting Standard No. 142 "Goodwill and Other Intangibles" and Financial Accounting Standard No. 144 "Accounting for the Impairment or Disposal of Long Lived Assets;"
plus
 
(e) other non-cash charges reducing Consolidated Net Income, including any write-offs or write-downs (excluding any such non-cash charge to the extent it represents an accrual of or reserve for cash charges in any future period or amortization of a prepaid cash expense that was paid in a prior period not included in the calculation);
plus
(f) any non-cash compensation expense realized for grants of restricted stock, performance shares, stock options or other rights to officers, directors and employees of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary; that such shares, options or other rights can be redeemed at the option of the holder only for Capital Stock of the Company (other than Disqualified Stock);
provided
plus
(g) any non-recurring fees, charges or other expenses made or Incurred in connection with the Transactions;
plus
(h) any non-recurring, non-cash severance and relocation costs and expenses;
(2) decreased (without duplication) by non-cash items increasing Consolidated Net Income of such Person for such period (excluding any items which represent the reversal of any accrual of, or reserve for, anticipated cash charges that reduced EBITDA in any prior period), and
(3) increased or decreased (without duplication) to eliminate the following items reflected in Consolidated Net Income:
(a) any net gain or loss resulting in such period from Hedging Obligations and the application of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 133;
(b) all unrealized gains and losses relating to financial instruments to which fair market value accounting is applied;
(c) any net gain or loss resulting in such period from currency translation gains or losses related to currency remeasurements of Indebtedness (including any net loss or gain resulting from Hedging Obligations for currency exchange risk); and
(d) effects of adjustments (including the effects of such adjustments pushed down to the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries) in any line item in such Person's consolidated financial statements pursuant to GAAP resulting from the application of purchase accounting in relation to any completed acquisition.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, clauses (1)(b) through (e) relating to amounts of a Restricted Subsidiary of a Person shall be added to Consolidated Net Income to compute Consolidated EBITDA of such Person only to the extent (and in the same proportion) that the net income (loss) of such Restricted Subsidiary was included in calculating the Consolidated Net Income of
 
such Person and, to the extent the amounts set forth in clauses (1)(b) through (e) are in excess of those necessary to offset a net loss of such Restricted Subsidiary or if such Restricted Subsidiary has net income for such period included in Consolidated Net Income, only if a corresponding amount would be permitted at the date of determination to be dividended to the Company by such Restricted Subsidiary without prior approval (that has not been obtained), pursuant to the terms of its charter and all agreements, instruments, judgments, decrees, orders, statutes, rules and governmental regulations applicable to that Restricted Subsidiary or its stockholders.
"Consolidated Income Taxes" means, with respect to any Person for any period, taxes imposed upon such Person or other payments required to be made by such Person by any governmental authority which taxes or other payments are calculated by reference to the income or profits or capital of such Person or such Person and its Restricted Subsidiaries (to the extent such income or profits were included in computing Consolidated Net Income for such period), including, without limitation, state, franchise and similar taxes and foreign withholding taxes regardless of whether such taxes or payments are required to be remitted to any governmental authority.
"Consolidated Interest Expense" means, for any period, the total interest expense of the Company and its consolidated Restricted Subsidiaries, whether paid or accrued (other than (i) non-cash interest expense attributable to convertible Indebtedness under Accounting Practices Bulletin 14-1 or any successor provision, (ii) the upfront costs associated with refinancing the 2011 Notes to the extent such payments constitute interest expense in accordance with GAAP, (iii) any gain or loss realized with respect to the termination in August 2008 of Swap Agreements that hedged interest rates on the potential issuance of Indebtedness and (iv) fees and expenses associated with commitments and loans under the ABL Facility), plus, to the extent not included in such interest expense (other than by reason of the foregoing parenthetical):
(1) interest expense attributable to Capitalized Lease Obligations and the interest portion of rent expense associated with Attributable Indebtedness in respect of the relevant lease giving rise thereto, determined as if such lease were a capitalized lease in accordance with GAAP and the interest component of any deferred payment obligations;
(2) amortization of debt discount (including the amortization of original issue discount resulting from the issuance of Indebtedness at less than par) and debt issuance cost; ,, that any amortization of bond premium shall be credited to reduce Consolidated Interest Expense unless, pursuant to GAAP, such amortization of bond premium has otherwise reduced Consolidated Interest Expense;
provided
however
(3) non-cash interest expense; any non-cash interest expense or income attributable to the movement in the mark to market valuation of Hedging Obligations or other derivative instruments pursuant to GAAP shall be excluded from the calculation of Consolidated Interest Expense);
provided
(4) commissions, discounts and other fees and charges owed with respect to letters of credit and bankers' acceptance financing;
 
(5) the interest expense on Indebtedness of another Person that is Guaranteed by such Person or one of its Restricted Subsidiaries or secured by a Lien on assets of such Person or one of its Restricted Subsidiaries; , that such interest shall only be included in "Consolidated Interest Expense" if the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary has ever previously made a payment of interest or principal or other Obligations in respect of such Indebtedness;
provided, however
(6) costs associated with entering into Interest Rate Agreements (including amortization of fees);
(7) the Consolidated Interest Expense of such Person and its Restricted Subsidiaries that was capitalized during such period;
(8) the product of (a) all dividends paid or payable, in cash, Cash Equivalents or Indebtedness or accrued during such period on any series of Disqualified Stock of such Person or on Preferred Stock of its Restricted Subsidiaries that are not Subsidiary Guarantors payable to a party other than the Company or a Wholly-Owned Subsidiary, times (b) a fraction, the numerator of which is one and the denominator of which is one minus the then current combined federal, state, provincial and local statutory tax rate of such Person, expressed as a decimal, in each case, on a consolidated basis and in accordance with GAAP;
(9) Receivables Fees; and
(10) the cash contributions to any employee stock ownership plan or similar trust to the extent such contributions are used by such plan or trust to pay interest or fees to any Person (other than the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries) in connection with Indebtedness Incurred by such plan or trust.
For purposes of the foregoing, total interest expense shall be determined (i) after giving effect to any net payments made or received by the Company and its Subsidiaries with respect to Interest Rate Agreements and (ii) exclusive of amounts classified as other comprehensive income in the balance sheet of the Company.
"Consolidated Net Income" means, for any period, the net income (loss) of the Company and its consolidated Restricted Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; , that there shall not be included in such Consolidated Net Income:
provided, however
(1) any net income (loss) of any Person if such Person is not a Restricted Subsidiary or that is accounted for by the equity method of accounting, except that:
(a) subject to the limitations contained in clauses (3) through (6) below, the Company's equity in the net income of any such Person for such period shall be included in such Consolidated Net Income up to the aggregate amount of cash
 
actually distributed by such Person during such period to the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary as a dividend or other distribution (subject, in the case of a dividend or other distribution to a Restricted Subsidiary, to the limitations contained in clause (2) below); and
(b) the Company's equity in a net loss of any such Person (other than an Unrestricted Subsidiary) for such period shall be included in determining such Consolidated Net Income to the extent such loss has been funded with cash from the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary;
(2) solely for the purpose of determining the amount available for Restricted Payments under , any net income (but not loss) of any Restricted Subsidiary (other than a Subsidiary Guarantor) if such Restricted Subsidiary is subject to prior government approval or other restrictions due to the operation of its charter or any agreement, instrument, judgment, decree, order statute, rule or government regulation (which have not been waived), directly or indirectly, on the payment of dividends or the making of distributions by such Restricted Subsidiary, directly or indirectly, to the Company, except that:
Section 3.4(a)(3)(A)
(a) subject to the limitations contained in clauses (3) through (6) below, the Company's equity in the net income of any such Restricted Subsidiary for such period shall be included in such Consolidated Net Income up to the aggregate amount of cash that could have been distributed by such Restricted Subsidiary during such period to the Company or another Restricted Subsidiary as a dividend (subject, in the case of a dividend to another Restricted Subsidiary, to the limitation contained in this clause); and
(b) the Company's equity in a net loss of any such Restricted Subsidiary for such period shall be included in determining such Consolidated Net Income;
(3) any after-tax effect of gain or loss (less all fees and expenses relating thereto) realized upon sales or other dispositions of any assets of the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, other than in the ordinary course of business, as determined in Good Faith by the Company;
(4) any after-tax effect of income (loss) from the early extinguishment of Indebtedness or Hedging Obligations or other derivative instruments;
(5) the after-tax effect of extraordinary gain or loss;
(6) the after-tax effect of the cumulative effect of a change in accounting principles; and
(7) any after-tax effect of non-cash impairment charges recorded in connection with the application of Financial Accounting Standard No. 142 "Goodwill and Other
 
Intangibles" and Financial Accounting Standard No. 144 "Accounting for the Impairment or Disposal of Long Lived Assets."
"Continuing Directors" means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who: (1) was a member of such Board of Directors on the Issue Date; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to such Board of Directors with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of the Board of Directors at the time of such nomination or election.
"Corporate Trust Office" means the designated office of the Trustee at which, at any particular time, its corporate trust business shall be administered, which office at the date hereof is located at 2 North LaSalle Street, Suite 1020, Chicago, Illinois 60602, or such other address as the Trustee may designate from time to time by notice to the Company or the principal corporate office of any successor trustee (or such other address as a successor trustee may designate from time to time by notice to the Company).
"Currency Agreement" means in respect of a Person any foreign exchange contract, currency swap agreement, futures contract, option contract or other similar agreement as to which such Person is a party or a beneficiary.
"Customer Finance Program Obligations" means inventory repurchase and recourse obligations, including any obligation of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary to repurchase products of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries or to purchase or repurchase receivables created in connection with the sale of products or related services of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries under any customer finance program, in each case incurred in the ordinary course of business and as described in the Company's annual audited financial statements.
"Debt Facility" or "Debt Facilities" means, with respect to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor, one or more debt facilities (including, without limitation, the Initial Notes, the Additional Notes, this Indenture, the ABL Facility and the Mercury Facility) or commercial paper facilities with banks or other institutional lenders providing for revolving credit loans, term loans, receivables financing (including through the sale of receivables to such lenders or to special purpose entities formed to borrow from such lenders against such receivables) or letters of credit or issuances of debt securities evidenced by notes, debentures, bonds or similar instruments, in each case, as amended, restated, supplemented, modified, renewed, refunded, replaced or refinanced (including by means of sales of debt securities to institutional investors) in whole or in part from time to time (and whether or not with the original trustee, administrative agent, Holders and lenders or another trustee, administrative agent or agents or other holders or lenders and whether provided under this Indenture, the ABL Facility or any other credit agreement or other agreement or indenture).
"Default" means any event or condition that is, or after notice or passage of time or both would be, an Event of Default.
 
"Defaulted Interest" shall have the meaning set forth in .
Section 2.13
"Depositary" means The Depository Trust Company, its nominees and their respective successors and assigns, or such other depository institution hereinafter appointed by the Company.
"Designated Non-cash Consideration" means the noncash consideration received by the Company or one of its Restricted Subsidiaries in connection with an Asset Disposition. Any such noncash consideration shall be designated as Designated Non-cash Consideration pursuant to an Officers' Certificate setting forth the fair market value of such Designated Non-cash Consideration and the basis of such valuation, executed by the principal financial officer of the Company, less the amount of cash or Cash Equivalents received in connection with a subsequent sale, redemption or payment of, on or with respect to such Designated Non-cash Consideration.
"Disposition" means any sale, lease, license, transfer, assignment or other disposition of all or any portion of the business, assets, rights, revenues or property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, of the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries (including any equity interests owned by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries).
"Disqualified Stock" means, with respect to any Person, any Capital Stock of such Person that by its terms (or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is exchangeable) or upon the happening of any event: (1) matures or is mandatorily redeemable pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, (2) is convertible into or exchangeable for Indebtedness or Disqualified Stock (excluding Capital Stock which is convertible or exchangeable solely at the option of the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary (it being understood that upon such conversion or exchange it shall be an Incurrence of such Indebtedness or Disqualified Stock)); or (3) is redeemable at the option of the holder of Capital Stock, in whole or in part, in each case on or prior to the date 91 days after the earlier of the final maturity date of the Securities or the date the Securities are no longer outstanding; that only the portion of Capital Stock that so matures or is mandatorily redeemable, is so convertible or exchangeable or is so redeemable at the option of the holder thereof prior to such date shall be deemed to be Disqualified Stock; , that any Capital Stock that would constitute Disqualified Stock solely because the holders thereof have the right to require the Company to repurchase such Capital Stock upon the occurrence of a Change of Control or Asset Disposition (each defined in a substantially identical manner to the corresponding definitions in this Indenture) shall not constitute Disqualified Stock if the terms of such Capital Stock (and all such securities into which it is convertible or for which it is ratable or exchangeable) provide that the Company may not repurchase or redeem any such Capital Stock (and all such securities into which it is convertible or for which it is ratable or exchangeable) pursuant to such provision prior to compliance by the Company with and and such repurchase or redemption complies with .
provided, however,
provided, further
Section 3.8
Section 3.10
Section 3.4
"Euroclear" means Euroclear Bank S.A./N.V. or any successor securities clearing agency.
 
"Equity Offering" means a public offering for cash by the Company of its Common Stock, or options, warrants or rights with respect to its Common Stock, other than (x) public offerings with respect to the Company's Common Stock, or options, warrants or rights, registered on Form S-4 or S-8, (y) an issuance to any Subsidiary or (z) any offering of Common Stock issued in connection with a transaction that constitutes a Change of Control.
"Exchange Act" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the SEC promulgated thereunder.
"Excluded Assets" means (i) any property to the extent that such grant of a security interest is prohibited by any requirement of law of a governmental authority, requires a consent not obtained of any governmental authority pursuant to such requirement of law or is prohibited by, or constitutes a breach or default under or results in the termination of or gives rise to a right on the part of the parties thereto other than the Company and its Subsidiaries to terminate (or materially modify) or requires any consent not obtained under, any contract, license, agreement, instrument or other document evidencing or giving rise to such property or, in the case of any investment property, pledged stock or pledged note, any applicable shareholder or similar agreement, except to the extent that such requirement of law or the term in such contract, license, agreement, instrument or other document or shareholder or similar agreement providing for such prohibition, breach, default or right of termination or modification or requiring such consent is ineffective under applicable law, (ii) all receivables of the Mercury-Marine division that are owed by account debtors that are organized under any applicable law of the United States, any state of the United States or the District of Columbia and all related rights, security interests and proceeds, (iii) any property owned by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary acquired after the date of the ABL Facility that is subject to a Lien securing a purchase money, project financing or capital or finance lease obligation permitted to be incurred pursuant to this Indenture and the ABL Facility if the contract or other agreement in which such Lien is granted (or the documentation providing for such purchase money, project financing or capital or finance lease obligation) prohibits the creation of any other Lien on such property, (iv) any aircraft or any trucks, trailers, tractors, service vehicles, automobiles, rolling stock or other registered mobile equipment or equipment covered by certificates of title or ownership of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary, (v) deposit accounts exclusively used for payroll, payroll taxes and other employee wage and benefit payments, (vi) any property (including deposit accounts) located outside of the United States of America, (vii) any equity interest in (1) BAC Joint Venture, (2) Brunswick Financial Services Corporation and (3) Brunswick Product Protection Corp., (viii) any equity interest of the following Foreign Subsidiaries: Brunswick China Limited, Brunswick Intl Trading (Shanghai) Co., Ltd., Centennial Assurance Company, Ltd., Cummins Mercruiser Diesel South Pacific Pty Limited, HJ Askviks Sonner A/S, Marine Power Australia Pty Ltd, Mercury Marine Sdn Bhd, Suzhou Taihu Mercury Club & Marina Co and Tohatsu Marine Corporation, (ix) more than 65% of the total outstanding voting Capital Stock of any Foreign Subsidiary, (x) any Foreign Receivables, and (xi) any property that the Collateral Agent shall determine in its sole discretion in which the cost (including adverse tax consequences) of obtaining a security interest would be excessive in relation to the value of the security to be afforded thereby and (xii) the Fond du Lac Facility or the Stillwater Facility to the
 
extent such assets are subject to a Lien permitted by the ABL Facility; , , that Excluded Assets referred to above shall not include any proceeds (in respect of clauses (i), (iv), (v) and (vii)), substitutions or replacements of any Excluded Assets referred to above (unless such proceeds, substitutions or replacements would constitute Excluded Assets referred to above).
provided
however
"First-Priority Collateral" means (A) prior to the termination of the ABL Facility, the Bowling Assets and the Headquarters and (B) after the termination of the ABL Facility (without any replacement thereof), the assets listed in clause (A) above and the Second-Priority Collateral; that for purposes of clauses (1) and (24) of the definition of Permitted Liens, First-Priority Collateral shall exclude property and assets that become First-Priority Collateral due to the retirement or cancellation of the ABL Facility without a replacement facility.
provided
"Floorplan Borrowing Base" means, as of the date of determination, and solely in the event of the termination of the BAC Joint Venture, an amount equal to 90% of the net book value of secured floorplan loans and similar financing arrangements made by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary to boat and engine dealers to finance the sale of inventory to such Persons.
"Fond du Lac Facility" means the manufacturing plants and facilities, distribution and warehouse facilities and executive offices of the Mercury Marine division located in or adjacent to Fond du Lac, Wisconsin, including all fixtures thereon and equipment and manufacturing-related tangible assets located therein from time to time, but excluding Inventory, raw materials and all production components thereof.
"Foreign Assets" means the aggregate assets held by, or related to, the Foreign Subsidiaries of the Company determined in accordance with GAAP as disclosed in the financial statements or in the footnotes to the financial statements of the Company most recently made available in accordance with this Indenture.
"Foreign Receivables" means (a) each account receivable owned by any Subsidiary of the Company that is not organized under the laws of any jurisdiction within the United States of America or Brunswick International Ltd., Marine Power International Limited, Marine Power New Zealand Limited, Life Fitness International Sales Inc., Marine Power International Pty. Ltd., Brunswick Marine in EMEA, Inc. and each other Subsidiary of the Company organized under the laws of any jurisdiction within the United States of America the business of which consists substantially entirely in holding Capital Stock in Subsidiaries of the Company that are not organized under the laws of any jurisdiction within the United States of America and/or conducting operations through foreign branches and (b) each account receivable owned by the Company or any of the Subsidiary of the Company that guarantees the Indebtedness under the ABL Facility that is owed by a Person that is not organized under any applicable law of the United States, any state of the United States or the District of Columbia, Canada, or any province of Canada.
 
"Foreign Subsidiary" means any Restricted Subsidiary that is not organized under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof or the District of Columbia and any Subsidiary of such Restricted Subsidiary.
"GAAP" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America as in effect as of the Issue Date, including those set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or in such other statements by such other entity as approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession. All ratios and computations based on GAAP contained in this Indenture shall be computed in conformity with GAAP, except that in the event the Company is acquired in a transaction that is accounted for using purchase accounting, the effects of the application of purchase accounting shall be disregarded in the calculation of such ratios and other computations contained in this Indenture.
"Good Faith by the Company" means the decision in good faith by a responsible financial officer of the Company; that (a) if such decision involves a determination of fair market value in excess of $2.5 million, the decision is made in good faith by the Senior Management of the Company and (b) if such decision involves a determination of fair market value in excess of $25.0 million, the decision is made in good faith by the Board of Directors of Company.
provided
"Guarantee" means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of any Person, directly or indirectly, guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other nonfinancial obligations of any other Person and any obligation, direct or indirect, contingent or otherwise, of such Person:
(1) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness of such other Person (whether arising by virtue of partnership arrangements, or by agreement to keep-well, to purchase assets, goods, securities or services, to take-or-pay, or to maintain financial statement conditions or otherwise); or
(2) entered into for purposes of assuring in any other manner the obligee of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof or to protect such obligee against loss in respect thereof (in whole or in part); , , that the term "Guarantee" shall not include (a) endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business, (b) Customer Finance Program Obligations or (c) the BAC Joint Venture Obligations. The term "Guarantee" used as a verb has a corresponding meaning.
provided
however
"Guarantor Subordinated Obligation" means, with respect to a Subsidiary Guarantor, any Indebtedness of such Subsidiary Guarantor (whether outstanding on the Issue Date or thereafter Incurred) that is expressly subordinated in right of payment to the obligations of such Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee pursuant to a written agreement.
"Headquarters" means the real property located at 1 N. Field Court, Lake Forest, Illinois 60045.
 
"Hedging Obligations" of any Person means the obligations of such Person pursuant to any Interest Rate Agreement, Currency Agreement or Commodity Agreement.
"Holder" means a Person in whose name a Security is registered on the Registrar's books.
"Incur" means issue, create, assume, Guarantee, incur or otherwise become liable for; that any Indebtedness or Capital Stock of a Person existing at the time such Person becomes a Restricted Subsidiary (whether by merger, consolidation, acquisition or otherwise) shall be deemed to be Incurred by such Person at the time it becomes a Restricted Subsidiary; and the terms "Incurred" and "Incurrence" have meanings correlative to the foregoing. Any Indebtedness issued at a discount (including Indebtedness on which interest is payable through the issuance of additional Indebtedness) shall be deemed incurred at the time of original issuance of the Indebtedness at the initial accreted amount thereof.
provided, however,
"Indebtedness" means, with respect to any Person on any date of determination (without duplication):
(1) the principal of and premium (if any) in respect of indebtedness of such Person for borrowed money;
(2) the principal of and premium (if any) in respect of obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or other similar instruments;
(3) the principal component of all obligations of such Person in respect of letters of credit, bankers' acceptances or other similar instruments (including reimbursement obligations with respect thereto except to the extent such reimbursement obligation relates to a Trade Payable or similar obligation to a trade creditor in each case incurred in the ordinary course of business and such obligation is satisfied within 30 days of Incurrence) other than obligations with respect to letters of credit securing obligations (other than obligations described in clauses (1) and (2) above and clause (5) below) entered into in the ordinary course of business of such Person to the extent such letters of credit are not drawn upon or, to the extent drawn upon, such drawing is reimbursed no later than the fifth Business Day following receipt by such Person of a demand for reimbursement following payment on the letter of credit;
(4) the principal component of all obligations of such Person to pay the deferred and unpaid purchase price of property (except Trade Payables), which purchase price is due more than six months after the date of placing such property in service or taking delivery and title thereto, except (i) any such balance that constitutes a trade payable or similar obligation to a trade creditor, in each case accrued in the ordinary course of business and (ii) any earn-out obligation until the amount of such obligation becomes a liability on the balance sheet of such Person in accordance with GAAP;
 
(5) Capitalized Lease Obligations and all Attributable Indebtedness of such Person (whether or not such items would appear on the balance sheet of the guarantor or obligor);
(6) the principal component or liquidation preference of all obligations of such Person with respect to the redemption, repayment or other repurchase of any Disqualified Stock or, with respect to any Subsidiary that is not a Subsidiary Guarantor, any Preferred Stock (but excluding, in each case, any accrued dividends);
(7) the principal component of all Indebtedness of other Persons secured by a Lien on any asset of such Person, whether or not such Indebtedness is assumed by such Person; , , that the amount of such Indebtedness shall be the lesser of (a) the fair market value of such asset at such date of determination and (b) the amount of such Indebtedness of such other Persons;
provided
however
(8) the principal component of Indebtedness of other Persons to the extent Guaranteed by such Person (whether or not such items would appear on the balance sheet of the guarantor or obligor);
(9) to the extent not otherwise included in this definition, net Hedging Obligations of such Person (the amount of any such obligations to be equal at any time to the termination value of such agreement or arrangement giving rise to such Hedging Obligation that would be payable by such Person at such time); and
(10) to the extent not otherwise included in this definition, the Receivables Transaction Amount outstanding relating to a Qualified Receivables Transaction.
The amount of Indebtedness of any Person at any date shall be the outstanding balance at such date of all unconditional obligations as described above and the maximum liability, upon the occurrence of the contingency giving rise to the obligation, of any contingent obligations at such date; that contingent obligations arising in the ordinary course of business and not with respect to borrowed money of such Person or other Persons shall not be deemed to constitute Indebtedness. Notwithstanding the foregoing, money borrowed and set aside at the time of the Incurrence of any Indebtedness in order to pre-fund the payment of interest on such Indebtedness shall not be deemed to be "Indebtedness" that such money is held to secure the payment of such interest.
provided
provided
The term "Indebtedness" shall not include Customer Finance Program Obligations.
"Independent Financial Advisor" means an accounting, appraisal or investment banking firm or consultant to Persons engaged in a Permitted Business of nationally recognized standing that is, in the good faith judgment of the Company, qualified to perform the task for which it has been engaged.
 
"Intercreditor Agreement" means the Intercreditor Agreement to be entered into among the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors, the Collateral Agent, on behalf of itself, the Holders and the ABL Agent, on behalf of itself and the lenders thereunder, substantially in the form attached hereto as , as the same may be amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
Exhibit C
"Interest Payment Date" means May 1 and November 1 of each year to stated maturity.
"Interest Rate Agreement" means with respect to any Person any interest rate protection agreement, interest rate future agreement, interest rate option agreement, interest rate swap agreement, interest rate cap agreement, interest rate collar agreement, interest rate hedge agreement or other similar agreement or arrangement as to which such Person is party or a beneficiary.
"Investment" in any Person means any direct or indirect advance, loan (other than advances or extensions of credit to customers in the ordinary course of business that are in conformity with GAAP recorded as accounts receivable on the balance sheet of the Company or its Restricted Subsidiaries) or other extensions of credit (including by way of Guarantee or similar arrangement, but excluding any debt or extension of credit represented by a bank deposit other than a time deposit) or capital contribution to (by means of any transfer of cash or other property to others or any payment for property or services for the account or use of others), or any purchase or acquisition of Capital Stock, Indebtedness or other similar instruments issued by such Person and all other items that are or would be classified as investments on a balance sheet prepared in accordance with GAAP; that none of the following shall be deemed to be an Investment:
provided
(1) Hedging Obligations entered into in the ordinary course of business and in compliance with this Indenture;
(2) endorsements of negotiable instruments and documents in the ordinary course of business; and
(3) an acquisition of assets, Capital Stock or other securities by the Company or a Subsidiary for consideration to the extent such consideration consists of Common Stock of the Company.
For purposes of , (1) "Investment" shall include the portion (proportionate to the Company's equity interest in a Restricted Subsidiary to be designated as an Unrestricted Subsidiary) of the fair market value of the net assets of such Restricted Subsidiary at the time that such Restricted Subsidiary is designated an Unrestricted Subsidiary; that upon a redesignation of such Subsidiary as a Restricted Subsidiary, the Company shall be deemed to continue to have a permanent "Investment" in an Unrestricted Subsidiary in an amount (if positive) equal to (a) the Company's aggregate "Investment" in such Subsidiary as of the time of such redesignation less (b) the portion (proportionate to the Company's equity
Section 3.4
provided, however,
 
interest in such Subsidiary) of the fair market value of the net assets (as conclusively determined in Good Faith by the Company) of such Subsidiary at the time that such Subsidiary is so re-designated a Restricted Subsidiary; and (2) any property transferred to or from an Unrestricted Subsidiary shall be valued at its fair market value at the time of such transfer, in each case as determined in Good Faith by the Company.
"Investment Grade Rating" means a rating equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent) by Moody's Investors Service, Inc. and BBB- (or the equivalent) by Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, Inc., in each case, with a stable or better outlook; that a change in outlook shall not by itself cause the Company to lose its Investment Grade Rating.
provided
"Issue Date" means August 14, 2009.
"Junior Lien Collateral Indebtedness" means any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor which (x) is or shall be secured by a Lien on the Collateral on a basis that is junior to the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees and (y) has a Stated Maturity date after the Stated Maturity of the Securities.
"Lien" means, with respect to any asset, any mortgage, lien (statutory or otherwise), pledge, hypothecation, charge, security interest, preference, priority or encumbrance of any kind in respect of such asset, whether or not filed, recorded or otherwise perfected under applicable law, including any conditional sale or other title retention agreement, any lease in the nature thereof, any option or other agreement to sell or give a security interest in and any filing of or agreement to give any financing statement under the Uniform Commercial Code (or equivalent statutes) of any jurisdiction; that in no event shall an operating lease be deemed to constitute a Lien.
provided
"Mercury Facility" means the Business Financing Agreement, dated as of May 29, 2009, between the Company and GE Commercial Distribution Finance Corporation, as amended and supplemented and otherwise modified from time to time or any other working capital facility designed to replace such Business Financing Agreement and secured only by Mercury-Marine division receivables that are owed by account debtors that are organized under any applicable law of the United States, any state of the United States or the District of Columbia and related assets but no other assets.
"Mortgage Permitted Exceptions" means the encumbrances and exceptions to title expressly permitted in the Mortgages or Indenture (including Permitted Liens) or expressly set forth as an exception to the policies of title insurance obtained to insure the lien of each Mortgage with respect to each of the Premises subject to a Mortgage.
"Mortgages" means the mortgages, deeds of trust, deeds to secure Indebtedness or other similar documents securing Liens on the Premises, as well as the other Collateral secured by and described in the mortgages, deeds of trust, deeds to secure Indebtedness or other similar documents.
 
"Net Available Cash" from an Asset Disposition means cash payments received (including any cash payments received by way of deferred payment of principal pursuant to a note or installment receivable or otherwise and net proceeds from the sale or other disposition of any securities or other assets received as consideration, but only as and when received, but excluding any other consideration received in the form of assumption by the acquiring Person of Indebtedness or other obligations relating to the properties or assets that are the subject of such Asset Disposition or received in any other non-cash form) therefrom, in each case net of (i) all brokerage, legal, accounting, investment banking, title and recording tax expenses, commissions and other fees and expenses Incurred, and all Federal, state, provincial, foreign and local taxes required to be paid or accrued as a liability under GAAP (after taking into account any available tax credits or deductions and any tax sharing agreements), as a consequence of such Asset Disposition, (ii) all payments made on any Indebtedness that is secured by any assets subject to such Asset Disposition, in accordance with the terms of any Lien upon such assets, or that must by its terms, or in order to obtain a necessary consent to such Asset Disposition, or by applicable law be repaid out of the proceeds from such Asset Disposition, (iii) all distributions and other payments required to be made to minority interest holders in Subsidiaries or joint ventures as a result of such Asset Disposition, (iv) the deduction of appropriate amounts to be provided by the seller as a reserve, in accordance with GAAP, against any liabilities associated with the property or other assets disposed of in such Asset Disposition and retained by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary after such Asset Disposition and (v) any portion of the purchase price from an Asset Disposition placed in escrow (whether as a reserve for adjustment of the purchase price, or for satisfaction of indemnities in respect of such Asset Disposition); that, in the cases of clauses (iv) and (v), upon reversal of any such reserve or the termination of any such escrow, Net Available Cash shall be increased by the amount of such reversal or any portion of funds released from escrow to the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary.
provided, however,
"Net Award" means any awards or proceeds in respect of any condemnation or other eminent domain proceeding relating to any First-Priority Collateral deposited in any Collateral Account pursuant to the Collateral Documents.
"Net Cash Proceeds" means, with respect to any issuance or sale of Capital Stock or Indebtedness, the cash proceeds of such issuance or sale, net of attorneys' fees, accountants' fees, underwriters' or placement agents' fees, listing fees, discounts or commissions and brokerage, consultant and other fees and charges actually Incurred in connection with such issuance or sale and net of taxes paid or payable as a result of such issuance or sale (after taking into account any available tax credit or deductions and any tax sharing arrangements).
"Net Insurance Proceeds" means any awards or proceeds in respect of any casualty insurance or title insurance claim relating to any First-Priority Collateral deposited in any Collateral Account pursuant to the Collateral Documents.
"Non-Guarantor Subsidiary" means any Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Subsidiary Guarantor.
"Non-Recourse Debt" means Indebtedness of a Person:
 
(1) as to which neither the Company nor any Restricted Subsidiary (a) provides any Guarantee or credit support of any kind (including any undertaking, Guarantee, indemnity, agreement or instrument that would constitute Indebtedness) or (b) is directly or indirectly liable (as a guarantor or otherwise);
(2) no default with respect to which (including any rights that the Holders thereof may have to take enforcement action against an Unrestricted Subsidiary) would permit (upon notice, lapse of time or both) any holder of any other Indebtedness of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary to declare a default under such other Indebtedness or cause the payment thereof to be accelerated or payable prior to its Stated Maturity; and
(3) the explicit terms of which provide there is no recourse against any of the assets of the Company or its Restricted Subsidiaries, except that Standard Securitization Undertakings shall not be considered recourse.
"Note Register" means the register of Securities, maintained by the Trustee, pursuant to .
Section 2.3
"Obligations" means any principal, interest (including any interest accruing subsequent to the filing of a petition in bankruptcy, reorganization or similar proceeding at the rate provided for in the documentation with respect thereto, whether or not such interest is an allowed claim under applicable state, federal or foregoing law), penalties, fees, indemnifications, reimbursements (including, without limitation, reimbursement obligations with respect to letters of credit and bankers' acceptances), damages and other liabilities, and guarantees of payment of such principal, interest, penalties, feels, indemnifications, reimbursements, damages and other liabilities, payable under the documentation governing any Indebtedness; that Obligations with respect to the Securities shall not include fees or indemnifications in favor of the Trustee and other third parties other than the Holders of the Securities.
provided
"Officer" means the Chairman of the Board, the Chief Executive Officer, the President, the Chief Financial Officer, any Executive Vice President, Senior Vice President or Vice President, the Treasurer or the Secretary of the Company or, in the event that a Person is a partnership or a limited liability company that has no such officers, a person duly authorized under applicable law by the general partner, managers, members or a similar body to act on behalf of such Person. Officer of any Subsidiary Guarantor has a correlative meaning.
"Officers' Certificate" means a certificate signed by two Officers or by an Officer and either an Assistant Treasurer or an Assistant Secretary of the Company.
"Opinion of Counsel" means a written opinion from legal counsel who is reasonably acceptable to the Trustee. The counsel may be an employee of or counsel to the Company, a Subsidiary Guarantor.
"Pari Passu Indebtedness" means Indebtedness that ranks equally in right of payment to the Securities (without giving effect to collateral arrangements).
 
"Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness" means Indebtedness that ranks equally in right of payment to the Securities after giving effect to collateral arrangements.
"Permitted Convertible Notes Offering" means any offering by the Company or any of its Subsidiary Guarantors after the Issue Date of unsecured convertible notes; that such notes are permitted pursuant to .
provided
Section 3.3
"Permitted Investment" means an Investment by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary in:
(1) a Restricted Subsidiary (other than a Receivables Entity), including through the purchase of Capital Stock of a Restricted Subsidiary;
(2) any Investment by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries in a Person that is engaged in a Related Business if as a result of such Investment:
a. such Person becomes a Restricted Subsidiary; or
b. such Person, in one transaction or a series of related transactions, is merged or consolidated with or into, or transfers or conveys substantially all of its assets to, or is liquidated into, the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary,
and, in each case, any Investment held by such Person; , that such Investment was not acquired by such Person in contemplation of such acquisition, merger, consolidation or transfer;
provided
(3) cash and Cash Equivalents;
(4) receivables owing to the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary created or acquired in the ordinary course of business and payable or dischargeable in accordance with customary trade terms; , , that such trade terms may include such concessionary trade terms as the Company or any such Restricted Subsidiary deems reasonable under the circumstances;
provided
however
(5) payroll, travel and similar advances to cover matters that are expected at the time of such advances ultimately to be treated as expenses for accounting purposes and that are made in the ordinary course of business;
(6) loans or advances to employees, officers or directors of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices in an aggregate amount outstanding at any time not in excess of $10.0 million with respect to all loans or advances made since the Issue Date (without giving effect to the forgiveness of any such loan);
(7) any Investment acquired by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries:
 
(a) in exchange for any other Investment or accounts receivable held by the Company or any such Restricted Subsidiary in connection with or as a result of a bankruptcy, workout, reorganization or recapitalization of the issuer of such other Investment or accounts receivable;
(b) as a result of a foreclosure by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries with respect to any secured Investment or other transfer of title with respect to any secured Investment in default; or
(c) in the form of Securities payable, or stock or other securities issued by account debtors to the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary pursuant to negotiated agreements with respect to the settlement of such account debtor's accounts, and other Investments arising in connection with the compromise, settlement or collection of accounts receivable, in each case in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices;
(8) Investments made as a result of the receipt of non-cash consideration from an Asset Disposition that was made pursuant to and in compliance with or any other disposition of assets not constituting an Asset Disposition;
Section 3.8
(9) Investments in existence on the Issue Date;
(10) Currency Agreements, Interest Rate Agreements, Commodity Agreements and related Hedging Obligations, which transactions or obligations are Incurred in compliance with ;
Section 3.3
(11) Guarantees issued in accordance with ;
Section 3.3
(12) Investments made in connection with the funding of contributions under any non-qualified retirement plan or similar employee compensation plan including, without limitation, split-dollar insurance policies, in an amount not to exceed the amount of compensation expense recognized by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries in connection with such plans;
(13) Investments by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary in a Receivables Entity or any Investment by a Receivables Entity in any other Person, in each case, in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction, , , that any Investment in any such Person is in the form of a Purchase Money Note, or any equity interest or interests in Receivables and related assets generated by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary and transferred to any Person in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction or any such Person owning such Receivables;
provided
however
(14) Investments in the BAC Joint Venture (a) existing on the Issue Date and (b) made after the Issue Date pursuant to the BAC Joint Venture Obligations in accordance with the BAC LLC Agreement as in effect on the Issue Date (or as amended
 
after the Issue Date in accordance with the terms of this Indenture); and Investments made in Brunswick Financial Services Corporation to the extent the proceeds thereof are applied to make any such Investment in the BAC Joint Venture;
(15) Investments (i) acquired as a result of the performance of Customer Finance Program Obligations and other Investments arising in connection with the compromise, settlement or collection of such Investments in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices, (ii) consisting of Indebtedness of customers held pending Disposition pursuant to a customer finance program in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices and (iii) consisting of Indebtedness of retail customers held until funded by a retail finance lender;
(16) Investments by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries in Permitted Joint Ventures in an aggregate amount at the time of such Investment not to exceed $50.0 million outstanding at any one time (with the fair market value of such Investment being measured at the time made and without giving effect to subsequent changes in value); that no more than $15.0 million may be used for Permitted Joint Ventures that are neither (a) in existence on the Issue Date nor (b) a replacement for any Permitted Joint Venture in existence on the Issue Date;
provided
(17) hedge and warrant option transactions entered into or performed by the Company in connection with a Permitted Convertible Notes Offering;
(18) Investments by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries in the form of loans or advances or guarantees of working capital facilities to customers, suppliers and distributors not to exceed $50.0 million outstanding at any one time;
(19) Investments in unaffiliated third parties in the ordinary course of business in an amount not to exceed $30.0 million outstanding at any one time solely for the purpose of facilitating development of properties that, upon completion, if acquired by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary, would constitute Bowling Assets on behalf of the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary; that such Investments are secured by a Lien in favor of the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary on the property being developed; and
provided
(20) Investments by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, together with all other Investments pursuant to this clause (20), in an aggregate amount at the time of such Investment not to exceed $20.0 million outstanding at any one time (with the fair market value of such Investment being measured at the time made and without giving effect to subsequent changes in value).
"Permitted Joint Venture" means, with respect to any Person, (1) any corporation, association, or other business entity (other than a partnership) of which 50% or less of the total voting power of shares of Capital Stock entitled (without regard to the occurrence of any contingency) to vote in the election of directors, managers or trustees thereof and (2) any partnership, joint venture, limited liability company or similar entity of which 50% or less of the
 
capital accounts, distribution rights, total equity and voting interests or general or limited partnership interests, as applicable, are owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by such Person or one or more of the other Restricted Subsidiaries of that Person or a combination thereof whether in the form of membership, general, special or limited partnership interests or otherwise.
"Permitted Liens" means, with respect to any Person:
(1) Liens securing Indebtedness Incurred pursuant to and Section  and related Hedging Obligations and banking services management obligations; that First-Priority Collateral shall only secure Indebtedness on a first-lien priority basis in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $375.0 million;
Section 3.3(b)(i)
3.3(b)(ii)(x)(A)
provided
(2) pledges or deposits by such Person under workers' compensation laws, unemployment, general insurance and other insurance laws and old age pensions and other social security or retirement benefits or similar legislation, or good faith deposits in connection with bids, tenders, contracts (other than for the payment of Indebtedness) or leases to which such Person is a party, or deposits to secure public or statutory obligations of such Person or deposits of cash or United States government bonds to secure surety or appeal bonds to which such Person is a party, or deposits as security for contested taxes or import or customs duties or for the payment of rent, in each case Incurred in the ordinary course of business;
(3) Liens imposed by law, including carriers', warehousemen's, mechanics', materialmen's and repairmen's Liens, Incurred in the ordinary course of business;
(4) Liens for taxes, assessments or other governmental charges not yet subject to penalties for non-payment or that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings provided appropriate reserves required pursuant to GAAP have been made in respect thereof;
(5) Liens in favor of issuers of surety or performance bonds or letters of credit or bankers' acceptances or similar obligations issued pursuant to the request of and for the account of such Person in the ordinary course of its business; , , that such instruments do not secure the payment of Indebtedness;
provided
however
(6) encumbrances, ground leases, easements or reservations of, or rights of others for, licenses, rights of way, sewers, electric lines, telegraph and telephone lines and other similar purposes, or zoning, building codes or other restrictions (including, without limitation, minor defects or irregularities in title and similar encumbrances) as to the use of real properties or liens incidental to the conduct of the business of such Person or to the ownership of its properties that do not in the aggregate materially adversely affect the value of said properties or materially impair their use in the operation of the business of such Person;
 
(7) Liens securing Hedging Obligations so long as the related Indebtedness is, and is permitted to be under this Indenture, secured by a Lien on the same property securing such Hedging Obligation;
(8) leases, licenses, subleases and sublicenses of assets (including, without limitation, real property and intellectual property rights) that do not materially interfere with the ordinary conduct of the business of the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries; that such leases, licenses, subleases and sublicenses do not secure Indebtedness;
provided
(9) judgment Liens not giving rise to an Event of Default so long as any appropriate legal proceedings that may have been duly initiated for the review of such judgment have not been finally terminated or the period within which such proceedings may be initiated has not expired;
(10) Liens for the purpose of securing (A) any Attributable Indebtedness in respect of a Sale/Leaseback Transaction Incurred pursuant to or (B) the payment of all or a part of the purchase price of, or Capitalized Lease Obligations, mortgage financings, purchase money obligations or other payments Incurred to finance assets or property (other than Capital Stock or other Investments) acquired, constructed, improved or leased in the ordinary course of business; that, in the case of this clause (10)(B):
Section 3.3(b)(viii)
provided
(a) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness secured by such Liens is otherwise permitted to be Incurred under this Indenture and does not exceed the cost of the assets or property so acquired, constructed or improved; and
(b) such Liens are created within 180 days of construction, acquisition or improvement of such assets or property and do not encumber any other assets or property of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary other than such assets or property and assets affixed or appurtenant thereto;
(11) Liens that constitute banker's Liens, rights of set-off or similar rights and remedies as to deposit accounts or other funds maintained with a depositary institution, whether arising by operation of law or pursuant to contract;
(12) Liens arising from Uniform Commercial Code financing statement filings regarding operating leases entered into by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business;
(13) Liens existing on the Issue Date (other than Liens permitted under clause (1));
(14) Liens on property or shares of stock of a Person at the time such Person becomes a Restricted Subsidiary; , , that such Liens are not created,
provided
however
 
Incurred or assumed in connection with, or in contemplation of, such other Person becoming a Restricted Subsidiary; , that any such Lien may not extend to any other property owned by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary;
provided further, however
(15) Liens on property at the time the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary acquired the property, including any acquisition by means of a merger or consolidation with or into the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary; , however, that such Liens are not created, Incurred or assumed in connection with, or in contemplation of, such acquisition; further, however, that such Liens may not extend to any other property owned by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary;
provided
provided
(16) Liens securing Indebtedness or other obligations of a Restricted Subsidiary owing to the Company or another Restricted Subsidiary (other than a Receivables Entity);
(17) Liens securing Indebtedness incurred after the Issue Date and any Refinancing Indebtedness relating thereto (excluding any Liens securing any other Indebtedness Incurred after the Issue Date permitted under other clauses hereof) in an aggregate principal amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed $10.0 million;
(18) Liens securing Refinancing Indebtedness Incurred to refinance, refund, replace, amend, extend or modify, as a whole or in part, Indebtedness that was previously so secured pursuant to clauses (10), (13), (14), (15) and (18) of this definition, that any such Lien is limited to all or part of the same property or assets (plus improvements, accessions, proceeds or dividends or distributions in respect thereof) that secured (or, under the written arrangements under which the original Lien arose, could secure) the Indebtedness being refinanced or is in respect of property that is the security for a Permitted Lien hereunder;
provided
(19) any interest or title of a lessor under any Capitalized Lease Obligation or operating lease;
(20) Liens under industrial revenue, municipal or similar bonds;
(21) Liens in favor of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor;
(22) Liens on assets transferred to a Receivables Entity or on assets of a Receivables Entity, in either case Incurred in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction;
(23) Liens on assets of Foreign Subsidiaries securing Indebtedness Incurred by Foreign Subsidiaries under ;
Section 3.3
(24) Liens exclusively securing Indebtedness Incurred under or to refinance the 2013 Notes; that (x) Second-Priority Collateral shall only secure such Indebtedness on a third-lien priority
Section 3.3(b)(ii)(x)(A)
Section 3.3(b)(v)
provided
 
basis unless the ABL Agent has released the relevant ABL Collateral (other than in connection with termination of the ABL Facility pursuant to a release described in ), in which case the ABL Collateral may secure such Indebtedness on a first-lien priority basis so long as the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees continue to be secured on a second-lien priority basis by any such assets that would constitute Second-Priority Collateral and (y) such Liens shall not extend to First-Priority Collateral;
Section 11.6(iv)(C)
(25) Liens securing Indebtedness Incurred under ; and
Section 3.3(b)(xiv)
(26) Liens securing Indebtedness Incurred under to the extent of the property, plant and equipment acquired or constructed with the proceeds of such Indebtedness; that Liens permitted under this clause (26) shall not result in Indebtedness issued under the 1987 Indenture obtaining the benefit of a Lien on such properties; and
Section 3.3(b)(xvi)
provided
(27) Liens to secure Indebtedness Incurred under on notes, loans, promissory notes and other evidences of Indebtedness and related Guarantees and collateral arrangements, and the proceeds thereof, arising from floorplan financing and similar arrangements to boat and engine dealers to promote the sale of inventory.
Section 3.3(b)(ii)(y)
"Person" means any individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, association, joint-stock company, trust, unincorporated organization, government or any agency or political subdivision hereof or any other entity.
"Preferred Stock" means, as applied to the Capital Stock of any corporation, Capital Stock of any class or classes (however designated) that is preferred as to the payment of dividends, or as to the distribution of assets upon any voluntary or involuntary liquidation or dissolution of such Person, over shares of Capital Stock of any other class of such Person.
"Premises" means the Headquarters and the Bowling Assets owned by the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor on the Issue Date, as listed on Schedule I attached hereto, or any fee interest in any real property acquired by the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor after the Issue Date that is required to be subject to a first-priority Lien securing the Securities.
"Purchase Money Note" means a promissory note of a Receivables Entity evidencing the deferred purchase price of Receivables (and related assets) and/or a line of credit, which may be irrevocable, from the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction with a Receivables Entity, which deferred purchase price or line is repayable from cash available to the Receivables Entity, other than amounts required to be established as reserves pursuant to agreements, amounts paid to investors in respect of interest, principal and other amounts owing to such investors and amounts owing to such investors and amounts paid in connection with the purchase of newly generated Receivables.
"QIB" means any "qualified institutional buyer" (as defined in Rule 144A under the Securities Act).
 
"Qualified Receivables Transaction" means any transaction or series of transactions that may be entered into by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries pursuant to which the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries may sell, convey or otherwise transfer to (1) a Receivables Entity (in the case of a transfer by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries) and (2) any other Person (in the case of a transfer by a Receivables Entity), or may grant a security interest in, any Receivables (whether now existing or arising in the future) of the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, and any assets related thereto including, without limitation, all Collateral securing such Receivables, all contracts and all Guarantees or other obligations in respect of such accounts receivable, the proceeds of such Receivables and other assets that are customarily transferred, or in respect of which security interests are customarily granted in connection with asset securitization involving Receivables.
"Rating Agencies" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, Inc. and Moody's Investors Service, Inc. or if Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, Inc. or Moody's Investors Service, Inc. or both shall not make a rating on the Securities publicly available, a nationally recognized statistical Rating Agency or agencies, as the case may be, selected by the Company (as certified by a resolution of the Board of Directors of the Company) which shall be substituted for Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, Inc. or Moody's Investors Service, Inc. or both, as the case may be.
"Receivables Entity" means a Wholly-Owned Subsidiary (or another Person in which the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary makes an Investment and to which the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary transfers Receivables and related assets) that engages in no activities other than in connection with the financing of Receivables and that is designated by the Board of Directors of the Company (as provided below) as a Receivables Entity:
(1) no portion of the Indebtedness or any other obligations (contingent or otherwise) of which:
(a) is guaranteed by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary (excluding guarantees of obligations (other than the principal of, and interest on, Indebtedness) pursuant to Standard Securitization Undertakings);
(b) is recourse to or obligates the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary in any way other than pursuant to Standard Securitization Undertakings; or
(c) subjects any property or asset of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary, directly or indirectly, contingently or otherwise, to the satisfaction thereof, other than pursuant to Standard Securitization Undertakings;
(2) with which neither the Company nor any Restricted Subsidiary has any material contract, agreement, arrangement or understanding (except in connection with a Purchase Money Note or Qualified Receivables Transaction) other than on terms no less favorable to the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary than those that might be obtained
 
at the time from Persons that are not Affiliates of the Company, other than fees payable in the ordinary course of business in connection with servicing Receivables; and
(3) to which neither the Company nor any Restricted Subsidiary has any obligation to maintain or preserve such entity's financial condition or cause such entity to achieve certain levels of operating results.
"Receivables Fees" means any fees or interest paid to purchasers or lenders providing the financing in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction, factoring agreement or other similar agreement, including any such amounts paid by discounting the face amount of Receivables or participations therein transferred in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction, factoring agreement or other similar arrangement, regardless of whether any such transaction is structured as on-balance sheet or off-balance sheet or through a Restricted Subsidiary or an Unrestricted Subsidiary.
"Record Date" for the interest and Defaulted Interest, if any, payable on any applicable Interest Payment Date means April 15 or October 15 (whether or not a Business Day) next preceding such Interest Payment Date.
"Recovery Event" means any event, occurrence, claim or proceeding that results in any Net Award or Net Insurance Proceeds being deposited into the Collateral Accounts pursuant to the Collateral Documents.
"Receivables Transaction Amount" means the amount of obligations outstanding under the legal documents entered into as part of such Qualified Receivables Transaction on any date of determination that would be characterized as principal if such Qualified Receivables Transaction were structured as a secured lending transaction rather than as a purchase.
"Refinancing Indebtedness" means Indebtedness that is Incurred to refund, refinance, replace, exchange, renew, repay or extend (including pursuant to any defeasance or discharge mechanism) (collectively, "refinance," "refinances," and "refinanced" shall each have a correlative meaning) any Indebtedness existing on the Issue Date or Incurred in compliance with this Indenture (including Indebtedness of the Company that refinances Indebtedness of any Restricted Subsidiary and Indebtedness of any Restricted Subsidiary that refinances Indebtedness of another Restricted Subsidiary (except that a Subsidiary Guarantor shall not refinance Indebtedness of a Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Subsidiary Guarantor)) including Indebtedness that refinances Refinancing Indebtedness, that:
provided, however,
(1) (a) if the Stated Maturity of the Indebtedness being refinanced is earlier than the Stated Maturity of the Securities, the Refinancing Indebtedness has a Stated Maturity no earlier than the Stated Maturity of the Indebtedness being refinanced or (b) if the Stated Maturity of the Indebtedness being refinanced is later than the Stated Maturity of the Securities, the Refinancing Indebtedness has a Stated Maturity at least 91 days later than the Stated Maturity of the Securities, (2) the Refinancing Indebtedness has an Average Life at the time such Refinancing Indebtedness is Incurred that is equal to or greater than the Average Life of the
 
Indebtedness being refinanced, (3) such Refinancing Indebtedness is Incurred in an aggregate principal amount (or if issued with original issue discount, an aggregate issue price) that is equal to or less than the sum of the aggregate principal amount (or if issued with original issue discount, the aggregate accreted value) then outstanding of the Indebtedness being refinanced (plus, without duplication, any additional Indebtedness Incurred to pay interest, premiums required by the instruments governing such existing Indebtedness or premiums necessary to effectuate such refinancing and fees and expenses Incurred in connection therewith), (4) if the Indebtedness being refinanced is subordinated in right of payment to the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantee, such Refinancing Indebtedness is subordinated in right of payment to the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantee on terms at least as favorable to the Holders as those contained in the documentation governing the Indebtedness being extended, refinanced, renewed, replaced, defeased or refunded, and (5) Refinancing Indebtedness shall not include Indebtedness of a Non-Guarantor Subsidiary that refinances Indebtedness of the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor.
"Related Business" means any business that is the same as or related, ancillary or complementary to any of the businesses of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries on the Issue Date.
"Restoration" has the meaning ascribed to such term in the applicable Collateral Document.
"Restricted Investment" means any Investment other than a Permitted Investment.
"Restricted Period" means, in relation to the Initial Notes, the 40 consecutive days beginning on and including the later of (A) the day on which the Initial Notes are offered to persons other than distributors (as defined in Regulation S under the Securities Act) and (B) the Issue Date and, in relation to any Additional Notes that are Restricted Securities, it means the comparable period of 40 consecutive days.
"Restricted Securities Legend" means the Private Placement Legend set forth in clause (A) of or the Regulation S Legend set forth in clause (B) of , as applicable.
Section 2.1(d)
Section 2.1(d)
"Restricted Subsidiary" means any Subsidiary of the Company other than an Unrestricted Subsidiary.
"Sale/Leaseback Transaction" means any direct or indirect arrangement relating to property now owned or hereafter acquired by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary whereby the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary transfers such property to a Person (other than the Company or any of its Subsidiaries) and the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary leases it from such Person.
"SEC" means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
"Second-Priority Collateral" means assets constituting the ABL Collateral, except for (i) the Capital Stock or Indebtedness of the 1987 Restricted Subsidiaries and (ii) any asset that constitutes "Principal Property" under the 1987 Indenture (such clauses (i) and (ii) being ineffective upon the repayment of all Securities and other Obligations under the 1987 Indenture or upon the Lien covenant therein becoming ineffective).
"Secured Indebtedness" means any Indebtedness of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary secured by a Lien.
"Securities" means the Securities issued under this Indenture.
"Securities Act" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the SEC promulgated thereunder.
"Securities Custodian" means the custodian with respect to the Global Security (as appointed by the Depositary), or any successor Person thereto and shall initially be the Trustee.
"Senior Management" means the Chief Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer of the Company.
"Senior Unsecured Pari Passu Indebtedness" means:
(1) with respect to the Company, any Indebtedness that ranks in right of payment to the Securities but is unsecured with a Stated Maturity date subsequent to the Stated Maturity of the Securities; and
pari passu
(2) with respect to any Subsidiary Guarantor, any Indebtedness that ranks in right of payment to such Subsidiary Guarantor's Subsidiary Guarantee but is unsecured with a Stated Maturity date subsequent to the Stated Maturity of the Securities.
pari passu
"Significant Subsidiary" means any Restricted Subsidiary that would be a "Significant Subsidiary" of the Company within the meaning of Rule 1-02 under Regulation S-X promulgated by the SEC.
"Standard Securitization Undertakings" means representations, warranties, covenants and indemnities entered into by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary that are reasonably customary in securitization of accounts receivables transactions.
"Stated Maturity" means, with respect to any security, the date specified in the agreement governing or certificate relating to such security as the fixed date on which the final payment of principal of such security is due and payable, including pursuant to any mandatory redemption provision, but shall not include any contingent obligations to repay, redeem or repurchase any such principal prior to the date originally scheduled for the payment thereof.
 
"Stillwater Facility" means the manufacturing plants and facilities, distribution and warehouse facilities and executive offices of the Mercury Marine division located in or adjacent to Stillwater, Oklahoma, including all fixtures thereon and equipment and manufacturing-related tangible assets located therein from time to time, but excluding Inventory, raw materials and all production components thereof.
"Subordinated Obligation" means any Indebtedness of the Company (whether outstanding on the Issue Date or thereafter Incurred) that is subordinated or junior in right of payment to the Securities pursuant to a written agreement.
"Subsidiary" of any Person means (a) any corporation, association or other business entity (other than a partnership, joint venture, limited liability company or similar entity) of which more than 50% of the total ordinary voting power of shares of Capital Stock entitled (without regard to the occurrence of any contingency) to vote in the election of directors, managers or trustees thereof (or Persons performing similar functions) or (b) any partnership, joint venture limited liability company or similar entity of which more than 50% of the capital accounts, distribution rights, total equity and voting interests or general or limited partnership interests, as applicable, is, in the case of clauses (a) and (b), at the time owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by (1) such Person, (2) such Person and one or more Subsidiaries of such Person or (3) one or more Subsidiaries of such Person. Unless otherwise specified herein, each reference to a Subsidiary shall refer to a Subsidiary of the Company.
"Subsidiary Guarantee" means, individually, any Guarantee of payment of the Securities by a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to the terms of this Indenture and any supplemental indenture thereto, and, collectively, all such Guarantees. Each such Subsidiary Guarantee shall be in the form prescribed by this Indenture.
"Subsidiary Guarantor" means each Restricted Subsidiary in existence on the Issue Date that provides a Subsidiary Guarantee on the Issue Date (and any other Restricted Subsidiary that provides a Subsidiary Guarantee in accordance with this Indenture); provided that upon release or discharge of such Restricted Subsidiary from its Subsidiary Guarantee in accordance with this Indenture, such Restricted Subsidiary ceases to be a Subsidiary Guarantor.
"Total Tangible Assets" means total assets after deducting accumulated depreciation and amortization, allowances for doubtful accounts, other applicable reserves and other similar items of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries and after deducting, to the extent otherwise included therein, the amounts of (without duplication):
(1) the excess of cost over fair market value of assets or business acquired, as determined by the Company in good faith (or if such fair market value exceeds $50.0 million, in writing by an Independent Financial Advisor);
(2) any revaluation or other write-up in book value of assets subsequent to the last day of the fiscal quarter of the Company immediately preceding the Issue Date as a result of a change in the method of valuation in accordance with GAAP;
 
(3) unamortized debt discount and expenses and other unamortized deferred charges, goodwill, patents, trademarks, service marks, trade names, copyrights, licenses, organization or developmental expenses and other intangible items;
(4) minority interest in consolidated Subsidiaries held by Persons other than the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary;
(5) treasury stock;
(6) cash or securities set aside and held in a sinking or other analogous fund established for the purpose of redemption or other retirement of Capital Stock or Indebtedness; and
(7) Investments in and assets of Unrestricted Subsidiaries.
"Trademark Collateral" means, with respect to any Person, all of such Person's right, title, and interest, now owned or hereafter acquired, in and to the following: (a) all trademarks (including service marks), trade names, trade dress, trade styles and other source indicators and the registrations and applications for registration thereof and the goodwill of the business symbolized by the foregoing; (b) all licenses of the foregoing, whether as licensee or licensor; (c) all renewals of the foregoing; (d) all income, royalties, damages, and payments now or hereafter due or payable with respect thereto, including, without limitation, damages, claims, and payments for past and future infringements thereof; (e) all rights to sue for past, present, and future infringements of the foregoing, including the right to settle suits involving claims and demands for royalties owing; and (f) all rights corresponding to any of the foregoing throughout the world.
"Trade Payables" means, with respect to any Person, any accounts payable to trade creditors created, assumed or Guaranteed by such Person arising in the ordinary course of business in connection with the acquisition of goods or services.
"Transactions" means this offering of Securities and the offer and solicitation for the 5.0% Notes due 2011.
"Treasury Rate" means the yield to maturity at the time of computation of United States Treasury securities with a constant maturity (as compiled and published in the most recent Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (519) that has become publicly available at least two Business Days prior to the Redemption Date (or, if such Statistical Release is no longer published, any publicly available source or similar market data)) most nearly equal to the period from the Redemption Date to November 1, 2013; , that if the period from the Redemption Date to November 1, 2013 is not equal to the constant maturity of a United States Treasury security for which a weekly average yield is given, the Treasury Rate shall be obtained by linear interpolation (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth of a year) from the weekly average yields of United States Treasury securities for which such yields are given, except that if the
provided, however
 
period from the Redemption Date to November 1, 2013 is less than one year, the weekly average yield on actually traded United States Treasury securities adjusted to a constant maturity of one year shall be used.
"Trustee" means the party named as such in this Indenture until a successor replaces it and, thereafter, means such successor.
"Trust Officer" means, when used with respect to the Trustee, any officer within the corporate trust department of the Trustee, including any vice president, assistant vice president, assistant secretary, assistant treasurer, trust officer or any other officer of the Trustee who customarily performs functions similar to those performed by the Persons who at the time shall be such officers, respectively, or to whom any corporate trust matter is referred because of such person's knowledge of and familiarity with the particular subject and who shall have direct responsibility for the administration of the Indenture.
"Uniform Commercial Code" means the Uniform Commercial Code, as in effect from time to time, of the State of New York or of any other state.
"Unrestricted Subsidiary" means (1) any Subsidiary of the Company that at the time of determination shall be designated an Unrestricted Subsidiary by the Board of Directors of the Company in the manner provided below and (2) any Subsidiary of an Unrestricted Subsidiary.
The Board of Directors of the Company may designate any Subsidiary of the Company (including any newly acquired or newly formed Subsidiary or a Person becoming a Subsidiary through merger or consolidation or Investment therein) to be an Unrestricted Subsidiary only if:
(1) such Subsidiary or any of its Subsidiaries does not own any Capital Stock or Indebtedness of or have any Investment in, or own or hold any Lien on any property of, any other Subsidiary of the Company that is not a Subsidiary of the Subsidiary to be so designated or otherwise an Unrestricted Subsidiary;
(2) all the Indebtedness of such Subsidiary and its Subsidiaries shall, at the date of designation, and shall at all times thereafter, consist of Non-Recourse Debt;
(3) such designation and the Investment of the Company in such Subsidiary complies with ;
Section 3.4
(4) such Subsidiary, either alone or in the aggregate with all other Unrestricted Subsidiaries, does not operate, directly or indirectly, all or substantially all of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries;
(5) such Subsidiary is a Person with respect to which neither the Company nor any of its Restricted Subsidiaries has any direct or indirect obligation:
(a) to subscribe for additional Capital Stock of such Person; or
 
(b) to maintain or preserve such Person's financial condition or to cause such Person to achieve any specified levels of operating results; and
(6) on the date such Subsidiary is designated an Unrestricted Subsidiary, such Subsidiary is not a party to any agreement, contract, arrangement or understanding with the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary with terms substantially less favorable to the Company than those that might have been obtained from Persons who are not Affiliates of the Company.
Any such designation by the Board of Directors of the Company shall be evidenced to the Trustee by filing with the Trustee a resolution of the Board of Directors of the Company giving effect to such designation and an Officers' Certificate certifying that such designation complies with the foregoing conditions. If, at any time, any Unrestricted Subsidiary would fail to meet the foregoing requirements as an Unrestricted Subsidiary, it shall thereafter cease to be an Unrestricted Subsidiary for purposes of this Indenture and any Indebtedness of such Subsidiary shall be deemed to be Incurred as of such date.
The Board of Directors of the Company may designate any Unrestricted Subsidiary to be a Restricted Subsidiary; that immediately after giving effect to such designation, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would occur as a consequence thereof and the Company could Incur at least $1.00 of additional Indebtedness under (a) on a basis taking into account such designation.
provided
Section 3.3
pro forma
"U.S. Government Obligations" means securities that are (a) direct obligations of the United States of America for the timely payment of which its full faith and credit is pledged or (b) obligations of a Person controlled or supervised by and acting as an agency or instrumentality of the United States of America the timely payment of which is unconditionally guaranteed as a full faith and credit obligation of the United States of America, which, in either case, are not callable or redeemable at the option of the issuer thereof, and shall also include a depositary receipt issued by a bank (as defined in Section 3(a)(2) of the Securities Act), as custodian with respect to any such U.S. Government Obligations or a specific payment of principal of or interest on any such U.S. Government Obligations held by such custodian for the account of the holder of such depositary receipt; that (except as required by law) such custodian is not authorized to make any deduction from the amount payable to the Holder of such depositary receipt from any amount received by the custodian in respect of the U.S. Government Obligations or the specific payment of principal of or interest on the U.S. Government Obligations evidenced by such depositary receipt.
provided
"Voting Stock" of a Person means all classes of Capital Stock of such Person then outstanding and normally entitled to vote in the election of directors, managers or trustees, as applicable of such Person.
"Wholly-Owned Subsidiary" means a Restricted Subsidiary, all of the Capital Stock of which (other than directors' qualifying shares) is owned by the Company or another Wholly-Owned Subsidiary.
 
SECTION 1.2. .
Other Definitions
 
 
SECTION 1.3. . Unless the context otherwise requires:
Rules of Construction
(a) a term has the meaning assigned to it;
(b) an accounting term not otherwise defined has the meaning assigned to it in accordance with GAAP;
(c) "or" is not exclusive;
(d) "including" means including without limitation;
(e) words in the singular include the plural and words in the plural include the singular;
(f) unsecured Indebtedness shall not be deemed to be subordinate or junior to Secured Indebtedness merely by virtue of its nature as unsecured Indebtedness;
(g) references to sections of, or rules under, the Securities Act shall be deemed to include substitute, replacement or successor sections or rules adopted by the SEC from time to time;
(h) unless the context otherwise requires, any reference to an "Article," "Section" or "clause" refers to an Article, Section or clause, as the case may be, of this Indenture; and
(i) the words "herein," "hereof" and "hereunder" and any other words of similar import refer to this Indenture as a whole and not any particular Article, Section, clause or other subdivision.
 
SECTION 2.1. .
Form, Dating and Terms
(a) The aggregate principal amount of Securities that may be authenticated and delivered under this Indenture is unlimited. The Initial Notes issued on the date hereof shall be in an aggregate principal amount of $350,000,000. In addition, the Company may issue, from time to time in accordance with the provisions of this Indenture, including, without limitation, , Additional Notes in the form of hereto. Furthermore, Securities may be authenticated and delivered upon registration or transfer, or in lieu of, other Securities pursuant to , , , or or in connection with a Collateral Disposition Offer, a Pari Passu Offer or an Offer pursuant to or a Change of Control Offer pursuant to .
Section 3.3
Exhibit A
Section 2.6
2.9
2.11
5.4
Section 3.8
Section 3.10
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, the Company may not issue any Additional Notes, unless Immediately after giving effect to such issuance, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
The Initial Notes shall be known and designated as "11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016" of the Company. Additional Notes shall be known and designated as "11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016" of the Company.
With respect to any Additional Notes, the Company shall set forth in (a) a Board Resolution and (b)(i) an Officers' Certificate or (ii) one or more indentures supplemental hereto, the following information:
(i) the aggregate principal amount of such Additional Notes to be authenticated and delivered pursuant to this Indenture; and
(ii) the issue price and the issue date of such Additional Notes.
In authenticating and delivering Additional Notes, the Trustee shall be entitled to receive and shall be fully protected in relying upon, in addition to the Opinion of Counsel and Officers' Certificate required by , an Opinion of Counsel as to the due authorization, execution, delivery, validity and enforceability of such Additional Notes.
Section 12.2
The Initial Notes and the Additional Notes shall be considered collectively as a single class for all purposes of this Indenture. Holders of the Initial Notes and the Additional Notes shall vote and consent together on all matters to which such Holders are entitled to vote or consent as one class, and none of the Holders of the Initial Notes or the Additional Notes shall have the right to vote or consent as a separate class on any matter to which such Holders are entitled to vote or consent.
(b) The Initial Notes are being offered and sold by the Company pursuant to a Purchase Agreement, dated August 11, 2009, among the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors,
 
J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., Banc of America Securities LLC and the other initial purchasers named therein. The Initial Notes and any Additional Notes shall be resold initially only to (A) QIBs and (B) Persons other than U.S. Persons (as defined in Regulation S under the Securities Act ("")) in reliance on Regulation S. Such Initial Notes and Additional Notes may thereafter be transferred to among others, QIBs, purchasers in reliance on Regulation S and institutional "accredited investors" (as defined in Rules 501(a)(1), (2), (3) and (7) under the Securities Act) who are not QIBs ("") in accordance with Rule 501 of the Securities Act in accordance with the procedure described herein. Additional Notes offered after the date hereof may be offered and sold by the Company from time to time pursuant to one or more purchase agreements in accordance with applicable law.
Regulation S
IAIs
Initial Notes and Additional Notes offered and sold to QIBs in the United States of America in reliance on Rule 144A (the "") shall be issued in the form of a permanent global Security substantially in the form of , which is hereby incorporated by reference and made a part of this Indenture, including appropriate legends as set forth in (the ""), deposited with the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary, duly executed by the Company and authenticated by the Trustee as hereinafter provided. The Rule 144A Global Note may be represented by more than one certificate, if so required by the Depositary's rules regarding the maximum principal amount to be represented by a single certificate. The aggregate principal amount of the Rule 144A Global Note may from time to time be increased or decreased by adjustments made on the records of the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary or its nominee, as hereinafter provided.
Rule 144A Notes
Exhibit A
Section 2.1(d)
Rule 144A Global Note
Initial Notes and any Additional Notes offered and sold outside the United States of America (the "") in reliance on Regulation S shall initially be issued in the form of a permanent global Security substantially in the form of including appropriate legends as set forth in (the ""). The Regulation S Global Note shall be deposited upon issuance with, or on behalf of, the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary in the manner described in this for credit to the respective accounts of the purchasers (or to such other accounts as they may direct) at Euroclear or Clearstream. During the Restricted Period, interests in the Regulation S Global Note may only be held through Euroclear or Clearstream (as indirect participants in the Depositary) unless exchanged for interests in a Global Security in accordance with the transfer and certification requirements described herein.
Regulation S Notes
Exhibit A
Section 2.1(d)
Regulation S Global Note
Article II
Investors may hold their interests in the Regulation S Global Note directly through Euroclear or Clearstream, if they are participants in such systems, or indirectly through organizations which are participants in such systems. After the expiration of the Restricted Period (but not earlier), investors may also hold such interests through organizations other than Euroclear or Clearstream that are participants in the Depositary's system. Euroclear and Clearstream shall hold such interests in the Regulation S Global Note on behalf of their participants through customers' securities accounts in their respective names on the books of their respective depositaries. Such depositaries, in turn, shall hold such interests in the applicable Regulation S Global Note in customers' securities accounts in the depositaries' names on the books of the Depositary. The Regulation S Global Note may be represented by more than
 
one certificate, if so required by the Depositary's rules regarding the maximum principal amount to be represented by a single certificate. The aggregate principal amount of the Regulation S Global Note may from time to time be increased or decreased by adjustments made on the records of the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary or its nominee, as hereinafter provided.
Initial Notes and any Additional Notes resold to IAIs (the "") in the United States of America shall be issued in the form of a permanent global Security substantially in the form of including appropriate legends as set forth in (the "") deposited with the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary, duly executed by the Company and authenticated by the Trustee as hereinafter provided. The Institutional Accredited Investor Global Note may be represented by more than one certificate, if so required by the Depositary's rules regarding the maximum principal amount to be represented by a single certificate. The aggregate principal amount of the Institutional Accredited Investor Global Note may from time to time be increased or decreased by adjustments made on the records of the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary or its nominee, as hereinafter provided.
Institutional Accredited Investor Notes
Exhibit A
Section 2.1(d)
Institutional Accredited Investor Global Note
The Rule 144A Global Note, the Regulation S Global Note, and the Institutional Accredited Investor Global Note are sometimes collectively herein referred to as the "."
Global Securities
The principal of (and premium, if any) and interest on the Securities shall be payable at the office or agency of the Company maintained for such purpose in The City of New York, or at such other office or agency of the Company as may be maintained for such purpose pursuant to ; that, at the option of the Company, each installment of interest may be paid by (i) check mailed to addresses of the Persons entitled thereto as such addresses shall appear on the Note Register or (ii) wire transfer to an account located in the United States maintained by the payee. Payments in respect of Securities represented by a Global Security (including principal, premium, if any, and interest) shall be made by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the accounts specified by the Depositary. Payments in respect of Securities represented by Definitive Securities (including principal, premium, if any, and interest) held by a Holder of at least $5,000,000 aggregate principal amount of Securities represented by Definitive Securities shall be made by wire transfer to a U.S. dollar account maintained by the payee with a bank in the United States if such Holder elects payment by wire transfer by giving written notice to the Trustee or the Paying Agent to such effect designating such account no later than 15 days immediately preceding the relevant due date for payment (or such other date as the Trustee may accept in its discretion).
Section 2.3
provided, however,
The Securities may have notations, legends or endorsements required by law, stock exchange rule or usage, in addition to those set forth on and in . The Company and the Trustee shall approve the form of the Securities and any notation, endorsement or legend on them. Each Security shall be dated the date of its authentication. The terms of the Securities set forth in are part of the terms of this Indenture and, to the extent applicable, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee, by their execution and delivery of this Indenture, expressly agree to be bound by such terms.
Exhibit A
Section 2.1(d)
Exhibit A
 
(c) . The Securities shall be issuable only in fully registered form, without coupons, and only in denominations of $2,000 and any integral multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.
Denominations
(d) . (A) Each Rule 144A Global Note and the Institutional Accredited Investor Global Note shall bear the following legend (the "") on the face thereof:
Restrictive Legends
Private Placement Legend
"THIS SECURITY HAS NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE "SECURITIES ACT"), OR THE SECURITIES LAWS OF ANY STATE OR OTHER JURISDICTION. NEITHER THIS SECURITY NOR ANY INTEREST OR PARTICIPATION HEREIN MAY BE REOFFERED, SOLD, ASSIGNED, TRANSFERRED, PLEDGED, ENCUMBERED OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF IN THE ABSENCE OF SUCH REGISTRATION OR UNLESS SUCH TRANSACTION IS EXEMPT FROM, OR NOT SUBJECT TO, SUCH REGISTRATION. THE HOLDER OF THIS SECURITY, BY ITS ACCEPTANCE HEREOF, AGREES ON ITS OWN BEHALF AND ON BEHALF OF ANY INVESTOR ACCOUNT FOR WHICH IT HAS PURCHASED SECURITIES, TO OFFER, SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER SUCH SECURITY, PRIOR TO THE DATE (THE "RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE") THAT IS ONE YEAR AFTER THE LATER OF THE ORIGINAL ISSUE DATE HEREOF AND THE LAST DATE ON WHICH THE ISSUER OR ANY AFFILIATE OF THE ISSUER WAS THE OWNER OF THIS SECURITY (OR ANY PREDECESSOR OF SUCH SECURITY), ONLY (A) TO THE ISSUER OR ANY SUBSIDIARY THEREOF, (B) PURSUANT TO A REGISTRATION STATEMENT THAT HAS BEEN DECLARED EFFECTIVE UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, (C) FOR SO LONG AS THE SECURITIES ARE ELIGIBLE FOR RESALE PURSUANT TO RULE 144A UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT ("RULE 144A"), TO A PERSON IT REASONABLY BELIEVES IS A "QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER" AS DEFINED IN RULE 144A THAT PURCHASES FOR ITS OWN ACCOUNT OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER TO WHOM NOTICE IS GIVEN THAT THE TRANSFER IS BEING MADE IN RELIANCE ON RULE 144A, (D) PURSUANT TO OFFERS AND SALES TO NON-U.S. PERSONS THAT OCCUR OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES WITHIN THE MEANING OF REGULATION S UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, (E) TO AN INSTITUTIONAL "ACCREDITED INVESTOR" WITHIN THE MEANING OF RULE 501(a)(1), (2), (3) OR (7) UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT THAT IS NOT A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER AND THAT IS PURCHASING FOR ITS OWN ACCOUNT OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF ANOTHER INSTITUTIONAL ACCREDITED INVESTOR, IN EACH CASE IN A TRANSACTION INVOLVING A MINIMUM PRINCIPAL AMOUNT OF THE SECURITIES OF $250,000, FOR INVESTMENT PURPOSES AND NOT WITH A VIEW TO OR FOR OFFER OR SALE IN CONNECTION WITH ANY DISTRIBUTION IN VIOLATION OF THE SECURITIES ACT, OR (F) PURSUANT TO ANOTHER AVAILABLE EXEMPTION FROM THE REGISTRATION
 
REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES ACT, SUBJECT TO THE ISSUER'S AND THE TRUSTEE'S RIGHT PRIOR TO ANY SUCH OFFER, SALE OR TRANSFER PURSUANT TO CLAUSES (D), (E) OR (F) TO REQUIRE THE DELIVERY OF AN OPINION OF COUNSEL, CERTIFICATION AND/ OR OTHER INFORMATION SATISFACTORY TO EACH OF THEM. THIS LEGEND WILL BE REMOVED UPON THE REQUEST OF THE HOLDER AFTER THE RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE.
(B) each Regulation S Global Note shall bear the following legend (the "") on the face thereof:
Regulation S Legend
"THIS SECURITY HAS NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE "SECURITIES ACT"), OR THE SECURITIES LAWS OF ANY STATE OR OTHER JURISDICTION. NEITHER THIS SECURITY NOR ANY INTEREST OR PARTICIPATION HEREIN MAY BE REOFFERED, SOLD, ASSIGNED, TRANSFERRED, PLEDGED, ENCUMBERED OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF IN THE ABSENCE OF SUCH REGISTRATION OR UNLESS SUCH TRANSACTION IS EXEMPT FROM, OR NOT SUBJECT TO, SUCH REGISTRATION. THE HOLDER OF THIS SECURITY, BY ITS ACCEPTANCE HEREOF, AGREES ON ITS OWN BEHALF AND ON BEHALF OF ANY INVESTOR ACCOUNT FOR WHICH IT HAS PURCHASED SECURITIES, TO OFFER, SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER SUCH SECURITY, PRIOR TO THE DATE (THE "RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE") THAT IS 40 DAYS AFTER THE LATER OF THE ORIGINAL ISSUE DATE HEREOF AND THE LAST DATE ON WHICH THE ISSUER OR ANY AFFILIATE OF THE ISSUER WAS THE OWNER OF THIS SECURITY (OR ANY PREDECESSOR OF SUCH SECURITY), ONLY (A) TO THE ISSUER OR ANY SUBSIDIARY THEREOF, (B) PURSUANT TO A REGISTRATION STATEMENT THAT HAS BEEN DECLARED EFFECTIVE UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, (C) FOR SO LONG AS THE SECURITIES ARE ELIGIBLE FOR RESALE PURSUANT TO RULE 144A UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT ("RULE 144A"), TO A PERSON IT REASONABLY BELIEVES IS A "QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER" AS DEFINED IN RULE 144A THAT PURCHASES FOR ITS OWN ACCOUNT OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER TO WHOM NOTICE IS GIVEN THAT THE TRANSFER IS BEING MADE IN RELIANCE ON RULE 144A, (D) PURSUANT TO OFFERS AND SALES TO NON-U.S. PERSONS THAT OCCUR OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES WITHIN THE MEANING OF REGULATION S UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, (E) TO AN INSTITUTIONAL "ACCREDITED INVESTOR" WITHIN THE MEANING OF RULE 501(a)(1), (2), (3) OR (7) UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT THAT IS NOT A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER AND THAT IS PURCHASING FOR ITS OWN ACCOUNT OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF ANOTHER INSTITUTIONAL ACCREDITED INVESTOR, IN EACH CASE IN A TRANSACTION INVOLVING A MINIMUM PRINCIPAL AMOUNT OF THE SECURITIES OF $250,000, FOR INVESTMENT PURPOSES AND NOT WITH A
 
VIEW TO OR FOR OFFER OR SALE IN CONNECTION WITH ANY DISTRIBUTION IN VIOLATION OF THE SECURITIES ACT, OR (F) PURSUANT TO ANOTHER AVAILABLE EXEMPTION FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES ACT, SUBJECT TO THE ISSUER'S AND THE TRUSTEE'S RIGHT PRIOR TO ANY SUCH OFFER, SALE OR TRANSFER PURSUANT TO CLAUSES (D), (E) OR (F) TO REQUIRE THE DELIVERY OF AN OPINION OF COUNSEL, CERTIFICATION AND/ OR OTHER INFORMATION SATISFACTORY TO EACH OF THEM. THIS LEGEND WILL BE REMOVED UPON THE REQUEST OF THE HOLDER AFTER THE RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE. BY ITS ACQUISITION HEREOF, THE HOLDER HEREOF REPRESENTS THAT IT IS NOT A U.S. PERSON NOR IS IT PURCHASING FOR THE ACCOUNT OF A U.S. PERSON AND IS ACQUIRING THIS SECURITY IN AN OFFSHORE TRANSACTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATION S UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT.
The Global Securities, whether or not an Initial Note, shall bear the following legend on the face thereof:
"UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION ("DTC"), NEW YORK, NEW YORK, TO THE ISSUER OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC (AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL INASMUCH AS THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
TRANSFERS OF THIS GLOBAL SECURITY SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS IN WHOLE, BUT NOT IN PART, TO DTC, TO NOMINEES OF DTC OR TO A SUCCESSOR THEREOF OR SUCH SUCCESSOR'S NOMINEE AND TRANSFERS OF PORTIONS OF THIS GLOBAL SECURITY SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RESTRICTIONS SET FORTH IN THE INDENTURE REFERRED TO ON THE REVERSE HEREOF."
Each Security issued hereunder that has more than a de minimis amount of original issue discount for U.S. federal income tax purposes shall bear a legend in substantially the following form:
"THIS NOTE IS ISSUED WITH ORIGINAL ISSUE DISCOUNT FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 1271 ET SEQ. OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE. A HOLDER MAY OBTAIN THE ISSUE PRICE, AMOUNT OF ORIGINAL ISSUE DISCOUNT, ISSUE
 
DATE AND YIELD TO MATURITY FOR SUCH NOTE BY SUBMITTING A WRITTEN REQUEST FOR SUCH INFORMATION TO: CORPORATE SECRETARY, BRUNSWICK CORPORATION, 1 N. FIELD CT., LAKE FOREST, ILLINOIS, 60045-4811, TELEPHONE NUMBER (847) 735-4700."
(e) .
Book-Entry Provisions
(i) This shall apply only to Global Securities deposited with the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary.
Section 2.1(e)
(ii) Each Global Security initially shall (x) be registered in the name of the Depositary for such Global Security or the nominee of such Depositary, (y) be delivered to the Trustee as custodian for such Depositary and (z) bear legends as set forth in .
Section 2.1(d)
(iii) Members of, or participants in, the Depositary ("") shall have no rights under this Indenture with respect to any Global Security held on their behalf by the Depositary or by the Trustee as the custodian of the Depositary or under such Global Security, and the Depositary may be treated by the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee as the absolute owner of such Global Security for all purposes whatsoever. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing herein shall prevent the Company, the Trustee or any agent of the Company or the Trustee from giving effect to any written certification, proxy or other authorization furnished by the Depositary or impair, as between the Depositary and its Agent Members, the operation of customary practices of the Depositary governing the exercise of the rights of a Holder of a beneficial interest in any Global Security.
Agent Members
(iv) The registered Holder of a Global Security may grant proxies and otherwise authorize any person, including Agent Members and persons that may hold interests through Agent Members, to take any action which a Holder is entitled to take under this Indenture or the Securities.
(v) In connection with any transfer of a portion of the beneficial interest in a Global Security pursuant to subsection (f) of this to beneficial owners who are required to hold Definitive Securities, the Trustee shall reflect on its books and records the date and a decrease in the principal amount of such Global Security in an amount equal to the principal amount of the beneficial interest in the Global Security to be transferred, and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, one or more Definitive Securities of like tenor and amount.
Section 2.1
(vi) In connection with the transfer of an entire Global Security to beneficial owners pursuant to subsection (f) of this Section, such Global Security shall be deemed to be surrendered to the Trustee for cancellation, and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, to each beneficial owner identified by the
 
Depositary in exchange for its beneficial interest in such Global Security, an equal aggregate principal amount of Definitive Securities of authorized denominations.
(vii) Any Holder of a Global Security shall, by acceptance of such Global Security, agree that transfers of beneficial interests in such Global Security may be effected only through a book-entry system maintained by (a) the Holder of such Global Security (or its agent) or (b) any Holder of a beneficial interest in such Global Security, and that ownership of a beneficial interest in such Global Security shall be required to be reflected in a book entry.
(f) . Except as provided below, owners of beneficial interests in Global Securities shall not be entitled to receive Definitive Securities. If required to do so pursuant to any applicable law or regulation, beneficial owners may obtain Definitive Securities in exchange for their beneficial interests in a Global Security upon written request in accordance with the Depositary's and the Registrar's procedures. In addition, Definitive Securities shall be transferred to all beneficial owners in exchange for their beneficial interests in a Global Security if (i) the Depositary notifies the Company that it is unwilling or unable to continue as depositary for such Global Security or the Depositary ceases to be a clearing agency registered under the Exchange Act, at a time when the Depositary is required to be so registered in order to act as Depositary, and in each case a successor depositary is not appointed by the Company within 90 days of such notice or, (ii) the Company executes and delivers to the Trustee and Registrar an Officers' Certificate stating that such Global Security shall be so exchangeable or (iii) an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Registrar has received a request from the Depositary.
Definitive Securities
(g) Any Definitive Security delivered in exchange for an interest in a Global Security pursuant to or  shall, except as otherwise provided by paragraph (c) of , bear the applicable legend regarding transfer restrictions applicable to the Definitive Security set forth in .
Section 2.1(e)(iv)
(v)
Section 2.6
Section 2.1(d)
(h) In connection with the exchange of a portion of a Definitive Security for a beneficial interest in a Global Security, the Trustee shall cancel such Definitive Security, and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, to the transferring Holder a new Definitive Security representing the principal amount not so transferred.
SECTION 2.2. . Two Officers shall sign the Securities for the Company by manual or facsimile signature. If an Officer whose signature is on a Security no longer holds that office at the time the Trustee authenticates the Security, the Security shall be valid nevertheless.
Execution and Authentication
A Security shall not be valid until an authorized signatory of the Trustee manually authenticates the Security. The signature of the Trustee on a Security shall be conclusive evidence that such Security has been duly and validly authenticated and issued under this Indenture. A Security shall be dated the date of its authentication.
 
At any time and from time to time after the execution and delivery of this Indenture, the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery: (1) Initial Notes for original issue on the Issue Date in an aggregate principal amount of $350,000,000 and (2) subject to the terms of this Indenture Additional Notes for original issue in an unlimited principal amount of an equal principal amount, in each case upon a written order of the Company signed by two Officers or by an Officer and either an Assistant Treasurer or an Assistant Secretary of the Company (the ""). Such Company Order shall specify the amount of the Securities to be authenticated and the date on which the original issue of Securities is to be authenticated and whether the Securities are to be Initial Notes or Additional Notes.
Company Order
The Trustee may appoint an agent (the "") reasonably acceptable to the Company to authenticate the Securities. Unless limited by the terms of such appointment, any such Authenticating Agent may authenticate Securities whenever the Trustee may do so. Each reference in this Indenture to authentication by the Trustee includes authentication by such agent.
Authenticating Agent
In case the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor, pursuant to shall be consolidated or merged with or into any other Person or shall convey, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of its properties and assets substantially as an entirety to any Person, and the successor Person resulting from such consolidation, or surviving such merger, or into which the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor shall have been merged, or the Person which shall have received a conveyance, transfer, lease or other disposition as aforesaid, shall have executed an indenture supplemental hereto with the Trustee pursuant to , any of the Securities authenticated or delivered prior to such consolidation, merger, conveyance, transfer, lease or other disposition may, from time to time, at the request of the successor Person, be exchanged for other Securities executed in the name of the successor Person with such changes in phraseology and form as may be appropriate, but otherwise in substance of like tenor as the Securities surrendered for such exchange and of like principal amount; and the Trustee, upon Company Order of the successor Person, shall authenticate and deliver Securities as specified in such order for the purpose of such exchange. If Securities shall at any time be authenticated and delivered in any new name of a successor Person pursuant to this in exchange or substitution for or upon registration of transfer of any Securities, such successor Person, at the option of the Holders but without expense to them, shall provide for the exchange of all Securities at the time outstanding for Securities authenticated and delivered in such new name.
Article IV
Article IV
Section 2.2
SECTION 2.3. . The Company shall maintain an office or agency where Securities may be presented for registration of transfer or for exchange (the "") and an office or agency where Securities may be presented for payment (the ""). The Company shall cause each of the Registrar and the Paying Agent to maintain an office or agency in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York. The Registrar shall keep a register of the Securities and of their transfer and exchange (the ""). The Company may have one or more co-registrars and one or more additional paying agents. The term "Paying Agent" includes any additional paying agent and the term "Registrar" includes any co-registrar.
Registrar and Paying Agent
Registrar
Paying Agent
Note Register
 
The Company shall enter into an appropriate agency agreement with any Registrar or Paying Agent not a party to this Indenture. The agreement shall implement the provisions of this Indenture that relate to such agent. The Company shall notify the Trustee of the name and address of each such agent. If the Company fails to maintain a Registrar or Paying Agent, the Trustee shall act as such and shall be entitled to appropriate compensation therefor pursuant to . The Company or any of its domestically incorporated Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries may act as Paying Agent, Registrar or transfer agent.
Section 7.6
The Company initially appoints the Trustee as Registrar and Paying Agent for the Securities. The Company may remove any Registrar or Paying Agent upon written notice to such Registrar or Paying Agent and to the Trustee; that no such removal shall become effective until (i) acceptance of any appointment by a successor as evidenced by an appropriate agreement entered into by the Company and such successor Registrar or Paying Agent, as the case may be, and delivered to the Trustee or (ii) notification to the Trustee that the Trustee shall serve as Registrar or Paying Agent until the appointment of a successor in accordance with clause (i) above. The Registrar or Paying Agent may resign at any time upon written notice to the Company and the Trustee.
provided, however,
SECTION 2.4. . By no later than 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which any principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any Security is due and payable, the Company shall deposit with the Paying Agent a sum sufficient in immediately available funds to pay such principal, premium, if any, or interest when due. The Company shall require each Paying Agent (other than the Trustee) to agree in writing that such Paying Agent shall hold in trust for the benefit of Holders or the Trustee all money held by such Paying Agent for the payment of principal of, premium, if any, or interest on the Securities and shall notify the Trustee in writing of any default by the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor in making any such payment. If the Company or a Subsidiary acts as Paying Agent, it shall segregate the money held by it as Paying Agent and hold it as a separate trust fund. The Company at any time may require a Paying Agent (other than the Trustee) to pay all money held by it to the Trustee and to account for any funds disbursed by such Paying Agent. Upon complying with this Section, the Paying Agent (if other than the Company or a Subsidiary) shall have no further liability for the money delivered to the Trustee. Upon any bankruptcy, reorganization or similar proceeding with respect to the Company, the Trustee shall serve as Paying Agent for the Securities.
Paying Agent To Hold Money in Trust
SECTION 2.5. . The Trustee shall preserve in as current a form as is reasonably practicable the most recent list available to it of the names and addresses of Holders. If the Trustee is not the Registrar, the Company, on its own behalf and on behalf of each of the Subsidiary Guarantors, shall furnish to the Trustee, in writing at least five Business Days before each interest payment date and at such other times as the Trustee may request in writing, a list in such form and as of such date as the Trustee may reasonably require of the names and addresses of Holders.
Holder Lists
SECTION 2.6. .
Transfer and Exchange
 
(a) The following provisions shall apply with respect to any proposed transfer of a Rule 144A Note or an Institutional Accredited Investor Note prior to the date which is one year after the later of the date of its original issue and the last date on which the Company or any Affiliate of the Company was the owner of such Securities (or any predecessor thereto) (the ""):
Resale Restriction Termination Date
(i) a transfer of a Rule 144A Note or an Institutional Accredited Investor Note or a beneficial interest therein to a QIB shall be made upon the representation of the transferee in the form as set forth on the reverse of the Security that it is purchasing the Security for its own account or an account with respect to which it exercises sole investment discretion and that it and any such account is a "qualified institutional buyer" within the meaning of Rule 144A, and is aware that the sale to it is being made in reliance on Rule 144A and acknowledges that it has received such information regarding the Company as it has requested pursuant to Rule 144A or has determined not to request such information and that it is aware that the transferor is relying upon its foregoing representations in order to claim the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144A;
(ii) a transfer of a Rule 144A Note or an Institutional Accredited Investor Note or a beneficial interest therein to an IAI shall be made upon receipt by the Trustee or its agent of a certificate substantially in the form set forth in hereof from the proposed transferee and, if requested by the Company or the Trustee, the delivery of an opinion of counsel, certification and/or other information satisfactory to each of them; and
Section 2.7
(iii) a transfer of a Rule 144A Note or an Institutional Accredited Investor Note or a beneficial interest therein to a Non-U.S. Person shall be made upon receipt by the Trustee or its agent of a certificate substantially in the form set forth in hereof from the proposed transferee and, if requested by the Company or the Trustee, the delivery of an opinion of counsel, certification and/or other information satisfactory to each of them.
Section 2.8
(b) The following provisions shall apply with respect to any proposed transfer of a Regulation S Note prior to the expiration of the Restricted Period:
(i) a transfer of a Regulation S Note or a beneficial interest therein to a QIB shall be made upon the representation of the transferee, in the form of assignment on the reverse of the certificate, that it is purchasing the Security for its own account or an account with respect to which it exercises sole investment discretion and that it and any such account is a "qualified institutional buyer" within the meaning of Rule 144A, and is aware that the sale to it is being made in reliance on Rule 144A and acknowledges that it has received such information regarding the Company as the undersigned has requested pursuant to Rule 144A or has determined not to request such information and that it is aware that the transferor is relying upon its foregoing representations in order to claim the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144A;
 
(ii) a transfer of a Regulation S Note or a beneficial interest therein to an IAI shall be made upon receipt by the Trustee or its agent of a certificate substantially in the form set forth in hereof from the proposed transferee and, if requested by the Company or the Trustee, the delivery of an opinion of counsel, certification and/or other information satisfactory to each of them; and
Section 2.7
(iii) a transfer of a Regulation S Note or a beneficial interest therein to a Non-U.S. Person shall be made upon receipt by the Trustee or its agent of a certificate substantially in the form set forth in hereof from the proposed transferee and, if requested by the Company or the Trustee, receipt by the Trustee or its agent of an opinion of counsel, certification and/or other information satisfactory to each of them.
Section 2.8
After the expiration of the Restricted Period, interests in the Regulation S Note may be transferred in accordance with applicable law without requiring the certification set forth in or any additional certification.
Section 2.8
(c) . Upon the transfer, exchange or replacement of Securities not bearing a Restricted Securities Legend, the Registrar shall deliver Securities that do not bear a Restricted Securities Legend. Upon the transfer, exchange or replacement of Securities bearing a Restricted Securities Legend, the Registrar shall deliver only Securities that bear such Restricted Securities Legend unless there is delivered to the Registrar an Opinion of Counsel to the effect that neither such legend nor the related restrictions on transfer are required in order to maintain compliance with the provisions of the Securities Act. Any Additional Notes sold in a registered offering shall not be required to bear the Restricted Securities Legend.
Restricted Securities Legend
(d) The Registrar shall retain copies of all letters, notices and other written communications received pursuant to or this . The Company shall have the right to inspect and make copies of all such letters, notices or other written communications at any reasonable time upon the giving of reasonable written notice to the Registrar.
Section 2.1
Section 2.6
(e)  To the extent permitted by law after the six-month anniversary of the Issue Date and upon compliance with the following procedures, beneficial interests in a Global Note bearing the Restricted Securities Legend (a "") may, at the Company's sole discretion, be exchanged for beneficial interests in a Global Note not bearing the Restricted Securities Legend (an ""). In order to effect such exchange, the Company shall provide written notice to the Trustee instructing the Trustee to (1) direct the Depositary to transfer the specified amount of the outstanding beneficial interests in a particular Restricted Global Note to an Unrestricted Global Note and provide the Depositary with all such information as is necessary for the Depositary to appropriately credit and debit the relevant Holder accounts and (2) provide prior written notice to all Holders of such exchange, which notice must include the date such exchange is proposed to occur, the CUSIP number of the relevant Restricted Global Note and the CUSIP number of the Unrestricted Global Note into which such Holders' beneficial interests shall be exchanged. As a condition to any such exchange pursuant to this , the Trustee shall be entitled to
Exchange from Global Note Bearing Restricted Securities Legend to Global Note Not Bearing Restricted Securities Legend.
Restricted Global Note
Unrestricted Global Note
Section 2.6(e)
 
receive from the Company, and rely upon conclusively without any liability, an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel to the Company, in form and in substance reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee, to the effect that such transfer of beneficial interests to the Unrestricted Global Note shall be effected in compliance with the Securities Act. The Company may request from Holders such information it reasonably determines is required in order to be able to deliver such Officers' Certificate and Opinion of Counsel, including certification from Holders that they are not Affiliates of the Company and have not knowingly acquired their beneficial interests in the Restricted Global Note from any Affiliate of the Company. Upon such exchange of beneficial interests pursuant to this , the Registrar shall reflect on its books and records the date of such transfer and a decrease and increase, respectively, in the principal amount of the applicable Restricted Global Note and the Unrestricted Global Note, respectively, equal to the principal amount of beneficial interests transferred. Following any such transfer pursuant to this of all of the beneficial interests in a Restricted Global Note, such Restricted Global Note shall be cancelled.
Section 2.6(e)
Section 2.6(e)
(f) . The Registrar shall retain copies of all letters, notices and other written communications received pursuant to or this . The Company shall have the right to inspect and make copies of all such letters, notices or other written communications at any reasonable time upon the giving of reasonable prior written notice to the Registrar.
Retention of Written Communications
Section 2.1
Section 2.6
(g) .
Obligations with Respect to Transfers and Exchanges of Securities
(i) To permit registrations of transfers and exchanges, the Company shall, subject to the other terms and conditions of this , execute and the Trustee shall authenticate Definitive Securities and Global Securities at the Registrar's request.
Article II
(ii) No service charge shall be made to a Holder for any registration of transfer or exchange, but the Company may require the Holder to pay a sum sufficient to cover any transfer tax, assessments, or similar governmental charge payable in connection therewith (other than any such transfer taxes, assessments or similar governmental charges payable upon exchange or transfer pursuant to or ).
Sections 3.10
9.4
(iii) The Registrar shall not be required to register the transfer of or exchange of any Security for a period beginning (1) 15 Business Days before the mailing of a notice of an offer to repurchase Securities and ending at the close of business on the day of such mailing or (2) 15 Business Days before an interest payment date and ending on such interest payment date.
(iv) Prior to the due presentation for registration of transfer of any Security, the Company, the Trustee, the Paying Agent or the Registrar may deem and treat the person in whose name a Security is registered as the absolute owner of such Security for the purpose of receiving payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on such Security and for all other purposes whatsoever, whether or not such Security is overdue,
 
and none of the Company, the Trustee, the Paying Agent or the Registrar shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
(v) All Securities issued upon any transfer or exchange pursuant to the terms of this Indenture shall evidence the same debt and shall be entitled to the same benefits under this Indenture as the Securities surrendered upon such transfer or exchange.
(h) . (i) The Trustee shall have no responsibility or obligation to any beneficial owner of a Global Security, a member of, or a participant in, the Depositary or other Person with respect to the accuracy of the records of the Depositary or its nominee or of any participant or member thereof, with respect to any ownership interest in the Securities, or with respect to the delivery to any participant, member, beneficial owner or other Person (other than the Depositary) of any notice or the payment of any amount or delivery of any Securities (or other security or property) under or with respect to such Securities. All notices and communications to be given to the Holders and all payments to be made to Holders in respect of the Securities shall be given or made only to or upon the order of the registered Holders (which shall be the Depositary or its nominee in the case of a Global Security). The rights of beneficial owners in any Global Security shall be exercised only through the Depositary subject to the applicable rules and procedures of the Depositary. The Trustee may rely and shall be fully protected in relying upon information furnished by the Depositary with respect to its members, participants and any beneficial owners.
No Obligation of the Trustee
(ii) The Trustee shall have no obligation or duty to monitor, determine or inquire as to compliance with any restrictions on transfer imposed under this Indenture or under applicable law with respect to any transfer of any interest in any Security (including any transfers between or among Depositary participants, members or beneficial owners in any Global Security) other than to require delivery of such certificates and other documentation or evidence as are expressly required by, and to do so if and when expressly required by, the terms of this Indenture, and to examine the same to determine substantial compliance as to form with the express requirements hereof.
(i) . By accepting a beneficial interest in a Global Security, any Person that is an Affiliate of the Company agrees to give notice to the Company, the Trustee and the Registrar of the acquisition and its Affiliate status.
Affiliate Holders
 
SECTION 2.7. .
Form of Certificate to be Delivered in Connection with Transfers to Institutional Accredited Investors
Brunswick Corporation
c/o The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A.
2 North LaSalle Street
Suite 1020
Chicago, Illinois 60602
Attention: Corporate Trust Department
Dear Sirs:
This certificate is delivered to request a transfer of $ principal amount of the 11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016 (the "Notes") of Brunswick Corporation (the "Company").
Upon transfer, the Notes would be registered in the name of the new beneficial owner as follows:
 
The undersigned represents and warrants to you that:
1. We are an institutional "accredited investor" (as defined in Rule 501(a)(1), (2), (3) or (7) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act")) purchasing for our own account or for the account of such an institutional "accredited investor" at least $250,000 principal amount of the Notes, and we are acquiring the Notes not with a view to, or for offer or sale in connection with, any distribution in violation of the Securities Act. We have such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters as to be capable of evaluating the merits and risk of our investment in the Notes and we invest in or purchase securities similar to the Notes in the normal course of our business. We and any accounts for which we are acting are each able to bear the economic risk of our or its investment.
2. We understand that the Notes have not been registered under the Securities Act and, unless so registered, may not be sold except as permitted in the following sentence. We agree on our own behalf and on behalf of any investor account for which we are purchasing Notes to offer, sell or otherwise transfer such Notes prior to the date that is one year after the later of the date of original issue and the last date on which the Company or any affiliate of the Company was the owner of such Notes (or any predecessor thereto) (the "Resale Restriction
 
Termination Date") only (a) to the Company, (b) pursuant to a registration statement which has been declared effective under the Securities Act ("Rule 144A"), (c) in a transaction complying with the requirements of Rule 144A under the Securities Act, to a person we reasonably believe is a qualified institutional buyer under Rule 144A (a "QIB") that purchases for its own account or for the account of a QIB and to whom notice is given that the transfer is being made in reliance on Rule 144A, (d) pursuant to offers and sales that occur outside the United States within the meaning of Regulation S under the Securities Act, (e) to an institutional "accredited investor" within the meaning of Rule 501(a)(1), (2), (3) or (7) under the Securities Act that is purchasing for its own account or for the account of such an institutional "accredited investor," in each case in a minimum principal amount of Notes of $250,000 or (f) pursuant to any other available exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act, subject in each of the foregoing cases to any requirement of law that the disposition of our property or the property of such investor account or accounts be at all times within our or their control and in compliance with any applicable state securities laws. The foregoing restrictions on resale shall not apply subsequent to the Resale Restriction Termination Date. If any resale or other transfer of the Notes is proposed to be made pursuant to clause (e) above prior to the Resale Restriction Termination Date, the transferor shall deliver a letter from the transferee substantially in the form of this letter to the Company and the Trustee, which shall provide, among other things, that the transferee is an institutional "accredited investor" (within the meaning of Rule 501(a)(1), (2), (3) or (7) under the Securities Act) and that it is acquiring such Notes for investment purposes and not for distribution in violation of the Securities Act. Each purchaser acknowledges that the Company and the Trustee reserve the right prior to any offer, sale or other transfer prior to the Resale Termination Date of the Notes pursuant to clauses (d), (e) or (f) above to require the delivery of an opinion of counsel, certifications and/or other information satisfactory to the Company and the Trustee.
 
SECTION 2.8. .
Form of Certificate to be Delivered in Connection with Transfers Pursuant to Regulation S
Brunswick Corporation c/o
The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A.
2 North LaSalle Street
Suite 1020
Chicago, Illinois 60602
Attention: Corporate Trust Department
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with our proposed sale of $                     aggregate principal amount of the Securities, we confirm that such sale has been effected pursuant to and in accordance with Regulation S under the United States Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"), and, accordingly, we represent that:
(a) the offer of the Securities was not made to a person in the United States;
(b) either (i) at the time the buy order was originated, the transferee was outside the United States or we and any person acting on our behalf reasonably believed that the transferee was outside the United States or (ii) the transaction was executed in, on or through the facilities of a designated off-shore securities market and neither we nor any person acting on our behalf knows that the transaction has been pre-arranged with a buyer in the United States;
(c) no directed selling efforts have been made in the United States in contravention of the requirements of Rule 903(a)(2) or Rule 904(a)(2) of Regulation S, as applicable; and
(d) the transaction is not part of a plan or scheme to evade the registration requirements of the Securities Act.
In addition, if the sale is made during a restricted period and the provisions of Rule 903(b)(2), Rule 903(b)(3) or Rule 904(b)(1) of Regulation S are applicable thereto, we confirm that such sale has been made in accordance with the applicable provisions of Rule 903(b)(2), Rule 903(b)(3) or Rule 904(b)(1), as the case may be.
We also hereby certify that we [are][are not] an Affiliate of the Company and, to our knowledge, the transferee of the Securities [is][is not] an Affiliate of the Company.
You and the Company are entitled to rely upon this letter and are irrevocably authorized to produce this letter or a copy hereof to any interested party in any administrative or legal proceedings or official inquiry with respect to the matters covered hereby. Terms used in this certificate have the meanings set forth in Regulation S.
 
SECTION 2.9. . If a mutilated Security is surrendered to the Registrar or if the Holder of a Security claims that the Security has been lost, destroyed or wrongfully taken, the Company shall issue and the Trustee, upon Company Order, shall authenticate a replacement Security if the requirements of Section 8-405 of the Uniform Commercial Code are met such that the Holder (a) notifies the Company and the Trustee within a reasonable time after such Holder has notice of such loss, destruction or wrongful taking and the Registrar has not registered a transfer prior to receiving such notification, (b) makes such request to the Company prior to the Company having notice that the Security has been acquired by a protected purchaser as defined in Section 8-303 of the Uniform Commercial Code (a "protected purchaser") and (c) satisfies any other reasonable requirements of the Company and the Trustee. If required by the Trustee or the Company, such Holder shall furnish an indemnity bond sufficient in the judgment of the Company and the Trustee to protect the Company, the Trustee, the Paying Agent and the Registrar from any loss which any of them may suffer if a Security is replaced, then, in the absence of notice to the Company, any Subsidiary Guarantor or the Trustee that such Security has been acquired by a protected purchaser, the Company shall execute and upon Company Order the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, in exchange for any such mutilated Security or in lieu of any such destroyed, lost or stolen Security, a new Security of like tenor and principal amount, bearing a number not contemporaneously outstanding.
Mutilated, Destroyed, Lost or Stolen Securities
In case any such mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security has become or is about to become due and payable, the Company in its discretion may, instead of issuing a new Security, pay such Security.
Upon the issuance of any new Security under this Section, the Company may require that such Holder pay a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in relation thereto and any other expenses (including the fees and expenses of the Trustee) in connection therewith.
Every new Security issued pursuant to this Section in lieu of any mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall constitute an original additional contractual obligation of the Company, any Subsidiary Guarantor and any other obligor upon the Securities, whether or not the mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall be at any time enforceable by anyone, and shall be entitled to all benefits of this Indenture equally and proportionately with any and all other Securities duly issued hereunder.
 
The provisions of this Section are exclusive and shall preclude (to the extent lawful) all other rights and remedies with respect to the replacement or payment of mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Securities.
SECTION 2.10. . Securities outstanding at any time are all Securities authenticated by the Trustee except for those canceled by it, those delivered to it for cancellation and those described in this Section as not outstanding. A Security does not cease to be outstanding in the event the Company or an Affiliate of the Company holds the Security except that the Company or an Affiliate of the Company shall obtain voting rights with respect to such Security.
Outstanding Securities
not
If a Security is replaced pursuant to , it ceases to be outstanding unless the Trustee and the Company receive proof satisfactory to them that the replaced Security is held by a bona fide purchaser.
Section 2.9
If the Paying Agent segregates and holds in trust, in accordance with this Indenture, on a Redemption Date or maturity date money sufficient to pay all principal, premium, if any, and interest payable on that date with respect to the Securities (or portions thereof) to be redeemed or maturing, as the case may be, and the Paying Agent is not prohibited from paying such money to the Holders on that date pursuant to the terms of this Indenture, then on and after that date such Securities (or portions thereof) cease to be outstanding and interest on them ceases to accrue.
SECTION 2.11. . In the event that Definitive Securities are to be issued under the terms of this Indenture, until such Definitive Securities are ready for delivery, the Company may prepare and the Trustee shall authenticate temporary Securities. Temporary Securities shall be substantially in the form of Definitive Securities but may have variations that the Company considers appropriate for temporary Securities. Without unreasonable delay, the Company shall prepare and the Trustee shall authenticate Definitive Securities. After the preparation of Definitive Securities, the temporary Securities shall be exchangeable for Definitive Securities upon surrender of the temporary Securities at any office or agency maintained by the Company for that purpose and such exchange shall be without charge to the Holder. Upon surrender for cancellation of any one or more temporary Securities, the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery in exchange therefor, one or more Definitive Securities representing an equal principal amount of Securities. Until so exchanged, the Holder of temporary Securities shall in all respects be entitled to the same benefits under this Indenture as a Holder of Definitive Securities.
Temporary Securities
SECTION 2.12. . The Company at any time may deliver Securities to the Trustee for cancellation. The Registrar and the Paying Agent shall forward to the Trustee any Securities surrendered to them for registration of transfer, exchange or payment. The Trustee and no one else shall cancel and return to the Company all Securities surrendered for registration of transfer, exchange, payment or cancellation and deliver a certificate of such cancellation to the Company. The Company may not issue new Securities to replace Securities it has paid or delivered to the Trustee for cancellation.
Cancellation
 
At such time as all beneficial interests in a Global Security have either been exchanged for Definitive Securities, transferred, redeemed, repurchased or canceled, such Global Security shall be returned by the Depositary to the Trustee for cancellation or retained and canceled by the Trustee. At any time prior to such cancellation, if any beneficial interest in a Global Security is exchanged for Definitive Securities, transferred in exchange for an interest in another Global Security, redeemed, repurchased or canceled, the principal amount of Securities represented by such Global Security shall be reduced and an adjustment shall be made on the Global Security and on the books and records of the Trustee (if it is then the Securities Custodian for such Global Security) with respect to such Global Security, by the Trustee or the Securities Custodian, to reflect such reduction.
SECTION 2.13. . Interest on any Security which is payable, and is punctually paid or duly provided for, on any interest payment date shall be paid to the Person in whose name such Security (or one or more predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the regular record date for such interest at the office or agency of the Company maintained for such purpose pursuant to .
Payment of Interest; Defaulted Interest
Section 2.3
Any interest on any Security which is payable, but is not paid when the same becomes due and payable and such nonpayment continues for a period of 30 days shall forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on the regular record date by virtue of having been such Holder, and such defaulted interest and (to the extent lawful) interest on such defaulted interest at the rate borne by the Securities (such defaulted interest and interest thereon herein collectively called "") shall be paid by the Company, at its election in each case, as provided in clause (a) or (b) below:
Defaulted Interest
(a) The Company may elect to make payment of any Defaulted Interest to the Persons in whose names the Securities (or their respective predecessor Securities) are registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date (as defined below) for the payment of such Defaulted Interest, which shall be fixed in the following manner. The Company shall notify the Trustee in writing of the amount of Defaulted Interest proposed to be paid on each Security and the date (not less than 30 days after such notice) of the proposed payment (the ""), and at the same time the Company shall deposit with the Trustee an amount of money equal to the aggregate amount proposed to be paid in respect of such Defaulted Interest or shall make arrangements satisfactory to the Trustee for such deposit prior to the date of the proposed payment, such money when deposited to be held in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled to such Defaulted Interest as in this clause provided. Thereupon the Trustee shall fix a record date (the "") for the payment of such Defaulted Interest which shall be not more than 15 days and not less than 10 days prior to the Special Interest Payment Date and not less than 10 days after the receipt by the Trustee of the notice of the proposed payment. The Trustee shall promptly notify the Company of such Special Record Date, and in the name and at the expense of the Company, shall cause notice of the proposed payment of such Defaulted Interest and the Special Record Date and Special Interest Payment Date therefor to be given in the manner provided for in , not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date. Notice of the
Special Interest Payment Date
Special Record Date
Section 12.1
 
proposed payment of such Defaulted Interest and the Special Record Date and Special Interest Payment Date therefor having been so given, such Defaulted Interest shall be paid on the Special Interest Payment Date to the Persons in whose names the Securities (or their respective Predecessor Securities) are registered at the close of business on such Special Record Date and shall no longer be payable pursuant to the following clause (b).
(b) The Company may make payment of any Defaulted Interest in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Securities may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, if, after notice given by the Company to the Trustee of the proposed payment pursuant to this clause, such manner of payment shall be deemed practicable by the Trustee.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any such interest payment date (other than an interest payment date at maturity) would otherwise be a day that is not a Business Day, then the interest payment shall be postponed to the next succeeding Business Day (except if that Business Day falls in the next succeeding calendar month, then interest shall be paid on the immediately preceding Business Day). If the maturity date of the Securities is a day that is not a Business Day, all payments to be made on such day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day, with the same force and effect as if made on the maturity date. In either of such cases, no additional interest shall be payable as a result of such delay in payment.
Subject to the foregoing provisions of this Section, each Security delivered under this Indenture upon registration of transfer of or in exchange for or in lieu of any other Security shall carry the rights to interest accrued and unpaid, and to accrue, which were carried by such other Security.
SECTION 2.14. . Interest on the Securities shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months.
Computation of Interest
SECTION 2.15. . The Company in issuing the Securities may use "CUSIP" numbers (if then generally in use). The Trustee shall not be responsible for the use of CUSIP numbers, and the Trustee makes no representation as to their correctness as printed on any Security or notice to Holders. The Company shall promptly notify the Trustee in writing of any change in the CUSIP numbers.
CUSIP Numbers
SECTION 3.1. . The Company shall promptly pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Securities on the dates and in the manner provided in the Securities and in this Indenture. Principal, premium, if any, and interest shall be
Payment of Securities
 
considered paid on the date due if on such date the Trustee or the Paying Agent holds in accordance with this Indenture money sufficient to pay all principal, premium, if any, and interest then due and the Trustee or the Paying Agent, as the case may be, is not prohibited from paying such money to the Holders on that date pursuant to the terms of this Indenture.
The Company shall pay interest on overdue principal at the rate specified therefor in the Securities.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Indenture, the Company may, to the extent it is required to do so by law, deduct or withhold income or other similar taxes imposed by the United States of America from principal or interest payments hereunder.
SECTION 3.2. . Notwithstanding that the Company may not be subject to the reporting requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act, if not filed electronically with the SEC through EDGAR (or any successor system), the Company shall provide to the Trustee and the registered Holders of the Securities, within 15 days of the time periods specified in the relevant forms:
SEC Reports
(1) all quarterly and annual financial information that would be required to be contained in a filing with the SEC on Forms 10-Q and 10-K if the Company were required to file such Forms, including a "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" and, with respect to the annual information only, a report on the annual financial statements by the Company's independent registered public accounting firm; and
(2) all current reports that would be required to be filed with the SEC on Form 8-K if the Company were required to file such reports.
The requirement for the Company to provide information may be satisfied by posting such reports, documents and information on its website within the time periods specified by this ; , , that the Company shall (upon request) provide one copy of the exhibits of the foregoing to the Trustee and shall (upon request) provide additional copies of such exhibits to any Holder or prospective Holder.
Section 3.2
provided
however
If the Company has designated any of its Subsidiaries as Unrestricted Subsidiaries and such Unrestricted Subsidiaries, either individually or collectively, would otherwise have been a Significant Subsidiary, then the quarterly and annual financial information required by the preceding paragraph shall include a reasonably detailed presentation, either on the face of the financial statements or in the footnotes to the financial statements and in Management's Discussion and Analysis of Results of Operations and Financial Condition, of the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries.
In addition, the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors shall make available to the Holders and to prospective investors, upon the request of such Holders, the information
 
required to be delivered pursuant to Rule 144A(d)(4) under the Securities Act so long as the Securities are not freely transferable under the Securities Act. For purposes of this , the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors shall be deemed to have furnished the reports to the Trustee and the Holders of Securities as required by this if it has filed such reports with the SEC via the EDGAR filing system (or any successor system) and such reports are publicly available.
Section 3.2
Section 3.2
Delivery of such reports, information and documents to the Trustee is for informational purposes only and the Trustee's receipt of such shall not constitute constructive notice of any information contained therein or determinable from information contained therein, including the Company's compliance with any of its covenants hereunder (as to which the Trustee is entitled to rely exclusively on Officers' Certificates). The Trustee shall have no duty to search for or obtain any electronic or other filings that the Company makes with the SEC, regardless of whether such filings are periodic, supplemental or otherwise.
SECTION 3.3. . (a) The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to directly or indirectly, Incur any Indebtedness (including Acquired Indebtedness); , that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors may Incur Indebtedness (including Acquired Indebtedness) if on the date thereof and after giving effect thereto on a basis:
Limitation on Indebtedness
provided, however
pro forma
(i) the Consolidated Coverage Ratio for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries is at least 2.00 to 1.00; and
(ii) no Default or Event of Default shall be continuing or would occur as a consequence of Incurring the Indebtedness.
(b) The provisions of shall not apply to the Incurrence of the following Indebtedness:
Section 3.3(a)
(i) Indebtedness of the Company evidenced by the Initial Notes and of Subsidiary Guarantors evidenced by the Subsidiary Guarantees relating to the Initial Notes (and Refinancing Indebtedness in respect thereof);
(ii) (x)(A) Indebtedness Incurred pursuant to Debt Facilities and (B) the Incurrence by a Receivables Entity of Indebtedness in a Qualified Receivables Transaction that is nonrecourse to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (except for Standard Securitization Undertakings) in an aggregate principal amount for Indebtedness Incurred under clauses (A) and (B) not to exceed (together with any Indebtedness Incurred under ) the greater of (a) $925.0 million, less, to the extent a permanent repayment or commitment reduction is required thereunder as a result of such application, the aggregate principal amount of all principal repayments actually made under the ABL Facility since the Issue Date with Net Available Cash from Asset Dispositions utilized in accordance with and (b) the Borrowing Base and (y) Indebtedness pursuant to Debt Facilities to finance the extension by the Company
Section 3.3(b)(i)
Section 3.8(b)(iii)
 
and its Restricted Subsidiaries of financing to boat and engine dealers in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed the Floorplan Borrowing Base;
(iii) Guarantees by (x) the Company or Subsidiary Guarantors of Indebtedness permitted to be Incurred by the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor in accordance with the provisions of this Indenture, that in the event such Indebtedness that is being Guaranteed is a Subordinated Obligation or a Guarantor Subordinated Obligation, then the related Guarantee shall be subordinated in right of payment to the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantee, as the case may be, and (y) Non-Guarantor Subsidiaries of Indebtedness Incurred by Non-Guarantor Subsidiaries in accordance with the provisions of this Indenture;
provided
(iv) Indebtedness of the Company owing to and held by any Restricted Subsidiary (other than a Receivables Entity) or Indebtedness of a Restricted Subsidiary owing to and held by the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary (other than a Receivables Entity);
provided, however,
 
 
 
shall be deemed, in each case, to constitute an Incurrence of such Indebtedness by the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be.
(v) any Indebtedness (other than the Indebtedness described in clauses (i), (ii) (iii), (iv), (vii), (ix), (x), (xi), (xii) and (xv)) outstanding on the Issue Date, including, without limitation, Indebtedness of the Company evidenced by the 2013 Notes, and any Refinancing Indebtedness Incurred in respect of any Indebtedness described in this clause (v) or clause (vi) or Incurred pursuant to (a);
Section 3.3
(vi) Indebtedness of Persons Incurred and outstanding on the date on which such Person became a Restricted Subsidiary or was acquired by, or merged into, the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary (other than Indebtedness Incurred (x) to provide
 
all or any portion of the funds utilized to consummate the transaction or series of related transactions pursuant to which such Person became a Restricted Subsidiary or was otherwise acquired by the Company or (y) otherwise in connection with, or in contemplation of, such acquisition); , , that at the time such Person is acquired by the Company, either (A) the Company would have been able to Incur $1.00 of additional Indebtedness pursuant to after giving effect to the Incurrence of such Indebtedness pursuant to this clause (vi) or (B) the Consolidated Coverage Ratio for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries would have improved after giving effect to the Incurrence of such Indebtedness pursuant to this clause (vi); that, for purposes of this clause (B), the Consolidated Coverage Ratio is at least 1.5:1.0;
provided
however
Section 3.3(a)
provided
(vii) Indebtedness under Hedging Obligations; , that such Hedging Obligations are entered into for the purpose of fixing, hedging or swapping the underlying exposure of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business (and not for speculative purposes);
provided, however
(viii) (x) Indebtedness (including Capitalized Lease Obligations) of the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary Incurred to finance the purchase, lease, construction or improvement of any property, plant or equipment used or to be used in the business of the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary through the direct purchase of such property, plant or equipment including any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the purchase of such property, plant or equipment or secured by a Lien on such property, plant or equipment prior to the purchase thereof, or (y) Attributable Indebtedness in respect of a Sale/Leaseback Transaction, and any Indebtedness of a Restricted Subsidiary which serves to refund or refinance any Indebtedness Incurred pursuant to this clause (viii), in a principal amount not to exceed the greater of (A) $75.0 million and (B) 3.0% of Total Tangible Assets in the aggregate at any one time outstanding together with all other Indebtedness issued under this clause (viii);
(ix) Indebtedness Incurred by the Company or its Restricted Subsidiaries in respect of workers' compensation claims, health, disability or other employee benefits or property, casualty or liability insurance, self-insurance obligations, performance, bid surety, appeal and similar bonds and completion Guarantees (not for borrowed money) provided in the ordinary course of business;
(x) Indebtedness arising from agreements of the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary providing for indemnification, adjustment of purchase price or similar obligations, in each case, Incurred or assumed in connection with the disposition of any business or assets of the Company or any business, assets or Capital Stock of a Subsidiary, other than Guarantees of Indebtedness Incurred by any Person acquiring all or any portion of such business, assets or a Subsidiary for the purpose of financing such acquisition, that;
provided
(A) the maximum aggregate liability in respect of all such Indebtedness shall at no time exceed the gross proceeds including non-cash proceeds (the fair market
 
value of such non-cash proceeds being measured at the time received and without giving effect to subsequent changes in value) actually received by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries in connection with such disposition; and
(B) such Indebtedness is not reflected on the balance sheet of the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries (contingent obligations referred to in a footnote to financial statements and not otherwise reflected on the balance sheet shall not be deemed to be reflected on such balance sheet for purposes of this clause (x);
(xi) Indebtedness represented by earnout provisions, contingent payments in respect of purchase price or adjustment of purchase price or similar obligations in acquisition agreements; that this clause (xi) shall not extend to Indebtedness Incurred to finance an earnout or contingent payment;
provided
(xii) Indebtedness arising from the honoring by a bank or other financial institution of a check, draft or similar instrument, including, but not limited to, electronic transfers, wire transfers and commercial card payments drawn against insufficient funds in the ordinary course of business (except in the form of committed or uncommitted lines of credit); , , that such Indebtedness is extinguished within five Business Days of Incurrence;
provided
however
(xiii) Indebtedness Incurred by Foreign Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount, together with all other Indebtedness Incurred pursuant to this clause (xiii), not to exceed the greater of (x) $100.0 million and (y) 4.0% of Foreign Assets and any Guarantee by the Company thereof;
(xiv) Indebtedness Incurred by the Company in connection with insurance premium financing arrangements not to exceed $10.0 million at any one time outstanding;
(xv) Indebtedness arising out of customer deposits in the ordinary course of business;
(xvi) Indebtedness of the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary owing to and held by any entity, agency, instrumentality or political subdivision of the United States, any State of the United States, the District of Columbia or any territory thereof in connection with the construction or relocation of facilities or job creation incentives of such entity, agency, instrumentality or political subdivision (which Indebtedness may arise as a consequence of a Sale/Leaseback Transaction) not to exceed 3.5% of Total Tangible Assets as of July 4, 2009 at any one time outstanding; and
(xvii) in addition to the items referred to in clauses (i) through (xvi) above, Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries in an aggregate outstanding principal amount which, when taken together with the principal amount of all other
 
Indebtedness Incurred pursuant to this clause (xvii) and then outstanding, shall not exceed $15.0 million.
(c) In addition, the Company shall not permit any of its Unrestricted Subsidiaries to Incur any Indebtedness or issue any shares of Disqualified Stock, other than Non-Recourse Debt. If at any time an Unrestricted Subsidiary becomes a Restricted Subsidiary, any Indebtedness of such Subsidiary shall be deemed to be Incurred by a Restricted Subsidiary as of such date (and, if such Indebtedness is not permitted to be Incurred as of such date under this , the Company shall be in Default of this ).
Section 3.3
Section 3.3
(d) For purposes of determining compliance with, and the outstanding principal amount of any particular Indebtedness Incurred pursuant to and in compliance with, this :
Section 3.3
(i) in the event that Indebtedness meets the criteria of more than one of the types of Indebtedness described in , the Company, in its sole discretion, shall classify such item of Indebtedness (or any portion thereof) on the date of Incurrence and may later reclassify such item of Indebtedness (or any portion thereof) in any manner that complies with and only be required to include the amount and type of such Indebtedness in one of such clauses; that all Indebtedness outstanding on the Issue Date under the ABL Facility and the Mercury Facility shall each be deemed Incurred on the Issue Date under and not or and may not later be reclassified;
Section 3.3(b)
Section 3.3(b)
provided
Section 3.3(b)(ii)
Section 3.3(a)
Section 3.3(b)(v)
(ii) Guarantees of, or obligations in respect of letters of credit relating to, Indebtedness that is otherwise included in the determination of a particular amount of Indebtedness shall not be included;
(iii) if obligations in respect of letters of credit are Incurred pursuant to a Debt Facility and are being treated as Incurred pursuant to and the letters of credit relate to other Indebtedness, then such other Indebtedness shall not be included;
Section 3.3(b)(ii)
(iv) the principal amount of any Disqualified Stock of the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary, or Preferred Stock of a Restricted Subsidiary that is not a Subsidiary Guarantor, shall be equal to the greater of the maximum mandatory redemption or repurchase price (not including, in either case, any redemption or repurchase premium) or the liquidation preference thereof;
(v) Indebtedness permitted by this need not be permitted solely by reference to one provision permitting such Indebtedness but may be permitted in part by one such provision and in part by one or more other provisions of this permitting such Indebtedness;
Section 3.3
Section 3.3
 
(vi) the principal amount of any Indebtedness outstanding in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction is the Receivables Transaction Amount relating to such Qualified Receivables Transaction; and
(vii) the amount of Indebtedness issued at a price that is less than the principal amount thereof shall be equal to the amount of the liability in respect thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
Accrual of interest, accrual of dividends, the accretion of accreted value or the amortization of debt discount, the payment of interest in the form of additional Indebtedness and the payment of dividends in the form of additional shares of Preferred Stock or Disqualified Stock shall not be deemed to be an Incurrence of Indebtedness for purposes of this . The amount of any Indebtedness outstanding as of any date shall be (i) the accreted value thereof in the case of any Indebtedness issued with original issue discount or the aggregate principal amount outstanding in the case of Indebtedness issued with interest payable-in-kind and (ii) the principal amount or liquidation preference thereof, together with any interest thereon that is more than 30 days past due, in the case of any other Indebtedness.
Section 3.3
(e) For purposes of determining compliance with any U.S. dollar-denominated restriction on the Incurrence of Indebtedness, the U.S. dollar-equivalent principal amount of Indebtedness denominated in a foreign currency shall be calculated based on the relevant currency exchange rate in effect on the date such Indebtedness was Incurred, in the case of term Indebtedness, or first committed, in the case of revolving credit Indebtedness; that if such Indebtedness is Incurred to refinance other Indebtedness denominated in a foreign currency, and such refinancing would cause the applicable U.S. dollar-denominated restriction to be exceeded if calculated at the relevant currency exchange rate in effect on the date of such refinancing, such U.S. dollar-denominated restriction shall be deemed not to have been exceeded so long as the principal amount of such Refinancing Indebtedness does not exceed the principal amount of such Indebtedness being refinanced. Notwithstanding any other provision of this , the maximum amount of Indebtedness that the Company may Incur pursuant to this shall not be deemed to be exceeded solely as a result of fluctuations in the exchange rate of currencies. The principal amount of any Indebtedness Incurred to refinance other Indebtedness, if Incurred in a different currency from the Indebtedness being refinanced, shall be calculated based on the currency exchange rate applicable to the currencies in which such Refinancing Indebtedness is denominated that is in effect on the date of such refinancing.
provided
Section 3.3
Section 3.3
SECTION 3.4. . (a) The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, directly or indirectly, to:
Limitation on Restricted Payments
(i) declare or pay any dividend or make any distribution (whether made in cash, securities or other property) on or in respect of its Capital Stock (including any payment in connection with any merger or consolidation involving the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries) other than:
 
(A) dividends or distributions payable solely in Capital Stock of the Company (other than Disqualified Stock) or in options, warrants or other rights to purchase such Capital Stock of the Company; and
(B) dividends or distributions by a Restricted Subsidiary payable to the Company or another Restricted Subsidiary (and if such Restricted Subsidiary is not a Wholly-Owned Subsidiary, to its other holders of common Capital Stock on a pro rata basis);
(ii) purchase, redeem, retire or otherwise acquire for value any Capital Stock of the Company or any direct or indirect parent of the Company held by Persons other than the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary (other than in exchange for Capital Stock of the Company (other than Disqualified Stock));
(iii) make any principal payment on, or purchase, repurchase, redeem, defease or otherwise acquire or retire for value, prior to any scheduled maturity, scheduled repayment or scheduled sinking fund payment, any Subordinated Obligations or Guarantor Subordinated Obligations other than (A) Indebtedness of the Company owing to and held by any Subsidiary Guarantor or Indebtedness of a Subsidiary Guarantor owing to and held by the Company or any other Subsidiary Guarantor permitted under (b)(iv); (B) the purchase, repurchase, redemption, defeasance or other acquisition or retirement for value of Subordinated Obligations or Guarantor Subordinated Obligations purchased in anticipation of satisfying a sinking fund obligation, principal installment or final maturity, in each case due within one year of the date of purchase, repurchase, redemption, defeasance or other acquisition or retirement); (C) repayments from time to time of advances outstanding under revolving credit facilities, or (D) repayments following the occurrence of a default or event of default under an indenture or other agreement relating to Indebtedness; or
Section 3.3
(iv) make any Restricted Investment in any Person;
(all such payments and other actions referred to in clauses (i) through (iv) (other than any exception thereto) shall be referred to as a "Restricted Payment"), unless, at the time of and after giving effect to such Restricted Payment:
(1) no Default shall have occurred and be continuing (or would result therefrom);
(2) immediately after giving effect to such transaction on a basis, the Company is able to Incur $1.00 of additional Indebtedness under (a) hereof; or
pro forma
Section 3.3
(3) the aggregate amount of such Restricted Payment and all other Restricted Payments declared or made subsequent to the Issue Date (excluding Restricted Payments made pursuant to clauses (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (vii), (viii), (x), and (xi) of ) would not exceed the sum of, without duplication:
Section 3.4(b)
 
(A) 50% of Consolidated Net Income for the period (treated as one accounting period) from January 1, 2010 to the end of the most recent fiscal quarter ending prior to the date of such Restricted Payment for which financial statements are available (or, in case such Consolidated Net Income is a deficit, minus 100% of such deficit);
(B) 100% of the aggregate Net Cash Proceeds and the fair market value, as determined in Good Faith by the Company, of marketable securities or other property received by the Company from the issue or sale of its Capital Stock (other than Disqualified Stock) or other capital contributions subsequent to the Issue Date, other than:
(x) Net Cash Proceeds received from an issuance or sale of such Capital Stock to a Subsidiary of the Company or to an employee stock ownership plan, option plan or similar trust to the extent such sale to an employee stock ownership plan or similar trust is financed by loans from or Guaranteed by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary unless such loans have been repaid with cash on or prior to the date of determination); and;
(y) Net Cash Proceeds received by the Company from the issue and sale of its Capital Stock or capital contributions to the extent applied to redeem Securities in compliance with the provisions set forth under (b);
Section 5.1
(C) the amount by which Indebtedness of the Company or its Restricted Subsidiaries is reduced on the Company's consolidated balance sheet upon the conversion or exchange (other than Indebtedness held by a Subsidiary of the Company) subsequent to the Issue Date of any Indebtedness of the Company or its Restricted Subsidiaries convertible or exchangeable for Capital Stock (other than Disqualified Stock) of the Company (less the amount of any cash, or the fair market value of any other property, distributed by the Company upon such conversion or exchange);
(D) 100% of the Net Cash Proceeds and the fair market value of property other than cash and marketable securities (such fair market value to be determined in Good Faith by the Company) from the sale or other disposition (other than to the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor or to an employee stock ownership plan or trust established by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary) of Restricted Investments made after the Issue Date and redemptions and repurchases of such Restricted Investments from the Company or its Restricted Subsidiaries and repayment of Restricted Investments in the form of loans or advances from the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries and releases of Guarantees that constitute Restricted Investments by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries (other than in each case to the extent the Restricted Investment was made pursuant to );
Section 3.4(b)(xiv)
(E) 100% of the Net Cash Proceeds and the fair market value of property other than cash and marketable securities (such fair market value to be determined in Good Faith by the Company) received by the Company or Restricted Subsidiaries from the sale (other than to the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary) of the stock of an Unrestricted Subsidiary
 
(other than in each case to the extent the Investment in such Unrestricted Subsidiary was made by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary pursuant to or to the extent such Investment constituted a Permitted Investment); and
Section 3.4(b)(xiv)
(F) to the extent that any Unrestricted Subsidiary of the Company designated as such after the Issue Date is redesignated as a Restricted Subsidiary or any Unrestricted Subsidiary of the Company merges into or consolidates with the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, in each case after the Issue Date, the fair market value of such Subsidiary as of the date of such redesignation or such merger or consolidation, or in the case of the transfer, dividend or distribution of assets of an Unrestricted Subsidiary to the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary, the fair market value of such assets of the Unrestricted Subsidiary, as determined in Good Faith by the Company at the time of the redesignation of such Unrestricted Subsidiary as a Restricted Subsidiary or at the time of such merger, consolidation or transfer of assets (other than an Unrestricted Subsidiary to the extent the Investment in such Unrestricted Subsidiary was made by a Restricted Subsidiary pursuant to or to the extent such Investment constituted a Permitted Investment).
Section 3.4(b)(xiv)
(b) The provisions of hereof shall not prohibit
Section 3.4(a)
(i) any purchase, repurchase, redemption, defeasance or other acquisition or retirement of Capital Stock, Disqualified Stock, Subordinated Obligations of the Company or Guarantor Subordinated Obligations of any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Restricted Investment made by exchange for, or out of the proceeds of the substantially concurrent sale of, Capital Stock of the Company (other than Disqualified Stock and other than Capital Stock issued or sold to a Subsidiary or an employee stock ownership plan or similar trust to the extent such sale to an employee stock ownership plan or similar trust is financed by loans from or Guaranteed by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary unless such loans have been repaid with cash on or prior to the date of determination); , , that the Net Cash Proceeds from such sale of Capital Stock shall be excluded from clause (3)(B) of ;
provided
however
Section 3.4(a)
(ii) (A) any purchase, repurchase, redemption, defeasance or other acquisition or retirement of Subordinated Obligations or Guarantor Subordinated Obligations made by exchange for, or out of the proceeds of the substantially concurrent sale of, Subordinated Obligations of the Company or (B) any purchase, repurchase, redemption, defeasance or other acquisition or retirement of Guarantor Subordinated Obligations made by exchange for, or out of the proceeds of the substantially concurrent sale of, Guarantor Subordinated Obligations that, in each case, is permitted to be Incurred pursuant to and constitutes Refinancing Indebtedness;
Section 3.3
(iii) any purchase, repurchase, redemption, defeasance or other acquisition or retirement of Disqualified Stock of the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary made by exchange for or out of the proceeds of the substantially concurrent sale of Disqualified Stock of the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, that, so long
 
as such refinancing Disqualified Stock is permitted to be Incurred pursuant to and constitutes Refinancing Indebtedness;
Section 3.3
(iv) any purchase or redemption of Subordinated Obligations or Guarantor Subordinated Obligations from Net Available Cash to the extent permitted under ;
Section 3.8
(v) dividends paid within 60 days after the date of declaration if at such date of declaration such dividend would have complied with this provision;
(vi) the purchase, redemption or other acquisition, cancellation or retirement for value of Capital Stock, or options, warrants, equity appreciation rights or other rights to purchase or acquire Capital Stock, of the Company or any direct or indirect parent of the Company held by any existing or former employees, management or directors of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company or their assigns, estates or heirs, in each case in connection with the repurchase provisions under employee stock option or stock purchase agreements or other compensatory agreements approved by the Board of Directors; that such redemptions or repurchases pursuant to this clause shall not exceed $2.0 million in the aggregate during any calendar year, although such amount in any calendar year may be increased by an amount not to exceed:
provided
 
 
 
(vii) the declaration and payment of dividends to holders of any class or series of Disqualified Stock of the Company issued in accordance with the terms of this Indenture to the extent such dividends are included in the definition of "Consolidated Interest Expense";
 
(viii) repurchases of Capital Stock deemed to occur upon the exercise of stock options, warrants, other rights to purchase Capital Stock or other convertible securities if such Capital Stock represents a portion of the exercise price thereof;
(ix) the purchase, repurchase, redemption, defeasance or other acquisition or retirement for value of any Subordinated Obligation or Guarantor Subordinated Obligation (i) at a purchase price not greater than 101% of the principal amount of such Subordinated Obligation or Guarantor Subordinated Obligation in the event of a Change of Control in accordance with provisions similar to or (ii) at a purchase price not greater than 100% of the principal amount thereof in accordance with provisions similar to ; that, prior to or simultaneously with such purchase, repurchase, redemption, defeasance or other acquisition or retirement, the Company has made the Change of Control Offer or Asset Disposition Offer, as applicable, as provided in or with respect to the Securities and has completed the repurchase or redemption of all Securities validly tendered for payment in connection with such Change of Control Offer or Asset Disposition Offer;
Section 3.10
Section 3.8
provided
Section 3.8
Section 3.10
(x) the repurchase or redemption of the Company's preferred stock purchase rights, or any substitute therefor, in an aggregate amount not to exceed the product of (x) the number of outstanding shares of Common Stock of the Company and (y) $0.01 per share, as such amount may be adjusted in accordance with the rights agreement relating to the Common Stock of the Company;
(xi) the repurchase, redemption or other acquisition for value of Capital Stock of the Company or any direct or indirect parent of the Company representing fractional shares of such Capital Stock in connection with a merger, consolidation, amalgamation or other combination involving the Company or any direct or indirect parent of the Company;
(xii) the declaration and payment of dividends on the Company's common stock of up to $5.0 million per calendar year;
(xiii) Restricted Payments under hedge and warrant option transactions entered into in connection with a Permitted Convertible Notes Offering; and
(xiv) other Restricted Payments in an aggregate amount, which, when taken together with all other Restricted Payments made pursuant to this clause (xiv) (as reduced by the amount of capital returned from any such Restricted Payments that constituted Restricted Investments in the form of cash and Cash Equivalents (exclusive of amounts included in Section ) not to exceed $10.0 million;
3.4(a)(3)(A)
, , that at the time of and after giving effect to, any Restricted Payment permitted under clauses (iv), (vi), (vii), (xii) and (xiv), no Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would occur as a consequence thereof.
provided
however
 
(c) The amount of all Restricted Payments (other than cash) shall be the fair market value on the date of such Restricted Payment of the assets or securities proposed to be paid, transferred or issued by the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, pursuant to such Restricted Payment. The fair market value of any cash Restricted Payment shall be its face amount and any non-cash Restricted Payment shall be determined conclusively in Good Faith by the Company and any such determination shall be (x) delivered to the Trustee if such fair market value is estimated in Good Faith by the Company to exceed $10.0 million and (y) based upon an opinion or appraisal issued by an accounting, appraisal or investment banking firm of national standing if such fair market value is estimated in Good Faith by the Company to exceed $25.0 million.
(d) As of the Issue Date, all of the Company's Subsidiaries shall be Restricted Subsidiaries. The Company shall not permit any Unrestricted Subsidiary to become a Restricted Subsidiary except pursuant to the last sentence of the definition of "Unrestricted Subsidiary." For purposes of designating any Restricted Subsidiary as an Unrestricted Subsidiary, all outstanding Investments by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries (except to the extent repaid) in the Subsidiary so designated shall be deemed to be Restricted Payments in an amount determined as set forth in the definition of "Investment." Such designation shall be permitted only if a Restricted Payment in such amount would be permitted at such time and if such Subsidiary otherwise meets the definition of an Unrestricted Subsidiary. Unrestricted Subsidiaries shall not be subject to any of the restrictive covenants set forth in this Indenture.
(e) The Company shall not permit any "Unrestricted Subsidiary" to become a "Restricted Subsidiary" under the 1987 Indenture, with respect to any Indebtedness currently outstanding or issued after the Issue Date.
SECTION 3.5. .
Limitation on Liens
The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly, create, Incur or suffer to exist any Lien (other than Permitted Liens) that secures obligations under any Indebtedness on any asset or property of the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, including any Guarantee of such Restricted Subsidiary, or any income or profits therefrom, or assign or convey any right to receive income therefrom. In addition, if the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor, directly or indirectly, shall create, incur or suffer to exist any Lien securing ABL Obligations (other than Liens on the Capital Stock or Indebtedness of the 1987 Restricted Subsidiaries or on any asset that constitutes a "Principal Property" under the 1987 Indenture until such time as all notes issued under the 1987 Indenture have been repaid, discharged or defeased or the lien covenant thereunder is no longer in effect), the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor, as the case may be, must concurrently grant at least a second-priority Lien, subject to Permitted Liens, upon such property as security for the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees.
SECTION 3.6. . The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, enter into any Sale/Leaseback Transaction unless:
Limitation on Sale/Leaseback Transactions
 
(a) the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, receives consideration at the time of such Sale/Leaseback Transaction at least equal to the fair market value (as determined in Good Faith by the Company) of the property subject to such transaction;
(b) the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary could have Incurred Indebtedness in an amount equal to the Attributable Indebtedness in respect of such Sale/Leaseback Transaction pursuant to ;
Section 3.3
(c) the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary would be permitted to create a Lien on the property subject to such Sale/Leaseback Transaction under ; and
Section 3.5
(d) the Sale/Leaseback Transaction is treated as an Asset Disposition and all of the conditions of this Indenture described in (including the provisions concerning the application of Net Available Cash) are satisfied with respect to such Sale/Leaseback Transaction, treating all of the consideration received in such Sale/Leaseback Transaction as Net Available Cash for purposes of such covenant.
Section 3.8
SECTION 3.7.  (a) The Company shall not, and shall not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, create or otherwise cause or permit to exist or become effective any consensual encumbrance or consensual restriction on the ability of any Restricted Subsidiary to:
Limitation on Restrictions on Distributions from Restricted Subsidiaries
(i)(A) pay dividends or make any other distributions on its Capital Stock to the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, or with respect to any other interest or participation in, or measured by, its profits, or
(B) pay any Indebtedness or other obligations owed to the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary (it being understood that the priority of any Preferred Stock in receiving dividends, or liquidating distributions prior to dividends or liquidating distributions being paid on Common Stock shall not be deemed a restriction on the ability to make distributions on Capital Stock);
(ii) make any loans or advances to the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary (it being understood that the subordination of loans or advances made to the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary to other Indebtedness Incurred by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary shall not be deemed a restriction on the ability to make loans or advances); or
(iii) sell, lease or transfer any of its property or assets to the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary (it being understood that such transfers shall not include any type of transfer described in clause (i) or (ii) above).
(b) The restrictions in Section 3.7(a) shall not prohibit encumbrances or restrictions existing under or by reason of:
 
(i) any encumbrance or restriction pursuant to an agreement in effect at or entered into on the Issue Date, including, without limitation, the 1987 Indenture, this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents, the Intercreditor Agreement, the ABL Facility (and related documentation) and the Mercury Marine Facility (and related documentation) in effect on such date;
(ii) any encumbrance or restriction with respect to a Person pursuant to an agreement relating to any Capital Stock or Indebtedness Incurred by such Person on or before the date on which such Person became a Restricted Subsidiary or was acquired by, merged into or consolidated with the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary (other than Capital Stock or Indebtedness Incurred as consideration in, or to provide all or any portion of the funds or credit support utilized to consummate, the transaction or series of related transactions pursuant to which such Person became a Restricted Subsidiary or was acquired by, merged into or consolidated with the Company or in contemplation of the transaction) and outstanding on such date, , that any such encumbrance or restriction shall not extend to any Person or the assets or property of the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary other than the Person and its Subsidiaries or the assets and property so acquired and that, in the case of Indebtedness, was permitted to be Incurred pursuant to this Indenture;
provided
(iii) any encumbrance or restriction pursuant to an agreement effecting a refunding, replacement or refinancing of Indebtedness Incurred pursuant to an agreement referred to in the preceding clauses (i) or (ii) or this clause (iii) or contained in any amendment, restatement, modification, renewal, supplement, refunding replacement or refinancing of an agreement referred to in the preceding clauses (i) or (ii) or this clause (iii); , that the encumbrances and restrictions with respect to such Restricted Subsidiary contained in any such agreement are no less favorable (as determined in Good Faith by the Company) in any material respect, taken as a whole, to the Holders of the Securities than the encumbrances and restrictions contained in such agreements referred to in clauses (i) or (ii) of this on the Issue Date or the date such Restricted Subsidiary became a Restricted Subsidiary or was merged into a Restricted Subsidiary, whichever is applicable;
provided, however
Section 3.7(b)
(iv) in the case of , Liens permitted to be Incurred under the provisions of that limit the right of the debtor to dispose of the assets securing such Indebtedness;
Section 3.7(a)(iii)
Section 3.5
(v) (a) purchase money obligations for property acquired in the ordinary course of business and (b) Capitalized Lease Obligations permitted under this Indenture, in each case, that impose encumbrances or restrictions of the nature described in on the property so acquired;
Section 3.7(a)(iii)
(vi) any Purchase Money Note or other Indebtedness or contractual requirements Incurred with respect to a Qualified Receivables Transaction relating
 
exclusively to a Receivables Entity that, as determined in Good Faith by the Company, are appropriate to effect such Qualified Receivables Transaction;
(vii) contracts for the sale of assets, including customary restrictions with respect to a Subsidiary of the Company pursuant to an agreement that has been entered into for the sale of all or a portion of the Capital Stock or assets of such Subsidiary;
(viii) restrictions on cash or other deposits or net worth imposed by customers under contracts entered into in the ordinary course of business;
(ix) any customary provisions in joint venture agreements relating to joint ventures and other similar agreements entered into in the ordinary course of business, that if such joint venture is a Restricted Subsidiary, such provisions shall not materially affect the Company's ability to make anticipated principal or interest payments on the Securities (as determined in Good Faith by the Company);
provided
(x) any customary provisions in leases, subleases or licenses and other agreements entered into by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business;
(xi) encumbrances or restrictions arising or existing by reason of applicable law or any applicable rule, regulation or order;
(xiii) encumbrances or restrictions contained in indentures or debt instruments or other debt arrangements Incurred or Preferred Stock issued by Subsidiary Guarantors in accordance with that are not more restrictive, taken as a whole, than those applicable to the Company in either this Indenture or the ABL Facility on the Issue Date (which results in encumbrances or restrictions comparable to those applicable to the Company at a Restricted Subsidiary level); and
Section 3.3
(xiv) encumbrances or restrictions contained in indentures or other debt instruments or debt arrangements Incurred or Preferred Stock issued by Restricted Subsidiaries that are not Subsidiary Guarantors subsequent to the Issue Date pursuant to clauses (ii), (vi), (xiii) and (xiv) of (b) by Restricted Subsidiaries, that such encumbrances and restrictions contained in any agreement or instrument shall not materially affect the Company's ability to make anticipated principal or interest payments on the Securities (as determined in Good Faith by the Company).
Section 3.3
provided
SECTION 3.8. . (a) The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, make any Asset Disposition of First-Priority Collateral :
Limitation on Sales of Assets and Subsidiary Stock
unless
(i) the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, receives consideration at least equal to the fair market value (such fair market value to be determined as of the date of contractually agreeing to such Asset Disposition), as
 
determined in Good Faith by the Company, (including as to the value of all non-cash consideration), of the First-Priority Collateral subject to such Asset Disposition;
(ii) at least 75% of the consideration from such Asset Disposition received by the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, is in the form of cash or Cash Equivalents and is deposited directly into the Collateral Accounts; and
(iii) the remaining consideration from such Asset Disposition that is not in the form of cash or Cash Equivalents is thereupon with its acquisition pledged as First-Priority Collateral to secure the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees.
Any Net Available Cash deposited into the Collateral Account from any Asset Dispositions of First-Priority Collateral or Recovery Events (as described below) may be withdrawn by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary to be invested by the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary in First-Priority Collateral within 360 days of the date of such Asset Disposition or Recovery Event, which First-Priority Collateral is thereupon with its acquisition added to the First-Priority Collateral securing the Securities.
All of the Net Available Cash received by the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, from any Recovery Event shall be deposited directly into the Collateral Account and may be withdrawn by the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary to be invested in First-Priority Collateral (which may include performance of a restoration of the affected Collateral) in accordance with the preceding paragraph within 360 days of the date of such Recovery Event.
Any Net Available Cash from Asset Dispositions of First-Priority Collateral or Recovery Events that are not applied or invested as provided in this subsection (a) shall be deemed to constitute "." When the aggregate amount of Excess Collateral Proceeds exceeds $10.0 million, the Company shall be required to make an offer ("") to all Holders to purchase the maximum principal amount of the Securities (on a pro rata basis) and, if required by the terms of any other Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness, to holders of such Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness, to which the Collateral Disposition Offer applies that may be purchased out of the Excess Collateral Proceeds, at an offer price in cash in an amount equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Securities and such other Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the date of purchase, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Indenture in denominations of $2,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. To the extent that the aggregate amount of Securities so validly tendered and not properly withdrawn pursuant to a Collateral Disposition Offer is less than the Excess Collateral Proceeds, the Company may use any remaining Excess Collateral Proceeds for general corporate purposes, subject to the other covenants contained in this Indenture. If the aggregate principal amount of Securities surrendered by Holders exceeds the amount of Excess Collateral Proceeds, the Securities to be purchased shall be selected on a pro rata basis on the basis of the aggregate principal amount of tendered Securities. Upon completion of such Collateral Disposition Offer, the amount of Excess Collateral Proceeds shall be reset at zero.
Excess Collateral Proceeds
Collateral Disposition Offer
 
(b) The Company shall not, and shall not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, make any Asset Disposition (other than Asset Dispositions of First-Priority Collateral which shall be treated in the manner set forth in ):
Section 3.8(a)
unless
(i) the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, receives consideration (including by way of relief from, or by way of any other Person assuming sole responsibility for, any liabilities, contingent or otherwise) at least equal to the fair market value (such fair market value to be determined as of the date of contractually agreeing to such Asset Disposition) (as determined in Good Faith by the Company (including as to the value of all non-cash consideration)) of the shares and assets subject to such Asset Disposition;
(ii) at least 75% of the consideration from such Asset Disposition received by the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, is in the form of cash or Cash Equivalents; and
(iii) an amount equal to 100% of the Net Available Cash from such Asset Disposition is applied by the Company (or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be) as follows (it being understood that actions under clause (B) may occur prior to actions under clause (A)):
(A) to the extent the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary elects (or is required by the terms of any Indebtedness), to prepay, repay or purchase Indebtedness (other than Disqualified Stock, Subordinated Obligations and Guarantor Subordinated Obligation) within 365 days after the date of such Asset Disposition;
(B) to the extent the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary elects, to reinvest in Additional Assets (including by means of an Investment in Additional Assets by a Restricted Subsidiary with Net Available Cash received by the Company or another Restricted Subsidiary) (in each case other than Indebtedness owed to the Company or an Affiliate of the Company) within 365 days from the date of such Asset Disposition;
(C) to the extent of the balance of such Net Available Cash after application in accordance with clauses (A) and (B), to make an offer to purchase Securities and Pari Passu Indebtedness with similar asset sale provisions, pro rata at 100% of the tendered principal amount thereof (or 100% of the accreted value of such other Pari Passu Indebtedness so tendered, if such Pari Passu Indebtedness was offered at a discount) plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon to the purchase date; and
(D) to the extent of the balance of such Net Available Cash after application in accordance with clauses (A), (B) and (C) above, to fund (to the extent consistent with any other applicable provision of this Indenture) any
 
corporate purpose; , that in connection with any prepayment, repayment or purchase of Indebtedness pursuant to clause (A) or (C) above, the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary shall retire such Indebtedness and shall cause the related loan commitment (if any) to be permanently reduced in an amount equal to the principal amount so prepaid, repaid or purchased.
provided, however
In the case of the second paragraph of or above, a binding commitment shall be treated as a permitted application of the Net Available Cash from the date of such commitment; that (A) such Net Available Cash is applied to acquire Additional Assets within 540 days of the Asset Disposition and (B) in the event such binding commitment is later canceled or terminated for any reason before such Net Available Cash is so applied, the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary may satisfy its obligations as to any Net Available Cash by entering into another binding commitment within 90 days of such cancellation or termination of the prior binding commitment or termination of the prior binding commitment and applying the Net Available Cash within 180 days of such subsequent binding commitment; that the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary may only enter into such a commitment under the foregoing provision one time with respect to each Asset Disposition.
Section 3.8(a)
Section 3.8(b)(iii)(B)
provided
provided further
In the event of an Asset Disposition that requires the purchase of Securities pursuant to above, the Company shall be required to apply such Excess Proceeds (as defined below) to the repayment of the Securities and any other Pari Passu Indebtedness outstanding with similar provisions requiring the Company to make an offer to purchase such Indebtedness with the proceeds from any Asset Disposition as follows: (A) the Company shall make an offer to purchase (an "") within ten Business Days of such time from all Holders in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Indenture in the maximum principal amount (expressed in denominations of $2,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof) of Securities that may be purchased out of an amount (the "") equal to the product of such Excess Proceeds multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the outstanding principal amount of the Securities and the denominator of which is the sum of the outstanding principal amount of the Securities and such Pari Passu Indebtedness and (B) to the extent required by such Pari Passu Indebtedness to permanently reduce the principal amount of such Pari Passu Indebtedness, the Company shall make an offer to purchase or otherwise repurchase or redeem such Pari Passu Indebtedness (a "") in an amount equal to the excess of the Excess Proceeds over the Note Amount at a purchase price of 100% of their principal amount plus accrued and unpaid interest (or 100% of the accreted value of such Pari Passu Indebtedness, if such Pari Passu Indebtedness was offered at a discount) to the purchase date in accordance with the procedures (including prorating in the event of oversubscription) set forth in this Indenture with respect to the Asset Disposition Offer and in the documentation governing such Pari Passu Indebtedness with respect to the Pari Passu Offer. If the aggregate purchase price of the Securities and Pari Passu Indebtedness tendered pursuant to the Asset Disposition Offer and Pari Passu Offer is less than the Excess Proceeds, the remaining Excess Proceeds shall be available to the Company for use in accordance with clause (b)(iii)(D) above. The Company shall only be required to make an Asset Disposition Offer for Securities pursuant to if the Net Available Cash available therefor (after application of the proceeds as provided
Section 3.8(b)(iii)(C)
Asset Disposition Offer
Note Amount
Pari Passu Offer
Section 3.8(b)
 
in clauses (b)(iii)(A) and (b)(iii)(B) above) ("") exceeds $10.0 million (any lesser amounts shall be carried forward for purposes of determining whether an Asset Disposition Offer is required with respect to the Net Available Cash from any subsequent Asset Disposition). Upon completion of any such Offer, the amount of Excess Proceeds shall be reset at zero.
Excess Proceeds
(c) The Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer shall remain open for a period of 20 Business Days following its commencement, except to the extent that a longer period is required by applicable law (the ""). No later than five Business Days after the termination of the Disposition Offer Period (the ""), the Company shall purchase the principal amount of Securities (and other Indebtedness required to be purchased pursuant to the last paragraph of ) and Pari Passu Indebtedness required to be purchased pursuant to this (the "") or, if less than the Disposition Offer Amount has been so validly tendered, all Securities (and other Indebtedness required to be purchased pursuant to the last paragraph of ) and Pari Passu Indebtedness, if applicable, validly tendered in response to the Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer, as applicable.
Disposition Offer Period
Disposition Purchase Date
Section 3.8(a)
Section 3.8
Disposition Offer Amount
Section 3.8(a)
Upon the commencement of a Collateral Disposition Offer or an Asset Disposition Offer, as applicable, the Company shall send, by first class mail, a notice to the Trustee and each of the Holders of the Securities. The notice shall contain all instructions and materials necessary to enable such Holders to tender Securities pursuant to the Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer, as applicable. The notice, which shall govern the terms of the Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer, as applicable, shall state:
(i) that the Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer is being made pursuant to this and the length of time the Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer shall remain open;
Section 3.8
(ii) the Disposition Offer Amount, the purchase price and the Disposition Purchase Date;
(iii) that any Security not tendered or accepted for payment shall continue to accrue interest;
(iv) that, unless the Company defaults in making such payment, any Security accepted for payment pursuant to the Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer shall cease to accrue interest after the Disposition Purchase Date;
(v) that Holders electing to have a Security purchased pursuant to a Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer, as applicable, may elect to have Securities purchased in denominations of $2,000 or integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof only;
 
(vi) that Holders electing to have a Security purchased pursuant to any Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer, as applicable, shall be required to surrender the Security, with the form entitled "Option of Holder to Elect Purchase" attached to the Security completed, or transfer its interest in such Security by book-entry transfer, to the Company or a Paying Agent at the address specified in the notice at least three Business Days before the Disposition Purchase Date;
(vii) that Holders shall be entitled to withdraw their election if the Company or the Paying Agent, as the case may be, receives, not later than the expiration of the Disposition Offer Period, facsimile transmission or letter setting forth the name of the Holder, the principal amount of the Security the Holder delivered for purchase and a statement that such Holder is withdrawing his election to have such Security purchased;
(viii) that, if the aggregate principal amount of Securities and, if applicable, other Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness (in the case of a Collateral Disposition Offer) or Pari Passu Indebtedness (in the case of an Asset Disposition Offer) surrendered by the holders thereof exceeds the Disposition Offer Amount, the Company shall select the Securities and, if applicable, other Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness and Pari Passu Indebtedness, as the case may be, to be purchased on a pro rata basis based on the principal amount of Securities and such other Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness and Pari Passu Indebtedness, as the case may be, surrendered (with such adjustments as may be deemed appropriate so that only Securities in denominations of $2,000, or integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof, shall be purchased); and
(ix) that Holders whose Securities were purchased only in part shall be issued new Securities equal in principal amount to the unpurchased portion of the Securities surrendered (or transferred by book-entry transfer) but no less than an aggregate principal amount of $2,000.
If the Disposition Purchase Date is on or after an interest record date and on or before the related interest payment date, any accrued and unpaid interest shall be paid on such Disposition Purchase Date to the Person in whose name a Security is registered at the close of business on such record date, and no additional interest shall be payable to Holders who tender Securities pursuant to the Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer.
On or before the Disposition Purchase Date, the Company shall, to the extent lawful, accept for payment, on a pro rata basis to the extent necessary, the Disposition Offer Amount of Securities (and other Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness required to be purchased pursuant to the last paragraph of ) and Pari Passu Indebtedness or portions of Securities (and other Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness required to be purchased pursuant to the last paragraph of ) and Pari Passu Indebtedness so validly tendered and not properly withdrawn pursuant to the Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer, or if less than the Disposition Offer Amount has been validly tendered and not properly withdrawn, all Securities (and other Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness required to be purchased pursuant to the last paragraph of ) and Pari Passu Indebtedness so validly tendered and not properly withdrawn, in each case
Section 3.8(a)
Section 3.8(a)
Section 3.8(a)
 
in denominations of $2,000 or integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. The Company or the Paying Agent, as the case may be, shall promptly (but in any case not later than five Business Days after termination of the Disposition Offer Period) mail or deliver to each tendering Holder of Securities or holder or lender of such other Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness or Pari Passu Indebtedness, as the case may be, an amount equal to the purchase price of the Securities, such other Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness or Pari Passu Indebtedness so validly tendered and not properly withdrawn by such holder or lender, as the case may be, and accepted by the Company for purchase, and the Company shall promptly issue a new Security, and the Trustee, upon delivery of an Officers' Certificate from the Company, shall authenticate and mail or deliver such new Security to such Holder, in a principal amount equal to any unpurchased portion of the Security surrendered; that each such new Security shall be in a principal amount of $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof. Any Security not so accepted shall be promptly mailed or delivered by the Company to the Holder thereof. The Company shall publicly announce the results of the Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer, as the case may be, on the Disposition Purchase Date.
provided
(d) For the purposes of this , the following are deemed to be cash: (x) the assumption of Indebtedness of the Company (other than Disqualified Stock, Subordinated Obligations, Junior Lien Collateral Indebtedness or Senior Unsecured Pari Passu Indebtedness) or Indebtedness of any Restricted Subsidiary (other than Guarantor Subordinated Obligation, Disqualified Stock, Junior Lien Collateral Indebtedness or Senior Unsecured Pari Passu Indebtedness of any Subsidiary Guarantor) and the release of the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary from all liability on such Indebtedness in connection with such Asset Disposition, (y) securities, notes or similar obligations received by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary from the transferee that are converted within 90 days by the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary into cash and (z) any Designated Non-Cash Consideration received by the Company or any of the Restricted Subsidiaries in such Asset Disposition having an aggregate fair market value (as determined in Good Faith by the Company), taken together with all other Designated Non-Cash Consideration pursuant to this clause (z) that is at that time outstanding, not to exceed 2.5% of Total Tangible Assets at the time of the receipt of such Designated Non-Cash Consideration (with the fair market value of each item of Designated Non-cash Consideration being measured at the time received and without giving effect to subsequent changes in value). Upon the completion of the application of the Net Available Cash from any Asset Disposition pursuant to paragraph (b) above, the amount of Net Available Cash attributable to such Asset Disposition shall be deemed to be zero.
Section 3.8
(e) The Company shall comply, to the extent applicable, with the requirements of Section 14(e) of the Exchange Act and any other securities laws or regulations in connection with the repurchase of Securities pursuant to this . To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with provisions of this , the Company shall comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and shall not be deemed to have breached obligations of the Company described under this Indenture by virtue thereof.
Section 3.8
Section 3.8
 
(f) The Company shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to transfer any First-Priority Collateral to Brunswick Family Boat Company, Inc., Brunswick Bowling and Billiards Corporation and Sea Ray Boats, Inc.
(g) If the ABL Facility is terminated without a replacement thereof and the ABL Collateral is released as a consequence of such termination, then Asset Dispositions of Collateral that was previously classified as Second-Priority Collateral (and constituting First-Priority Collateral after such release) shall continue to be treated in the manner set forth in .
Section 3.8(b)
SECTION 3.9. . (a) The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly, enter into or conduct any transaction (including the purchase, sale, lease or exchange of any property or the rendering of any service) with any Affiliate of the Company (an "") unless:
Limitation on Affiliate Transactions
Affiliate Transaction
(i) the terms of such Affiliate Transaction are not materially less favorable to the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, than those that could be obtained in a comparable transaction at the time of such transaction in arm's-length dealings with a Person who is not such an Affiliate;
(ii) in the event such Affiliate Transaction involves an aggregate consideration in excess of $10.0 million, the terms of such transaction have been approved by a majority of the members of the Board of Directors of the Company and by a majority of the members of such Board of Directors having no personal stake in such transaction, if any (and such majority or majorities, as the case may be, determines that such Affiliate Transaction satisfies the criteria in clause (i) above); and
(iii) in the event such Affiliate Transaction involves an aggregate consideration in excess of $20.0 million, the Company has received a written opinion from an Independent Financial Advisor that such Affiliate Transaction is fair, from a financial point of view, to the Company and the Restricted Subsidiaries or not materially less favorable than those that might reasonably have been obtained in a comparable transaction at such time on an arm's-length basis from a Person that is not an Affiliate.
(b) The provisions of shall not apply to:
Section 3.9(a)
(i) any Restricted Payment permitted to be made pursuant to ;
Section 3.4
(ii) any issuance of securities, or other payments, awards or grants in cash, securities or otherwise pursuant to, or the funding of, employment agreements and other compensation arrangements, options to purchase Capital Stock of the Company pursuant to restricted stock plans, long-term incentive plans, stock appreciation rights plans, participation plans or similar employee benefits plans, pension plans or similar plans approved by the Board of Directors of the Company;
 
(iii) loans or advances to employees, officers or directors of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary of the Company in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices, in an aggregate amount outstanding at any time not in excess of $10.0 million (without giving effect to the forgiveness of any such loan);
(iv) any transaction between or among the Company and any Restricted Subsidiary (other than a Receivables Entity) or between or among Restricted Subsidiaries (other than a Receivables Entity or Receivables Entities) and any Guarantees issued by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary for the benefit of the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary, as the case may be, in accordance with ;
Section 3.3
(v) the payment of reasonable and customary fees and compensation to, and employee benefit arrangements, including, without limitation, split-dollar insurance policies, and indemnity provided on behalf of, directors, officers and employees of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary;
(vi) the existence of, and the performance of obligations of the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries under the terms of any agreement to which the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries is a party as of or on the Issue Date, as these agreements may be amended, modified, supplemented, extended or renewed from time to time; , , that any future amendment, modification, supplement, extension or renewal entered into after the Issue Date shall be permitted to the extent that its terms are not more disadvantageous to the Holders of the Securities in any material respect, as determined in Good Faith by the Company, than the terms of the agreements in effect on the Issue Date;
provided
however
(vii) any agreement between any Person and an Affiliate of such Person existing at the time such Person is acquired by or merged into the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary; , that such agreement was not entered into in contemplation of such acquisition or merger, or any amendment thereto (so long as any such amendment is not disadvantageous in any material respect to the Holders, as determined in Good Faith by the Company, when taken as a whole as compared to the applicable agreement as in effect on the date of such acquisition or merger);
provided
(viii) transactions with customers, clients, suppliers, joint venture partners or purchasers or sellers of goods or services, in each case in the ordinary course of the business of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries; that as determined in Good Faith by the Company, such transactions are on terms that are not materially less favorable to the Company or the relevant Restricted Subsidiary than those that would have been obtained in a comparable transaction by the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary with an unrelated Person;
provided
(ix) any issuance or sale of Capital Stock (other than Disqualified Stock) to Affiliates of the Company and the granting of registration and other customary rights in connection therewith;
 
(x) cash equity contributions by the Company and/or any Subsidiary to the BAC Joint Venture pursuant to clause (14) of the definition of "Permitted Investments" and other transactions in the ordinary course of conduct with the BAC Joint Venture; and
(xi) sales or other transfers or dispositions of accounts receivable and other related assets customarily transferred in an asset securitization transaction involving accounts receivable to a Receivables Entity in a Qualified Receivables Transaction, and acquisitions of Permitted Investments in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction.
SECTION 3.10. . (a) If a Change of Control occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem all of the Securities as described under , each Holder shall have the right to require the Company to repurchase all or any part (equal to $2,000 or a larger integral multiples of $1,000) of such Holder's Securities at a purchase price in cash equal to 101% of the principal amount of the Securities plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date of purchase (subject to the right of Holders of record on the relevant Record Date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date).
Change of Control
Section 5.1
(b) Within 30 days following any Change of Control, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem all of the Securities as described under , the Company shall mail a notice (the "") to each Holder at the address appearing in the security register, with a copy to the Trustee, stating:
Section 5.1
Change of Control Offer
(i) that a Change of Control has occurred and, as a consequence, a Change of Control Offer is being made and such Holder has the right to require the Company to purchase such Holder's Securities at a purchase price in cash equal to 101% of the principal amount of such Securities plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date of purchase (subject to the right of Holders of record on a record date to receive interest on the relevant interest payment date) (the "");
Change of Control Payment
(ii) the repurchase date (which shall be no earlier than 30 days nor later than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed) (the ""); and
Change of Control Payment Date
(iii) the procedures determined by the Company, consistent with this Indenture, that a Holder must follow in order to have its Securities repurchased.
(c) On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company shall, to the extent lawful:
(i) accept for payment all Securities or portions of Securities (equal to $2,000 or larger integral multiples of $1,000) properly tendered pursuant to the Change of Control Offer;
 
(ii) deposit with the Paying Agent an amount equal to the Change of Control Payment in respect of all Securities or portions of Securities so tendered; and
(iii) deliver or cause to be delivered to the Trustee the Securities so accepted, together with an Officers' Certificate stating the aggregate principal amount of Securities or portions of Securities being purchased by the Company.
(d) The Paying Agent shall promptly mail to each Holder of Securities so tendered the Change of Control Payment for such Securities, and the Trustee shall promptly authenticate and mail (or cause to be transferred by book entry) to each Holder a new Security equal in principal amount to any unpurchased portion of the Securities surrendered, if any; that each such new Security shall be in a principal amount of $2,000 or larger integral multiples of $1,000.
provided
(e) If the Change of Control Payment Date is on or after an interest Record Date and on or before the related Interest Payment Date, any accrued and unpaid interest, if any, will be paid to the Person in whose name a Security is registered at the close of business on such Record Date, and no additional interest shall be payable to Holders who tender pursuant to the Change of Control Offer.
(f) The Company will publicly announce the results of the Change of Control Offer on or as soon as practicable after the Change of Control Payment Date.
(g) The Company will not be required to make a Change of Control Offer upon a Change of Control if (i) a third party makes the Change of Control Offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements set forth in this Indenture applicable to a Change of Control Offer made by the Company and purchases all Securities validly tendered and not withdrawn under such Change of Control Offer or (ii) a notice of redemption has been given pursuant to of this Indenture, unless and until there has been a default in the payment of the applicable redemption price. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, a Change of Control Offer may be made in advance of a Change of Control, conditional upon such Change of Control, if a definitive agreement is in place for the Change of Control at the time of making the Change of Control Offer.
Article V
(h) The Company shall comply, to the extent applicable, with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws or regulations thereunder in connection with the repurchase of Securities pursuant to this . To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with provisions of this , the Company shall comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and shall not be deemed to have breached its obligations under this Indenture by virtue thereof.
Section 3.10
Section 3.10
SECTION 3.11. .
Future Subsidiary Guarantors
 
(a) The Company shall cause each Restricted Subsidiary that Guarantees, on the Issue Date or any time thereafter, any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor to execute and deliver to the Trustee a Subsidiary Guarantee (which, with respect to Subsidiary Guarantees delivered in the future, will be) in the form of a supplemental indenture substantially in the form of hereto, pursuant to which such Restricted Subsidiary shall unconditionally Guarantee, on a joint and several basis, the full and prompt payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest in respect of the Securities on a senior secured basis and all other obligations under this Indenture. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event (i) a Subsidiary Guarantor is released and discharged in full from all of its obligations under its Guarantees of (1) the ABL Facility and (2) all other Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries, and (ii) such Subsidiary Guarantor has not Incurred any Indebtedness in reliance on its status as a Subsidiary Guarantor under or such Subsidiary Guarantor's obligations under such Indebtedness are satisfied in full and discharged or are otherwise permitted to be Incurred by a Restricted Subsidiary (other than a Subsidiary Guarantor) under (b) then the Subsidiary Guarantee of such Subsidiary Guarantor shall be automatically and unconditionally released and discharged.
Exhibit B
Section 3.3
Section 3.3
(b) The obligations of each Subsidiary Guarantor shall be limited to the maximum amount as shall, after giving effect to all other contingent and fixed liabilities of such Subsidiary Guarantor (including, without limitation, any Guarantees under the ABL Facility) and after giving effect to any collections from or payments made by or on behalf of any other Subsidiary Guarantor in respect of the obligations of such other Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee or pursuant to its contribution obligations under this Indenture, result in the obligations of such Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee not constituting a fraudulent conveyance or fraudulent transfer under federal or state law.
(c) Each Subsidiary Guarantee shall only be released in accordance with .
Article X
(d) Each Restricted Subsidiary that becomes a Subsidiary Guarantor on or after the Issue Date shall also become a party to the applicable Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement and shall as promptly as practicable execute and deliver such security instruments, financing statements, mortgages, deeds of trust (in substantially the same form as those executed and delivered with respect to the First-Priority Collateral and the Second-Priority Collateral) and certificates and opinions of counsel (to the extent, and substantially in the form, delivered on the Issue Date (but in no greater scope)) as may be necessary to vest in the Collateral Agent a perfected first or second priority security interest, as the case may be, (subject to Permitted Liens) in properties and assets that constitute Collateral as security for the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees and as may be necessary to have such property or asset added to the applicable Collateral as required under the Collateral Documents and this Indenture, and thereupon all provisions of this Indenture relating to the Collateral shall be deemed to relate to such properties and assets to the same extent and with the same force and effect that if granting such first or second priority security interest, as the case may be, in any such property or asset requires the consent of a third party, the Company
; provided, however,
 
shall use commercially reasonable efforts to obtain such consent that if after the use of commercially reasonable efforts, such third party does not consent, to the first or second priority security interest on an asset or property that would constitute an immaterial portion of the Collateral, the Subsidiary Guarantor shall not be required to provide such security interest.
; provided, further, however,
SECTION 3.12. . The Company shall not, and shall not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, engage in any business other than a Related Business.
Limitation on Lines of Business
SECTION 3.13. . If after the Issue Date (i) the Securities have an Investment Grade Rating from both of the Ratings Agencies and (ii) no Default has occurred and is continuing under this Indenture then, beginning on that day and continuing at all times thereafter until the Reinstatement Date (as defined below), the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries shall not be subject to , , , , , and (collectively, the "").
Effectiveness of Covenants
Sections 3.3
3.4
3.7
3.8(b)
3.9
3.11
4.1(a)(iv)
Suspended Covenants
(b) If at any time the Securities' credit rating is downgraded from an Investment Grade Rating by one or both Rating Agencies or if a Default or Event of Default occurs and is continuing, then the Suspended Covenants shall thereafter be reinstated as if such covenants had never been suspended (the "") and be applicable pursuant to the terms of this Indenture (including in connection with performing any calculation or assessment to determine compliance with the terms of this Indenture), unless and until the Securities subsequently attain an Investment Grade Rating and no Default or Event of Default is in existence (in which event the Suspended Covenants shall no longer be in effect for such time that the Securities maintain an Investment Grade Rating and no Default or Event of Default is in existence); , , that no Default, Event of Default or breach of any kind shall be deemed to exist or have occurred under this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees with respect to the Suspended Covenants based on, and none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries shall bear any liability for, any actions taken or events occurring during the Suspension Period (as defined below), or any actions taken at any time pursuant to any contractual obligation arising prior to the Reinstatement Date, regardless of whether such actions or events would have been permitted if the applicable Suspended Covenants remained in effect during such period. The period of time between the date of suspension of the covenants and the Reinstatement Date is referred to herein as the "."
Reinstatement Date
provided
however
Suspension Period
(c) On the Reinstatement Date, all Indebtedness Incurred during the Suspension Period shall be classified to have been Incurred pursuant to or one of the clauses set forth in (to the extent such Indebtedness would be permitted to be Incurred thereunder as of the Reinstatement Date and after giving effect to Indebtedness Incurred prior to the Suspension Period and outstanding on the Reinstatement Date). To the extent such Indebtedness would not be so permitted to be Incurred pursuant to or , such Indebtedness shall be deemed to have been outstanding on the Issue Date, so that it is classified as permitted under Section 3.3(b)(v). Calculations made after the
Section 3.3(a)
Section 3.3(b)
Section 3.3(a)
(b)
 
Reinstatement Date of the amount available to be made as Restricted Payments under shall be made as though had been in effect since the Issue Date and throughout the Suspension Period. Accordingly, Restricted Payments made during the Suspension Period shall reduce the amount available to be made as Restricted Payments under .
Section 3.4
Section 3.4
Section 3.4(a)
(d) During any period when the Suspended Covenants are suspended, the Board of Directors of the Company may not designate any of the Company's Subsidiaries as Unrestricted Subsidiaries pursuant to this Indenture unless the Company would have been permitted to designate such Subsidiary to be an Unrestricted Subsidiary if a Suspension Period had not been in effect at the time of such designation and such designation shall be treated in accordance with the immediately preceding sentence.
SECTION 3.14. . The Company shall maintain in The City of New York, an office or agency where the Securities may be presented or surrendered for payment, where, if applicable, the Securities may be surrendered for registration of transfer or exchange and where notices and demands to or upon the Company in respect of the Securities and this Indenture may be served. The corporate trust agency of the Trustee, which initially shall be located at the Corporate Trust Office, shall be such office or agency of the Company, unless the Company shall designate and maintain some other office or agency for one or more of such purposes. The Company shall give prompt written notice to the Trustee of any change in the location of any such office or agency. If at any time the Company shall fail to maintain any such required office or agency or shall fail to furnish the Trustee with the address thereof, such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands may be made or served at the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee, and the Company hereby appoints the Trustee as its agent to receive all such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands.
Maintenance of Office or Agency
The Company may also from time to time designate one or more other offices or agencies (in or outside of The City of New York) where the Securities may be presented or surrendered for any or all such purposes and may from time to time rescind any such designation; that no such designation or rescission shall in any manner relieve the Company of its obligation to maintain an office or agency in The City of New York for such purposes. The Company shall give prompt written notice to the Trustee of any such designation or rescission and any change in the location of any such other office or agency.
provided, however,
SECTION 3.15. . If the Company shall at any time act as its own Paying Agent, it shall, on or before each due date of the principal of (or premium, if any) or interest on any of the Securities, segregate and hold in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled thereto a sum sufficient to pay the principal of (or premium, if any) or interest so becoming due until such sums shall be paid to such Persons or otherwise disposed of as herein provided and shall promptly notify the Trustee in writing of its action or failure to so act.
Money for Security Payments to Be Held in Trust
Whenever the Company shall have one or more Paying Agents for the Securities, it shall, on or before each due date of the principal of (or premium, if any) or interest on any Securities, deposit with any Paying Agent a sum in same day funds (or New York Clearing
 
House funds if such deposit is made prior to the date on which such deposit is required to be made) that shall be available to the Trustee by 10:00 a.m. New York City time on such due date sufficient to pay the principal (and premium, if any) or interest so becoming due, such sum to be held in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled to such principal, premium or interest, and (unless such Paying Agent is the Trustee) the Company shall promptly notify the Trustee in writing of such action or any failure to so act.
The Company shall cause each Paying Agent (other than the Trustee) to execute and deliver to the Trustee an instrument in which such Paying Agent shall agree with the Trustee, subject to the provisions of this Section, that such Paying Agent shall:
(a) hold all sums held by it for the payment of the principal of (and premium, if any) or interest on Securities in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled thereto until such sums shall be paid to such Persons or otherwise disposed of as herein provided;
(b) give the Trustee written notice of any default by the Company (or any other obligor upon the Securities) in the making of any payment of principal (and premium, if any) or interest; and
(c) at any time during the continuance of any such default, upon the written request of the Trustee, forthwith pay to the Trustee all sums so held in trust by such Paying Agent.
The Company may at any time, for the purpose of obtaining the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture or for any other purpose, pay, or by Company Order direct any Paying Agent to pay, to the Trustee all sums held in trust by the Company or such Paying Agent, such sums to be held by the Trustee upon the same trusts as those upon which such sums were held by the Company or such Paying Agent; and, upon such payment by any Paying Agent to the Trustee, such Paying Agent shall be released from all further liability with respect to such sums.
Any money deposited with the Trustee or any Paying Agent, or then held by the Company, in trust for the payment of the principal of (or premium, if any) or interest on any Security and remaining unclaimed for two years after such principal, premium or interest has become due and payable shall be paid to the Company on Company Order, or (if then held by the Company) shall be discharged from such trust; and the Holder of such Security shall thereafter, as an unsecured general creditor, look only to the Company for payment thereof, and all liability of the Trustee or such Paying Agent with respect to such trust money, and all liability of the Company as trustee thereof, shall thereupon cease; that the Trustee or such Paying Agent, before being required to make any such repayment to the Company, may at the expense of the Company cause to be published once, in a leading daily newspaper (if practicable, (Eastern Edition)) printed in the English language and of general circulation in New York City, notice that such money remains unclaimed and that, after a date specified therein, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of such publication nor shall it be later than two years after such principal (or premium, if any) or interest shall have become
provided, however,
The Wall Street Journal
 
due and payable, any unclaimed balance of such money then remaining shall be repaid to the Company.
SECTION 3.16. . Subject to , the Company shall do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve and keep in full force and effect its corporate existence and the corporate, partnership, limited liability company or other existence of each of its Restricted Subsidiaries, in accordance with the respective organizational documents (as the same may be amended from time to time) and the rights (charter and statutory), licenses and franchises of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries; that the Company shall not be required to preserve any such existence, right, license or franchise, or the corporate, partnership, limited liability company or other existence of any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, if it shall be determined (in Good Faith by the Company) that the preservation thereof is no longer desirable in the conduct of the business of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
Corporate Existence
Article IV
provided, however,
SECTION 3.17. . The Company shall pay or discharge or cause to be paid or discharged, before the same shall become delinquent, all material taxes, assessments and governmental charges levied or imposed upon the Company or any Subsidiary, except such as are being contested in good faith by appropriate negotiations or proceedings or where the failure to effect such payment is not adverse in any material respect to the Holders.
Payment of Taxes
SECTION 3.18. . The Company shall deliver to the Trustee within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company an Officers' Certificate stating that in the course of the performance by the signers of their duties as Officers of the Company they would normally have knowledge of any Default or Event of Default and whether or not the signers know of any Default or Event of Default that occurred during such period. If they do, the certificate shall describe the Default or Event of Default, its status and what action the Company is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto. The Officers' Certificate shall also notify the Trustee should the then current fiscal year be changed to end on any date other than on the date as herein defined.
Compliance Certificate
SECTION 3.19. . Upon request of the Trustee, the Company shall execute and deliver such further instruments and do such further acts as may be reasonably necessary or proper to carry out more effectively the purpose of this Indenture.
Further Instruments and Acts
SECTION 3.20. . The Company shall deliver to the Trustee, within 30 days after the knowledge thereof, written notice in the form of an Officers' Certificate of any Event of Default or any event which, with notice or the lapse of time or both, would constitute an Event of Default under , , , , , , ,  or , which shall include their status and what action the Company is taking or proposing to take in respect thereof.
Statement by Officers as to Default
Section 6.1(a)(i)
(ii)
(iii)
(iv)
(v)
(vi)
(ix)
(x)
(xi)
SECTION 3.21. . The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly, pay or cause to be paid any consideration to or for the benefit of any Holder of any Securities for or as an inducement to any consent,
Payment for Consents
 
waiver or amendment of any of the terms or provisions of the Indenture or the Securities unless such consideration is offered to be paid and is paid to all Holders of the Securities that consent, waive or agree to amend in the time frame set forth in the solicitation documents relating to such consent, waiver or amendment.
SECTION 3.22. . The Company shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive any of its rights under the BAC LLC Agreement to the extent any such amendment, modification or waiver would materially adversely affect the Company's or any Subsidiary Guarantor's ability to make anticipated principal or interest payments on the Securities or Subsidiary Guarantee, as the case may be.
Amendment of BAC LLC Agreement
SECTION 4.1. .
When Company May Merge or Otherwise Dispose of Assets
(a) The Company shall not consolidate with or merge with or into or wind up into (whether or not the Company is the surviving corporation), or sell, assign, convey, transfer, lease, convey or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its properties and assets, in one or more related transactions, to any Person :
unless
(i) if other than the Company, the resulting, surviving or transferee Person (the "") shall be a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America, any State of the United States, the District of Columbia or any territory thereof;
Successor Company
(ii) the Successor Company (if other than the Company) assumes pursuant to a supplemental indenture or other documentation instruments, executed and delivered to the Trustee, in forms reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee, all of the obligations of the Company under the Securities, this Indenture, the Collateral Documents (as applicable) and the Intercreditor Agreement and shall cause such amendments, supplements or other instruments to be executed, filed and recorded in such jurisdictions as may be required by applicable law to preserve and protect the Lien on the Collateral owned by or transferred to the Successor Company, together with such financing statements or comparable documents as may be required to perfect any security interests in such Collateral which may be perfected by the filing of a financing statement or a similar document under the Uniform Commercial Code or other similar statute or regulation of the relevant states or jurisdictions;
(iii) immediately after giving effect to such transaction (and treating any Indebtedness which becomes an obligation of the Successor Company or any Restricted Subsidiary as a result of such transaction as having been Incurred by the Successor
 
Company or such Restricted Subsidiary at the time of such transaction), no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing;
(iv) immediately after giving effect to such transaction and any related financing transactions, as if such transactions had occurred at the beginning of the applicable four-quarter period;
pro forma
(A) the Successor Company would be able to Incur at least $1.00 of additional Indebtedness pursuant to ; or
Section 3.3(a)
(B) the Consolidated Coverage Ratio for the Successor Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries would be greater than such ratio for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries immediately prior to such transaction;
(v) each Subsidiary Guarantor (unless it is the other party to the transactions above, in which case clause (i) shall apply) shall have by supplemental indenture confirmed that its Subsidiary Guarantee shall apply to such Person's obligations in respect of this Indenture and the Securities and its obligations under the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement shall continue to be in effect and shall cause such amendments, supplements or other instruments to be executed, filed, and recorded in such jurisdictions as may be required by applicable law to preserve and protect the Lien on the Collateral owned by such Subsidiary Guarantor, together with such financing statements or comparable documents as may be required to perfect any security interests in such Collateral which may be perfected by the filing of a financing statement or a similar document under the Uniform Commercial Code or other similar statute or regulation of the relevant states or jurisdictions; and
(vi) the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that such consolidation, merger or transfer and such supplemental indenture (if any) comply with this Indenture and, if any supplement to any Collateral Document is required in connection with such transaction, such supplement shall comply with the applicable provisions of this Indenture.
(b) Notwithstanding and :
Section 4.1(a)(iii)
(iv)
(i) any Restricted Subsidiary may consolidate with, merge with or into or transfer all or part of its properties and assets to the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor so long as no Capital Stock of the Restricted Subsidiary is distributed to any Person other than the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor, and
(ii) the Company may merge with an Affiliate of the Company solely for the purpose of reincorporating the Company in another jurisdiction to realize tax or other benefits, so long as the amount of Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries is not increased thereby; that, in the case of a Restricted Subsidiary
provided
 
that merges into the Company, the Company shall not be required to comply with the preceding clause (vi).
For purposes of this , the sale, lease, conveyance, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the properties and assets of one or more Subsidiaries of the Company, which properties and assets, if held by the Company instead of such Subsidiaries, would constitute all or substantially all of the properties and assets of the Company on a consolidated basis, shall be deemed to be the transfer of all or substantially all of the properties and assets of the Company.
Section 4.1
(c) The Successor Company shall succeed to, and be substituted for, and may exercise every right and power of, the Company under this Indenture, the Collateral Documents (as applicable) and the Intercreditor Agreement, but the predecessor Company in the case of a conveyance, transfer or lease of all or substantially all its assets shall not be released from the obligation to pay the principal of and interest on the Securities. Solely for the purpose of computing amounts under , , and , the Successor Company shall only be deemed to have succeeded and be substituted for the Company with respect to periods subsequent to the effective time of such merger, consolidation, combination or transfer of assets.
Sections 3.4(a)(3)(A)
(a)(3)(B)
(a)(3)(C)
(a)(3)(D)
SECTION 4.2. . (a) In addition, the Company shall not permit any Subsidiary Guarantor to consolidate with or merge with or into or wind up into (whether or not the Subsidiary Guarantor is the surviving corporation), or sell, assign, convey, transfer, lease, convey or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its properties and assets, in one or more related transactions, to any Person (other than to the Company or another Subsidiary Guarantor), :
When a Subsidiary Guarantor May Merge or Otherwise Dispose of Assets
unless
(i) if such entity remains a Subsidiary Guarantor, (A) the resulting, surviving or transferee Person (the "") shall be a corporation, partnership, trust or limited liability company organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America, any State of the United States, the District of Columbia or any other territory thereof; (B) the Successor Guarantor, if other than such Subsidiary Guarantor, expressly assumes in writing by supplemental indenture (and other applicable documents), executed and delivered to the Trustee, in form satisfactory to the Trustee, all the obligations of such Subsidiary Guarantor under the Subsidiary Guarantee, this Indenture, the Collateral Documents (as applicable) and the Intercreditor Agreement and shall cause such amendments, supplements or other instruments to be executed, filed, and recorded in such jurisdictions as may be required by applicable law to preserve and protect the Lien on the Collateral owned by or transferred to the Successor Guarantor, together with such financing statements or comparable documents as may be required to perfect any security interests in such Collateral which may be perfected by the filing of a financing statement or a similar document under the Uniform Commercial Code or other similar statute or regulation of the relevant states or jurisdictions; (C) immediately after giving effect to such transaction (and treating any Indebtedness which becomes an obligation of the Successor Guarantor or any Restricted Subsidiary as a result of such transaction as
Successor Guarantor
 
having been Incurred by the Successor Guarantor or such Restricted Subsidiary at the time of such transaction), no Default of Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing; and (D) the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that such consolidation, merger or transfer and such supplemental indenture (if any) comply with this Indenture; and
(ii) the transaction is made in compliance with (it being understood that only such portion of the Net Available Cash as is required to be applied on the date of such transaction in accordance with the terms of this Indenture needs to be applied in accordance therewith at such time), to the extent applicable.
Section 3.8
(b) Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Subsidiary Guarantor may merge with or into or transfer all or part of its properties and assets to another Subsidiary Guarantor or the Company or merge with a Restricted Subsidiary of the Company solely for the purpose of reincorporating the Subsidiary Guarantor in a State of the United States or the District of Columbia, as long as the amount of Indebtedness of such Subsidiary Guarantor and its Restricted Subsidiaries is not increased thereby.
SECTION 5.1. . (a) Except pursuant to clause (a) or (b) of this , the Securities shall not be redeemable at the Company's option prior to November 1, 2013. At any time prior to November 1, 2013, upon not less than 30 nor more than 60 days' prior notice as provided for in , the Company may redeem the Securities, in whole but not in part, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Securities redeemed plus the Applicable Premium plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to, the date of redemption (the ""), subject to the rights of Holders of Securities on the relevant Record Date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date.
Optional Redemption
Section 5.1
Section 5.5
Redemption Date
(b) Prior to November 1, 2012, the Company may on any one or more occasions redeem up to 35% of the original principal amount of the Securities (calculated after giving effect to any issuance of Additional Notes) with the Net Cash Proceeds of one or more Equity Offerings at a Redemption Price of 111.250% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the applicable Redemption Date (subject to the right of Holders of Securities on the relevant Record Date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date); that:
provided
(i) at least 65% of the original principal amount of the Securities (calculated after giving effect to any issuance of Additional Notes) remains outstanding after each such redemption; and
 
(ii) the redemption occurs within 90 days after the closing of such Equity Offering.
Notice of any redemption upon any Equity Offering may be given prior to the completion of such Equity Offering, and any such redemption or notice may, at the Company's discretion, be subject to one or more conditions precedent, including, but not limited to, completion of the related Equity Offering.
(c) From and after November 1, 2013, the Company may redeem the Securities, in whole or, from time to time, in part, upon not less than 30 nor more than 60 days' prior notice as provided for in , at the redemption prices (expressed as percentages of principal amount of the Securities to be redeemed), plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, if any, to the applicable Redemption Date (subject to the right of Holders of Securities of record on the relevant Record Date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date) if redeemed during the twelve-month period beginning on November 1 of each of the years indicated below:
Section 5.5
 
SECTION 5.2. . The Company shall not be required to make mandatory redemption payments or sinking fund payments with respect to the Securities.
Mandatory Redemption
SECTION 5.3. . If the Company elects to redeem Securities pursuant to , the Company shall furnish to the Trustee, at least 5 Business Days before notice of redemption is required to be mailed or caused to be mailed to Holders pursuant to but not more than 60 days before a Redemption Date, an Officers' Certificate setting forth (a) the paragraph or subparagraph of such Security and/or Section of this Indenture pursuant to which the redemption shall occur, (b) the Redemption Date, (c) the principal amount of the Securities to be redeemed and (d) the redemption price. The Company shall deliver to the Trustee such documentation and records as shall enable the Trustee to select the Securities to be redeemed pursuant to .
Election to Redeem; Notice to Trustee
Section 5.1
Section 5.5
Section 5.4
SECTION 5.4. . In the case of any partial redemption, selection of the Securities for redemption will be made by the Trustee in compliance with the requirements of the principal national securities exchange, if any, on which the Securities are listed or, if the Securities are not listed, then on a basis, by lot or by such other method as the Trustee in its sole discretion shall deem to be fair and appropriate, although no Security of $2,000 in original principal amount or less shall be redeemed in part. If any Security is to be redeemed in part only, the notice of redemption relating to such note shall state the portion of the principal amount thereof to be redeemed. A new Security in principal amount equal to the unredeemed portion thereof shall be issued in the name of the Holder thereof upon cancellation of the original Security.
Selection by Trustee of Securities to Be Redeemed
pro rata
 
The Trustee shall promptly notify the Company in writing of the Securities selected for redemption and, in the case of any Securities selected for partial redemption, the principal amount thereof to be redeemed.
For all purposes of this Indenture, unless the context otherwise requires, all provisions relating to redemption of Securities shall relate, in the case of any Security redeemed or to be redeemed only in part, to the portion of the principal amount of such Security which has been or is to be redeemed.
SECTION 5.5. . Notice of redemption shall be given in the manner provided for in not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior to the Redemption Date, to each Holder of Securities to be redeemed. The Trustee shall give notice of redemption in the Company's name and at the Company's expense; that the Company shall deliver to the Trustee, at least 5 Business Days before the notice of redemption is required to be mailed or caused to be mailed to Holders (unless a shorter notice shall be agreed to by the Trustee), an Officers' Certificate requesting that the Trustee give such notice at the Company's expense and setting forth the information to be stated in such notice as provided in the following items; , , that redemption notices may be mailed more than 60 days prior to a Redemption Date if the notice is issued in connection with .
Notice of Redemption
Section 12.1
provided, however,
provided
further
Article VIII
All notices of redemption shall state:
(a) the Redemption Date,
(b) the redemption price and the amount of accrued interest to the Redemption Date payable as provided in , if any,
Section 5.7
(c) if less than all outstanding Securities are to be redeemed, the identification of the particular Securities (or portion thereof) to be redeemed, as well as the aggregate principal amount of Securities to be redeemed and the aggregate principal amount of Securities to be outstanding after such partial redemption,
(d) in case any Security is to be redeemed in part only, the notice which relates to such Security shall state that on and after the Redemption Date, upon surrender of such Security, the Holder shall receive, without charge, a new Security or Securities of authorized denominations for the principal amount thereof remaining unredeemed,
(e) that on the Redemption Date the redemption price (and accrued interest, if any, to the Redemption Date payable as provided in ) shall become due and payable upon each such Security, or the portion thereof, to be redeemed, and, unless the Company defaults in making the redemption payment, that interest on Securities called for redemption (or the portion thereof) shall cease to accrue on and after said date,
Section 5.7
(f) the place or places where such Securities are to be surrendered for payment of the Redemption Price and accrued interest, if any,
 
(g) the name and address of the Paying Agent,
(h) that Securities called for redemption must be surrendered to the Paying Agent to collect the Redemption Price,
(i) the CUSIP number, and that no representation is made as to the accuracy or correctness of the CUSIP number, if any, listed in such notice or printed on the Securities, and
(j) the paragraph of the Securities pursuant to which the Securities are to be redeemed.
SECTION 5.6. . Prior to 10:00 a.m. New York City time, on any Redemption Date, the Company shall deposit with the Trustee or with a Paying Agent (or, if the Company is acting as its own Paying Agent, segregate and hold in trust as provided in ) an amount of money sufficient to pay the redemption price of, and accrued interest on, all the Securities which are to be redeemed on that date.
Deposit of Redemption Price
Section 2.4
SECTION 5.7. . Notice of redemption having been given as aforesaid, the Securities so to be redeemed shall, on the Redemption Date, become due and payable at the redemption price therein specified (together with accrued interest, if any, to the Redemption Date), and from and after such date (unless the Company shall default in the payment of the Redemption Price and accrued interest) such Securities shall cease to bear interest. Upon surrender of any such Security for redemption in accordance with said notice, such Security shall be paid by the Company at the redemption price, together with accrued interest, if any, to the Redemption Date (subject to the rights of Holders of record on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant interest payment date).
Securities Payable on Redemption Date
If any Security called for redemption shall not be so paid upon surrender thereof for redemption, the principal (and premium, if any) shall, until paid, bear interest from the Redemption Date at the rate borne by the Securities.
If the optional Redemption Date is on or after an interest Record Date and on or before the related Interest Payment Date, the accrued and unpaid interest, if any, shall be paid to the Person in whose name the Security is registered at the close of business on such Record Date, and no additional interest shall be payable to Holders whose Securities shall be subject to redemption by the Company.
SECTION 5.8. . Any Security which is to be redeemed only in part (pursuant to the provisions of this Article) shall be surrendered at the office or agency of the Company maintained for such purpose pursuant to (with, if the Company so requires, due endorsement by, or a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company duly executed by, the Holder thereof or such Holder's attorney duly authorized in writing), and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery to the Holder of such Security at the expense of the Company, a new Security or Securities, of any authorized denomination as requested by such Holder, in an
Securities Redeemed in Part
Section 3.14
 
aggregate principal amount equal to and in exchange for the unredeemed portion of the principal of the Security so surrendered, that each such new Security shall be in a principal amount of $2,000 or integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. It is understood that, notwithstanding anything in this Indenture to the contrary, only an Authentication Order and not an Opinion of Counsel or Officers' Certificate is required for the Trustee to authenticate such new Security.
provided,
SECTION 6.1. .
Events of Default
(a) Each of the following is an event of default (an "Event of Default"):
(i) default in any payment of interest on any Security when the same becomes due and payable, and such default continues for a period of 30 days;
(ii) default in the payment of the principal of or premium, if any, on any Security when the same becomes due and payable at its Stated Maturity, upon optional redemption, upon required repurchase, upon declaration of acceleration or otherwise;
(iii) the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor fails to comply with its obligations under;
Article IV
(iv) the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor fails to comply for 30 days after notice as provided below with (a) any of its obligations under (in each case, other than a failure to repurchase Securities that shall constitute an Event of Default under and other than a failure to comply with which failure shall constitute an Event of Default under );
Section 3.2, 3.3, 3.4, 3.5, 3.6, 3.7, 3.8, 3.9, 3.10, 3.11, 3.12, 3.21 and 3.22
Section 6.1(a)(ii)
Article IV
Section 6.1(a)(iii)
(v) the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor fails to comply for 60 days after notice as provided below with its other agreements contained in this Indenture or under the Securities, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement;
(vi) the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries defaults under any mortgage, indenture or instrument under which there is issued or by which there is secured or evidenced any Indebtedness for money borrowed by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries (or the payment of which is guaranteed by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries), other than Indebtedness owed to the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary, whether such Indebtedness or Guarantee now exists, or is created after the Issue Date, which default:
 
(a) is caused by a failure to pay principal of, or interest or premium, if any, on such Indebtedness at its stated maturity or due date (after giving effect to any applicable grace periods) ("payment default"); or
(b) results in the acceleration by the holders of such Indebtedness prior to its stated final, maturity ("cross acceleration provision");
and, in each case, the principal amount of any such Indebtedness, together with the principal amount of any other such Indebtedness under which there has been a payment default or the maturity of which has been so accelerated, aggregates $35.0 million or more;
(vii) the Company or a Significant Subsidiary or group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary pursuant to or within the meaning of any Bankruptcy Law (as defined below):
(A) commences a voluntary case or proceeding with respect to itself;
(B) consents to the entry of an order for relief against it in an involuntary case or proceeding;
(C) consents to the appointment of a Custodian (as defined below) of it or for substantially all of its property; or
(D) makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors;
or takes any comparable action under any foreign laws relating to insolvency;
(viii) a court of competent jurisdiction enters an order or decree under any Bankruptcy Law that:
(A) is for relief against the Company or any Significant Subsidiary or a group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary, in an involuntary case;
(B) appoints a Custodian of the Company, any Significant Subsidiary or a group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary, for any substantial part of its property; or
(C) orders the winding up or liquidation of the Company, any Significant Subsidiary or a group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary;
 
or any similar relief is granted under any foreign laws and the order, decree or relief remains unstayed and in effect for 60 days;
(ix) failure by the Company or any Significant Subsidiary or group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary to pay final and nonappealable judgments aggregating in excess of $35.0 million (net of any amount that is covered by insurance issued by a reputable and creditworthy insurance company (as determined in the Good Faith by the Company) that has not contested coverage), which judgments are not paid, discharged or stayed for a period of 60 days after such judgment becomes final (the "judgment default provision");
(x) any (A) Subsidiary Guarantee, (B) Collateral Document governing a security interest with respect to any Collateral having a fair market value in excess of $10.0 million or (C) obligation under the Intercreditor Agreement, in each case, of a Significant Subsidiary or group of Restricted Subsidiaries that taken together as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries would constitute a Significant Subsidiary ceases to be in full force and effect (except as contemplated by the terms of this Indenture and the Subsidiary Guarantees) or is declared null and void in a judicial proceeding or any Subsidiary Guarantor that is a Significant Subsidiary or group of Subsidiary Guarantors that taken together as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries would constitute a Significant Subsidiary denies or disaffirms its obligations under this Indenture, its Subsidiary Guarantee, any Collateral Document or the Intercreditor Agreement and the Company fails to cause such Restricted Subsidiary or Restricted Subsidiaries, as the case may be, to rescind such denials or disaffirmations within 30 days; and
(xi) with respect to any Collateral having a fair market value in excess of $10.0 million, individually or in the aggregate, (A) the failure of the security interest with respect to such Collateral under the Collateral Documents, at any time, to be in full force and effect for any reason other than in accordance with their terms and the terms of this Indenture or the Intercreditor Agreement and other than the satisfaction in full of all obligations under this Indenture and discharge of this Indenture if such Default continues for 60 days or, (B) the assertion by the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor, in any pleading in any court of competent jurisdiction, that any such security interest is invalid or unenforceable, except in each case for the failure or loss of perfection resulting from the failure of the Collateral Agent to make filings, renewals and continuations (or other equivalent filings) which are required to be made or the failure of the Collateral Agent to maintain possession of certificates actually delivered to it representing securities pledged under the Collateral Documents.
The foregoing shall constitute Events of Default whatever the reason for any such Event of Default and whether it is voluntary or involuntary or is effected by operation of law or
 
pursuant to any judgment, decree or order of any court or any order, rule or regulation of any administrative or governmental body.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, a default under clauses (iv), (v) or (xi)(A) or (xi)(B) of this (a) shall not constitute an Event of Default until the Trustee or the Holders of 25% in principal amount of the outstanding Securities notify the Company of the default and the Company does not cure such default within the time specified in clauses (iv), (v) or (xi)(A) or (xi)(B) of this paragraph after receipt of such notice. Such notice must specify the Default, demand that it be remedied and state that such notice is a "".
Section 6.1
Notice of Default
If an Event of Default (other than an Event of Default described in or ) occurs and is continuing, the Trustee by notice in writing specifying the Event of Default and that it is a "notice" to the Company, or the Holders of at least 25% in principal amount of the outstanding Securities by notice to the Company and the Trustee, may, and the Trustee at the request of such Holders shall, declare the principal of, premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest, if any, on all the Securities to be due and payable. Upon such a declaration, such principal, premium and accrued and unpaid interest shall be due and payable immediately.
Section 6.1(a) (vii) 
(viii)
In the event of a declaration of acceleration of the Securities because an Event of Default described has occurred and is continuing, the declaration of acceleration of the Securities shall be automatically annulled if the default triggering such Event of Default pursuant to shall be remedied or cured by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary or waived by the holders of the relevant Indebtedness within 20 days after the declaration of acceleration with respect thereto and if (1) the annulment of the acceleration of the Securities would not conflict with any judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction and (2) all existing Events of Default, except nonpayment of principal, premium or interest on the Securities that became due solely because of the acceleration of the Securities, have been cured or waived. If an Event of Default described or  above occurs and is continuing, the principal of, premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on all the Securities shall become and be immediately due and payable without any declaration or other act on the part of the Trustee or any Holders.
Section 6.1(a)(vi)
Section 6.1(a)(vi)
Section 6.1(a)(vii)
(viii)
The term "" means Title 11, , or any similar Federal or state law for the relief of debtors. The term "" means any receiver, trustee, assignee, liquidator, custodian or similar official under any Bankruptcy Law.
Bankruptcy Law
United States Code
Custodian
SECTION 6.2. . If an Event of Default (other than an Event of Default specified in or  with respect to the Company or a Significant Subsidiary) occurs and is continuing, the Trustee by notice to the Company, or the Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Securities by notice to the Company and the Trustee, may, and the Trustee at the request of such Holders shall, declare the principal of, premium, if any, and accrued but unpaid interest on all the Securities to be due and payable. Upon such a declaration, such principal, premium and interest shall, subject to , be immediately due and payable. In the event of a declaration of acceleration because an Event of
Acceleration
Section 6.1(a)(vii)
(viii)
Section 6.4
 
Default set forth in above has occurred and is continuing, such declaration of acceleration shall be automatically rescinded and annulled if the event of default or payment default triggering such Event of Default pursuant to shall be remedied or cured by the Company and/or the relevant Significant Subsidiaries or waived by the holders of the relevant Indebtedness within 60 days after the declaration of acceleration with respect thereto. If an Event of Default specified in or  with respect to the Company or a Significant Subsidiary occurs and is continuing, the principal of, premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on all the Securities shall become immediately due and payable without any declaration or other act on the part of the Trustee or any Holders.
Section 6.1(a)(vi)
Section 6.1(a)(vi)
Section 6.1(a)(vii)
(viii)
SECTION 6.3. . If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee may pursue any available remedy to collect the payment of principal of or interest on the Securities or to enforce the performance of any provision of the Securities, this Indenture, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement.
Other Remedies
The Trustee may maintain a proceeding even if it does not possess any of the Securities or does not produce any of them in the proceeding. A delay or omission by the Trustee or any Holder in exercising any right or remedy accruing upon an Event of Default shall not impair the right or remedy or constitute a waiver of or acquiescence in the Event of Default. No remedy is exclusive of any other remedy. All available remedies are cumulative.
SECTION 6.4. . The Holders of a majority in principal amount outstanding (including without limitation, consents obtained in connection with a purchase of, or tender offer or exchange offer for, notes) Securities by notice to the Trustee may waive an existing Default or Event of Default and its consequences (except a Default or Event of Default in the payment of the principal of, premium or interest on a Security) and rescind any such acceleration with respect to the Securities and its consequences if (1) rescission would not conflict with any judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction and (2) all existing Events of Default, other than the nonpayment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Securities that have become due solely by such declaration of acceleration, have been cured or waived. When a Default or Event of Default is waived, it is deemed cured, but no such waiver shall extend to any subsequent or other Default or Event of Default or impair any consequent right.
Waiver of Past Defaults
SECTION 6.5. . The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the then outstanding Securities may direct the time, method and place of conducting any proceeding for exercising any remedy available to the Trustee or the Collateral Agent or of exercising any trust or power conferred on the Trustee or the Collateral Agent. However, the Trustee or the Collateral Agent, as the case may be, may refuse to follow any direction that conflicts with law or this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement, or, subject to and , that the Trustee or the Collateral Agent determines is unduly prejudicial to the rights of other Holders or would involve the Trustee or the Collateral Agent in personal liability; , that the Trustee or the Collateral Agent may take any other action deemed proper by the Trustee or the Collateral Agent that is not inconsistent with such direction. Prior to taking any action under this
Control by Majority
Sections 7.1
7.2
provided, however
 
Indenture, the Trustee or the Collateral Agent shall be entitled to indemnification satisfactory to it in its sole discretion against all losses and expenses caused by taking or not taking such action.
SECTION 6.6. . Except to enforce the right to receive payment of principal, premium, if any, or interest when due, no Holder may pursue any remedy with respect to this Indenture or the Securities unless:
Limitation on Suits
(i) the Holder gives to the Trustee written notice stating that an Event of Default is continuing;
(ii) the Holders of at least 25% in outstanding principal amount of the Securities make a written request to the Trustee to pursue the remedy;
(iii) such Holder or Holders offer to the Trustee security or indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it against any loss, liability or expense;
(iv) the Trustee does not comply with the request within 60 days after receipt of the request and the offer of security or indemnity; and
(v) the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the outstanding Securities do not give the Trustee a direction inconsistent with the request during such 60-day period.
A Holder may not use this Indenture to prejudice the rights of another Holder or to obtain a preference or priority over another Holder.
SECTION 6.7. . Notwithstanding any other provision of this Indenture, the right of any Holder to receive payment of principal of, premium (if any) or interest on the Securities held by such Holder, on or after the respective due dates expressed in the Securities, or to bring suit for the enforcement of any such payment on or after such respective dates, shall not be impaired or affected without the consent of such Holder.
Rights of Holders to Receive Payment
SECTION 6.8. . If an Event of Default specified in or  occurs and is continuing, the Trustee may recover judgment in its own name and as trustee of an express trust against the Company for the whole amount then due and owing (together with interest on any unpaid interest to the extent lawful) and the amounts provided for in .
Collection Suit by Trustee
Section 6.1(a)(i)
(ii)
Section 7.6
SECTION 6.9. . The Trustee may file such proofs of claim and other papers or documents as may be necessary or advisable in order to have the claims of the Trustee and the Holders allowed in any judicial proceedings relative to the Company, its Subsidiaries or their respective creditors or properties and, unless prohibited by law or applicable regulations, may vote on behalf of the Holders in any election of a trustee in bankruptcy or other Person performing similar functions, and any Custodian in any such judicial proceeding is hereby authorized by each Holder to make payments to the Trustee and, in the event that the Trustee shall consent to the making of such payments directly to the Holders, to pay to the Trustee any amount due it for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements
Trustee May File Proofs of Claim
 
and advances of the Trustee, its agents and its counsel, and any other amounts due the Trustee under .
Section 7.6
SECTION 6.10. . (a) With respect to the First-Priority Collateral, the Trustee shall pay out any money or property received by it from the Collateral Agent, whether pursuant to the foreclosure or other remedial provisions contained in the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement (including any money or property deposited into the Collateral Account in connection therewith) or otherwise, in the following order:
Priorities
First: to the Trustee for amounts due to it under and to the Collateral Agent for fees and expenses incurred under the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement;
Section 7.6
Second: to Holders for amounts due and unpaid on the Securities for principal, premium, if any, and interest, ratably, without preference or priority of any kind, according to the amounts due and payable on the Securities for principal, premium, if any, and interest, respectively; and
Third: to the Company or, to the extent the Trustee receives any amount for any Subsidiary Guarantor, to such Subsidiary Guarantor; and
(b) With respect to the Second-Priority Collateral, the Trustee shall pay out any money or property received by it from the Collateral Agent, whether pursuant to the foreclosure or other remedial provisions contained in the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement (including any money or property deposited into one or more accounts under the control of the ABL Agent) or otherwise, in the following order:
First: to the Trustee for amounts due to it under and to the Collateral Agent for fees and expenses incurred under the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement;
Section 7.6
Second: to Holders for amounts due and unpaid on the Securities for principal, premium, if any, and interest, ratably, without preference or priority of any kind, according to the amounts due and payable on the Securities for principal, premium, if any, and interest, respectively; and
Third: to the Company or, to the extent the Trustee receives any amount for any Subsidiary Guarantor, to such Subsidiary Guarantor;
, , that the payments set forth above shall with respect to the Second-Priority Collateral be made subject to the Intercreditor Agreement.
provided
however
The Trustee may fix a record date and payment date for any payment to Holders pursuant to this Section. At least 15 days before such record date, the Company shall mail to each Holder and the Trustee a notice that states the record date, the payment date and amount to be paid.
 
SECTION 6.11. . In any suit for the enforcement of any right or remedy under this Indenture or in any suit against the Trustee for any action taken or omitted by it as Trustee, a court in its discretion may require the filing by any party litigant in the suit of an undertaking to pay the costs of the suit, and the court in its discretion may assess reasonable costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses, against any party litigant in the suit, having due regard to the merits and good faith of the claims or defenses made by the party litigant. This Section does not apply to a suit by the Trustee, a suit by the Company, a suit by a Holder pursuant to or a suit by Holders of more than 10% in outstanding principal amount of the Securities.
Undertaking for Costs
Section 6.7
SECTION 7.1. . If an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Trustee or the Collateral Agent shall exercise the rights and powers vested in it by this Indenture and use the same degree of care and skill in their exercise as a prudent Person would exercise or use under the circumstances in the conduct of such Person's own affairs; that if an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee and the Collateral Agent shall be under no obligation to exercise any of the rights or powers under this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement at the request or direction of any of the Holders unless such Holders have offered the Trustee or the Collateral Agent indemnity or security reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee or the Collateral Agent, as applicable, against loss, liability or expense.
Duties of Trustee
provided
(b) Except during the continuance of an Event of Default:
(i) the Trustee undertakes to perform such duties and only such duties as are specifically set forth in this Indenture and no implied covenants or obligations shall be read into this Indenture against the Trustee; and
(ii) in the absence of bad faith on its part, the Trustee may conclusively rely, as to the truth of the statements and the correctness of the opinions expressed therein, upon certificates or opinions furnished to the Trustee and conforming to the requirements of this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement, as applicable. However, in the case of any such certificates or opinions which by any provisions hereof are specifically required to be furnished to the Trustee, the Trustee shall examine such certificates and opinions to determine whether or not they conform to the requirements of this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement, as the case may be (but need not confirm or investigate the accuracy of mathematical calculations or other facts stated therein).
 
(c) The Trustee may not be relieved from liability for its own negligent action, its own negligent failure to act or its own willful misconduct, except that:
(i) this paragraph does not limit the effect of paragraph (b) of this Section;
(ii) the Trustee shall not be liable for any error of judgment made in good faith by a Trust Officer or Trust Officers unless it is proved that the Trustee was negligent in ascertaining the pertinent facts; and
(iii) the Trustee shall not be liable with respect to any action it takes or omits to take in good faith in accordance with a direction received by it pursuant to .
Section 6.5
(d) The Trustee shall not be liable for interest on any money received by it except as the Trustee may agree in writing with the Company.
(e) Money held in trust by the Trustee need not be segregated from other funds except to the extent required by law.
(f) No provision of this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement shall require the Trustee to expend or risk its own funds or otherwise incur any financial liability in the performance of any of its duties hereunder or thereunder or in the exercise of any of its rights or powers, if it shall have reasonable grounds to believe that repayment of such funds or adequate indemnity against such risk or liability is not reasonably assured to it.
(g) Every provision of this Indenture relating to the conduct or affecting the liability of or affording protection to the Trustee shall be subject to the provisions of this Section.
(h) The Trustee shall be under no obligation to exercise any of the rights or powers vested in it by this Indenture at the request or direction of any of the Holders unless such Holders shall have offered to the Trustee security or indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it against the costs, expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses) and liabilities that might be incurred by it in compliance with such request or direction.
SECTION 7.2. . (a) The Trustee may conclusively rely and shall be protected in acting upon any resolution, certificate, statement, instrument, opinion, notice, request, direction, consent, order, bond or any other paper or document believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or presented by the proper Person or Persons. The Trustee need not investigate any fact or matter stated in the document.
Rights of Trustee
(b) Before the Trustee acts or refrains from acting, it may require an Officers' Certificate or an Opinion of Counsel. The Trustee shall not be liable for any action it takes or omits to take in good faith in reliance on an Officers' Certificate or Opinion of Counsel.
 
(c) The Trustee may act through its attorneys and agents and shall not be responsible for the misconduct or negligence of any agent appointed with due care.
(d) The Trustee shall not be liable for any action it takes or omits to take in good faith which it believes to be authorized or within its rights or powers; , that the Trustee's conduct does not constitute willful misconduct or negligence.
provided, however
(e) The Trustee may consult with counsel of its selection, and the advice or opinion of counsel with respect to legal matters relating to this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement shall be full and complete authorization and protection from liability in respect to any action taken, omitted or suffered by it hereunder or under the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement in good faith and in accordance with the advice or opinion of such counsel.
(f) The Trustee shall not be bound to make any investigation into the facts or matters stated in any resolution, certificate, statement, instrument, opinion, notice, request, direction, consent, order, bond or other paper or document; but the Trustee, in its discretion, may make such further inquiry or investigation into such facts or matters as it may see fit, and, if the Trustee shall determine to make such further inquiry or investigation, it shall be entitled to examine the books, records and premises of the Company, personally or by agent or attorney at the sole cost of the Company and shall incur no liability or additional liability of any kind by reason of such inquiry or investigation.
(g) The Trustee shall not be deemed to have knowledge of any Default or Event of Default except (i), during any period it is serving as Registrar and Paying Agent for the Securities, any Event of Default occurring pursuant to and , or (ii) any Default or Event of Default of which a Trust Officer shall have (i) received written notification at the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee and such notice references the Securities and this Indenture or (ii) obtained "actual knowledge." "Actual knowledge" shall mean the actual fact or statement of knowing by a Trust Officer without independent investigation with respect thereto.
Section 6.1(a)(i)
6.1(a)(ii)
(h) In no event shall the Trustee be responsible or liable for special, indirect, or consequential loss or damage of any kind whatsoever (including, but not limited to, loss of profit) irrespective of whether the Trustee has been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage and regardless of the form of action.
(i) The rights, privileges, protections, immunities and benefits given to the Trustee, including, without limitation, its right to be indemnified, are extended to, and shall be enforceable by, the Trustee in each of its capacities hereunder, the Collateral Agent, and each agent, custodian and other Person employed to act hereunder
 
(j) The Trustee may request that the Company deliver a certificate setting forth the names of individuals and/or titles of officers authorized at such time to take specified actions pursuant to this Indenture.
SECTION 7.3. . The Trustee in its individual or any other capacity may become the owner or pledgee of Securities and may otherwise deal with the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors or their Affiliates with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee. Any Paying Agent, Registrar, co-registrar or co-paying agent may do the same with like rights. However, the Trustee must comply with . In addition, the Trustee shall be permitted to engage in transactions with the Company; , that if the Trustee acquires any conflicting interest the Trustee must (i) eliminate such conflict within 90 days of acquiring such conflicting interest, (ii) apply to the SEC for permission to continue acting as Trustee or (iii) resign.
Individual Rights of Trustee
Sections 7.9
provided, however
SECTION 7.4. . The Trustee shall not be responsible for and makes no representation as to the validity or adequacy of this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement or the Securities, it shall not be accountable for the Company's use of the Securities or the proceeds from the Securities, and it shall not be responsible for any statement of the Company in this Indenture or in any document issued in connection with the sale of the Securities or in the Securities other than the Trustee's certificate of authentication or for the use or application of any funds received by any Paying Agent other than the Trustee.
Trustee's Disclaimer
SECTION 7.5. . If a Default or Event of Default occurs and is continuing and if a Trust Officer has actual knowledge thereof, the Trustee shall mail to each Holder notice of the Default or Event of Default within 90 days after it occurs. Except in the case of a Default or Event of Default in payment of principal of, premium (if any), or interest on any Security (including payments pursuant to the required repurchase provisions of such Security, if any), the Trustee may withhold the notice if and so long as its board of directors, a committee of its board of directors or a committee of its Trust Officers in good faith determines that withholding the notice is in the interests of Holders. In addition, the Company is required to deliver to the Trustee (x) within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year, a certificate indicating whether the signers thereof know of any Default that occurred during the previous year and (y) within 30 days after knowledge thereof, written notice of any events that would constitute an Event of Default, the status of such event and the action the Company is taking or proposing to take in respect thereof.
Notice of Defaults
SECTION 7.6. . The Company shall pay to the Trustee from time to time such compensation for its services as the parties shall agree in writing from time to time. The Trustee's compensation shall not be limited by any law on compensation of a trustee of an express trust. The Company shall reimburse the Trustee upon request for all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred or made by it, including, but not limited to, costs of collection, costs of preparing and reviewing reports, certificates and other documents, costs of preparation and mailing of notices to Holders and reasonable costs of counsel retained by the Trustee in connection with the delivery of an Opinion of Counsel or otherwise, in addition to the
Compensation and Indemnity
 
compensation for its services. Such expenses shall include the reasonable compensation and expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee's agents, counsel, accountants and experts. The Company shall indemnify the Collateral Agent, any predecessor Collateral Agent, the Trustee or any predecessor Trustee in each of its capacities hereunder (including Paying Agent, and Registrar), and each of their officers, directors, employees, counsel and agents, against any and all loss, liability or expense (including, but not limited to, reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses) incurred by it in connection with the administration of this trust and the performance of its duties hereunder and under the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement, including the costs and expenses of enforcing this Indenture (including this ), the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement and of defending itself against any claims (whether asserted by any Holder, the Company or otherwise). The Collateral Agent and the Trustee shall notify the Company promptly of any claim for which it may seek indemnity. Failure by the Collateral Agent and the Trustee to so notify the Company shall not relieve the Company of its obligations hereunder. The Company shall defend the claim and the Collateral Agent and the Trustee may have separate counsel and the Company shall pay the fees and expenses of such counsel. The Company need not reimburse any expense or indemnify against any loss, liability or expense incurred by the Collateral Agent and the Trustee through their own willful misconduct, negligence or bad faith, subject to the exceptions contained in hereof.
Section 7.6
Section 7.1(c)
To secure the Company's payment obligations in this Section, the Collateral Agent and the Trustee shall have a lien prior to the Securities on all money or property held or collected by the Trustee other than money or property held in trust to pay principal of and interest on particular Securities. The right of the Collateral Agent and the Trustee to receive payment of any amounts due under this shall not be subordinate to any other liability or indebtedness of the Company.
Section 7.6
The Company's payment obligations pursuant to this Section and any lien arising hereunder shall survive the discharge of this Indenture and the resignation or removal of the Trustee. When the Trustee incurs expenses after the occurrence of a Default specified in or  with respect to the Company, the expenses are intended to constitute expenses of administration under any Bankruptcy Law.
Section 6.1(a)(vii)
(viii)
SECTION 7.7. . The Trustee may resign at any time by so notifying the Company. The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities may remove the Trustee by so notifying the Company and the Trustee in writing and may appoint a successor Trustee. The Company shall remove the Trustee if:
Replacement of Trustee
(i) the Trustee fails to comply with ;
Section 7.9
(ii) the Trustee is adjudged bankrupt or insolvent;
(iii) a receiver or other public officer takes charge of the Trustee or its property; or
 
(iv) the Trustee otherwise becomes incapable of acting.
If the Trustee resigns or is removed by the Company or by the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities and such Holders do not reasonably promptly appoint a successor Trustee, or if a vacancy exists in the office of Trustee for any reason (the Trustee in such event being referred to herein as the retiring Trustee), the Company shall promptly appoint a successor Trustee.
A successor Trustee shall deliver a written acceptance of its appointment to the retiring Trustee and to the Company. Thereupon the resignation or removal of the retiring Trustee shall become effective, and the successor Trustee shall have all the rights, powers and duties of the Trustee under this Indenture. The successor Trustee shall mail a notice of its succession to Holders. The retiring Trustee shall promptly transfer all property held by it as Trustee to the successor Trustee, subject to the lien provided for in .
Section 7.6
If a successor Trustee does not take office within 60 days after the retiring Trustee resigns or is removed, the retiring Trustee or the Holders of at least 10% in principal amount of the Securities may petition, at the Company's expense, any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor Trustee.
If the Trustee fails to comply with , unless the Trustee's duty to resign is stayed, any Holder may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the removal of the Trustee and the appointment of a successor Trustee.
Section 7.9
Notwithstanding the replacement of the Trustee pursuant to this , the Company's obligations under shall continue for the benefit of the retiring Trustee.
Section 7.7
Section 7.6
SECTION 7.8. . If the Trustee consolidates with, merges or converts into, or transfers all or substantially all its corporate trust business or assets to, another corporation or banking association, the resulting, surviving or transferee corporation without any further act shall be the successor Trustee.
Successor Trustee by Merger
In case at the time such successor or successors by merger, conversion or consolidation to the Trustee shall succeed to the trusts created by this Indenture, any of the Securities shall have been authenticated but not delivered, any such successor to the Trustee may adopt the certificate of authentication of any predecessor trustee, and deliver such Securities so authenticated; and in case at that time any of the Securities shall not have been authenticated, any successor to the Trustee may authenticate such Securities either in the name of any predecessor hereunder or in the name of the successor to the Trustee; and in all such cases such certificates shall have the full force which it is anywhere in the Securities or in this Indenture provided that the certificate of the Trustee shall have.
SECTION 7.9. . The Trustee shall have a combined capital and surplus of at least $50 million as set forth in its most recent filed annual report of condition.
Eligibility; Disqualification
 
SECTION 7.10. . (a) Beyond the exercise of reasonable care in the custody thereof, neither the Trustee nor the Collateral Agent shall have any duty as to any Collateral in their possession or control or in the possession or control of any agent or bailee or any income thereon or as to preservation of rights against prior parties or any other rights pertaining thereto and neither the Trustee nor the Collateral Agent shall be responsible for filing any financing or continuation statements or recording any documents or instruments in any public office at any time or times or otherwise perfecting or maintaining the perfection of any security interest in the Collateral. The Trustee and the Collateral Agent shall be deemed to have exercised reasonable care in the custody of the Collateral in their possession if the Collateral is accorded treatment substantially equal to that which they accord their own property and shall not be liable or responsible for any loss or diminution in the value of any of the Collateral, by reason of the act or omission of any carrier, forwarding agency or other agent or bailee selected by the Trustee or the Collateral Agent in good faith.
Limitation on Duty of Trustee and Collateral Agent in Respect of Collateral; Indemnification
(b) Neither the Trustee nor the Collateral Agent shall have any duty to ascertain or inquire as to the performance or observance of any of the terms of this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement by the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors, the ABL Agent or any other Person.
SECTION 8.1. . (a) When (i) (x) the Company delivers to the Trustee all outstanding Securities (other than Securities replaced pursuant to ) for cancellation or (y) all outstanding Securities not theretofore delivered for cancellation have become due and payable whether at maturity or upon redemption pursuant to hereof, or will become due and payable within one year or are to be called for redemption within one year under arrangements satisfactory to the Trustee for the giving of a notice of redemption pursuant to Article V and the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor irrevocably deposits or causes to be deposited with the Trustee as trust funds in trust solely for the benefit of the Holders money in U.S. dollars, U.S. Government Obligations, or a combination thereof, in such amounts as shall be sufficient without consideration of any reinvestment of interest to pay and discharge the entire Indebtedness on such Securities not theretofore delivered to the Trustee for cancellation for principal, premium, if any, and accrued interest to the date of maturity or redemption; (ii) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing on the date of such deposit or shall occur as a result of such deposit (other than a default resulting from borrowing of funds to be applied to such deposit and the grant of any Lien securing such borrowing) and such deposit will not result in a breach or violation of, or constitute a default under, the ABL Facility or any other material instrument (other than the Indenture) to which the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor is a party or by which the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor is bound; (iii) the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor
Discharge of Liability on Securities; Defeasance
Section 2.9
Article V
 
has paid or caused to be paid all sums payable to the Trustee under this Indenture and the Securities; and (iv) the Company has delivered irrevocable instructions to the Trustee under this Indenture to apply the deposited money toward the payment of such Securities at maturity or the Redemption Date, as the case may be, then this Indenture shall, subject to , cease to be of further effect. The Trustee shall acknowledge satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture and release of all Liens on the Collateral with respect to the Securities on demand of the Company (accompanied by an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel stating that all conditions precedent specified herein relating to the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture have been complied with) and at the cost and expense of the Company.
Section 8.1(c)
(b) Subject to and , the Company at its option and at any time may terminate (i) all the obligations of the Company and any Subsidiary Guarantor under the Securities, this Indenture, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement, and cause the release of all Liens on the Collateral granted under the Collateral Documents ("") or (ii) the obligations of the Company and any Subsidiary Guarantor under , , , , , , , , , , , , , and and the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors may omit to comply with and shall have no liability in respect of any term, condition or limitation set forth in any such covenant or provision, whether directly or indirectly, by reason of any reference elsewhere herein to any such covenant or provision or by reason of any reference in any such covenant to any other provision herein or in any other document and such omission to comply with such covenants or provisions shall no longer constitute a Default or an Event of Default under (only with respect to , and ), (only with respect to such covenants), (only with respect to such covenants), , (only with respect to Significant Subsidiaries or a group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited financial statements of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary), (only with respect to Significant Subsidiaries or a group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited financial statements of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary) and (clause (ii) being referred to as the ""), but except as specified above, the remainder of this Indenture, the Securities, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement shall be unaffected thereby. The Company may exercise its legal defeasance option notwithstanding its prior exercise of its covenant defeasance option. If the Company exercises its legal defeasance option or covenant defeasance option, the Subsidiary Guarantees in effect at such time shall terminate and the Liens on Collateral shall terminate and shall be released with respect to the Securities.
Sections 8.1(c)
8.2
legal defeasance option
Sections 3.2
3.3
3.4
3.5
3.6
3.7
3.8
3.9
3.10
3.11
3.12
3.21
3.22
4.1(a)(iv),
4.1(a)(v)
4.2
Section 6.1(a)(iii)
Section 4.1(a)(iv)
4.1(a)(v)
4.2
6.1(a)(iv)
6.1(a)(v)
6.1(a)(vi)
6.1(a)(vii)
Section 6.1(a)(viii)
6.1(a)(ix)
covenant defeasance option
If the Company exercises its legal defeasance option, payment of the Securities may not be accelerated because of an Event of Default. If the Company exercises its covenant defeasance option, payment of the Securities may not be accelerated because of an Event of Default specified in (only with respect to ), (only with respect to the covenants subject to such covenant defeasance), ,
Section 6.1(a)(iii)
Section 4.1(a)(iv)
6.1(a)(iv)
6.1(a)(v)
6.1(a)(vi),
 
(but only with respect to a Significant Subsidiary), (but only with respect to a Significant Subsidiary), , or or 6.1(a)(xi).
6.1(a)(vii)
6.1(a)(viii)
6.1(a)(ix)
6.1(a)(x)
Upon satisfaction of the conditions set forth herein and upon request of the Company, the Trustee shall acknowledge in writing the discharge of those obligations that the Company terminates.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of and , the Company's obligations in , , , , , , , , , , , , , , , , (with respect to legal defeasance), , , and shall survive until the Securities have been paid in full. Thereafter, the Company's obligations in , , and shall survive.
Sections 8.1(a)
(b)
Sections 2.2
2.3
2.4
2.5
2.6
2.9
2.10
2.11
2.12
3.1
6.7
6.8
7.1
7.2
7.6
7.7
8.1(b)
8.3
8.4
8.5
8.6
Sections 6.7
7.6
8.4
8.5
SECTION 8.2. . The Company may exercise its legal defeasance option or its covenant defeasance option only if:
Conditions to Defeasance
(i) the Company must irrevocably deposit with the Trustee, in trust, for the benefit of the Holders, cash in U.S. dollars, U.S. Government Obligations, or a combination of cash in U.S. dollars and U.S. Government Obligations, in such amounts as shall be sufficient, in the opinion of a nationally recognized firm of independent public accountants, to pay the principal of, or interest and premium, if any, on the outstanding Securities issued hereunder on the Stated Maturity or on the applicable Redemption Date, as the case may be, and the Company must specify whether the notes are being defeased to maturity or to a particular Redemption Date;
(ii) in the case of legal defeasance, the Company has delivered to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel reasonably acceptable to the Trustee confirming that, subject to customary assumptions and exclusions, (a) the Company has received from, or there has been published by, the Internal Revenue Service a ruling or (b) since the date of the Indenture, there has been a change in the applicable federal income tax law, in either case to the effect that, and based thereon such Opinion of Counsel shall confirm that, the Holders shall not recognize income, gain or loss for federal income tax purposes as a result of such legal defeasance and shall be subject to federal income tax on the same amounts, in the same manner and at the same times as would have been the case if such legal defeasance had not occurred;
(iii) in the case of covenant defeasance, the Company has delivered to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel reasonably acceptable to the Trustee confirming that, subject to customary assumptions and exclusions, the Holders of the respective outstanding Securities shall not recognize income, gain or loss for federal income tax purposes as a result of such covenant defeasance and shall be subject to federal income tax on the same amounts, in the same manner and at the same times as would have been the case if such covenant defeasance had not occurred;
 
(iv) such legal defeasance or covenant defeasance shall not result in a breach or violation of, or constitute a default under any material agreement or instrument (other than the Indenture) to which the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries is bound;
(v) no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing on the date of such deposit (other than a Default or Event of Default resulting from the borrowing of funds to be applied to such deposit and the grant of any Lien securing such borrowings);
(vi) the Company must deliver to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel to the effect that, assuming, among other things, no intervening bankruptcy of the Company between the date of deposit and the 91st day following the deposit and assuming that no Holder is an "insider" of the Company under applicable bankruptcy law, after the 91st day following the deposit, the trust funds shall not be subject to the effect of Section 547 of Title 11 of the United States Code;
(vii) the Company must deliver to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate stating that the deposit was not made by the Company with the intent of defeating, hindering, delaying or defrauding creditors of the Company or others; and
(viii) the Company delivers to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel (which Opinion of Counsel may be subject to customary assumptions and exclusions), each stating that all conditions precedent to the defeasance and discharge of the Securities and this Indenture as contemplated by this have been complied with.
Article VIII
SECTION 8.3. . The Trustee shall hold in trust money or U.S. Government Obligations deposited with it pursuant to this . It shall apply the deposited money and the money from U.S. Government Obligations through the Paying Agent and in accordance with this Indenture to the payment of principal of and interest on the Securities.
Application of Trust Money
Article VIII
SECTION 8.4. . Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the Trustee shall deliver or pay to the Company from time to time upon Company Order any money or U.S. Government Obligations held by it as provided in this which, in the opinion of a nationally recognized firm of independent public accountants expressed in a written certification thereof delivered to the Trustee, are in excess of the amount thereof which would then be required to be deposited to effect legal defeasance or covenant defeasance, as applicable, that the Trustee shall not be required to liquidate any U.S. Government Obligations in order to comply with the provisions of this paragraph.
Repayment to Company
Article VIII
provided
Subject to any applicable abandoned property law, the Trustee and the Paying Agent shall pay to the Company upon written request any money held by them for the payment of principal of or interest on the Securities that remains unclaimed for two years, and, thereafter, Holders entitled to the money must look to the Company for payment as general creditors.
 
SECTION 8.5. . The Company shall pay and shall indemnify the Trustee against any tax, fee or other charge imposed on or assessed against deposited U.S. Government Obligations or the principal and interest received on such U.S. Government Obligations.
Indemnity for U.S. Government Obligations
SECTION 8.6. . If the Trustee or Paying Agent is unable to apply any money or U.S. Government Obligations in accordance with this by reason of any legal proceeding or by reason of any order or judgment of any court or governmental authority enjoining, restraining or otherwise prohibiting such application, the obligations of the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor under this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement shall be revived and reinstated as though no deposit had occurred pursuant to this until such time as the Trustee or Paying Agent is permitted to apply all such money or U.S. Government Obligations in accordance with this ; , that, if the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors have made any payment of interest on or principal of any Securities because of the reinstatement of its obligations, the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors, as the case may be, shall be subrogated to the rights of the Holders of such Securities to receive such payment from the money or U.S. Government Obligations held by the Trustee or Paying Agent.
Reinstatement
Article VIII
Article VIII
Article VIII
provided, however
SECTION 9.1. . The Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may amend this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement without notice to or consent of any Holder:
Without Consent of Holders
(i) to cure any ambiguity, omission, defect or inconsistency;
(ii) to comply with (i)  in respect of the assumption by a Successor Company of an obligation of the Company under this Indenture, the Securities, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement and (ii)  and in respect of the assumption by a Person of the obligations of a Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee, this Indenture, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement;
Article IV
Article IV
Article X
(iii) to provide for uncertificated Securities in addition to or in place of certificated Securities; that the uncertificated Securities are issued in registered form for purposes of Section 163(f) of the Code or in a manner such that the uncertificated Securities are described in Section 163(f)(2)(B) of the Code;
provided,
 
(iv) to add Guarantees with respect to the Securities or to release a Subsidiary Guarantor from its obligations under its Subsidiary Guarantee or this Indenture in accordance with the applicable provisions of this Indenture;
(v) to pledge or grant a security interest in favor of the Collateral Agent as additional security for the payment and performance of the Company's and Subsidiary Guarantors' obligations with respect to the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees thereof, in any property or assets, including any that are required to be mortgaged, pledged or hypothecated or in which a security interest is required to be granted, to the Collateral Agent pursuant to the Collateral Documents or otherwise;
(vi) to release Liens in favor of the Collateral Agent in the Collateral as provided under or otherwise in accordance with the terms of this Indenture, Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement;
Section 11.6
(vii) to add to the covenants of the Company for the benefit of the Holders or to surrender any right or power herein conferred upon the Company;
(viii) to make any change that does not adversely affect the rights of any Holder in any material respect;
(ix) comply with any requirement of the SEC in connection with the qualification of the Indenture under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended;
(x) provide for the appointment of a successor trustee; that the successor trustee is otherwise qualified and eligible to act as such under the terms of the Indenture; or
provided
(xi) conform the text of the Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees to any provision of the "Description of notes" Section of the Company's Offering Memorandum dated August 11, 2009, relating to the initial offering of the Securities, to the extent that such provision in the "Description of notes" is intended to be a verbatim recitation of a provision of the Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees.
After an amendment under this Section becomes effective, the Company shall mail to Holders a notice briefly describing such amendment. The failure to give such notice to all Holders, or any defect therein, shall not impair or affect the validity of an amendment under this Section. A consent to any amendment, supplement or waiver under the Indenture by any Holder given in connection with a tender of such Holder's Security shall not be rendered invalid by such tender.
Holders shall be deemed to have consented for purposes of the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement to any of the following amendments, waivers and other modifications to the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement:
 
(1) (A) to add other parties (or any authorized agent thereof or trustee therefor) holding Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness that are Incurred in compliance with the ABL Facility, the Indenture and the Collateral Documents, (B) to establish that the Liens on any First-Priority Collateral securing such Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness shall be pari passu under the Intercreditor Agreement with the Liens on such First-Priority Collateral securing the Obligations under this Indenture and the Securities, all on the terms provided for in the Intercreditor Agreement in effect immediately prior to such amendment and (C) to establish that the Liens on any Second-Priority Collateral securing such Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness shall be pari passu under the Intercreditor Agreement with the Liens on such Second-Priority Collateral securing the Obligations under this Indenture and the Securities and junior and subordinated to the Liens on such Second-Priority Collateral securing any obligations under the ABL Facility, all on the terms provided for in the Intercreditor Agreement as in effect immediately prior to such amendment;
(2) (A) to add other parties (or any authorized agent thereof or trustee therefor) holding Indebtedness that is incurred in compliance with the ABL Facility and this Indenture and the Collateral Documents, (B) to establish that the Liens on any Second-Priority Collateral securing such Indebtedness shall be pari passu under the Intercreditor Agreement with the Liens on such Second-Priority Collateral securing the obligations under the ABL Facility and senior to the Liens on such Second-Priority Collateral securing any obligations under this Indenture and the Securities, all on the terms provided for in the Intercreditor Agreement in effect immediately prior to such amendment and (C) to establish that the Liens on any First-Priority Collateral securing such Indebtedness shall be junior and subordinated to the Liens on such First-Priority Collateral securing any obligations under this Indenture and the Securities, all on the terms provided for in the Intercreditor Agreement in effect immediately prior to such amendment;
(3) to effectuate the release of assets included in the Second-Priority Collateral from the Liens securing the Securities (x) if all other Liens on those assets securing the Obligations (including all commitments thereunder) under the ABL Facility and other Indebtedness are released (other than (i) Trademark Collateral or (ii) in connection with a cancellation or termination of the ABL Facility without a replacement thereof) or (y) if those assets are owned by a Subsidiary that is a Subsidiary Guarantor and that Subsidiary Guarantor is released from its Guarantee in accordance with the terms of this Indenture;
(4) to establish that the Liens on any ABL Collateral securing any Indebtedness replacing the ABL Facility permitted to be incurred under shall be senior to the Liens on such ABL Collateral securing any obligations under this Indenture, the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees, and any obligations under this Indenture, the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees shall continue to be secured on a first-priority basis by the First-Priority Collateral and on a second-priority basis on the Second-Priority Collateral; and
Section 3.3(b)(ii)
 
(5) upon any cancellation or termination of the ABL Facility without a replacement thereof to establish that the Second-Priority Collateral shall become First-Priority Collateral.
Any such additional party and the ABL Agent, Trustee and the Collateral Agent shall be entitled to conclusively rely upon an Officer's Certificate certifying that such Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness or Indebtedness, as the case may be, was issued or borrowed in compliance with the ABL Facility and this Indenture and the Collateral Documents.
SECTION 9.2. . The Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may amend or supplement this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement with the written consent of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Securities then outstanding (including without limitation, consents obtained in connection with a purchase of, or tender offer or exchange offer for, Securities). Subject to clause (a)(vi) of , any past default or compliance with the provisions of this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement (other than a Default or Event of Default in the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, or interest on a Security (except in accordance with )) may be waived with the written consent of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Securities then outstanding (including, without limitation, consents obtained in connection with a purchase of, or tender offer or exchange offer for, Securities). However, without the consent of each Holder of an outstanding Security affected, an amendment, supplement or waiver may not:
With Consent of Holders
Section 11.6
Section 6.4
(i) reduce the principal amount of Securities whose Holders must consent to an amendment;
(ii) reduce the rate of or extend the time for payment of interest on any Security;
(iii) reduce the principal of or extend the Stated Maturity of any Security;
(iv) waive a Default or Event of Default in the payment of principal of, or in the payment of, or interest or premium, if any, on the Securities issued hereunder (except a rescission of acceleration of the Securities issued hereunder by the Holders of at least a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities issued hereunder with respect to a nonpayment default and a waiver of the payment default that resulted from such acceleration):
(v) reduce the premium payable upon the redemption or repurchase of any Security or change the time at which any Security may or shall be redeemed or repurchased in accordance with or , whether through an amendment or waiver of provisions in the covenants or otherwise; that any amendments to the definition of "Change of Control" shall not require the consent of each Holder affected;
Section 3.10
Article V
provided
 
(vi) make any Security payable in money other than that stated in the Security;
(vii) impair the right of any Holder to receive payment of principal, premium, if any, and interest on such Holder's Securities on or after the due dates therefor or to institute suit for the enforcement of any payment on or with respect to such Holder's Securities;
(viii) make any change in the amendment provisions that require each Holder's consent or in the waiver provisions;
(ix) modify the Subsidiary Guarantees of any Significant Subsidiary or group of Subsidiary Guarantors that, taken together (as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries) would constitute a Significant Subsidiary in any manner, taken as a whole, materially adverse to the Holders; or
(x) release any Subsidiary Guarantor that is a Significant Subsidiary or group of Subsidiary Guarantors that, taken together (as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary from any of its obligations under its Subsidiary Guarantee or this Indenture, except in compliance with the terms thereof.
In addition, without the consent of the Holders of at least 75% in principal amount of Securities then outstanding, no amendment, supplement or waiver may (1) modify any Collateral Document or the provisions in this Indenture dealing with Collateral Documents or application of trust moneys in any manner, taken as a whole, materially adverse to the Holders or otherwise release any Collateral other than in accordance with this Indenture, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement or (2) modify the Intercreditor Agreement in any manner adverse to the Holders in any material respect other than in accordance with the terms of this Indenture, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement.
It shall not be necessary for the consent of the Holders under this Section to approve the particular form of any proposed amendment, but it shall be sufficient if such consent approves the substance thereof. A consent to any amendment, supplement or waiver under the Indenture by any Holder given in connection with a tender of such Holder's Security shall not be rendered invalid by such tender.
After an amendment under this Section becomes effective, the Company shall mail to Holders a notice briefly describing such amendment. The failure to give such notice to all Holders, or any defect therein, shall not impair or affect the validity of an amendment under this Section.
SECTION 9.3. . A consent to an amendment, supplement or a waiver by a Holder of a Security shall bind the Holder and every subsequent Holder of that Security or portion of the Security that evidences the same debt as the
Revocation and Effect of Consents and Waivers
 
consenting Holder's Security, even if notation of the consent or waiver is not made on the Security. However, any such Holder or subsequent Holder may revoke the consent or waiver as to such Holder's Security or portion of the Security if the Trustee receives the notice of revocation before the date the amendment, supplement or waiver becomes effective. After an amendment or waiver becomes effective, it shall bind every Holder unless it makes a change described in clauses (i) through (x) of , in which case the amendment, supplement or waiver or other action shall bind each Holder who has consented to it and every subsequent Holder that evidences the same debt as the consenting Holder's Securities. An amendment or waiver made pursuant to shall become effective upon receipt by the Trustee of the requisite number of written consents.
Section 9.2
Section 9.2
The Company may, but shall not be obligated to, fix a record date for the purpose of determining the Holders entitled to give their consent or take any other action described above or required or permitted to be taken pursuant to this Indenture. If a record date is fixed, then notwithstanding the immediately preceding paragraph, those Persons who were Holders at such record date (or their duly designated proxies), and only those Persons, shall be entitled to give such consent or to revoke any consent previously given or to take any such action, whether or not such Persons continue to be Holders after such record date. No such consent shall become valid or effective more than 120 days after such record date.
SECTION 9.4. . If an amendment changes the terms of a Security, the Trustee may require the Holder of the Security to deliver it to the Trustee. The Trustee may place an appropriate notation on the Security regarding the changed terms and return it to the Holder. Alternatively, if the Company or the Trustee so determines, the Company in exchange for the Security shall issue and the Trustee shall authenticate a new Security that reflects the changed terms. Failure to make the appropriate notation or to issue a new Security shall not affect the validity of such amendment.
Notation on or Exchange of Securities
SECTION 9.5. . The Trustee shall sign any amendment, supplement or waiver authorized pursuant to this if the amendment, supplement or waiver does not, in the sole determination of the Trustee, adversely affect the rights, duties, liabilities or immunities of the Trustee. If it does, the Trustee may but need not sign it. In signing any amendment, supplement or waiver pursuant to this Article IX, the Trustee shall be entitled to receive, and (subject to and ) shall be fully protected in relying upon, an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel stating that such amendment, supplement or waiver is authorized or permitted by this Indenture and that such amendment, supplement or waiver is the legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company and any Subsidiary Guarantors, enforceable against them in accordance with its terms, subject to customary exceptions, and complies with the provisions hereof (including ). Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Opinion of Counsel will be required for the Trustee to execute any amendment or supplement adding a new Subsidiary Guarantor under this Indenture.
Trustee To Sign Amendments
Article IX
Section 7.1
7.2
Section 9.3
 
SECTION 10.1. . Subject to the provisions of this , each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby fully, unconditionally and irrevocably guarantees, as primary obligor and not merely as surety, jointly and severally with each other Subsidiary Guarantor, to each Holder of the Securities, to the extent lawful, and the Trustee the full and punctual payment when due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, by redemption or otherwise, of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Securities and all other obligations and liabilities of the Company under this Indenture (including, without limitation, interest accruing after the filing of any petition in bankruptcy, or the commencement of any insolvency, reorganization or like proceeding, relating to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor whether or not a claim for post-filing or post-petition interest is allowed in such proceeding and the obligations under ), the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement (all the foregoing being hereinafter collectively called the ""). Each Subsidiary Guarantor agrees that the Guarantor Obligations shall rank equally in right of payment with other Indebtedness of such Subsidiary Guarantor, except to the extent such other Indebtedness is expressly subordinated to the Guarantor Obligations, in which case the Guarantor Obligations shall rank senior in right of payment to such other Indebtedness. Each Subsidiary Guarantor further agrees (to the extent lawful) that the Guarantor Obligations may be extended or renewed, in whole or in part, without notice or further assent from it, and that it shall remain bound under this notwithstanding any extension or renewal of any Guarantor Obligation.
Subsidiary Guarantee
Article X
Section 7.6
Guarantor Obligations
Article X
Each Subsidiary Guarantor waives (to the extent lawful) presentation to, demand of, payment from and protest to the Company of any of the Guarantor Obligations and also waives (to the extent lawful) notice of protest for nonpayment. Each Subsidiary Guarantor waives (to the extent lawful) notice of any default under the Securities or the Guarantor Obligations.
Each Subsidiary Guarantor further agrees that its Subsidiary Guarantee herein constitutes a Guarantee of payment when due (and not a Guarantee of collection) and waives any right to require that any resort be had by any Holder to any security held for payment of the Guarantor Obligations.
Except as set forth in , and , the obligations of each Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination for any reason (other than payment of the Guarantor Obligations in full), including any claim of waiver, release, surrender, alteration or compromise, and shall not (to the extent lawful) be subject to any defense of setoff, counterclaim, recoupment or termination whatsoever or by reason of the invalidity, illegality or unenforceability of the Guarantor Obligations or otherwise. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the obligations of each Subsidiary Guarantor herein shall not (to the extent lawful) be discharged or impaired or otherwise affected by (a) the failure of any Holder to assert any claim or demand or to enforce any right or remedy against the Company or any other person under this Indenture, the
Section 4.2
Section 10.2
Article VIII
 
Securities, the Collateral Documents, the Intercreditor Agreement or any other agreement or otherwise; (b) any extension or renewal of any thereof; (c) any rescission, waiver, amendment or modification of any of the terms or provisions of this Indenture, the Securities, the Collateral Documents, the Intercreditor Agreement or any other agreement; (d) the release of any security held by any Holder or the Collateral Agent for the Guarantor Obligations or any of them; (e) the failure of any Holder to exercise any right or remedy against any other Subsidiary Guarantor; (f) any change in the ownership of the Company; (g) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the performance of the Guarantor Obligations, or (h) any other act or thing or omission or delay to do any other act or thing which may or might in any manner or to any extent vary the risk of any Subsidiary Guarantor or would otherwise operate as a discharge of such Subsidiary Guarantor as a matter of law or equity.
Each Subsidiary Guarantor agrees that its Subsidiary Guarantee herein shall remain in full force and effect until payment in full of all the Guarantor Obligations or such Subsidiary Guarantor is released from its Subsidiary Guarantee in compliance with , and . Each Subsidiary Guarantor further agrees that its Subsidiary Guarantee herein shall continue to be effective or be reinstated, as the case may be, if at any time payment, or any part thereof, of principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any of the Guarantor Obligations is rescinded or must otherwise be restored by any Holder upon the bankruptcy or reorganization of the Company or otherwise.
Section 4.2
Section 10.2
Article VIII
In furtherance of the foregoing and not in limitation of any other right which any Holder has at law or in equity against any Subsidiary Guarantor by virtue hereof, upon the failure of the Company to pay any of the Guarantor Obligations when and as the same shall become due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, by redemption or otherwise, each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby promises to and shall, upon receipt of written demand by the Trustee, forthwith pay, or cause to be paid, in cash, to the Trustee or the Trustee on behalf of the Holders an amount equal to the sum of (i) the unpaid amount of such Guarantor Obligations then due and owing and (ii) accrued and unpaid interest on such Guarantor Obligations then due and owing (but only to the extent not prohibited by law)(including interest accruing after the filing of any petition in bankruptcy or the commencement of any insolvency, reorganization or like proceeding relating to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor whether or not a claim for post-filing or post-petition interest is allowed in such proceeding).
Each Subsidiary Guarantor further agrees that, as between such Subsidiary Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Holders, on the other hand, (x) the maturity of the Guarantor Obligations guaranteed hereby may be accelerated as provided in this Indenture for the purposes of its Subsidiary Guarantee herein, notwithstanding any stay, injunction or other prohibition preventing such acceleration in respect of the Guarantor Obligations guaranteed hereby and (y) in the event of any such declaration of acceleration of such Guarantor Obligations, such Guarantor Obligations (whether or not due and payable) shall forthwith become due and payable by the Subsidiary Guarantor for the purposes of this Subsidiary Guarantee.
 
Each Subsidiary Guarantor also agrees to pay any and all reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) incurred by the Trustee or the Holders in enforcing any rights under this Section.
Neither the Company nor the Subsidiary Guarantors shall be required to make a notation on the Securities to reflect any Subsidiary Guarantee or any release, termination or discharge thereof and any such notation shall not be a condition to the validity of any Subsidiary Guarantee.
SECTION 10.2. . Any term or provision of this Indenture to the contrary notwithstanding, the obligations of each Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder shall be limited to the maximum amount as shall, after giving effect to all other contingent and fixed liabilities of such Subsidiary Guarantor (including, without limitation, any guarantees under all Debt Facilities) and after giving effect to any collections from or payments made by or on behalf of any other Subsidiary Guarantor in respect of the obligations of such other Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee or pursuant to its contribution obligations under this Indenture, result in the obligations of such Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee not constituting a fraudulent conveyance or fraudulent transfer under federal or state law and not otherwise being void or voidable under any similar laws affecting the rights of creditors generally.
Limitation on Liability; Termination, Release and Discharge
(a) A Subsidiary Guarantee by a Subsidiary Guarantor will be automatically and unconditionally released and discharged, and each Subsidiary Guarantor and its obligations under the Subsidiary Guarantee, this Indenture, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement will be released and discharged, upon any sale, exchange, transfer or disposition of (whether by merger, consolidation or the sale of) the Capital Stock of such Subsidiary Guarantor after which the applicable Subsidiary Guarantor is no longer a Restricted Subsidiary or the sale of all or substantially all the assets (other than by lease) of such Subsidiary Guarantor, whether or not such Subsidiary Guarantor is the surviving corporation in such transaction to a Person which is not the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary; that (x) such sale, exchange, transfer or disposition is made in compliance with the Indenture, including (it being understood that only such portion, if any, of the Net Available Cash as is required to be applied on or before the date of such release in accordance with the terms of this Indenture needs to be applied in accordance therewith at such time) and Article IV and (y) all the obligations of such Subsidiary Guarantor under all Indebtedness of the Company or its Restricted Subsidiaries terminate upon consummation of such transaction.
provided
Section 3.8
(b) Each Subsidiary Guarantor shall be deemed released from all its obligations under this Indenture, its Subsidiary Guarantee, the Collateral Documents to which it is a party and the Intercreditor Agreement, and such Subsidiary Guarantee shall terminate, upon the legal defeasance or covenant defeasance of the Securities or upon satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture, in each case pursuant to the provisions of hereof.
Article VIII
(c) A Subsidiary Guarantee of a Subsidiary Guarantor shall be automatically and unconditionally released and discharged, and the Subsidiary Guarantor and its obligations
 
under this Indenture, the Collateral Documents to which it is a party and the Intercreditor Agreement shall be released and discharged in the event that such Subsidiary Guarantor is released and discharged from its Guarantee of Indebtedness of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors under the ABL Facility (including by reason of the termination of the ABL Facility), all other Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries and/or the Guarantee that resulted in the obligation of such Subsidiary Guarantor to guarantee the Securities, if such Subsidiary Guarantor would not then otherwise be required to guarantee the Securities pursuant to this Indenture (and treating any Guarantees of such Subsidiary Guarantor that remain outstanding as Incurred at least 30 days prior to such release or discharge), except a discharge or release by or as a result of payment under such Guarantee, this Indenture, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement; , that if such Person has Incurred any Indebtedness or issued any Preferred Stock or Disqualified Stock in reliance on its status as a Subsidiary Guarantor under , such Subsidiary Guarantor's obligations under such Indebtedness, Disqualified Stock or Preferred Stock, as the case may be, so Incurred are satisfied in full and discharged or are otherwise permitted to be Incurred by a Restricted Subsidiary (other than a Subsidiary Guarantor) under .
provided
Section 3.3
Section 3.3(b)
(d) Each Subsidiary Guarantor shall be released from its obligations under this Indenture, its Subsidiary Guarantee, the Collateral Documents to which it is a party and the Intercreditor Agreement if the Company designates such Subsidiary Guarantor as an Unrestricted Subsidiary and such designation complies with the other applicable provisions of this Indenture.
(e) In the case of paragraph (b) above, such Subsidiary Guarantor shall deliver to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that all conditions precedent provided for in this Indenture relating to such transaction have been complied with.
(f) The release of a Subsidiary Guarantor from its Subsidiary Guarantee, and its obligations under this Indenture, the Collateral Documents to which it is a party and the Intercreditor Agreement in accordance with the provisions of this shall not preclude the future applications of to such Person.
Section 10.2
Section 3.11
SECTION 10.3. . Each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby agrees that to the extent that any Subsidiary Guarantor shall have paid more than its proportionate share of any payment made on the obligations under the Subsidiary Guarantees, such Subsidiary Guarantor shall be entitled to seek and receive contribution from and against the Company or any other Subsidiary Guarantor who has not paid its proportionate share of such payment. The provisions of this shall in no respect limit the obligations and liabilities of each Subsidiary Guarantor to the Trustee and the Holders and each Subsidiary Guarantor shall remain liable to the Trustee and the Holders for the full amount guaranteed by such Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder.
Right of Contribution
Section 10.3
SECTION 10.4. . Notwithstanding any payment or payments made by each Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder, no Subsidiary Guarantor shall be entitled to be
No Subrogation
 
subrogated to any of the rights of the Trustee or any Holder against the Company or any other Subsidiary Guarantor or any collateral security or guarantee or right of offset held by the Trustee or any Holder for the payment of the Guarantor Obligations, nor shall any Subsidiary Guarantor seek or be entitled to seek any contribution or reimbursement from the Company or any other Subsidiary Guarantor in respect of payments made by such Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder, until all amounts owing to the Trustee and the Holders by the Company on account of the Guarantor Obligations are paid in full. If any amount shall be paid to any Subsidiary Guarantor on account of such subrogation rights at any time when all of the Guarantor Obligations shall not have been paid in full, such amount shall be held by such Subsidiary Guarantor in trust for the Trustee and the Holders, segregated from other funds of such Subsidiary Guarantor, and shall, forthwith upon receipt by such Subsidiary Guarantor, be turned over to the Trustee in the exact form received by such Subsidiary Guarantor (duly indorsed by such Subsidiary Guarantor to the Trustee, if required), to be applied against the Guarantor Obligations.
SECTION 11.1. .
The Collateral
(a) The due and punctual payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees thereof when and as the same shall be due and payable, whether on an interest payment date, at maturity, by acceleration, repurchase, redemption or otherwise, interest on the overdue principal of and interest (to the extent lawful), if any, on the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees thereof and performance of all other obligations under this Indenture, including, without limitation, the obligations of the Company set forth in and herein, and the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees thereof and the Collateral Documents, shall be secured by (i) first-priority Liens and security interests and (ii) second-priority Liens and security interests, in each case subject to Permitted Liens, as provided in the Collateral Documents which the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors, as the case may be, have entered into simultaneously with the execution of this Indenture and shall be secured by all Collateral Documents hereafter delivered as required or permitted by this Indenture, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement.
Section 7.6
Section 8.6
(b) The Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors hereby agree that the Collateral Agent shall hold the Collateral in trust for the benefit of all of the Holders and the Trustee, in each case pursuant to the terms of the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement and the Collateral Agent is hereby authorized to execute and deliver the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement.
(c) Each Holder, by its acceptance of any Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees thereof, consents and agrees to the terms of the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement (including, without limitation, the provisions providing for foreclosure) as the same may be in effect or as may be amended from time to time in
 
accordance with their terms and authorizes and directs the Collateral Agent to perform its obligations and exercise its rights under the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement in accordance therewith.
(d) The Trustee and each Holder, by accepting the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees thereof, acknowledges that, as more fully set forth in the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement, the Collateral as now or hereafter constituted shall be held for the benefit of all the Holders and the Trustee, and that the Lien of this Indenture and the Collateral Documents in respect of the Trustee and the Holders is subject to and qualified and limited in all respects by the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement and actions that may be taken thereunder.
SECTION 11.2. .
Further Assurances
(a) The Company shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary Guarantor to, at their sole expense, do or cause to be done all acts which may be reasonably necessary, if requested by the Collateral Agent, to confirm that the Collateral Agent holds, for the benefit of the Holders and the Trustee, duly created, enforceable and perfected first or second priority Liens and security interests, as applicable, in the Collateral (subject to Permitted Liens) to the extent required by this Indenture, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement.
(b) As necessary, or upon request of the Collateral Agent or the Trustee, the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors shall, at their sole expense, execute, acknowledge and deliver such documents and instruments and take such other actions, which may be necessary, or as the Collateral Agent or the Trustee may reasonably request, to assure, perfect, transfer and confirm the property and rights and priority of Liens created or intended to be created by the Collateral Documents, including with respect to after-acquired Collateral, to the extent required thereunder. If the Company or such Subsidiary fails to do so, the Trustee is hereby irrevocably authorized and empowered, with full power of substitution, to execute, acknowledge and deliver such Collateral Documents, the Intercreditor Agreement, instruments, certificates, notices and other documents and, subject to the provisions of the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement, take such other actions in the name, place and stead of the Company or such Subsidiary, but the Trustee shall have no obligation to do so and no liability for any action taken or omitted by it in good faith in connection therewith.
SECTION 11.3. . Neither the Company nor any of its Restricted Subsidiaries shall take or omit to take any action which would materially adversely affect or impair the Liens in favor of the Collateral Agent and the Holders with respect to the Collateral. Neither the Company nor any of its Restricted Subsidiaries shall grant to any Person, or permit any Person to retain (other than the Collateral Agent), any interest whatsoever in the Collateral, other than Permitted Liens. Neither the Company nor any of its Restricted Subsidiaries shall enter into any agreement that requires the proceeds received from any sale of Collateral to be applied to repay, redeem, defease or otherwise acquire or retire any Indebtedness of any Person, other than as permitted by this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary
Impairment of Security Interest
 
Guarantees, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement. The Company shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary Guarantor to, at its sole cost and expense, execute and deliver all such agreements and instruments as necessary, or as the Trustee reasonably requests, to more fully or accurately describe the assets and property intended to be Collateral or the obligations intended to be secured by the Collateral Documents.
SECTION 11.4. . Subject to Permitted Liens and the terms of the Collateral Documents, upon the acquisition by the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor after the Issue Date of (1) any after-acquired real property or any equipment or fixtures which constitute accretions, additions or technological upgrades to the equipment or fixtures that, in any such case forms part of the First-Priority Collateral or Second-Priority Collateral, as applicable, or (2) any material Additional Assets that are required to become Collateral pursuant to , the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor shall execute and deliver (i) with regard to any real property that is a Bowling Asset with a Gross PPE of $0.3 million or more with a fair market value of $0.3 million, the items described under within 60 days of the date of acquisition and (ii) to the extent required by the Collateral Documents, any information, documentation or other certificates as may be necessary to vest in the Collateral Agent a perfected security interest, subjected only to Permitted Liens, in such after-acquired property (other than Excluded Assets) and to have such after-acquired property added to the Collateral, and thereupon all provisions of this Indenture, the Securities, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement relating to the Collateral shall be deemed to relate to such after-acquired property to the same extent and with the same force and effect.
After-Acquired Property
Section 3.8
Section 11.5
Upon the acquisition by the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor of any after-acquired assets that would constitute Second-Priority Collateral after the Issue Date, the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor shall execute and deliver any information, documentation or other instruments, and shall take such further actions (including the filing and recording of financing statements, fixture filings, mortgages, deeds of trust and other documents) as may be necessary to vest in the Collateral Agent a perfected security interest, subject to Permitted Liens, in such after-acquired property in substantially the same form, to the same extent and substantially concurrently as the ABL Agent, except that the Collateral Agent shall have a second-priority lien in such Second-Priority Collateral.
SECTION 11.5. . (a) With respect to the applicable Premises:
Real Estate Mortgages and Filings
(i) the Company shall deliver to the Collateral Agent, as mortgagee or beneficiary, as applicable, fully executed counterparts of Mortgages, duly executed by the Company or the applicable Subsidiary Guarantor, together with evidence of the completion (or satisfactory arrangements for the completion) of all recordings and filings of such Mortgage (and payment of any taxes or fees in connection therewith) as may be necessary to create a valid, perfected first-priority Lien, subject to Permitted Liens, against the Premises purported to be covered thereby, within 120 days of the Issue Date for Premises with an aggregate value of gross property, plant and equipment before depreciation (as reflected in the Company's records, "") equal to or greater
Gross PPE
 
than 75% of the total Gross PPE of all Premises as of the Issue Date and within 180 days of the Issue Date for the remaining Premises; and to the extent reasonably necessary (as determined in Good Faith by the Company), proper fixture filings under the Uniform Commercial Code on Form UCC-1 for filing under the Uniform Commercial Code in the appropriate jurisdictions in which the Premises are located, in order to perfect the security interests in fixtures purported to be created by the Mortgages in favor of the Collateral Agent for its benefit and for the benefit of the Trustee and the Holders;
(ii) the Collateral Agent shall have received an ALTA policy of title insurance (or commitment to issue such a policy having the effect of a policy of title insurance), which shall insure or commit to insure that the Mortgages insured thereby create valid and enforceable first-priority mortgage or deed of trust Liens on such Premises described therein, in an amount not more than 100% of the fair market value of such Premises as reasonably determined, in Good Faith by the Company and reasonably acceptable to the Collateral Agent, (such policies collectively, the "") and issued by a nationally recognized title insurance company, which reasonably assures the Trustee and the Collateral Agent that the Mortgage on such Premises is a valid and enforceable mortgage Lien, free and clear of all defects and encumbrances except Mortgage Permitted Exceptions, and such title policy shall otherwise be in form and substance as are customary in a transaction of this type and shall include such title endorsements (other than the creditor's rights endorsements which shall not be required) and affirmative coverage as are customary in a transaction of this type, to the extent the same are available in a particular jurisdiction, to the extent the same are applicable to the particular Premises, and to the extent the same are available at commercially reasonable rates and shall be accompanied by evidence of the payment in full of all premiums thereon within 120 days of the Issue Date for Premises with an aggregate Gross PPE equal to or greater than 75% of the total Gross PPE of all Premises as of the Issue Date and within 180 days of the Issue Date for the remaining Premises; that the Mortgage Policies shall contain the standard survey exception and shall not include survey related endorsements, unless the Company delivers surveys pursuant to clause (iii) below and such surveys are satisfactory to the title company for the title company to remove the standard survey exception and issue survey related endorsements at commercially reasonable rates, and that the Collateral Agent shall accept a zoning letter or zoning report in lieu of a zoning endorsement for a particular Premise should the cost of obtaining a zoning endorsement exceed the cost of obtaining a zoning letter or zoning report by more than a de minimis amount;
Mortgage Policies
provided
provided further
(iii) the Company shall use reasonable best efforts to, or shall use reasonable best efforts to cause its Subsidiary Guarantors to, deliver to the Collateral Agent, with respect to each of the Premises, any and all surveys, opinions of special counsel, or opinions or reports from architects, engineers or zoning report companies currently in their possession as may be reasonably required to cause the title company to issue the title insurance required pursuant to clause (ii) above within 120 days of the Issue Date for Premises with an aggregate Gross PPE equal to or greater than 75% of the total Gross
 
PPE of all Premises as of the Issue Date and within 180 days of the Issue Date for the remaining Premises; and
(iv) the Company shall, or shall cause its Subsidiary Guarantors to, deliver to the Collateral Agent, with respect to each of the Premises, an opinion of counsel in each jurisdiction where any Premise is located within 120 days of the Issue Date for Premises with an aggregate Gross PPE equal to or greater than 75% of the total Gross PPE of all Premises as of the Issue Date and within 180 days of the Issue Date for the remaining Premises.
(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in subsection (a) above, in the event the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors cannot, with respect to any Bowling Assets that constitute Premises satisfy the delivery requirements as provided in clauses (i) through (iv) under subsection (a) above after using commercially reasonable efforts to do so (""), they shall not be deemed to be in default of their obligations under such clauses if, within the time periods required above, the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors deliver the items described in clauses (i) through (iv) under subsection (a) above with respect to one or more substitute Premises which in the aggregate have a Gross PPE equal to or greater than the Removed Premises, that if, within 180 days of the Issue Date the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors are in compliance with subsection (a) above with respect to the Premises which shall have an aggregate Gross PPE of equal to or greater than 90% of the total Gross PPE of all Premises as of the Issue Date, then a Default shall not be deemed to occur if the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors are unable to satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) with respect to the remaining Premises so long as the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors continue to use commercially reasonable efforts to satisfy such requirements. With respect to any other real property required to be subject to a first-priority Lien pursuant to the provisions of this Indenture, the foregoing obligations shall be completed within 60 days of acquisition.
Removed Premises
provided
SECTION 11.6. .
Release of Liens on the Collateral
(a) The Liens on the Collateral shall be released with respect to the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantors, as applicable:
(i) in whole, upon payment in full of the principal of, accrued and unpaid interest and premium, if any, on the Securities;
(ii) in whole, upon satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture as set forth in hereof;
Section 8.1(a)
(iii) in whole, upon a legal defeasance as set forth in hereof;
Section 8.1(b)
(iv) in part, as to any property constituting Collateral (A) that is sold or otherwise disposed of by the Company or any of the Subsidiary Guarantors in a transaction permitted by and by the Collateral Documents, to the extent of the interest sold or disposed of, or otherwise not prohibited by this Indenture and the
Section 3.8
 
Collateral Documents; (B) that is cash or Net Available Cash withdrawn from the Collateral Accounts for any one or more purposes permitted by ; (C) with respect to Second-Priority Collateral, upon any release, sale or disposition (other than in connection with a cancellation or termination of the ABL Facility without a replacement thereof) of such Second-Priority Collateral pursuant to the terms of the ABL Facility resulting in the release of the Lien on such Collateral securing the ABL Facility, other than with respect to Trademark Collateral; or (D) otherwise in accordance with, and as expressly provided for under, this Indenture or the Intercreditor Agreement;
Section 3.8(a)
(v) in whole as to all Collateral that is owned by a Subsidiary Guarantor that is released from its Subsidiary Guarantee in accordance with this Indenture; and
(vi) with the consent of Holders of seventy five percent (75%) in aggregate principal amount of the Securities (including, without limitation, consents obtained in connection with a tender offer or exchange offer for, or purchase of, Securities),
that, in the case of any release in whole pursuant to this , all amounts owing to the Trustee under this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement have been paid.
provided,
Section 11.6(a)
(b) For the release of Premises that constitute First-Priority Collateral, the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor shall furnish to the Trustee, prior to each proposed release of such First-Priority Collateral pursuant to the Collateral Documents and this Indenture, an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel as required under (i) requesting such release and (ii) to the effect that all conditions precedent provided for in this Indenture and the Collateral Documents to such release have been complied with.
Section 12.2
(c) Upon compliance by the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors, as the case may be, with the conditions precedent set forth above, the Trustee or the Collateral Agent shall promptly cause to be released and reconveyed to the Company, or its Subsidiary Guarantors, as the case may be, the released Collateral in accordance with the directions of the Company, or its Subsidiary Guarantor, as the case may be.
(d) The release of any Collateral from the terms of the Collateral Documents shall not be deemed to impair the security under this Indenture in contravention of the provisions hereof or affect the Lien of this Indenture or the Collateral Documents if and to the extent the Collateral is released pursuant to this Indenture, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement or upon the termination of this Indenture.
(e) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary herein, as and when requested by the Company, the Trustee shall instruct the Collateral Agent to execute and deliver Uniform Commercial Code financing statement amendments or releases (which shall be prepared by the Company) solely to the extent necessary to delete Excluded Assets from the description of assets in any previously filed financing statements. If requested in writing by the Company, the Trustee shall instruct the Collateral Agent to execute and deliver such
 
documents, instruments or statements (which shall be prepared by the Company) and to take such other action as the Company may request to evidence or confirm that Excluded Assets described in the immediately preceding sentence has been released from the Liens of each of the Collateral Agreements. The Collateral Agent shall execute and deliver such documents, instruments and statements and shall take all such actions promptly upon receipt of such instructions from the Trustee.
SECTION 11.7. .
Authorization of Actions to be Taken by the Trustee or the Collateral Agent Under the Collateral Documents
(a) Subject to the provisions of the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement, each of the Trustee or the Collateral Agent may, in its sole discretion and without the consent of the Holders, on behalf of the Holders, take all actions it deems necessary or appropriate in order to (i) enforce any of its rights or any of the rights of the Holders under the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement and (ii) collect and receive any and all amounts payable in respect of the Collateral in respect of the obligations of the Company and the Subsidiaries hereunder and thereunder. Subject to the provisions of the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement, the Trustee or the Collateral Agent shall have the power to institute and to maintain such suits and proceedings as it may deem expedient to prevent any impairment of the Collateral by any acts that may be unlawful or in violation of the Collateral Documents, the Intercreditor Agreement or this Indenture, and such suits and proceedings as the Trustee or the Collateral Agent may deem expedient to preserve or protect its interest and the interests of the Holders in the Collateral (including power to institute and maintain suits or proceedings to restrain the enforcement of or compliance with any legislative or other governmental enactment, rule or order that may be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid if the enforcement of, or compliance with, such enactment, rule or order would impair the security interest hereunder or be prejudicial to the interests of the Holders or the Trustee).
(b) The Trustee or the Collateral Agent shall not be responsible for the existence, genuineness or value of any of the Collateral or for the validity, perfection, priority or enforceability of the Liens in any of the Collateral, whether impaired by operation of law or by reason of any action or omission to act on its part hereunder, except to the extent such action or omission constitutes negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct on the part of the Trustee or the Collateral Agent, for the validity or sufficiency of the Collateral or any agreement or assignment contained therein, for the validity of the title of the Company to the Collateral, for insuring the Collateral or for the payment of taxes, charges, assessments or Liens upon the Collateral or otherwise as to the maintenance of the Collateral. The Trustee or the Collateral Agent shall have no responsibility for recording, filing, re-recording or refiling any financing statement, continuation statement, document, instrument or other notice in any public office at any time or times or to otherwise take any action to perfect or maintain the perfection of any security interest granted to it under the Collateral Documents or otherwise.
(c) Where any provision of this Indenture requires that additional property or assets be added to the Collateral, the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor shall deliver to the Trustee or the Collateral Agent the following:
 
(i) a request from the Company that such Collateral be added;
(ii) the form of instrument adding such Collateral, which, based on the type and location of the property subject thereto, shall be in substantially the form of the applicable Collateral Documents entered into on the date of this Indenture, with such changes thereto as the Company shall consider appropriate, or in such other form as the Company shall deem proper; that any such changes or such form are administratively satisfactory to the Trustee or the Collateral Agent;
provided
(iii) an Officers' Certificate to the effect that the Collateral being added is in the form, consists of the assets and is in the amount or otherwise has the fair market value required by this Indenture; and
(iv) an Officers' Certificate and Opinion of Counsel to the effect that all conditions precedent provided for in this Indenture to the addition of such Collateral have been complied with, which Opinion of Counsel shall also opine as to the creation and perfection of the Collateral Agent's Lien on such Collateral and as to the due authorization, execution and delivery, validity and enforceability of the Collateral Document being entered into; and
(v) such financing statements, if any, as the Company shall deem necessary to perfect the Collateral Agent's security interest in such Collateral.
(d) The Trustee or the Collateral Agent, in giving any consent or approval under the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement, shall be entitled to receive, as a condition to such consent or approval, an Officers' Certificate to the effect that the action or omission for which consent or approval is to be given does not violate this Indenture, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement, and the Trustee or the Collateral Agent shall be fully protected in giving such consent or approval on the basis of such Officers' Certificate.
SECTION 11.8. .
Collateral Accounts
(a) The Trustee and Collateral Agent, as applicable, are authorized to receive any funds for the benefit of the Holders distributed under, and in accordance with, the Collateral Documents, and to make further distributions of such funds to the Holders according to the provisions of this Indenture, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement.
(b) The Collateral Agent shall establish the Collateral Accounts when and as needed. Such Collateral Accounts shall at all times thereafter until this Indenture shall have terminated, be maintained with, and under the sole control of, the Collateral Agent. The Collateral Accounts shall be trust accounts and shall be established and maintained by the Collateral Agent at one of its corporate trust offices (which may include the Corporate Trust Office) and all Collateral shall be credited thereto. All cash and Cash Equivalents received by
 
the Trustee and/or Collateral Agent from Asset Dispositions of First-Priority Collateral, Recovery Events, foreclosures of or sales of First-Priority Collateral, Net Insurance Proceeds and other awards or proceeds pursuant to the Collateral Documents, including earnings, revenues, rents, issues, profits and income from the Collateral received pursuant to the Collateral Documents, shall be deposited in the Collateral Account, and thereafter shall be held, applied and/or disbursed by the Trustee or the Collateral Agent, as applicable, in accordance with the terms of this Indenture (including, without limitation, , and . In connection with any and all deposits to be made into the Collateral Accounts under this Indenture, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement, the Trustee and/or the Collateral Agent, as applicable, shall receive an Officers' Certificate identifying which Collateral Account shall receive such deposit and directing the Trustee and/or the Collateral Agent to make such deposit.
Sections 3.8
6.10
11.8(a)
(c) Pending the distribution of funds in the Collateral Accounts in accordance with the provisions hereof and provided that no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, the Company may direct the Trustee and/or the Collateral Agent to invest such funds in Cash Equivalents specified in such direction, such investments to mature by the times such funds are needed hereunder and such direction to certify that such funds constitute Cash Equivalents and that no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing. So long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, the Company may direct the Trustee and/or the Collateral Agent to sell, liquidate or cause the redemption of any such investments, such direction to certify that no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing. Any gain or income on any investment of funds in the Collateral Accounts shall be credited to such Collateral Account. Neither the Trustee nor the Collateral Agent shall have any liability for any loss incurred in connection with any investment or any sale, liquidation or redemption thereof made in accordance with the provisions of this .
Section 11.8(c)
SECTION 11.9. . In the event any ABL Agent releases its first-priority security interest in any Trademark Collateral, the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees will be secured by the Trademark Collateral on a first-priority basis; that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors may use the Trademark Collateral to secure Indebtedness Incurred under or on a first-priority basis and the Trademark Collateral shall then secure the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees on a second-priority basis.
Trademark Collateral
provided
Section 3.3(b)(ii)(x)(A)
Section 3.3(b)(v)
SECTION 11.10. . If Indebtedness is Incurred (i) under Section 3.3(b)(ii)(x)(A) and is permitted to be secured by the Trademark Collateral on a first-priority basis after the release thereof by the ABL Agent or (ii) to refinance the 2013 Notes and such Indebtedness is secured by a first-priority Lien on any ABL Collateral released by the ABL Agent, and in either case, the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees are secured on a second-priority Lien by such asset in accordance with clause (24) of the definition of "Permitted Liens", the Collateral Agent and the representative of the holders of such Indebtedness shall enter into an intercreditor agreement with terms substantially similar to the Intercreditor Agreement.
Additional Intercreditor Agreements
 
SECTION 12.1. . Notices given by publication shall be deemed given on the first date on which publication is made, and notices given by first-class mail, postage prepaid, shall be deemed given five calendar days after mailing. Any notice or communication shall be in writing and delivered in person or mailed by first-class mail addressed as follows:
Notices
if to the Company or to any Subsidiary Guarantor:
Brunswick Corporation
1 N. Field Ct., Lake Forest,
Illinois 60045-4811
Attention: William Metzger, Vice President and Treasurer
Facsimile No.: (847) 735-4359
With a copy to:
Cravath Swaine & Moore LLP
Worldwide Plaza
825 Eight Avenue
New York, NY 10019
Attention: Andrew Pitts, Esq.
Facsimile No.: (212) 474-3700
if to the Trustee:
The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company
2 North LaSalle Street
Suite 1020
Chicago, Illinois 60602
Fax No.: (312) 827-8542
The Company or the Trustee by notice to the other may designate additional or different addresses for subsequent notices or communications.
Any notice or communication mailed to a Holder shall be mailed to the Holder at the Holder's address as it appears on the registration books of the Registrar and shall be sufficiently given if so mailed within the time prescribed.
Failure to mail a notice or communication to a Holder or any defect in it shall not affect its sufficiency with respect to other Holders. If a notice or communication is mailed in the manner provided above, it is duly given, whether or not the addressee receives it.
 
SECTION 12.2. . Upon any request or application by the Company to the Trustee to take or refrain from taking any action under this Indenture, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement (except in connection with the original issuance of Securities on the date hereof), the Company shall furnish to the Trustee:
Certificate and Opinion as to Conditions Precedent
(i) an Officers' Certificate in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee stating that, in the opinion of the signers, all conditions precedent, if any, provided for in this Indenture, the applicable Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement relating to the proposed action have been complied with; and
(ii) an Opinion of Counsel in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee stating that, in the opinion of such counsel, all such conditions precedent have been complied with.
SECTION 12.3. . Each certificate or opinion with respect to compliance with a covenant or condition provided for in this Indenture shall include:
Statements Required in Certificate or Opinion
(i) a statement that the individual making such certificate or opinion has read such covenant or condition;
(ii) a brief statement as to the nature and scope of the examination or investigation upon which the statements or opinions contained in such certificate or opinion are based;
(iii) a statement that, in the opinion of such individual, he has made such examination or investigation as is necessary to enable him to express an informed opinion as to whether or not such covenant or condition has been complied with; and
(iv) a statement as to whether or not, in the opinion of such individual, such covenant or condition has been complied with.
In giving such Opinion of Counsel, counsel may rely as to factual matters on an Officers' Certificate or on certificates of public officials.
SECTION 12.4. . In determining whether the Holders of the required principal amount of Securities have concurred in any direction, waiver or consent, Securities owned by the Company, any Subsidiary Guarantor or by any Person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with the Company shall be disregarded and deemed not to be outstanding, except that, for the purpose of determining whether the Trustee shall be protected in relying on any such direction, waiver or consent, only Securities which a Trust Officer of the Trustee knows are so owned shall be so disregarded. Also, subject to the foregoing, only Securities outstanding at the time shall be considered in any such determination.
When Securities Disregarded
 
SECTION 12.5. . The Trustee may make reasonable rules for action by, or a meeting of, Holders. The Registrar and the Paying Agent may make reasonable rules for their functions.
Rules by Trustee, Paying Agent and Registrar
SECTION 12.6. . If a payment date is not a Business Day, payment shall be made on the next succeeding day that is not a Business Day, and no interest shall accrue for the intervening period. If a regular Record Date is not a Business Day, the Record Date shall not be affected.
Days Other than Business Days
SECTION 12.7. . This Indenture, the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York. The Collateral Documents (other than the Mortgages) and the Intercreditor Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York. The Mortgages shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the states in which the applicable Premises are located.
Governing Law
SECTION 12.8. . An incorporator, director, officer, employee, stockholder or controlling person, as such, of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor shall not have any liability for any obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor under the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents, the Intercreditor Agreement or this Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of or by reason of such obligations or their creation. By accepting a Security, each Holder shall waive and release all such liability. The waiver and release shall be part of the consideration for the issue of the Securities.
No Recourse Against Others
SECTION 12.9. . All agreements of the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor in this Indenture and the Securities shall bind their respective successors. All agreements of the Trustee in this Indenture shall bind its successors.
Successors
SECTION 12.10. . The parties may sign any number of copies of this Indenture. Each signed copy shall be an original, but all of them together represent the same agreement. One signed copy is enough to prove this Indenture.
Multiple Originals
SECTION 12.11. . The Company initially appoints the Trustee as Paying Agent and Registrar and custodian with respect to any Global Securities.
Variable Provisions
SECTION 12.12. . The table of contents, cross-reference sheet and headings of the Articles and Sections of this Indenture have been inserted for convenience of reference only, are not intended to be considered a part hereof and shall not modify or restrict any of the terms or provisions hereof.
Table of Contents; Headings
SECTION 12.13. . Notwithstanding any contrary provision in this Indenture, this Indenture is subject to the provisions of the Intercreditor Agreement. The Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee (to the extent its interests
Intercreditor Agreement Control
 
are affected thereby) and the Holders, by their acceptance of the Securities, acknowledge and agree to be bound by the provisions of the Intercreditor Agreement.
SECTION 12.14. . By accepting a Security, each Holder is deemed to have authorized and directed the Trustee and the Collateral Agent, as applicable, to enter into the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement.
Direction by Holders to Enter into Collateral Documents and Intercreditor Agreement
SECTION 12.15. . In no event shall the Trustee or the Collateral Agent be responsible or liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder arising out of or caused by, directly or indirectly, forces beyond its control, including, without limitation, strikes, work stoppages, accidents, acts of war or terrorism, civil or military disturbances, nuclear or natural catastrophes or acts of God, and interruptions, loss or malfunctions of utilities, communications or computer (software and hardware) services; it being understood that the Trustee and the Collateral Agent shall use reasonable efforts which are consistent with accepted practices in the banking industry to resume performance as soon as practicable under the circumstances.
Force Majeure
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this Indenture to be duly executed as of the date first written above.
 
 
EXHIBIT A
 
Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation, promises to pay to [                    ], or registered assigns, the principal sum of [                            ] Dollars, as revised by the Schedule of Increases and Decreases in the Global Security attached hereto, on November 1, 2016.
Interest Payment Dates: May 1 and November 1.
Record Dates: April 15 and October 15.
Additional provisions of this Security are set forth on the other side of this Security.
 
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation (such corporation, and its successors and assigns under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, being herein called the "Company"), promises to pay interest on the principal amount of this Security at the rate per annum shown above.
The Company shall pay interest semiannually on May 1 and November 1 of each year, with the first interest payment to be made on November 1, 2009. Interest on the Securities shall accrue from the most recent date to which interest has been paid on the Securities or, if no interest has been paid, from August 14, 2009. The Company shall pay interest on overdue principal or premium, if any (plus interest on such interest to the extent lawful), at the rate borne by the Securities to the extent lawful. Interest shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months. The Company shall pay interest on overdue principal at the rate borne by the Securities plus 2.0% per annum.
Interest shall accrue (in addition to the interest rate borne by the Securities) from and including the date on which an Event of Default under or shall occur to but excluding the date on which such Event of Default shall have been cured, at a rate per annum equal to 2.0% of the principal amount of the Securities.
Section 6.1(a)(vii)
6.1(a)(viii)
 
By no later than 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which any principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any Security is due and payable, the Company shall irrevocably deposit with the Trustee or the Paying Agent money sufficient to pay such principal, premium, if any, and/or interest. The Company shall pay interest (except Defaulted Interest) to the Persons who are registered Holders of Securities at the close of business on the April 15 and October 15 next preceding the interest payment date even if Securities are cancelled, repurchased or redeemed after the record date and on or before the interest payment date. Holders must surrender Securities to a Paying Agent to collect principal payments. The Company shall pay principal, premium, if any, and interest in money of the United States that at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts. Payments in respect of Securities represented by a Global Security (including principal, premium, if any, and interest) shall be made by the transfer of immediately available funds to the accounts specified by the Depositary. The Company shall make all payments in respect of a Definitive Security (including principal, premium, if any, and interest) by mailing a check to the registered address of each Holder thereof; , , that payments on the Securities may also be made, in the case of a Holder of at least $5,000,000 aggregate principal amount of Securities, by wire transfer to a U.S. dollar account maintained by the payee with a bank in the United States if such Holder elects payment by wire transfer by giving written notice to the Trustee or the Paying Agent to such effect designating such account no later than 15 days immediately preceding the relevant due date for payment (or such other date as the Trustee may accept in its discretion).
provided
however
 
Initially, The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., duly organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America and having a corporate trust office in 2 North LaSalle Street, Suite 1020, Chicago, Illinois 60602 ("Trustee"), shall act as Paying Agent and Registrar. The Company may appoint and change any Paying Agent, Registrar or co-registrar without notice to any Holder. The Company or any of its domestically incorporated Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries may act as Paying Agent, Registrar or co-registrar.
 
The Company issued the Securities under an Indenture dated as of August 14, 2009 (as it may be amended or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the terms thereof, the "Indenture"), among the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee. The terms of the Securities include those stated in the Indenture. Capitalized terms used herein and not defined herein have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Indenture. The Securities are subject to all such terms, and Holders are referred to the Indenture and the Act for a statement of those terms. To the extent any provision of this Security conflicts with the express provisions of the Indenture, the provisions of the Indenture shall govern and be controlling.
The Securities are senior secured obligations of the Company. The aggregate principal amount of Securities which may be authenticated and delivered under the Indenture is unlimited. This Security is one of the 11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016 referred to in the Indenture. The Securities include (i) $350,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016 issued under the Indenture on August 14, 2009 (herein called "Initial Notes") and (ii) if and when issued, additional 11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016 of the Company that may be issued from time to time under the Indenture subsequent to August 14, 2009 (herein called "Additional Notes") subject to the limitations of Sections 3.3 and 3.5 of the Indenture. The Indenture, among other things, imposes certain limitations on the Incurrence of Indebtedness by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries, the payment of dividends and other distributions on the Capital Stock of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries, the purchase or redemption of Capital Stock of the Company, certain purchases or redemptions of Subordinated Obligations or Guarantor Subordinated Obligations, the sale or transfer of assets and Capital Stock of Subsidiaries, certain Sale/Leaseback Transactions involving the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary, the issuance or sale of Capital Stock of Restricted Subsidiaries, the incurrence of certain Liens, future Subsidiary Guarantors, the business activities and investments of the Company and its Subsidiaries and transactions with Affiliates, , , certain of such limitations shall be suspended if the Securities receive a rating of "BBB-" or higher from Standard & Poor's Rating Services (or its successors) and "Baa3" or higher from Moody's Investors Service, Inc. (or its successors), in each case, with a stable or better outlook. In addition, the Indenture limits the ability of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries to enter into agreements that restrict distributions and dividends from Subsidiaries. The Indenture also imposes requirements with respect to the provision of financial information.
provided
however
 
To guarantee the due and punctual payment of the principal, premium, if any, and interest (including post-filing or post-petition interest) on the Securities and all other amounts payable by the Company under the Indenture, the Securities, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement when and as the same shall be due and payable, whether at maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, according to the terms of the Securities and the Indenture, the Subsidiary Guarantors have unconditionally guaranteed (and future guarantors, together with the Subsidiary Guarantors, shall unconditionally Guarantee), jointly and severally, such obligations on a senior, secured basis pursuant to the terms of the Indenture.
 
The Initial Notes and Additional Notes are treated as a single class of securities under the Indenture and shall be secured by first- and second-priority Liens and security interests, subject to Permitted Liens, in the Collateral on the terms and conditions set forth in the Indenture, the Intercreditor Agreement and the Collateral Documents. The Collateral Agent holds the Collateral in trust for the benefit of the Trustee and the Holders, in each case pursuant to the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement. Each Holder, by accepting this Security, consents and agrees to the terms of the Collateral Documents (including the provisions providing for the foreclosure and release of Collateral) and the Intercreditor Agreement as the same may be in effect or may be amended from time to time in accordance with their terms and the Indenture and authorizes and directs the Collateral Agent to enter into the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement, and to perform its obligations and exercise its rights thereunder in accordance therewith.
 
(a) Except as described below under clauses 7(b) and 7(c) hereof, the Notes shall not be redeemable at the Issuer's option before November 1, 2013.
(b) At any time prior to November 1, 2013, upon not less than 30 nor more than 60 days' prior notice, the Company may redeem the Securities, in whole but not in part, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Securities redeemed plus the Applicable Premium plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to, the date of redemption (the ""), subject to the rights of Holders of Securities on the relevant Record Date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date.
Redemption Date
"Applicable Premium" means with respect to any Redemption Date, the greater of:
(1) 1.0% of the principal amount of such Security; and
(2) the excess, if any, of (a) the present value as of such Redemption Date of (i) $1,056.25 per $1,000 principal amount of such Security on November 1, 2013 plus (ii) all required interest payments due on such Security through November 1, 2013 (excluding accrued but unpaid interest to the date of redemption), computed using a discount rate equal to the Treasury Rate as of such Redemption Date plus 50 basis points, over (b) the then-outstanding
 
principal of such Security, in each case as calculated by the Company or on behalf of the Company by such Person as the Company shall designate; that such calculation shall not be a duty or obligation of the applicable Trustee.
provided
"Treasury Rate" means the yield to maturity at the time of computation of United states Treasury securities with a constant maturity (as compiled and published in the most recent Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (519) that has become publicly available at least two Business Days prior to the Redemption Date (or, if such Statistical Release is no longer published, any publicly available source or similar market data)) most nearly equal to the period from the Redemption Date to November 1, 2013; that if the period from the Redemption Date to November 1, 2013 is not equal to the constant maturity of a United States Treasury security for which a weekly average yield is given, the Treasury Rate shall be obtained by linear interpolation (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth of a year) from the weekly average yields of United States Treasury securities for which such yields are given, except that if the period from the Redemption Date to November 1, 2013 is less than one year, the weekly average yield on actually traded United States Treasury securities adjusted to a constant maturity of one year shall be used.
provided, however,
(c) On or prior to November 1, 2012, the Company may on any one or more occasions redeem up to 35% of the original principal amount of the Securities (calculated after giving effect to any issuance of Additional Notes) with the Net Cash Proceeds of one or more Equity Offerings at a Redemption Price of 111.250% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the applicable Redemption Date (subject to the right of Holders of Securities on the relevant Record Date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date); that at least 65% of the original principal amount of the Securities (exclusive of Additional Notes) remains outstanding after each such redemption; , the redemption occurs within 90 days after the closing of such Equity Offering. Notice of any redemption upon any Equity Offering may be given prior to the completion of such Equity Offering, and any such redemption or notice may, at the Company's discretion, be subject to one or more conditions precedent, including, but not limited to, completion of the related Equity Offering.
provided
provided
further
(d) From and after November 1, 2013, the Company may redeem the Securities, in whole or, from time to time, in part, upon not less than 30 nor more than 60 days' prior notice, at the redemption prices (expressed as percentages of principal amount of the Securities to be redeemed) set forth below, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, if any, to the applicable Redemption Date, subject to the right of Holders of Securities of record on the relevant Record Date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date, if redeemed during the twelve-month period beginning on November 1 of each of the years indicated below:
 
 
(e) Any redemption pursuant to this paragraph 5 shall be made pursuant to the provisions of Section 5.2 through 5.8 of the Indenture.
 
The Company shall not be required to make mandatory redemption payments or sinking fund payments with respect to the Securities.
 
(a) Upon the occurrence of a Change of Control, any Holder of Securities shall have the right to require the Company to repurchase all or any part of the Securities of such Holder at a purchase price in cash equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date of repurchase (subject to the right of Holders of record on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant interest payment date) as provided in, and subject to the terms of, the Indenture.
(b) In the event of an Asset Disposition that requires the purchase of Securities pursuant to or of the Indenture, the Company shall be required to make an offer to all Holders to purchase the maximum principal amount of Securities, and if required by the terms thereof, to the holders of Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness in accordance with the procedures set forth in of the Indenture or to the holders of Pari Passu Indebtedness in accordance with the procedures set forth in of the Indenture, as applicable, at an offer price in cash in an amount equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Securities and such other Pari Passu Lien Indebtedness or Pari Passu Indebtedness, as applicable, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the date of purchase. Holders of Securities that are the subject of an offer to purchase will receive a Collateral Disposition Offer or Asset Disposition Offer from the Company prior to any related purchase date and may elect to have such Security purchased pursuant to such offer by completing the form entitled "Option of Holder to Elect Purchase" attached hereto, or transferring its interest in such Security by book-entry transfer, to the Company or a Paying Agent at the address specified in the notice at least three Business Days before the Disposition Purchase Date.
Section 3.8(a)
Section 3.8(b)
Section 3.8(a)
Section 3.8(b)
 
The Securities are in registered form without coupons in denominations of principal amount of $2,000 and whole multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. A Holder may transfer or exchange Securities in accordance with the Indenture. The Registrar may require a Holder, among other things, to furnish appropriate endorsements or transfer documents and to pay any taxes and fees required by law or permitted by the Indenture. The Registrar need not register the transfer of or exchange any Securities for a period beginning 15 Business Days before an interest payment date and ending on such interest payment date.
 
The registered Holder of this Security may be treated as the owner of it for all purposes.
 
If money for the payment of the principal of or premium, if any, or interest remains unclaimed for two years, the Trustee or Paying Agent shall pay the money back to the Company at its request unless an abandoned property law designates another person. After any such payment, Holders entitled to the money must look only to the Company and not to the Trustee for payment.
 
Subject to certain conditions set forth in the Indenture, the Company at any time may terminate some or all of its obligations under the Securities and the Indenture if the Company deposits with the Trustee money or U.S. Government Obligations for the payment of principal and interest on the Securities to redemption or maturity, as the case may be.
 
Subject to certain exceptions set forth in the Indenture, (i) the Indenture, the Securities, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement may be amended with the written consent of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Securities then outstanding (including without limitation, consents obtained in connection with a purchase of, or tender offer or exchange offer for Securities) and (ii) any default (other than (x) with respect to nonpayment or (y) in respect of a provision that cannot be amended without the written consent of each Holder affected or (z) with respect to Section 11.6(a)(vi) of the Indenture) or noncompliance with any provision may be waived with the written consent of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities then outstanding (including without limitation, consents obtained in connection with a purchase of, or tender offer or exchange offer for Securities). Subject to certain exceptions set forth in the Indenture, without the consent of any Holder, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may amend the Indenture, the Securities, the Collateral Documents or the Intercreditor Agreement to cure any ambiguity, omission, defect or inconsistency, or to comply with Article IV or Article X of the Indenture in respect of the assumption by a Successor Company of an obligation of the Company under the Indenture or by a Successor Guarantor of obligations under a Subsidiary Guarantee, or to provide for uncertificated Securities in addition to or in place of certificated Securities, or to add Guarantees with respect to the Securities or to secure the Securities, or to release a Subsidiary Guarantor upon its designation as an Unrestricted Subsidiary or otherwise in accordance with the Indenture, to release Liens in favor of the Collateral Agent in the Collateral as provided under the collateral release provisions, or to add additional covenants or surrender rights and powers conferred on the Company, or to make any change that does not adversely affect the rights of any Holder in any material respect or to conform the text of the Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees to the "Description of notes" section of the Offering Memorandum dated August 11, 2009 in certain cases.
 
Under the Indenture, Events of Default include, without limitation: (i) default for 30 days in payment of interest when due on the Securities; (ii) default in payment of the principal
 
of or premium, if any, on the Securities at Stated Maturity, upon optional redemption, upon required repurchase, upon declaration or otherwise; (iii) failure by the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor to comply with its obligations under Article IV of the Indenture, (iv) failure by the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor to comply with certain other provisions or agreements in the Indenture, the Securities, the Collateral Documents and the Intercreditor Agreement, in certain cases subject to notice and lapse of time; (v) certain accelerations (including failure to pay within any grace period after final maturity) of other Indebtedness of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary if the amount accelerated (or so unpaid) exceeds $35.0 million (vi) certain events of bankruptcy or insolvency with respect to the Company or any Significant Subsidiary; (vii) certain final judgments or decrees for the payment of money in excess of $35.0 million; (viii) the failure of any (1) Subsidiary Guarantee, (2) Collateral Document governing a security interest with respect to any Collateral having a fair market value in excess of $10.0 million or (3) obligation under the Intercreditor Agreement, in each case entered into by a Subsidiary Guarantor which is a Significant Subsidiary or group of Restricted Subsidiaries that taken together would constitute a Significant Subsidiary, to be in full force and effect (except as contemplated thereby) or any denial or disaffirmation thereof and (ix) with respect to Collateral with a fair market value in excess of $10.0 million, a declaration or assertion of invalidity or unenforceability or the failure to be in full force and effect (except as contemplated hereby), subject to any applicable grace periods as set forth in the Indenture.
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee or Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Securities then outstanding may declare all the Securities to be due and payable immediately. Certain events of bankruptcy or insolvency are Events of Default which shall result in the Securities being due and payable immediately upon the occurrence of such Events of Default.
Holders may not enforce the Indenture or the Securities except as provided in the Indenture. The Trustee and the Collateral Agent may refuse to enforce the Indenture or the Securities unless each receives indemnity or security reasonably satisfactory to each of the Trustee and the Collateral Agent. Subject to certain limitations, Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities may direct the Trustee in its exercise of any trust or power. The Trustee may withhold from Holders notice of any continuing Default or Event of Default (except a Default or Event of Default in payment of principal or interest) if it determines that withholding notice is in their interest.
 
Subject to certain limitations set forth in the Indenture, the Trustee under the Indenture, in its individual or any other capacity, may become the owner or pledgee of Securities and may otherwise deal with and collect obligations owed to it by the Company or its Affiliates and may otherwise deal with the Company or its Affiliates with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee.
 
A director, officer, employee, incorporator or stockholder of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor shall not have any liability for any obligations of the Company or any
 
Subsidiary Guarantor under the Securities, the Indenture, the Subsidiary Guarantees, the Collateral Documents, the Intercreditor Agreement or for any claim based on, in respect of, or by reason of, such obligations or their creation. By accepting a Security, each Holder waives and releases all such liability. The waiver and release shall be part of the consideration for the issue of the Securities.
 
This Security shall not be valid until an authorized signatory of the Trustee (or an authenticating agent acting on its behalf) manually signs the certificate of authentication on the other side of this Security.
 
Customary abbreviations may be used in the name of a Holder or an assignee, such as TEN COM (=tenants in common), TEN ENT (=tenants by the entirety), JT TEN (=joint tenants with rights of survivorship and not as tenants in common), CUST (=custodian) and U/G/M/A (=Uniform Gift to Minors Act).
 
Pursuant to a recommendation promulgated by the Committee on Uniform Security Identification Procedures the Company has caused CUSIP numbers to be printed on the Securities. No representation is made as to the accuracy of such numbers as printed on the Securities and reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers placed thereon.
 
This Security shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
The Company shall furnish to any Holder upon written request and without charge to the Holder a copy of the Indenture which has in it the text of this Security in larger type. Requests may be made to:
Brunswick Corporation
1 N. Field Ct.
Lake Forest, Illinois 60045-4811
Attention: William Metzger
 

Exhibit 10.1
Execution Version
FIRST AMENDMENT, dated as of August 11, 2009 (this ""), to (i) the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of April 29, 2005, as amended and restated as of December 19, 2008 (the ""), among Brunswick Corporation (the ""), certain subsidiaries of the Company that may be Subsidiary Borrowers party thereto, certain subsidiaries of the Company party thereto as guarantors (the ""), the several banks and other financial institutions or entities from time to time party thereto as lenders (the ""), JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent (in such capacity, the ""), and the other Agents party thereto and (ii) the Pledge and Security Agreement, dated as of December 19, 2008 (the ""), among the Company, the Grantors and the Administrative Agent.
First Amendment
Credit Agreement
Company
Guarantors
Lenders
Administrative Agent
Security Agreement
WHEREAS, the Company, the Lenders, the Agents and the Administrative Agent are parties to the Credit Agreement, and the Company, the Guarantors and the Administrative Agent are parties to the Security Agreement;
WHEREAS, the Company has requested that the Required Lenders agree to amend the Credit Agreement and the Security Agreement in the manner set forth herein; and
WHEREAS, the Required Lenders are willing to agree to the requested amendments as set forth herein;
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual covenants hereinafter set forth, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
1. . Unless otherwise defined herein, capitalized terms used herein which are defined in the Credit Agreement are used herein as therein defined.
Defined Terms
2. . Section 1.01 of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended by:
Amendments to Section 1.01
(a) inserting the following definitions in appropriate alphabetical order:
"" means the Company's 9.75% Notes due August 15, 2013 issued under the Existing Notes Indenture.
Existing 2013 Notes
"" means the manufacturing plants and facilities, distribution and warehouse facilities and executive offices of the Mercury Marine division located in or adjacent to Fond du Lac, Wisconsin, including all fixtures thereon and equipment and manufacturing-related tangible assets located therein from time to time, but excluding Inventory, raw materials and all production components thereof.
Fond du Lac Facility
"" means sale and leaseback transactions with respect to the Fond du Lac Facility or the Stillwater Facility pursuant to one or more government sponsored or supported programs and related to the Company's plans from time to time with respect to the Fond du Lac Facility and/or the Stillwater Facility.
Permitted Government Financing Sale and Leaseback Transactions
"" means the manufacturing plants and facilities, distribution and warehouse facilities and executive offices of the Mercury Marine division located in or adjacent to Stillwater, Oklahoma, including all fixtures thereon and equipment and manufacturing-related tangible assets located therein from time to time, but excluding Inventory, raw materials and all production components thereof.
Stillwater Facility
(b) amending the definition of "Bowling Assets" by deleting the words "that are owned by Leiserv, Inc. and its Subsidiaries".
3. . Section 6.01A of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended by:
Amendments to Section 6.01A
(a) deleting paragraph (i) in its entirety and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
"(i) Indebtedness of the Company, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary that owns Available Collateral incurred to refinance Existing 2011 Notes from time to time (it being understood that the proceeds of any such Indebtedness may be deposited in an account subject to a control agreement reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent pending the application of such proceeds to refinance Existing 2011 Notes (which control agreement shall provide that the Administrative Agent shall have a security interest therein, and control over such proceeds, for the benefit of the Secured Parties subject only to the right of the Borrower, so long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, to use such proceeds to refinance Existing 2011 Notes)); that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this paragraph (i) to refinance Existing 2011 Notes shall not at any time exceed the outstanding principal amount of the Existing 2011 Notes plus any accrued interest and premiums and any underwriting discounts, defeasance costs, fees, commissions and expenses reasonably incurred in connection with the refinancing; that, in the event that no Existing 2011 Notes are outstanding (or sufficient proceeds are or have been deposited to provide for the refinancing of the Existing 2011 Notes in full as set forth above), the Company, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary that owns Available Collateral may incur additional Indebtedness (x) in an initial aggregate principal amount not to exceed $100,000,000 and (y) to refinance in whole or in part the Existing 2013 Notes (it being understood that the proceeds of any such Indebtedness may be deposited in an account subject to a control agreement reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent pending the application of such proceeds to refinance Existing 2013 Notes (which control agreement shall provide that the Administrative Agent shall have a security interest therein, and control over such proceeds, for the benefit of the Secured Parties subject only to the right of the Borrower, so long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, to use such proceeds to refinance Existing 2013 Notes)); that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (y) shall not at any time exceed the outstanding principal amount of the Existing 2013 Notes plus any accrued interest and premiums and any underwriting discounts, defeasance
provided
provided
further
provided
costs, fees, commissions and expenses reasonably incurred in connection with the refinancing; that immediately after giving effect to the incurrence of any Indebtedness pursuant to this paragraph (i), no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing;";
provided
further
pro
forma
(b) deleting the word "and" at the end of paragraph (s);
(c) deleting the period at the end of paragraph (t) and inserting in lieu thereof "; and"; and
(d) adding the following new paragraph (u):
"(u) Indebtedness of the Company, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary that owns a Fond du Lac Facility or a Stillwater Facility incurred pursuant to one or more government sponsored or supported programs and related to the Company's plans from time to time with respect to the Fond du Lac Facility and/or the Stillwater Facility; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this paragraph (u), together with the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated pursuant to clause (v) of Section 6.07, shall not exceed the Government Debt Cap, as defined in Annex A to the First Amendment hereto, dated as of August 11, 2009, at any time outstanding.".
provided
4. . Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended by:
Amendments to Section 6.02
(a) inserting the parenthetical "(or more junior)" after the words "second priority" in paragraph (i);
(b) deleting the word "and" at the end of paragraph (n);
(c) deleting the period at the end of paragraph (o) and inserting in lieu thereof "; and";
(d) adding the following new paragraph (p):
"(p) Liens on the Fond du Lac Facility or the Stillwater Facility securing Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A(u)."; and
(e) deleting the words "paragraph (a) above" and inserting in lieu thereof the words "paragraphs (a) or (p) above" in the final paragraph thereof.
5. . Section 6.07 of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended by:
Amendments to Section 6.07
(a) deleting the word "and" at the end of clause (iii) and inserting in lieu thereof a comma;
(b) deleting the period at the end of clause (vi) and inserting in lieu thereof the word "and"; and
(c) adding the following new clause (v):
"(v) Permitted Government Financing Sale and Leaseback Transactions in an aggregate amount, together with the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness incurred under Section 6.01A(u) at any time outstanding, not to exceed the Government Debt Cap, as defined in Annex A to the First Amendment hereto, dated as of August 11, 2009.".
6. . Section 6.08 of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the words "and the Existing 2013 Notes" after the words "Existing 2011 Notes" in clause (viii) of paragraph (b) thereof.
Amendment to Section 6.08
7. . Section 6.09 of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended by:
Amendments to Section 6.09
(a) deleting the word "or" at the end of clause (iii)(B);
(b) adding the word "or" at the end of clause (iii)(C); and
(c) adding the following new clause (iii)(D):
"(D) Indebtedness secured by, or sale and leaseback transactions in respect of, the Fond du Lac Facility or the Stillwater Facility, provided such restrictions apply solely to the Fond du Lac Facility or the Stillwater Facility, as applicable, and the Subsidiaries that own the Fond du Lac Facility or the Stillwater Facility, as applicable,"
8. . Section 10.18 of the Credit Agreement is hereby amended by inserting references to "Available Collateral, Fond du Lac Facility or Stillwater Facility" in lieu of the references to "Available Collateral" therein.
Amendments to Section 10.18
9. . Article II of the Security Agreement is hereby amended by:
Amendments to Article II of the Security Agreement
(a) deleting the word "and" at the end of clause (xi) of the definition of "Excluded Property" and inserting in lieu thereof a comma;
(b) inserting ", and" at the end of clause (xii) of the definition of "Excluded Property";
(c) inserting the following new clause (xiii) in the definition of "Excluded Property":
"(xiii) the Fond du Lac Facility or the Stillwater Facility to the extent such assets are subject to a Lien permitted by Section 6.02(p) of the Credit Agreement"; and
(d) deleting the final paragraph thereof in its entirety and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
"Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, for so long as the Indenture shall remain in effect, the aggregate amount of the Secured Obligations secured by the Liens granted under the Collateral Documents, in each case to the extent the assets subject to such security interests and Liens constitute Indenture Properties, shall not exceed the difference between (i) the maximum amount of the Secured Obligations that can be so secured without requiring that any securities outstanding under the Indenture be ratably secured with the Secured Obligations in accordance with Section 5.05(b) of the Indenture and (ii) the sum of (A) the amount of Indebtedness incurred in reliance on Section 6.01A(i) or (o) of the Credit Agreement that is secured by, or sale and leaseback transactions incurred in reliance on Section 6.07 in respect of the Headquarters to the extent it constitutes an Indenture Property and (B) the amount of Indebtedness incurred in reliance on Section 6.01A(u) that is secured by a Lien on the Fond du Lac Facility or the Stillwater Facility to the extent either such asset subject to such a Lien constitutes an Indenture Property.".
10. . This First Amendment shall become effective (the date of such effectiveness, the "") upon the satisfaction of or waiver by the Administrative Agent of the following conditions:
Conditions to Effectiveness of this Amendment
First Amendment Effective Date
(a) this First Amendment shall have been executed and delivered by the Company, the Administrative Agent and the Required Lenders;
(b) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing;
(c) each Lender that has provided its written consent to this First Amendment on or prior to 12:00 noon, New York City time, on August 11, 2009 shall have received an amendment fee (or the Administrative Agent shall have received such fee for the account of such Lender) in an amount equal to 0.125% of such Lender's Commitment; and
(d) the Administrative Agent and the Lead Arranger shall have received all fees required to be paid, and all expenses for which invoices have been presented (including the reasonable fees and expenses of legal counsel).
11. . To induce the Agents and the Lenders to enter into this First Amendment, the Company hereby represents and warrants to each Agent and each Lender that:
Representation and Warranties
(a) As of the First Amendment Effective Date, and after giving effect to this First Amendment, each of the representations and warranties made by the Company in or pursuant to the Loan Documents is true and correct in all material respects as if made on and as of such date (it being understood and agreed that any representation or warranty that by its terms is made as of a specific date shall be required to be true and correct in all material respects only as of such specified date).
(b) No Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing after giving effect to the amendments contemplated herein.
12. . Except as expressly amended hereby, all of the representations, warranties, terms, covenants and conditions of the Loan Documents shall remain unamended and not waived and shall continue to be in full force and effect.
Effect
13. . This First Amendment may be executed by one or more of the parties to this First Amendment on any number of separate counterparts, and all of said counterparts taken together shall be deemed to constitute one and the same instrument. A set of the copies of this First Amendment signed by all the parties shall be lodged with the Company and the Administrative Agent.
Counterparts
14. . Any provision of this First Amendment which is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability
15. . This First Amendment and the other Loan Documents represent the agreement of the Loan Parties, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders with respect to the subject matter hereof and thereof, and there are no promises, undertakings, representations or warranties by the Administrative Agent or any Lender relative to the subject matter hereof or thereof not expressly set forth or referred to herein or in the other Loan Documents.
Integration
16. . THIS FIRST AMENDMENT AND THE RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS OF THE PARTIES UNDER THIS FIRST AMENDMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED AND INTERPRETED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
GOVERNING LAW
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this First Amendment to be duly executed and delivered by their proper and duly authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20090825173008.txt.gz
TIME:20090825173008
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 21, 2009, Brunswick Corporation (the "") executed and delivered the First Supplemental Indenture (the "") by and between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as trustee, amending the terms of the Indenture dated as of March 15, 1987 (the ""), between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor trustee, governing the Company's 5% Notes due 2011 (the ""), solely with respect to the 2011 Notes.
Company
First Supplemental Indenture
1987 Indenture
2011 Notes
The Company had received tenders and consents from holders of $149,380,000 aggregate principal amount of the 2011 Notes, representing 99.59% of the outstanding 2011 Notes, as of 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on August 21, 2009 in connection with the Company's previously announced cash tender offer and related consent solicitation launched on August 10, 2009 (the "Offer"). The First Supplemental Indenture was entered into following receipt of the requisite consents from holders of over 66
 2
/
3
% of the outstanding aggregate principal amount of the 2011 Notes.
The First Supplemental Indenture effects certain proposed amendments to the 1987 Indenture by eliminating substantially all of the restrictive covenants, including covenants relating to the Company's ability to incur secured indebtedness and enter into sale and leaseback transactions. The First Supplemental Indenture became effective after acceptance for payment on August 24, 2009, the first acceptance date following the receipt on August 21, 2009 of the requisite consents pursuant to the Offer. In accordance with the terms of the Offer, the tendered 2011 Notes were purchased by the Company on August 24, 2009 using a portion of the proceeds of the Company's recently completed offering of $350 million aggregate principal amount of its 11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016.
The Supplemental Indenture is attached as Exhibit 4.1. The foregoing description of the Supplemental Indenture is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Supplemental Indenture, which is incorporated herein by reference.
The news release issued by the Company announcing the receipt of the requisite consents to the proposed amendments to the 1987 Indenture and the execution of the First Supplemental Indenture is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
The information provided in Item 1.01 is incorporated by reference herein.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX
 

Exhibit 4.1
THIS FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE ("") is made this 21st day of August, 2009, among BRUNSWICK CORPORATION, a Delaware corporation (the "") and THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, N.A., as successor trustee (the "").
First Supplemental Indenture
Company
Trustee
WHEREAS, the Company has issued its 5% Notes due 2011 in the original aggregate principal amount of $150,000,000 (herein the "").
Notes
WHEREAS, the Notes were issued under the Indenture dated as of March 15, 1987 between the Company and the Trustee (the ""), and the related officers' certificate, dated as of May 26, 2004.
Indenture
WHEREAS, pursuant to its offer to purchase and consent solicitation statement dated August 10, 2009, (the "") the Company commenced a tender offer for any and all of the outstanding Notes (the "") and solicited the consents of the holders of the Notes to the Proposed Amendments (the "").
Offer to Purchase
Tender Offer
Consent Solicitation
WHEREAS, the approval of the holders of at least 66
 2
/
3
% in aggregate principal amount of the Notes outstanding (not including any Notes owned by the Company, or by any Person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with the Company) is sufficient to amend the terms of the Indenture as set forth herein.
WHEREAS, having received the approval of the holders of at least 66
 2
/
3
% in aggregate principal amount of the Notes outstanding (not including any Notes owned by the Company, or by any Person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with the Company) pursuant to Section 11.02 of the Indenture, the Company and the Trustee desire to amend the Indenture, as provided hereinafter, solely with respect to the Notes.
WHEREAS, all things necessary to make this First Supplemental Indenture the legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company, upon its execution hereof, have been done.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and of the mutual covenants and agreements contained in this First Supplemental Indenture, the parties agree as follows for the benefit of each other and for the equal and ratable benefit of the Holders of the Notes:
1. . Section 3.02 () is hereby amended as follows: the number "30" in the first sentence of such Section shall be deleted and replaced with the number "5".
Amendment of Section 3.02
Notice of Redemption; Selection of Securities
2. . Each of Sections 5.05 (), and 5.06 () of the Indenture is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with "Intentionally Omitted." All references in the Indenture to such sections shall also be deleted in their entirety.
Deletion of Certain Provisions
Limitation on Liens
Sale and Leaseback Transactions
3. . Section 12.01 () is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
Amendment of Section 12.01
Company May Consolidate, etc., Only on Certain Terms
Section 12.01. . The Company shall not consolidate with or merge into any other corporation or sell, transfer or lease its properties and assets substantially as an entirety to any Person, nor may any other Person consolidate with or merge into the Company, or sell, transfer or lease its properties and assets substantially as an entirety to the Company, unless:
Company May Consolidate, etc., Only on Certain Terms
(a) the Person (if other than the Company) formed by or resulting from any such consolidation or merger, or the Person which shall have purchased or received the transfer of, or which leases, the properties and assets of the Company substantially as an entirety, shall be a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America or any State or the District of Columbia, and shall expressly assume, by an indenture supplemental hereto, executed and delivered to the Trustee, in form satisfactory to the Trustee, the due and punctual payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all the Debentures and the performance and observance of every covenant of this Indenture on the part of the Company to be performed and observed;
(b) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, no Event of Default and no event which, after notice or lapse of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, shall have happened and be continuing; and
(c) [Intentionally Omitted.]
4. . All definitions set forth in Section 1.01 of the Indenture that relate to defined terms used solely in sections deleted by this Supplemental Indenture are hereby deleted in their entirety.
Deletion of Certain Definitions
5. . Any corresponding provisions reflected in the Notes shall also be deemed amended in conformity herewith.
Amendment of the Notes
6. . This First Supplemental Indenture shall be effective upon execution hereof by the Company and the Trustee; , that the amendments to the Indenture set forth in Sections 1 through 5 of this First Supplemental Indenture shall not become operative until the first Payment Date (as defined in the Offer to Purchase). If the Tender Offer is terminated, withdrawn or otherwise not consummated prior to acceptance of the Notes, this First Supplemental Indenture shall automatically become null and void .
Effectiveness of Amendments
provided, however
ab initio
7. . All capitalized terms used in this First Supplemental Indenture and not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
Terms Defined in the Indenture
8. . Upon the execution and delivery of this First Supplemental Indenture, the Indenture shall be modified and amended, solely with respect to the Notes, in accordance with this First Supplemental Indenture, and all the terms and conditions of both shall be read together as though they constitute one instrument, except that, in case of conflict, the
Interpretation; Severability; Headings
provisions of this First Supplemental Indenture will control. Solely with respect to the Notes, the Indenture, as modified and amended by this First Supplemental Indenture, is hereby ratified and confirmed in all respects and shall bind every Holder of Notes. In case of conflict between the terms and conditions contained in the Notes and those contained in the Indenture, as modified and amended by this First Supplemental Indenture, the provisions of the Indenture, as modified by this First Supplemental Indenture, shall control. In case any provision in this First Supplemental Indenture shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby. The Section headings in this First Supplemental Indenture have been inserted for convenience of reference only, are not to be considered a part hereof and shall in no way modify or restrict any of the terms or provisions hereof.
9. . This First Supplemental Indenture relates to and only affects the Notes and no other series of Securities issued pursuant to the Indenture.
No Other Series Affected
10. . If any provision of this First Supplemental Indenture limits, qualifies or conflicts with any provision of the Trust Indenture Act that is required under the Trust Indenture Act to be part of and govern any provision of this First Supplemental Indenture, the provision of the Trust Indenture Act shall control. If any provision of this First Supplemental Indenture modifies or excludes any provision of the Trust Indenture Act that may be so modified or excluded, the provision of the Trust Indenture Act shall be deemed to apply to the Indenture as so modified or to be excluded by this First Supplemental Indenture, as the case may be.
Conflicts with Trust Indenture Act
11. All agreements of the Company in this First Supplemental Indenture shall bind its successors. Nothing in this First Supplemental Indenture or the Notes, express or implied, shall give to any Person, other than the parties hereto and thereto and their successors hereunder and thereunder and the Holders of Notes, any benefit of any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under the Indenture, this First Supplemental Indenture or the Notes.
Successor; Benefits of First Supplemental Indenture, etc.
12. . In entering into this First Supplemental Indenture, the Trustee shall be entitled to the benefit of every provision of the Indenture relating to the conduct or affecting the liability or affording protection to the Trustee, whether or not elsewhere herein so provided. The Trustee shall not be responsible in any manner whatsoever for or in respect of the recitals contained herein, all of which recitals are made solely by the Company. The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this First Supplemental Indenture.
Certain Duties and Responsibilities of the Trustee; Trustee Not Responsible for Recitals
13. . This First Supplemental Indenture shall be deemed to be a contract made under the laws of the State of Illinois, and for all purposes shall be construed in accordance with the laws of said State.
Governing Law
14. . This First Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original, but such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
Execution in Counterparts
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, this First Supplemental Indenture has been executed by a duly authorized officer of the Company and the Trustee.
Dated as of August 21, 2009.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that, pursuant to its previously announced cash tender offer and consent solicitation for its outstanding 5 percent notes due 2011, it had received tenders and consents from holders of approximately $149.4 million aggregate principal amount of the notes, representing over 99.5 percent of the outstanding 2011 notes, prior to 5 p.m. (EDT), on Aug. 21, 2009. Brunswick has accepted and paid for the tendered notes using proceeds from its recently completed offering of $350 million aggregate principal amount of 11.25 percent senior secured notes due 2016.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Aug. 25, 2009
Holders who have not yet tendered their notes may tender until midnight (EDT), Sept. 4, 2009, unless extended or terminated earlier by Brunswick.
This news release is neither an offer to purchase the 2011 notes, nor a solicitation of an offer to sell the notes or other securities of Brunswick. The offer is made only through and pursuant to the terms of the offer to purchase and the letter of transmittal, dated Aug. 10, 2009. Holders of the notes may obtain the offer to purchase and the letter of transmittal by contacting Global Bondholder Services, Attn: Corporate Actions, 65 BroadwaySuite 723, New York, N.Y. 10006; banks and brokers call: (212) 430-3774; U.S. Toll free: (866) 389-1500.
Brunswick Corporation
Aug. 25, 2009
Page 2 of 2
 
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity" (TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables. For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20091029091152.txt.gz
TIME:20091029091152
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 29, 2009, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the third quarter of 2009. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its third quarter 2009 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.  In addition, Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Brunswick Corporation  1 N. Field Court  Lake Forest, IL 60045
Telephone 847.735.4700  Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) reported today results for the third quarter of 2009:
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Oct. 29, 2009
We continue to make great strides in improving our overall liquidity position, reducing our marine dealer pipeline and executing our cost reduction program, said Brunswicks Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  These significant accomplishments have been achieved against a global marine market that has experienced its lowest level of demand in more than 45 years.
Our overall liquidity at the end of the third quarter was $740 million, $222 million higher than existed at the end of 2008. During the quarter, we retired notes maturing in 2011, which eliminates any material debt maturities over the next three years.
As we entered 2009, we established as one of our top priorities an inventory management and pipeline reduction strategy that was intended to assist our dealers through this very difficult period.  By producing fewer units than we sold at wholesale, and selling lower amounts at wholesale than our dealers are retailing, we have been able to reduce the number of boats on dealers showrooms as well as in our factory yards to extremely low levels.  This strategy of taking all reasonable actions to maintain the health of our dealers has thus far led to very manageable levels of dealer exits, and any related Brunswick boat repurchase obligations.
The factors that affected our revenues and earnings in the previous two quarters of 2009 continued into the third, including lower overall unit sales levels across our entire company, combined with higher discounts and incentives to facilitate retail boat sales, particularly of older boat models. During the third quarter, the company continued to experience reduced fixed-cost absorption and higher pension and bad debt expenses. Offsetting these factors were cost savings generated from our successful and ongoing fixed-cost reduction activities and lower restructuring charges, along with the absence of large impairment and tax charges incurred in the third quarter of last year, McCoy said.
 
Third Quarter Results
For the third quarter of 2009, the company reported net sales of $665.8 million, down from $1,038.8 million a year earlier.  For the quarter, the company reported an operating loss of $109.4 million, which included $28.8 million of restructuring charges.  In the third quarter of 2008, the company had an operating loss of $566.3 million, which included $534.2 million of impairment and restructuring charges.
For the quarter, Brunswick reported a net loss of $114.3 million, or $1.29 per diluted share, as compared with a net loss of $729.1 million, or $8.26 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2008.  The diluted loss per share for the third quarter of 2009 included restructuring charges of $0.32 per diluted share and a $0.24 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.  Diluted earnings per share for the third quarter of 2008 included $4.59 per diluted share of impairment and restructuring charges, and $3.34 per diluted share of non-cash charges for special tax items.
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
During the quarter, the company issued $350 million of senior secured notes due in 2016. The net proceeds from this financing of approximately $330 million were used to retire $149 million of senior notes due in 2011, and $12 million of senior notes due in 2013.  Also in the quarter, the company reduced its borrowings under the Mercury Marine ABL facility by $74 million, and ended the period with no borrowings under this facility.
Cash and cash equivalents were $624 million at the end of the third quarter, up $307 million from year-end 2008 levels. The companys increased cash position resulted primarily from a change in certain current assets and current liabilities, net financing activities and net tax refunds, partially offset by net losses experienced in the nine-month period and pension contributions. The change in certain current assets and current liabilities was largely the result of reductions of the companys inventory and accounts and notes receivable, partially offset by decreased accounts payable and lower accrued expenses.
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and cash equivalents) was $292 million, down $122 million from year-end 2008 levels. The companys total liquidity (defined as cash and cash equivalents, plus amounts available under its asset-backed lending facilities) totaled $740 million, up $222 million from year-end 2008 levels.
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine service, parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $363.5 million in the third quarter of 2009, down 29 percent from $515.2 million in the year-ago third quarter.  International sales, which represented 41 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, declined by 27 percent. For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported an operating loss of $13.4 million, including restructuring charges of $18.8 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $9.7 million in the year-ago quarter, which included $18.6 million of impairment and restructuring charges.
Sales were off across all Marine Engine operations, with sterndrive engines experiencing a greater sales decline than outboard engines.  Sales from the segments domestic marine service, parts and accessories businesses, which represented 35 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, were down mid-single digits, as boat usage and the purchase of parts and accessories remained relatively stable.
           Mercurys manufacturing facilities continued to cut production rates and take plant furloughs during the quarter in response to lower retail demand and to reduce pipeline levels.  Lower sales, reduced fixed-cost absorption on lower production and higher bad debt expense had an adverse effect on operating earnings, which were partially offset by Mercury Marines expense reductions.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group and includes 17 boat brands.  The Boat segment reported net sales for the third quarter of 2009 of $118.2 million, down 62 percent compared with $314.2 million in the third quarter of 2008.   International sales, which represented 43 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 60 percent during the period.  For the third quarter of 2009, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $86.7 million, including restructuring charges of $6.6 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $536.3 million, including impairment and restructuring charges of $491.6 million, in the third quarter of 2008.
Boat manufacturing facilities also continued to significantly cut production rates and take plant furloughs during the quarter to address inventory levels held by the company and its dealers.  Lower sales, reduced fixed-cost absorption on lower production volumes and higher discounts and incentives to support retail sales by dealers had an adverse effect on operating earnings, which were partially offset by the Boat Groups expense reductions and the absence of impairment charges incurred in the third quarter of 2008.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales in the third quarter of 2009 totaled $126.8 million, down 22 percent from $161.6 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 55 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, declined by 15 percent.   For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $12.5 million, including $0.4 million of restructuring charges.  This compares with operating earnings of $10.3 million, including restructuring charges of $0.8 million, in the third quarter of 2008.
Commercial equipment sales, which account for the largest percentage of Fitness segment sales, declined in the quarter as gym and fitness club operators remained cautious about ordering equipment.  Sales of consumer exercise equipment were also down, although at lower rates than sales of commercial equipment.  Higher operating earnings in the third quarter of 2009, when compared with 2008, reflect actions taken by Life Fitness to reduce expenses, which were partially offset by the unfavorable effect of lower sales.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards tables and accessories.  Segment sales in the third quarter of 2009 totaled $77.5 million, down 30 percent compared with $111.1 million in the year-ago quarter.  For the quarter, the segment reported an operating loss of $3.8 million, including restructuring charges of $0.8 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $10.4 million, including impairment and restructuring charges of $15.4 million in the third quarter of 2008.
For the quarter, retail bowling equivalent-center sales declined by a high single-digit percentage.  The bowling products and billiards businesses experienced greater sales declines, as bowling center operators and retail billiards customers remained cautious about purchases.  Operating losses reflected the unfavorable effect of the reduced sales, which was partially offset by Bowling & Billiards cost reduction activities and the absence of impairment charges incurred in the third quarter of 2008.
Outlook
As we enter the fourth quarter of 2009 and begin planning for 2010, our near-term operating and financial strategies will continue to be focused on maintaining strong liquidity without additional borrowing, taking all reasonable actions to protect our dealer network, and positioning ourselves to take advantage of improvements in economic conditions as they occur, McCoy said.
Strategic actions pertaining to our inventory management and pipeline reduction strategy will continue during the fourth quarter, with a target to further reduce the number of boats in our backyard and to minimize the seasonal growth in pipeline inventories. These actions should continue to negatively affect our sales and earnings as they have in the previous three quarters.
As we enter 2010, the majority of our boat and engine manufacturing facilities will begin to ramp up production.  This is primarily the result of dealer inventories being at historically low levels, which means we will need to increase our wholesale shipments of boats and engines to meet retail demand.  Increased production combined with higher wholesale shipments should provide improved revenue and reduced losses throughout 2010.
In addition, the cash generated from improving EBITDA, combined with continued tight working capital management as well as a continued focus on our cost management programs, should enable us to maintain strong levels of liquidity throughout 2010.
During the third quarter, in our continuing efforts to evaluate our manufacturing footprint, brands, models, and cost and operating structures, we made a strategic decision to consolidate Mercury Marines two largest U.S. manufacturing operations.  The consolidation of manufacturing operations in Fond du Lac, Wis., is expected to generate the highest returns with the lowest execution risk.
As a result of this decision, we will transition during the next 24 months our manufacturing operations from Stillwater, Okla., to our facility in Wisconsin. This consolidation, combined with the net fixed-cost reductions achieved over the past two years, should help uniquely position Brunswick for continued market leadership in our marine and recreation businesses, McCoy concluded.
 
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
www.br
u
nswick.com
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call
(800) 369-2064 (passcode: Brunswick Q3).  Callers outside North America should call +1 (517) 308-9313 to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through 10:59 p.m. CST Thursday, Nov. 5, 2009, by calling (800) 926-8540 or (203) 369-3852.  The replay will also be available at www.brunswick.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswicks business.  These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in the timeframe and cost anticipated; the ability to successfully complete the disposition of non-core assets; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components and raw materials from suppliers; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; and the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2008 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended July 4, 2009.  Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Kayot, Lowe, Lund, Maxum, Meridian, Ornvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables.  For more information, visit .
http://www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20100128085805.txt.gz
TIME:20100128085805
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                       Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
   
On January 28, 2010, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2009. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its fourth quarter 2009 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.  In addition, Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the fourth quarter of 2009:
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Jan. 28, 2010
During the fourth quarter we continued to successfully execute against our key strategic objectives, which has allowed us not only to remain stable during the worst marine market in decades, but also to position ourselves to take advantage of market opportunities as they evolve, said Brunswicks Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  We exited 2009 with $527 million in cash, a stronger dealer network with low inventories, and a leaner company with a significantly reduced cost structure.
 The factors that negatively affected our revenues and earnings in the fourth quarter of 2009, compared to the previous year, included: lower overall unit sales levels across the company; higher discounts to facilitate retail boat sales, particularly of older boat models; and a reversal of variable compensation and defined contribution retirement accruals that benefited the fourth quarter of 2008. During the quarter, we also experienced reduced fixed-cost absorption and higher pension and interest expense, as well as higher impairment and restructuring charges. Partially offsetting these factors were cost savings generated from our successful and ongoing fixed-cost reduction activities, and a special tax benefit recorded in the fourth quarter of 2009, McCoy said.
 
 
Fourth Quarter Results
For the fourth quarter of 2009, the company reported net sales of $657.3 million, down from $837.7 million a year earlier.  For the quarter, the company reported an operating loss of $188.2 million, which included $68.6 million of impairment and restructuring charges.  In the fourth quarter of 2008, the company had an operating loss of $38.4 million, which included an $81.2 million benefit from the reversal of variable compensation and defined contribution retirement accruals, affecting all of the companys segments, and $48.9 million of impairment and restructuring charges.
For the fourth quarter of 2009, Brunswick reported a net loss of $124.0 million, or $1.40 per diluted share, as compared with a net loss of $66.3 million, or $0.75 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2008.  The diluted loss per share for the fourth quarter of 2009 included impairment and restructuring charges of $0.78 per diluted share, and a $1.20 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.  Diluted loss per share for the fourth quarter of 2008 included $0.34 per diluted share of impairment and restructuring charges, and $0.59 per diluted share of non-cash charges for special tax items.
2009 Full-Year Results
For the year ended Dec. 31, 2009, the company reported net sales of $2,776.1 million, down from $4,708.7 million a year earlier, and an operating loss of $570.5 million, which included $172.5 million of impairment and restructuring charges.  In 2008, the company had an operating loss of $611.6 million, which included $688.4 million of impairment and restructuring charges.
For 2009, the company reported a net loss of $586.2 million, or $6.63 per diluted share, as compared with a net loss of $788.1 million, or $8.93 per diluted share, for 2008.  The diluted loss per share for 2009 included impairment and restructuring charges of $1.95 per diluted share, and a $1.09 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.  Diluted loss per share for 2008 included $5.68 per diluted share of impairment and restructuring charges, $3.90 per diluted share of non-cash charges for special tax items, and $0.11 per diluted share gain on investment sales.
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
During the quarter, the company completed open market purchases of approximately $85 million of its outstanding 11.75 percent notes due 2013. Combined with previous period purchases, the company reduced the amount of its 2013 notes outstanding to approximately $153 million, representing the only significant long-term debt maturity from 2010 to 2015.
Cash and cash equivalents were $527 million at the end of the fourth quarter, up $209 million from year-end 2008 levels. The companys increased cash position resulted primarily from a change in certain current assets and current liabilities and net tax refunds, partially offset by net losses experienced during the year. The change in certain current assets and current liabilities was largely the result of reductions of the companys inventory and accounts and notes receivable, partially offset by lower accrued expenses and decreased accounts payable.
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and cash equivalents) was $324 million, down $90 million from year-end 2008 levels. The companys total liquidity (defined as cash and cash equivalents, plus amounts available under its asset-backed lending facilities) totaled $615 million, up $96 million from year-end 2008 levels.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine service, parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $302.4 million in the fourth quarter of 2009, down 11 percent from $340.2 million in the year-ago fourth quarter.  International sales, which represented 51 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, declined by 3 percent. For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported an operating loss of $59.4 million, including restructuring charges of $8.2 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $12.9 million in the year-ago quarter, which benefited from a $0.8 million gain related to restructuring activities.
Sales were lower across all Marine Engine operations, with sterndrive engines experiencing a greater sales decline than outboard engines.  Sales from the segments domestic marine service, parts and accessories businesses, which represented 22 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, were down mid-single digits, as boat usage and the purchase of parts and accessories remained relatively stable.
           Mercurys manufacturing facilities began to ramp up production during the quarter in response to customer inventory requirements.  Lower sales, higher pension expense and restructuring charges as well as a reversal of variable compensation and defined contribution retirement accruals that benefited the fourth quarter of 2008 had an adverse effect on operating earnings comparisons, which were partially offset by Mercury Marines expense reductions.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group and includes 17 boat brands.  The Boat segment reported net sales of $153.4 million for the fourth quarter of 2009, down 38 percent compared with $248.0 million in the fourth quarter of 2008.  International sales, which represented 40 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 51 percent during the period.  For the fourth quarter of 2009, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $131.6 million, including impairment and restructuring charges of $58.3 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $59.4 million, including impairment and restructuring charges of $39.4 million, in the fourth quarter of 2008.
Boat manufacturing facilities also began to ramp up production during the quarter to address inventory requirements of their dealers, although production levels remained below the prior year quarter. Lower sales, reduced fixed-cost absorption on lower production volumes, higher discounts to support retail sales by dealers, higher impairment and restructuring charges, as well as a reversal of variable compensation and defined contribution retirement accruals that benefited the fourth quarter of 2008, had an adverse effect on operating earnings comparisons, which were partially offset by the Boat Groups expense reductions.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2009 totaled $146.4 million, down 15 percent from $171.8 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 52 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, declined by 10 percent.   For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $20.5 million, including $0.5 million of restructuring charges.  This compares with operating earnings of $25.6 million, including restructuring charges of $1.2 million, in the fourth quarter of 2008.
Commercial equipment sales, which account for the largest percentage of Fitness segment sales, declined in the quarter as gym and fitness club operators remained cautious about ordering equipment.  Sales of consumer exercise equipment were also down during the quarter.  Lower operating earnings in the fourth quarter of 2009, when compared with 2008, reflect the unfavorable effect of lower sales and a reversal of variable compensation and defined contribution retirement accruals that benefited the fourth quarter of 2008, partially offset by actions taken by Life Fitness to reduce expenses, including improvements in material costs.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards tables and accessories.  Segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2009 totaled $82.2 million, down 27 percent compared with $113.2 million in the year-ago quarter.  For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $2.2 million, including restructuring charges of $0.5 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $16.6 million, including impairment and restructuring charges of $3.8 million in the fourth quarter of 2008.
For the quarter, retail bowling equivalent-center sales declined by a mid-single-digit percentage.  The bowling products and the billiards businesses experienced greater sales declines, as bowling center operators and retail billiards customers remained cautious about purchases.  Lower operating earnings in the fourth quarter of 2009, when compared with 2008, reflect the unfavorable effect of the reduced sales, higher pension expenses and a reversal of variable compensation and defined contribution retirement accruals that benefited the fourth quarter of 2008, partially offset by Bowling & Billiards cost reduction activities.
Outlook
See Brunswicks Web Site for Supplemental Chart:
http://www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events.php
We remain committed to the strategic focus that has ensured our financial health and uniquely positioned us compared to most of our competitors in the marine, fitness and bowling and billiards segments, McCoy said. We will continue to focus on maintaining strong liquidity at our current net debt levels, taking all reasonable actions to strengthen our dealer network, and doing the work necessary to come out of this downturn stronger than when we began the period.
Although our plans reflect a modest reduction in retail marine demand, our boat facilities will gradually increase wholesale shipments throughout the year because dealer inventories are at historically low levels. The increase in wholesale boat shipments will require us to raise production rates throughout the year.  Additionally, although over-supply conditions still exist in the overall marine market, we believe that based on our 2009 achievements in lowering our dealer pipeline, the amount of discounts will be lower in 2010 as compared to 2009.
The factors affecting our Boat segment should also lead to revenue growth in our engine business, but the anticipated sales improvement will be less due to the mix of businesses within the Marine Engine segment. Specifically, Mercurys parts and accessories business and its international operations, which together currently account for roughly 72 percent of the segments revenues, are expected to grow at substantially lower rates than Brunswicks Boat segment.
As a result of the favorable fundamentals affecting our marine segments, our plan reflects improved revenue and significantly reduced operating losses in 2010.  Additionally, our plan reflects that our Fitness and Bowling & Billiards segments will experience modest growth in both revenue and operating earnings.  Contributing to the decline in operating losses for the company are lower impairment and restructuring costs and pension expense.  Partially offsetting the improvement in operating losses will be slightly higher interest expense during 2010.
Our extraordinary performance against our strategic goals in this recession has positioned Brunswick to transition from a focus on liquidity, to a focus on continuous improvement in financial results and strength relative to the competition in all of our business segments.
So while the economy and markets in which our businesses operate may remain challenging for the foreseeable future, this transition requires that in 2010 and beyond, as the worlds economies improve, we remain disciplined to: generate positive cash flow, perform better than the market in each of our business segments, and grow earnings faster than we grow sales, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CST, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
www.br
u
nswick.com
and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call
Security analysts
(866) 831-6224 (passcode: Brunswick Q4).  Callers outside North America should call (617) 213-8853 (passcode: Brunswick Q4) to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CST Thursday, Feb. 4, 2010, by calling (888) 286-8010 or (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 87644274).  The replay will also be available at www.brunswick.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswicks business.  These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in the timeframe and cost anticipated; the ability to successfully complete the disposition of non-core assets; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; adverse foreign economic conditions; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components and raw materials from suppliers; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; and the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2008 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended Oct. 3, 2009.   Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Ornvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables.  For more information, visit .
http://www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20100204171235.txt.gz
TIME:20100204171235
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
Item 5.03.                      Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
On February 2, 2010, the Board of Directors (the Board) of Brunswick Corporation (the Company) approved amendments to the Companys by-laws (as amended, the Amended By-laws). A copy of the Amended By-laws, which became effective immediately upon their adoption by the Board, is attached as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein.  The amendments included the following:
Article II, Sections 2(a) and 11 have been amended to provide that, in elections of directors, a nominee for director shall be elected to the Board if the votes cast for such nominee exceed the votes cast against such nominees election; provided, that if the number of nominees for director as of the meetings record date exceeds the number of directors to be elected at such meeting, then each director to be elected shall be elected by a plurality of votes cast.
Article II, Section 2(b) has been amended to clarify language and to expand the disclosure a stockholder must provide when seeking to bring business before an annual meeting of stockholders to include, among other things, a description of any agreement, arrangement or understanding with respect to such business between the stockholder and other persons and a description of any hedging, short position, arrangement, agreement or understanding intended to mitigate loss or share price changes or intended to increase or decrease voting power.  Article I, Section 2(b) has also been amended to provide that each of the foregoing types of information must be updated as of the record date of the meeting by a stockholder seeking to bring business before an annual meeting by not later than 10 days after the record date of the meeting.
Article II, Section 9 has been amended to provide that the Chairman of the Board or, in the Chairmans absence, such other person as the Board shall designate, shall preside at, and may adjourn, any annual or special meeting of stockholders.
Article III, Section 1 has been amended to reflect the present size of the Board and to make clear that the Board may approve amendments to the size of the Board by resolution, as well as by-law amendment.
Article III, Section 2 has been amended to clarify language and to expand the disclosure a stockholder must provide when seeking to nominate a person for election as a director to include, among other things, a description of any agreement, arrangement or understanding with respect to such business between the stockholder and other persons and a description of any hedging, short position, arrangement, agreement or understanding intended to mitigate loss or share price changes or intended to increase or decrease voting power.  Article III, Section 2 has also been amended to provide that each of the foregoing types of information must be updated as of the record date of the meeting by a stockholder seeking to bring business before an annual meeting by not later than 10 days after the record date of the meeting.
Article VI, Section 1 has been amended to provide that the Company shall be obligated to indemnify, to the fullest extent that is lawful, any person made party to any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (including an action by or in the right of the Company) (a proceeding) by reason of the fact that he or she is or was a director or officer of the Company, or is or was a director or officer of the Company serving at the request of the Company as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, against expenses, judgments, fines, taxes, penalties and amounts paid in settlement actually and reasonably incurred by him or her in connection with such proceeding.
Article VI, Section 4 has been amended to provide that the Company shall be obligated to pay or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred by a director or officer of the Company in defending any proceeding in advance of its final disposition upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of such director or officer to repay all amounts advanced if it should be ultimately determined that he or she is not entitled to be indemnified under Article VI or otherwise.
Article IX, Section 1 has been amended to remove the Companys election to be subject to the Tennessee Authorized Corporation Protection Act.
In addition, the Board approved a number of other amendments to the Companys by-laws that had as their purpose the correction of errors, the removal of redundant sections, and the clarification of administrative provisions.  These additional changes are located in Article II, Sections 4, 8 and 12; Article III, Sections 5, 6, 7, 9 and 11; Article IV, Section 1; Article V, Section 3; Article VI, Section 7; Article VII, Sections 1, 2, and 3; and Article VIII, Sections 3 and 4.  A copy of the Amended By-laws marked to show all changes to the former by-laws is attached as Exhibit 3.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 1. The registered office shall be in the City of Wilmington, County of New Castle, State of Delaware.
 
Section 2. The corporation may also have offices in the City of Lake Forest, State of Illinois, and at such other places as the board of directors may from time to time determine or the business of the corporation may require.
 
 
 
Section 1. Meetings of stockholders may be held at such time and place, if any, within or without the State of Delaware, as shall be stated in the notice of the meeting or in a duly executed waiver of notice thereof. The board of directors may, in its sole discretion, determine that the meeting shall not be held at any place, but shall be held solely by means of remote communication, subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of directors may adopt, as permitted by applicable law.
 
Section 2. (a) An annual meeting of stockholders shall be held at such time and on such day in the month of April or in such other month as the board of directors may specify by resolution. At the annual meeting the stockholders shall elect, by ballot, a board of directors and transact such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
 
(b) For business to be properly brought before the meeting, it must be: (i) authorized by the board of directors and specified in the notice, or a supplemental notice, of the meeting, (ii) otherwise brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the board of directors or the chairman of the meeting, or (iii) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder. For business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder (other than the nomination of a person for election as a director, which is governed by Article III, Section 2 of these by-laws), the stockholder must have given written notice thereof to the Secretary of the corporation, delivered or mailed to and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation not less than ninety days nor more than 120 days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that no annual meeting was held in the previous year or the annual meeting is called for a date that is not within thirty days from the anniversary date of the preceding year's annual meeting date, written notice by a stockholder in order to be timely must be received not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the day on which the first public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made. Delivery shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. In no event shall the public disclosure of an adjournment of an annual meeting commence a new time period for the giving of stockholder's notice as described above.  A stockholder's notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each item of business the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting: (1) a description of such item and the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting, (2) the name and address, as they appear on the corporation's records, of the stockholder proposing such business, (3) a representation that the stockholder is a holder of record of shares of stock of the corporation entitled to vote with respect to such business and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to move the consideration of such business, (4) the class and number of shares of stock of the corporation which are owned beneficially or of record by the stockholder (which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting), (5) a description of any agreement, arrangement or understanding with respect to such business between or among the stockholder and any of its affiliates or associates, and any others (including their names) acting in concert with any of the foregoing (which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting), (6) whether and the extent to which any hedging or other transaction or series of transactions has been entered into by or on behalf of, or any other agreement, arrangement or understanding (including any short position or any borrowing or lending of shares) has been made, the effect or intent of which is to mitigate loss to or manage risk or benefit of share price changes for, or to increase or decrease the voting power of, such stockholder with respect to any share of stock of the corporation (which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting) and (7) any material interest of the stockholder in such business. No business shall be conducted at any annual meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this paragraph (b) or, with respect to the election of directors, the provisions of Article III, Section 2. The chairman of the meeting at which any business is proposed by a stockholder shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that such business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this paragraph (b), and, in such event, the business not properly before the meeting shall not be transacted.
 
Section 3. Written notice of the annual meeting stating the place, if any, date, hour of meeting, and the means of remote communications, if any, by which stockholders and proxyholders may be deemed to be present in person and vote at such meeting shall be given not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the corporation.
 
Section 4. Special meetings of the stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, unless otherwise prescribed by statute or by the certificate of incorporation, may be called by the Chairman of the Board and shall be called by the Secretary at the request in writing of a majority of the board of directors. Such request shall state the purpose or purposes of the proposed meeting.
Section 5. Written notice of a special meeting of stockholders stating the place, if any, date, hour of meeting, the means of remote communications, if any, by which stockholders and proxyholders may be deemed to be present in person and vote at such meeting and the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called shall be given not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the corporation.
 
Section 6. Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice.
 
Section 7. If authorized by the board of directors in accordance with these by-laws and applicable law, stockholders and proxyholders not physically present at a meeting of stockholders may, by means of remote communication, (1) participate in a meeting of stockholders and (2) be deemed present in person and vote at a meeting of stockholders, whether such meeting is to be held at a designated place or solely by means of remote communication, provided that (i) the corporation shall implement reasonable measures to verify that each person deemed present and permitted to vote at the meeting by means of remote communication is a stockholder or proxyholder, (ii) the corporation shall implement reasonable measures to provide such stockholders and proxyholders a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the stockholders, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with such proceedings, and (iii) if any stockholder or proxyholder votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of remote communication, a record of such vote or other action shall be maintained by the corporation.
 
Section 8. The Secretary shall prepare, at least ten days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting for a period of at least ten days prior to the meeting: (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of the meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours, at the principal place of business of the corporation. In the event that the corporation determines to make the list available on an electronic network, the corporation may take reasonable steps to ensure that such information is available only to stockholders of the corporation. If the meeting is to be held at a place, the list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present. If the meeting is to be held solely by means of remote communication, the list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder during the whole time thereof on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the information required to access such list shall be provided with the notice of the meeting. The stock ledger shall be the only evidence as to who are the stockholders entitled to examine the list of stockholders required by this section or to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of stockholders.
 
Section 9. The Chairman of the Board or, in the Chairmans absence, such other person as the Board of Directors shall designate shall preside at any annual or special meeting of stockholders.  Such presiding person may adjourn any annual or special meeting of stockholders from time to time to reconvene at the same or some other place, if any, and notice need not be given of any such adjourned meeting if the date, time and place, if any, thereof and the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxyholders may be deemed present in person and vote at such adjourned meeting are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken. At the adjourned meeting any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the original meeting. If the adjournment is for more than thirty days, or if after the adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the adjourned meeting in accordance with Section 3 or Section 5 of this Article II as the case may be.
 
Section 10. The holders of a majority of the shares of the capital stock of the corporation, issued and outstanding and entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall be requisite and shall constitute a quorum at all meetings of the stockholders for the transaction of business except as otherwise provided by statute or by the certificate of incorporation or by these by-laws. If a quorum is present when a meeting is convened, the subsequent withdrawal of stockholders, even though less than a quorum remains, shall not affect the ability of the remaining stockholders lawfully to transact business. If, however, such quorum shall not be present or represented at any meeting of the stockholders, the stockholders entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall have power to adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present or represented. At such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present or represented any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally notified.
 
Section 11. In matters other than the election of directors, when a quorum is present or represented at any meeting, the vote of the holders of a majority of the stock having voting power present in person or represented by proxy shall decide any question brought before such meeting.  A nominee for director shall be elected to the board of directors if the votes cast for such nominees election exceed the votes cast against such nominees election; provided, that if the number of nominees for director as of the meetings record date exceeds the number of directors to be elected at such meeting, then each director to be elected shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the question to be voted upon is one upon which by express provision of the statutes or of the certificate of incorporation or of these by-laws, a different vote is required, such express provisions shall govern and control the decision of such question.
 
Section 12. (a) At any meeting of the stockholders every stockholder having the right to vote shall be entitled to vote in person. Each stockholder shall have one vote for each share of stock having voting power, registered in his name on the books of the corporation. Except where the transfer books of the corporation shall have been closed or a date shall have been fixed by the board of directors as a record date for the determination of its stockholders entitled to vote, no share of stock shall be voted on at any election for directors which shall have been transferred on the books of the corporation within twenty days next preceding such election of directors.
 
(b) Voting at meetings of stockholders need not be by written ballot and need not be conducted by inspectors of election unless so required by Section 14 of Article II of these by-laws or so determined by the holders of stock having a majority of the votes which could be cast by the holders of all outstanding stock entitled to vote which are present in person or by proxy at such meeting.
 
(c) Stock of the corporation standing in the name of another corporation and entitled to vote may be voted by such other corporations officer, agent or proxy as the by-laws or other internal regulations of such other corporation may prescribe or, in the absence of such provision, as the board of directors or comparable body of such other corporation may determine.
 
(d) Stock of the corporation standing in the name of a deceased person, a minor, an incompetent or a debtor in a case under Title 11, United States Code, and entitled to vote may be voted by an administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, debtor-in-possession or trustee, as the case may be, either in person or by proxy, without transfer of such shares into the name of the official or other person so voting.
 
(e) A stockholder whose voting stock of the corporation is pledged shall be entitled to vote such stock unless on the transfer records of the corporation the pledgor has expressly empowered the pledgee to vote such shares, in which case only the pledgee, or such pledgee's proxy, may represent such shares and vote thereon.
 
(f) If voting stock is held of record in the names of two or more persons, whether fiduciaries, members of a partnership, joint tenants, tenants in common, tenants by the entirety or otherwise, or if two or more persons have the same fiduciary relationship respecting the same shares, unless the Secretary is given written notice to the contrary and is furnished with a copy of the instrument or order appointing them or creating the relationship wherein it is so provided, their acts with respect to voting shall have the following effect: (i) if only one votes, such act binds all; (ii) if more than one vote, the act of the majority so voting binds all; and (iii) if more than one votes, but the vote is evenly split on any particular matter each faction may vote such stock  proportionally, or any person voting the shares, or a beneficiary, if any, may apply to the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware or such other court as may have jurisdiction to appoint an additional person to act with the persons so voting the stock, which shall then be voted as determined by a majority of such persons and the person appointed by the Court. If the instrument so filed shows that any such tenancy is held in unequal interests, a majority or even split for the purpose of this subsection shall be a majority or even split in interest.
 
(g) Stock of the corporation belonging to the corporation, or to another corporation if a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of directors of such other corporation are held by the corporation, shall neither be entitled to vote nor be counted for quorum purposes. Nothing in this Section 12(g) shall limit the right of the corporation to vote shares of stock of the corporation held by it in a fiduciary capacity.
 
Section 13. (a) Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy filed with the Secretary before or at the time of the meeting. No such proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period. A duly executed proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power. A stockholder may revoke any proxy which is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by filing with the Secretary an instrument in writing revoking the proxy or another duly executed proxy bearing a later date.
 
(b) A stockholder may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder as proxy (i) by executing a writing authorizing such person or persons to act as such, which execution may be accomplished by such stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, partner, employee or agent (or, if the stock is held in a trust or estate, by a trustee, executor or administrator thereof) signing such writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including, but not limited to, facsimile signature, or (ii) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram or other means of electronic transmission (a "Transmission") to the person who will be the holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service organization or like agent duly authorized by the person who will be the holder of the proxy to receive such Transmission; provided that any such Transmission must either set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that such Transmission was authorized by such stockholder.
 
(c) Any inspector or inspectors appointed pursuant to Section 14 of Article II of these by-laws shall examine Transmissions to determine if they are valid. If no inspector or inspectors are so appointed, the Secretary or such other person or persons as shall be appointed from time to time by the board of directors shall examine Transmissions to determine if they are valid. If it is determined that a Transmission is valid, the person or persons making that determination shall specify the information upon which such person or persons relied. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication or other reliable reproduction of such a writing or Transmission may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or Transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or Transmission could be used; provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or Transmission.
 
Section 14. (a) If the corporation has a class of voting stock that is (i) listed on a national securities exchange, (ii) authorized for quotation on an interdealer quotation system of a registered national securities association or (iii) held of record by more than 2,000 stockholders, the board of directors shall, in advance of any meeting of stockholders, appoint one or more inspectors (individually an "Inspector," and collectively the "Inspectors") to act at such meeting and make a written report thereof. The board of directors may designate one or more persons as alternate Inspectors to replace any Inspector who shall fail to act. If no Inspector or alternate is able to act at such meeting, the chairman of the meeting shall appoint one or more other persons to act as Inspectors. Each Inspector, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of Inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability.
 
(b) The Inspectors shall (i) ascertain the number of shares of stock of the corporation outstanding and the voting power of each, (ii) determine the number of shares of stock of the corporation present in person or by proxy at such meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots, (iii) count all votes and ballots, (iv) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by the Inspectors and (v) certify their determination of the number of such shares present in person or by proxy at such meeting and their count of all votes and ballots. The Inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
 
(c) The date and time of the opening and the closing of the polls for each matter upon which the stockholders will vote at a meeting shall be announced at such meeting. No ballots, proxies or votes, nor any revocations thereof or changes thereto, shall be accepted by the Inspectors after the closing of the polls unless the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware upon application by any stockholder shall determine otherwise.
 
(d) In determining the validity and counting of proxies and ballots, the Inspectors shall be limited to an examination of the proxies, any envelopes submitted with such proxies, any information referred to in paragraphs (b) and (c) of Section 13 of Article II of these by-laws, ballots and the regular books and records of the corporation, except that the Inspectors may consider other reliable information for the limited purpose of reconciling proxies and ballots submitted by or on behalf of banks, brokers, their nominees or similar persons which represent more votes than the holder of a proxy is authorized by a stockholder of record to cast or more votes than such stockholder holds of record. If the Inspectors consider other reliable information for the limited purpose permitted herein, the Inspectors, at the time they make their certification pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section 14, shall specify the precise information considered by them, including the person or persons from whom such information was obtained, when and the means by which such information was obtained and the basis for the Inspectors' belief that such information is accurate and reliable.
 
Section 15. (a) In order that the corporation may determine the stockholders entitled (i) to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, (ii) to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, (iii) to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock or (iv) to take, receive or participate in any other action, the board of directors may fix a record date, which shall not be earlier than the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the board of directors and which (1) in the case of a determination of stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or adjournment thereof, shall, unless otherwise required by law, be not more than sixty nor less than ten days before the date of such meeting; and (2) in the case of any other action, shall be not more than sixty days before such action.
 
(b) If no record date is fixed, (i) the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held; and (ii) the record date for determining stockholders for any other purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the board of directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
 
(c) A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting, but the board of directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
 
 
 
Section 1. The number of directors shall be ten, or such other number as may, from time to time, be determined by the board of directors in a manner consistent with the certificate of incorporation.
 
Section 2. Subject to the rights of holders of any class or series of stock having a preference over the common stock as to dividends or upon liquidation, nominations for the election of directors may be made by the board of directors or a committee appointed by the board of directors or by any stockholder entitled to vote in the election of directors generally. However, any stockholder entitled to vote in the election of directors generally may nominate one or more persons for election as directors at a meeting only if written notice of such stockholder's intent to make such nomination or nominations has been given, either by personal delivery or by United States mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the corporation not later than (a) with respect to an election to be held at an annual meeting of stockholders, not less than ninety days nor more than 120 days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that no annual meeting was held in the previous year or the annual meeting is called for a date that is not within thirty days from the anniversary date of the preceding year's annual meeting date, written notice by the stockholder in order to be timely must be so received not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the day on which public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made, and (b) with respect to an election to be held at a special meeting of stockholders for the election of directors, the close of business on the tenth day following the date on which public disclosure of such meeting is first given to stockholders. Delivery shall be by hand, or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of any annual or special meeting commence a new time period for giving of a stockholder notice as described above. Each such notice shall set forth: (i) the name and address of the stockholder who intends to make the nomination; (ii) the name, principal occupation, age, business address and residence address of the person or persons to be nominated; (iii) the class and number of shares of stock of the corporation which are owned beneficially or of record by the stockholder and each nominee (which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting); (iv) a representation that the stockholder is the holder of record of stock of the corporation entitled to vote at such meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the person or persons specified in the notice;  (v) whether and the extent to which any hedging or other transaction or series of transactions has been entered into by or on behalf of, or any other agreement, arrangement or understanding (including any short position or any borrowing or lending of shares) has been made, the effect or intent of which is to mitigate loss to or manage risk or benefit of share price changes for, or to increase or decrease the voting power of, such stockholder with respect to any share of stock of the corporation (which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting); (vi) a description of all arrangements or understandings between the stockholder and any of its affiliates or associates and each nominee and any other person or persons (naming such person or persons) pursuant to which the nomination or nominations are to be made by the stockholder (which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting); (vii) such other information regarding each nominee proposed by such stockholder as would be required to be included in a proxy statement filed pursuant to the proxy rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission had the nominee been nominated by the board of directors; and (viii) the consent of each nominee to serve as a director of the corporation if so elected. The presiding officer of the meeting may refuse to acknowledge the nomination of any person not made in compliance with the foregoing procedure.
 
Section 3. The property and business of the corporation shall be managed by its board of directors, which may exercise all such powers of the corporation and do all such lawful acts and things as are not by statute or by the certificate of incorporation or by these by-laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders.
 
 
Section 4. The board of directors of the corporation may hold meetings, both regular and special, either within or without the State of Delaware.
 
Section 5. The first meeting of each newly elected board shall be held immediately after, and at the same place, if any, as, the annual meeting of stockholders at which such board shall have been elected or at such other time as the board of directors may determine, for the purpose of electing officers, and for the consideration of any other business that may properly be brought before the meeting. No notice of such meeting shall be necessary to the newly elected directors in order legally to constitute the meeting, provided a quorum shall be present.
 
Section 6. Regular meetings of the board of directors shall be held on such dates, not less often than once each calendar quarter, as may be fixed from time to time by the board of directors. No notice need be given of such regular meetings. Such meetings shall be held at the Lake Forest office of the corporation or at such other place as the board of directors may determine. Upon the assent, given either verbally or in writing, of a majority of the whole board, any regular meeting may be cancelled, the time changed, or may be held at such other place and time, as a majority of the whole board may designate, either verbally or in writing, upon reasonable notice given to each director.
 
Section 7. Special meetings of the board of directors may be called by the Chairman of the Board, or by the Secretary on the written request of two directors, to be held either at the Lake Forest office of the corporation or at such other place, if any, as may be convenient and may be designated by the person calling the meeting. Reasonable notice of such special meeting shall be given to each director.
 
Section 8. (a) At all meetings of the board the presence of a majority of the whole board shall be necessary and sufficient to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and the act of a majority of the directors present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be the act of the board of directors, except as may be otherwise specifically provided by statute or by the certificate of incorporation or by these by-laws. If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the board of directors the directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
 
(b) A director who is directly or indirectly a party to a contract or transaction with the corporation, or is a director or officer of or has a financial interest in any other corporation, partnership, association or other organization which is a party to a contract or transaction with the corporation, may be counted in determining whether a quorum is present at any meeting of the board of directors or a committee thereof at which such contract or transaction is considered or authorized, and such director may participate in such meeting and vote on such authorization to the extent permitted by applicable law, including Section 144 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
 
 
Section 9. The board of directors may, by resolution passed by a majority of the whole board of directors, designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of one or more directors of the corporation or such higher number as shall be required by the certificate of incorporation. The board of directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of the committee, the member or members present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the board of directors to act at the meeting in place of any such absent or disqualified member. Any such committee, to the extent permitted by law and provided in these by-laws or in the resolution of the board of directors designating such committee, or an amendment to such resolution, shall have and may exercise all the powers and authority of the board of directors in the management of the business and affairs of the corporation, and may authorize the seal of the corporation to be affixed to all papers which may require it.
 
Section 10. Unless the board of directors otherwise provides, each committee designated by the board of directors may make, alter and repeal rules for the conduct of its business. In the absence of such rules each committee shall conduct its business in the same manner as the board of directors conducts its business pursuant to this Article III of these by-laws.
 
 
Section 11. Directors shall receive such fees and reimbursement of reasonable expenses as may be fixed from time to time by resolution of the board. Members of special or standing committees shall also be allowed such fees and reimbursements for reasonable expenses in connection with service on such committees as may from time to time be fixed by resolution of the board. Such fees may be fixed on the basis of meetings attended or on an annual basis or both and may be payable currently or deferred.
 
 
Section 12. Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the board of directors or of any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the board or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing (which may be in counterparts) or by electronic transmission, and the written consent or consents or electronic transmission or transmissions are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the board of directors or such committee. Such filing shall be made in paper form if the minutes of the corporation are maintained in paper form and shall be in electronic form if the minutes are maintained in electronic form.
 
 
Section 13. Directors may participate in a meeting of the board or any committee by means of conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other, and participation in a meeting pursuant to this section shall constitute presence in person at such meeting.
 
 
Section 14. Unless otherwise provided by the laws of the State of Delaware, a director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee thereof at which action is taken on any matter shall be presumed to have assented to the action taken unless his or her dissent shall be entered in the minutes of such meeting or unless he or she shall file his or her written dissent to such action with the person acting as Secretary of such meeting before the adjournment thereof or shall forward such dissent by registered mail to the Secretary immediately after the adjournment of such meeting. Such right to dissent shall not apply to a director who voted in favor of such action.
 
 
 
Section 1. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the certificate of incorporation or these by-laws, whenever notice is required to be given to any stockholder, director or member of any committee of the board of directors, such notice may be given by (i) personal delivery, (ii) depositing it, in a sealed envelope, in the United States mails, first class, postage prepaid, addressed, (iii) delivering to a company for overnight or second day mail or delivery, (iv) transmitting it via telecopier, or (v) any other reliable means permitted by applicable law (including electronic or Internet mail or transmission) in each case to such stockholder, director or member, either at the address of such stockholder, director or member as it appears on the records of the corporation or, in the case of such a director or member, at his or her business address; and such notice shall be deemed to be given at the time when it is thus personally delivered, deposited, delivered or transmitted, as the case may be. Such requirement for notice shall also be deemed satisfied, except in the case of stockholder meetings, if actual notice is received orally or by other writing by the person entitled thereto as far in advance of the event with respect to which notice is being given as the minimum notice period required by law or these by-laws.
 
(b) Without limiting the foregoing, any notice to stockholders given by the corporation pursuant to these by-laws shall be effective if given by a form of electronic transmission consented to by the stockholder to whom the notice is given. Any such consent shall be revocable by the stockholder by written notice to the corporation and shall also be deemed revoked if (1) the corporation is unable to deliver by electronic transmission two consecutive notices given by the corporation in accordance with such consent and (2) such inability becomes known to the Secretary of the corporation, the transfer agent or other person responsible for the giving of notice; provided, however, that the inadvertent failure to treat such inability as a revocation shall not invalidate any meeting or other action. Notice given by a form of electronic transmission in accordance with these by-laws shall be deemed given: (i) if by facsimile telecommunication, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (ii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by a posting on an electronic network, together with separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later of such posting and the giving of such separate notice; and (iv) if by another form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder.
 
Section 2. (a) Whenever notice is required to be given by law, the certificate of incorporation or these by-laws to any stockholder to whom (i) notice of two consecutive annual meetings of stockholders and all notices of meetings of stockholders during the period between such two consecutive annual meetings, or (ii) all, and at least two, payments (if sent by first class mail) of dividends or interest on securities of the corporation during a 12-month period, have been mailed addressed to such stockholder at the address of such stockholder as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable, the giving of such notice to such stockholder shall not be required. Any action or meeting which shall be taken or held without notice to such stockholder shall have the same force and effect as if such notice had been duly given. If any such stockholder shall deliver to the corporation a written notice setting forth the then current address of such stockholder, the requirement that notice be given to such stockholder shall be reinstated.
 
(a) Whenever notice is required to be given by law, the certificate of incorporation or these by-laws to any person with whom communication is unlawful, the giving of such notice to such person shall not be required, and there shall be no duty to apply to any governmental authority or agency for a license or permit to give such notice to such person. Any action or meeting which shall be taken or held without notice to any such person with whom communication is unlawful shall have the same force and effect as if such notice had been duly given.
 
Section 3. Any written waiver of notice, signed by the person entitled to notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to notice. Attendance of a person at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the person attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the stockholders, directors, or members of a committee or directors need be specified in any written waiver of notice.
 
 
 
Section 1. The board of directors shall elect a Chairman of the Board from among its members. The board of directors shall also elect a Chief Executive Officer, Secretary and such other officers as the board of directors determines, none of whom need to be members of the board of directors.
 
Section 2. The officers of the corporation shall hold office until their successors are chosen and qualify. Any officer of the corporation may be removed at any time by the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole board of directors.
 
Section 3. The officers of the corporation shall have such powers and duties in the management of the corporation as may be prescribed by the board of directors and, to the extent not so provided, as generally pertain to their respective offices, subject to the control of the board of directors.
 
Section 4. The Chief Executive Officer of the corporation shall in general supervise and control all of the business affairs of the corporation, subject to the direction of the board of directors. The Chief Executive Officer may execute, in the name and on behalf of the corporation, any deeds, mortgages, bonds, contracts or other instruments which the board of directors or a committee thereof has authorized to be executed, except in cases where the execution shall have been expressly delegated by the board of directors or a committee thereof to some other officer or agent of the corporation.
 
Section 5. In addition to such other duties, if any, as may be assigned to the Secretary by the board of directors, the Chairman of the Board, or the Chief Executive Officer, the Secretary shall (i) keep the minutes of proceedings of the stockholders, the board of directors and any committee of the board of directors in one or more books provided for that purpose; (ii) see that all notices are duly given in accordance with the provisions of these by-laws or as required by law; (iii) be the custodian of the records and seal of the corporation; (iv) affix or cause to be affixed the seal of the corporation or a facsimile thereof, and attest the seal by his or her signature, to all certificates for shares of stock of the corporation and to all other documents the execution of which under seal is authorized by the board of directors; and (v) unless such duties have been delegated by the board of directors to a transfer agent of the corporation, keep or cause to be kept a register of the name and address of each stockholder, as the same shall be furnished to the Secretary by such stockholder, and have general charge of the stock transfer records of the corporation.
 
 
 
Section 1. The corporation shall indemnify to the fullest extent that is lawful, any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (including an action by or in the right of the corporation) (a proceeding) by reason of the fact that he is or was a director or officer of the corporation, or is or was a director or officer of the corporation serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, against expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines, taxes, penalties and amounts paid in settlement actually and reasonably incurred by him in connection with such proceeding.
Section 2. The corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against any liability asserted against him and incurred by him in any such capacity, or arising out of his status as such, whether or not he would be entitled to indemnity against the same liability under the provisions of this article.
Section 3. The corporation may enter into an indemnity agreement with any director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation, upon terms and conditions that the board of directors deems appropriate, as long as the provisions of the agreement are not inconsistent with this article.
 
Section 4. The corporation shall pay or reimburse the reasonable expenses (including attorneys fees) incurred by a director or officer of the corporation in defending any proceeding in advance of its final disposition upon  receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of such director or officer to repay all amounts advanced if it should be ultimately determined that he or she is not entitled to be indemnified under this Article VI or otherwise. The corporation may require security for any such undertaking.
 
Section 5. The rights conferred on any person by this Article VI shall not be exclusive of any other rights which such person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provision of the certificate of incorporation, these by-laws, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors or otherwise.
 
Section 6. If a claim for indemnification or payment of expenses under this Article VI is not paid in full within sixty days after a written claim therefor has been received by the corporation, the claimant may file suit to recover the unpaid amount of such claim and, if successful in whole or in part, shall be entitled to be paid the expense of prosecuting such claim. In any such action the corporation shall have the burden of proving that the claimant was not entitled to the requested indemnification or payment of expenses under applicable law.
 
Section 7. The corporation's obligation, if any, to indemnify any person who was or is serving at its request as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise shall be reduced by any amount such person may collect as indemnification from such other corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise.
Section 8. Any repeal or modification of the foregoing provisions of this Article VI shall not adversely affect any right or protection hereunder of any person in respect of any act or omission occurring prior to the time of such repeal or modification.
 
 
Section 1. Shares of the corporations stock may be certificated or uncertificated.  Every holder of stock in the corporation shall be entitled to have a certificate, signed by, or in the name of the corporation by the Chairman of the Board, the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the corporation, certifying the number of shares owned by him in the corporation. If the corporation shall be authorized to issue more than one class of stock or more than one series of any class, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional and other special rights of each class of stock or series thereof and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions or such preferences and rights shall be set forth in full or summarized on the face or back of any certificate which the corporation shall issue to represent such class or series of stock; provided, however, that, to the full extent allowed by law, in lieu of the foregoing requirements, there may be set forth on the face or back of any certificate which the corporation shall issue to represent such class or series of stock, a statement that the corporation will furnish without charge to each stockholder who so requests the designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class of stock or series thereof and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and rights.
 
Section 2. Any or all the signatures on such certificate may be a facsimile. In case any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the corporation with the same effect as if he were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
 
 
Section 3. The board of directors may direct a new certificate to be issued in place of any certificate previously issued by the corporation alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the person claiming the certificate of stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed.  When authorizing such issue of a new certificate, the board of directors may, in its discretion and as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed certificate, or his or her legal representative, to advertise the same in such a manner as the board of directors shall require and/or to give the corporation a bond in such sum as it may direct as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the corporation with respect to the certificate alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed.
 
 
Section 4. Upon surrender to the corporation or the transfer agent of the corporation of a certificate for shares duly endorsed or accompanied by proper evidence of succession, assignment or authority to transfer, it shall be the duty of the corporation to issue a new certificate to the person entitled thereto, cancel the old certificate and record the transaction upon its books.
 
 
Section 5. The corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, and to vote as such owner, and to hold liable for calls and assessments a person registered on its books as the owner of shares, and shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the party of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
 
 
 
 
Section 1. Dividends upon the capital stock of the corporation, subject to the provisions of the certificate of incorporation, if any, may be declared by the board of directors at any regular or special meeting, pursuant to law. Dividends may be paid in cash, in property, or in shares of the capital stock, subject to the provisions of the certificate of incorporation.
 
Section 2. Before payment of any dividend, there may be set aside out of any funds of the corporation available for dividends such sum or sums as the directors from time to time, in their absolute discretion, think proper as a reserve or reserves to meet contingencies, or for equalizing dividends, or for repairing or maintaining any property of the corporation, or for such other purpose as the directors shall think conducive to the interest of the corporation, and the directors may modify or abolish any such reserve in the manner in which it was created.
 
 
Section 3. The fiscal year of the corporation shall begin on the first day of January, and terminate on the thirty-first day of December, in each year.
 
 
Section 4. The corporate seal, if any, shall have inscribed thereon the name of the corporation, the year of its organization and the words "Incorporated in Delaware". The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced or otherwise.
 
 
Section 5. (a) For purposes of these by-laws, "electronic transmission" means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved and reviewed by a recipient thereof, and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by such a recipient through an automated process.
 
(b) For purposes of these by-laws, "public disclosure" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press or comparable national news service, or in a document publicly filed by the corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
 
 
Section 1. The holders of shares of capital stock of the corporation entitled at the time to vote for the election of directors shall have the power to adopt, alter, amend, or repeal the by-laws of the corporation by vote of such percentage of such shares as is required by the Certificate of Incorporation, or if no percentage is specified by the Certificate of Incorporation, by vote of not less than 66-2/3% of such shares. The board of directors shall also have the power to adopt, alter, amend or repeal the by-laws of the corporation by vote of such percentage of the entire board as is required by the Certificate of Incorporation, or if no percentage is specified by the Certificate of Incorporation, by vote of not less than a majority of the entire board.
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
               Section 1. The registered office shall be in the City of Wilmington, County of New Castle, State of Delaware.
 
               Section 2. The corporation may also have offices in the City of Lake Forest, State of Illinois, and at such other places as the board of directors may from time to time determine or the business of the corporation may require.
 
 
 
               Section 1. Meetings of stockholders may be held at such time and place, if any, within or without the State of Delaware, as shall be stated in the notice of the meeting or in a duly executed waiver of notice thereof. The board of directors may, in its sole discretion, determine that the meeting shall not be held at any place, but shall be held solely by means of remote communication, subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of directors may adopt, as permitted by applicable law.
 
               Section 2. (a) An annual meeting of stockholders shall be held at such time and on such day in the month of April or in such other month as the board of directors may specify by resolution. At the annual meeting the stockholders shall elect, by ballot, a board of directors and transact such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
by a plurality vote of those stockholders voting at the meeting
 
               (b) For business to be properly brought before the meeting, it must be: (i) authorized by the board of directors and specified in the notice, or a supplemental notice, of the meeting, (ii) otherwise brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the board of directors or the chairman of the meeting, or (iii) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder. For business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder, the stockholder must have given written notice thereof to the Secretary of the corporation, delivered or mailed to and received at the principal executive offices of the corporation not less than ninety days nor more than 120 days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that no annual meeting was held in the previous year or the annual meeting is called for a date that is not within thirty days from the anniversary date of the preceding year's annual meeting date, written notice by a stockholder in order to be timely must be received not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the day on which the first public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made. Delivery shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. In no event shall the public disclosure of an adjournment of an annual meeting commence a new time period for the giving of stockholder's notice as described above.  A stockholder's notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each item of business the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting: (1) a description of such item and the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting, (2) the name and address, as they appear on the corporation's records, of the stockholder proposing such business, (3) a representation that the stockholder is a holder of record of shares of stock of the corporation entitled to vote with respect to such business and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to move the consideration of such business, (4) the class and number of shares of stock of the which are beneficially (5) any material interest of the stockholder in such business. No business shall be conducted at any annual meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this paragraph (b) The chairman of the meeting at which any business is proposed by a stockholder shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that such business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this paragraph (b), and, in such event, the business not properly before the meeting shall not be transacted.
(other than the nomination of a person for election as a director, which is governed by Article III, Section 2 of these by-laws)
Corporation
corporation
owned
owned by the stockholder (for purposes of the regulations under Sections 13 and 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended), and
or of record by the stockholder (which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting),
a description of any agreement, arrangement or understanding with respect to such business between or among the stockholder and any of its affiliates or associates, and any others (including their names) acting in concert with any of the foregoing (which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting), (6) whether and the extent to which any hedging or other transaction or series of transactions has been entered into by or on behalf of, or any other agreement, arrangement or understanding (including any short position or any borrowing or lending of shares) has been made, the effect or intent of which is to mitigate loss to or manage risk or benefit of share price changes for, or to increase or decrease the voting power of, such stockholder with respect to any share of stock of the corporation (which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting) and (7)
.
or, with respect to the election of directors, the provisions of Article III, Section 2.
 
               Section 3. Written notice of the annual meeting stating the place, if any, date, hour of meeting, and the means of remote communications, if any, by which stockholders and proxyholders may be deemed to be present in person and vote at such meeting shall be given not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the corporation.
 
               Section 4. Special meetings of the stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, unless otherwise prescribed by statute or by the certificate of incorporation, may be called by the Chairman of the Board and shall be called by the Secretary at the request in writing of a majority of the board of directors. Such request shall state the purpose or purposes of the proposed meeting.
President or
               Section 5. Written notice of a special meeting of stockholders stating the place, if any, date, hour of meeting, the means of remote communications, if any, by which stockholders and proxyholders may be deemed to be present in person and vote at such meeting and the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called shall be given not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, directed to the stockholder at such stockholder's address as it appears on the records of the corporation.
 
               Section 6. Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice.
 
               Section 7. If authorized by the board of directors in accordance with these by-laws and applicable law, stockholders and proxyholders not physically present at a meeting of stockholders may, by means of remote communication, (1) participate in a meeting of stockholders and (2) be deemed present in person and vote at a meeting of stockholders, whether such meeting is to be held at a designated place or solely by means of remote communication, provided that (i) the corporation shall implement reasonable measures to verify that each person deemed present and permitted to vote at the meeting by means of remote communication is a stockholder or proxyholder, (ii) the corporation shall implement reasonable measures to provide such stockholders and proxyholders a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the stockholders, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with such proceedings, and (iii) if any stockholder or proxyholder votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of remote communication, a record of such vote or other action shall be maintained by the corporation.
 
               Section 8. The Secretary shall prepare, at least ten days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting for a period of at least ten days prior to the meeting: (i) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of the meeting, or (ii) during ordinary business hours, at the principal place of business of the corporation. In the event that the corporation determines to make the list available on an electronic network, the corporation may take reasonable steps to ensure that such information is available only to stockholders of the corporation. If the meeting is to be held at a place, the list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present. If the meeting is to be held solely by means of remote communication, the list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder during the whole time thereof on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the information required to access such list shall be provided with the notice of the meeting. The stock ledger shall be the only evidence as to who are the stockholders entitled to examine the list of stockholders or to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of stockholders.
stock ledger, the
or the books of the corporation,
required by this section
 
               Section 9. annual or special meeting of stockholders may from time to time to reconvene at the same or some other place, if any, and notice need not be given of any such adjourned meeting if the date, time and place, if any, thereof and the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxyholders may be deemed present in person and vote at such adjourned meeting are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken. At the adjourned meeting any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the original meeting. If the adjournment is for more than thirty days, or if after the adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the adjourned meeting in accordance with Section 3 or Section 5 of this Article II as the case may be.
Any
The Chairman of the Board or, in the Chairmans absence, such other person as the Board of Directors shall designate shall preside at any
.  Such presiding person
be adjourned
adjourn any annual or special meeting of stockholders
 
               Section 10. The holders of a majority of the shares of the capital stock of the corporation, issued and outstanding and entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall be requisite and shall constitute a quorum at all meetings of the stockholders for the transaction of business except as otherwise provided by statute or by the certificate of incorporation or by these by-laws. If a quorum is present when a meeting is convened, the subsequent withdrawal of stockholders, even though less than a quorum remains, shall not affect the ability of the remaining stockholders lawfully to transact business. If, however, such quorum shall not be present or represented at any meeting of the stockholders, the stockholders entitled to vote thereat, present in person or represented by proxy, shall have power to adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present or represented. At such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present or represented any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally notified.
 
               Section 11. a quorum is present or represented at any meeting, the vote of the holders of a majority of the stock having voting power present in person or represented by proxy shall decide any question brought before such meeting
When
In matters other than the election of directors, when
, unless
.  A nominee for director shall be elected to the board of directors if the votes cast for such nominees election exceed the votes cast against such nominees election; provided, that if the number of nominees for director as of the meetings record date exceeds the number of directors to be elected at such meeting, then each director to be elected shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast.
 
                the question is one upon which by express provision of the statutes or of the certificate of incorporation or of these by-laws, a different vote is required, such express provisions shall govern and control the decision of such question.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if
to be voted upon
in which case
 
               Section 12. (a) At any meeting of the stockholders every stockholder having the right to vote shall be entitled to vote in person. Each stockholder shall have one vote for each share of stock having voting power, registered in his name on the books of the corporation. Except where the transfer books of the corporation shall have been closed or a date shall have been fixed by the board of directors as a record date for the determination of its stockholders entitled to vote, no share of stock shall be voted on at any election for directors which shall have been transferred on the books of the corporation within twenty days next such election of directors.
proceeding
preceding
 
               (b) Voting at meetings of stockholders need not be by written ballot and need not be conducted by inspectors of election unless so required by Section 14 of Article II of these by-laws or so determined by the holders of stock having a majority of the votes which could be cast by the holders of all outstanding stock entitled to vote which are present in person or by proxy at such meeting.
 
               (c) Stock of the corporation standing in the name of another corporation and entitled to vote may be voted by such officer, agent or proxy as the by-laws or other internal regulations of such other corporation may prescribe or, in the absence of such provision, as the board of directors or comparable body of such other corporation may determine.
other corporations
 
               (d) Stock of the corporation standing in the name of a deceased person, a minor, an incompetent or a debtor in a case under Title 11, United States Code, and entitled to vote may be voted by an administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, debtor-in-possession or trustee, as the case may be, either in person or by proxy, without transfer of such shares into the name of the official or other person so voting.
 
               (e) A stockholder whose voting stock of the corporation is pledged shall be entitled to vote such stock unless on the transfer records of the corporation the pledgor has expressly empowered the pledgee to vote such shares, in which case only the pledgee, or such pledgee's proxy, may represent such shares and vote thereon.
 
               (f) If voting stock is held of record in the names of two or more persons, whether fiduciaries, members of a partnership, joint tenants, tenants in common, tenants by the entirety or otherwise, or if two or more persons have the same fiduciary relationship respecting the same shares, unless the Secretary is given written notice to the contrary and is furnished with a copy of the instrument or order appointing them or creating the relationship wherein it is so provided, their acts with respect to voting shall have the following effect: (i) if only one votes, such act binds all; (ii) if more than one vote, the act of the majority so voting binds all; and (iii) if more than one votes, but the vote is evenly split on any particular matter each faction may vote such stock  proportionally, or any person voting the shares, or a beneficiary, if any, may apply to the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware or such other court as may have jurisdiction to appoint an additional person to act with the persons so voting the stock, which shall then be voted as determined by a majority of such persons and the person appointed by the Court. If the instrument so filed shows that any such tenancy is held in unequal interests, a majority or even split for the purpose of this subsection shall be a majority or even split in interest.
 
               (g) Stock of the corporation belonging to the corporation, or to another corporation a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of directors of are held by the corporation, shall quorum . Nothing in this Section 12(g) shall limit the right of the corporation to vote shares of stock of the corporation held by it in a fiduciary capacity.
if
which
such other corporation
not be voted at any meeting of stockholders and shall not be counted in the total number of outstanding shares for the purpose of determining whether a
neither be entitled to vote nor be counted for
is present
purposes
 
               Section 13. (a) Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder by proxy filed with the Secretary before or at the time of the meeting. No such proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period. A duly executed proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power. A stockholder may revoke any proxy which is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by filing with the Secretary an instrument in writing revoking the proxy or another duly executed proxy bearing a later date.
 
               (b) A stockholder may authorize another person or persons to act for such stockholder as proxy (i) by executing a writing authorizing such person or persons to act as such, which execution may be accomplished by such stockholder or such stockholder's authorized officer, director, partner, employee or agent (or, if the stock is held in a trust or estate, by a trustee, executor or administrator thereof) signing such writing or causing his or her signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including, but not limited to, facsimile signature, or (ii) by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram or other means of electronic transmission (a "Transmission") to the person who will be the holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service organization or like agent duly authorized by the person who will be the holder of the proxy to receive such Transmission; provided that any such Transmission must either set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that such Transmission was authorized by such stockholder.
 
               (c) Any inspector or inspectors appointed pursuant to Section 14 of Article II of these by-laws shall examine Transmissions to determine if they are valid. If no inspector or inspectors are so appointed, the Secretary or such other person or persons as shall be appointed from time to time by the board of directors shall examine Transmissions to determine if they are valid. If it is determined that a Transmission is valid, the person or persons making that determination shall specify the information upon which such person or persons relied. Any copy, facsimile telecommunication or other reliable reproduction of such a writing or Transmission may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or Transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or Transmission could be used; provided that such copy, facsimile telecommunication or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or Transmission.
 
               Section 14. (a) If the corporation has a class of voting stock that is (i) listed on a national securities exchange, (ii) authorized for quotation on an interdealer quotation system of a registered national securities association or (iii) held of record by more than 2,000 stockholders, the board of directors shall, in advance of any meeting of stockholders, appoint one or more inspectors (individually an "Inspector," and collectively the "Inspectors") to act at such meeting and make a written report thereof. The board of directors may designate one or more persons as alternate Inspectors to replace any Inspector who shall fail to act. If no Inspector or alternate is able to act at such meeting, the chairman of the meeting shall appoint one or more other persons to act as Inspectors. Each Inspector, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of Inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability.
 
               (b) The Inspectors shall (i) ascertain the number of shares of stock of the corporation outstanding and the voting power of each, (ii) determine the number of shares of stock of the corporation present in person or by proxy at such meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots, (iii) count all votes and ballots, (iv) determine and retain for a reasonable period of time a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by the Inspectors and (v) certify their determination of the number of such shares present in person or by proxy at such meeting and their count of all votes and ballots. The Inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist them in the performance of their duties.
 
               (c) The date and time of the opening and the closing of the polls for each matter upon which the stockholders will vote at a meeting shall be announced at such meeting. No ballots, proxies or votes, nor any revocations thereof or changes thereto, shall be accepted by the Inspectors after the closing of the polls unless the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware upon application by any stockholder shall determine otherwise.
 
               (d) In determining the validity and counting of proxies and ballots, the Inspectors shall be limited to an examination of the proxies, any envelopes submitted with such proxies, any information referred to in paragraphs (b) and (c) of Section 13 of Article II of these by-laws, ballots and the regular books and records of the corporation, except that the Inspectors may consider other reliable information for the limited purpose of reconciling proxies and ballots submitted by or on behalf of banks, brokers, their nominees or similar persons which represent more votes than the holder of a proxy is authorized by a stockholder of record to cast or more votes than such stockholder holds of record. If the Inspectors consider other reliable information for the limited purpose permitted herein, the Inspectors, at the time they make their certification pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section 14, shall specify the precise information considered by them, including the person or persons from whom such information was obtained, when and the means by which such information was obtained and the basis for the Inspectors' belief that such information is accurate and reliable.
 
               Section 15. (a) In order that the corporation may determine the stockholders entitled (i) to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, (ii) to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, (iii) to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock or (iv) to take, receive or participate in any other action, the board of directors may fix a record date, which shall not be earlier than the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the board of directors and which (1) in the case of a determination of stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or adjournment thereof, shall, unless otherwise required by law, be not more than sixty nor less than ten days before the date of such meeting; and (2) in the case of any other action, shall be not more than sixty days before such action.
 
               (b) If no record date is fixed, (i) the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held; and (ii) the record date for determining stockholders for any other purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the board of directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
 
               (c) A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting, but the board of directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
 
 
 
 
               Section 1. The number of directors shall be number may, from time to time, be with the certificate of incorporation.
twelve, but the
ten, or such other
of directors
as
altered by amendment of these by-laws in accordance
determined by the board of directors in a manner consistent
 
               Section 2. Subject to the rights of holders of any class or series of stock having a preference over the as to dividends or upon liquidation, nominations for the election of directors may be made by the board of directors or a committee appointed by the board of directors or by any stockholder entitled to vote in the election of directors generally. However, any stockholder entitled to vote in the election of directors generally may nominate one or more persons for election as directors at a meeting only if written notice of such stockholder's intent to make such nomination or nominations has been given, either by personal delivery or by United States mail, postage prepaid, to the Secretary of the corporation not later than (a) with respect to an election to be held at an annual meeting of stockholders, not less than ninety days nor more than 120 days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that no annual meeting was held in the previous year or the annual meeting is called for a date that is not within thirty days from the anniversary date of the preceding year's annual meeting date, written notice by the stockholder in order to be timely must be so received not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the day on which public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made, and (b) with respect to an election to be held at a special meeting of stockholders for the election of directors, the close of business on the tenth day following the date on which public disclosure of such meeting is first given to stockholders. Delivery shall be by hand, or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. In no event shall the public announcement of an adjournment of any annual or special meeting commence a new time period for giving of a stockholder notice as described above. Each such notice shall set forth: (i) the name and address of the stockholder who intends to make the nomination; (ii) the name, principal occupation, age, business address and residence address of the person or persons to be nominated; (iii) the class and number of shares of stock of the corporation which are beneficially by the stockholder and each nominee (); (iv) a representation that the stockholder is the holder of record of stock of the corporation entitled to vote at such meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the person or persons specified in the notice; ) a description of all arrangements or understandings between the stockholder and each nominee and any other person or persons (naming such person or persons) pursuant to which the nomination or nominations are to be made by the stockholder) such other information regarding each nominee proposed by such stockholder as would be required to be included in a proxy statement filed pursuant to the proxy rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission had the nominee been nominated by the board of directors; and () the consent of each nominee to serve as a director of the corporation if so elected. The presiding officer of the meeting may refuse to acknowledge the nomination of any person not made in compliance with the foregoing procedure.
Common Stock
common stock
owned
owned
or of record
for the purposes of the regulations under Sections 13 and 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended
which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting
(v
(v) whether and the extent to which any hedging or other transaction or series of transactions has been entered into by or on behalf of, or any other agreement, arrangement or understanding (including any short position or any borrowing or lending of shares) has been made, the effect or intent of which is to mitigate loss to or manage risk or benefit of share price changes for, or to increase or decrease the voting power of, such stockholder with respect to any share of stock of the corporation (which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting); (vi
any of its affiliates or associates and
; (vi
(which information shall be updated by such stockholder as of the record date of the meeting not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting); (vii
vii
viii
 
               Section 3. The property and business of the corporation shall be managed by its board of directors, which may exercise all such powers of the corporation and do all such lawful acts and things as are not by statute or by the certificate of incorporation or by these by-laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders.
 
 
               Section 4. The board of directors of the corporation may hold meetings, both regular and special, either within or without the State of Delaware.
 
               Section 5. The first meeting of each newly elected board shall be held immediately after, and at the same place, if any, as, the annual meeting of stockholders at which such board shall have been elected, for the purpose of electing officers, and for the consideration of any other business that may properly be brought before the meeting. No notice of such meeting shall be necessary to the newly elected directors in order legally to constitute the meeting, provided a quorum shall be present.
or at such other time as the board of directors may determine
 
               Section 6. Regular meetings of the board of directors shall be held on such dates, not less often than once each calendar quarter, as may be fixed from time to time by the board of directors. No notice need be given of such meetings. Such meetings shall be held at the Lake Forest office of the corporation or at such other place as . Upon the assent, given either verbally or in writing, of a majority of the whole board, any regular meeting may be cancelled, the time changed, or may be held at such other place and time, as a majority of the whole board may designate, either verbally or in writing, upon reasonable notice given to each director.
resolution of
regular
, provided that notice of such resolution has been furnished to each director
is stated in the notice of the meeting
the board of directors may determine
, either personally or by mail or by telegram
 
               Section 7. Special meetings of the board of directors may be called by the Chairman of the Board, or by the Secretary on the written request of two directors, to be held either at the Lake Forest office of the corporation or at such other place, if any, as may be convenient and may be designated by the calling the meeting. Reasonable notice of such special meeting shall be given to each director.
officer
person
, provided, that a majority of the whole board of directors present at a meeting called by any of said officers, in matters requiring prompt attention by the board, may hold a valid meeting and transact business without the giving of notice to each director as above provided
 
               Section 8. (a) At all meetings of the board the presence of a majority of the whole board shall be necessary and sufficient to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and the act of a majority of the directors present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be the act of the board of directors, except as may be otherwise specifically provided by statute or by the certificate of incorporation or by these by-laws. If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the board of directors the directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
 
               (b) A director who is directly or indirectly a party to a contract or transaction with the corporation, or is a director or officer of or has a financial interest in any other corporation, partnership, association or other organization which is a party to a contract or transaction with the corporation, may be counted in determining whether a quorum is present at any meeting of the board of directors or a committee thereof at which such contract or transaction is considered or authorized, and such director may participate in such meeting and vote on such authorization to the extent permitted by applicable law, including Section 144 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware.
 
 
               Section 9. The board of directors may, by resolution passed by a majority of the whole board of directors, designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of one or more directors of the corporation. The board of directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of the committee, the member or members present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the board of directors to act at the meeting in place of any such absent or disqualified member. Any such committee, to the extent permitted by law and provided in these by-laws or in the resolution of the board of directors designating such committee, or an amendment to such resolution, shall have and may exercise all the powers and authority of the board of directors in the management of the business and affairs of the corporation, and may authorize the seal of the corporation to be affixed to all papers which may require it.
or such higher number as shall be required by the certificate of incorporation
 
 
               Section 10. Unless the board of directors otherwise provides, each committee designated by the board of directors may make, alter and repeal rules for the conduct of its business. In the absence of such rules each committee shall conduct its business in the same manner as the board of directors conducts its business pursuant to this Article III of these by-laws.
 
 
               
Section 11. The board
of directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, any of whom may be selected by the chairman of a committee to replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of a committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee and of the alternate members of such committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitutes a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the board of directors to act at the meeting in place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
 
 
 
 
               Section Directors shall receive such fees and reimbursement of reasonable expenses as may be fixed from time to time by resolution of the board. Members of special or standing committees shall also be allowed such fees and reimbursements for reasonable expenses in connection with service on such committees as may from time to time be fixed by resolution of the board. Such fees may be fixed on the basis of meetings attended or on an annual basis or both and may be payable currently or deferred.
12.
11.
 
 
               Section Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the board of directors or of any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all members of the board or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing (which may be in counterparts) or by electronic transmission, and the written consent or consents or electronic transmission or transmissions are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the board of directors or such committee. Such filing shall be made in paper form if the minutes of the corporation are maintained in paper form and shall be in electronic form if the minutes are maintained in electronic form.
13.
12.
 
 
               Section Directors may participate in a meeting of the board or any committee by means of conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other, and participation in a meeting pursuant to this section shall constitute presence in person at such meeting.
14.
13.
 
 
               Section Unless otherwise provided by the laws of the State of Delaware, a director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee thereof at which action is taken on any matter shall be presumed to have assented to the action taken unless his or her dissent shall be entered in the minutes of such meeting or unless he or she shall file his or her written dissent to such action with the person acting as Secretary of such meeting before the adjournment thereof or shall forward such dissent by registered mail to the Secretary immediately after the adjournment of such meeting. Such right to dissent shall not apply to a director who voted in favor of such action.
15.
14.
 
 
 
               Section 1. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the certificate of incorporation or these by-laws, whenever notice is required to be given to any stockholder, director or member of any committee of the board of directors, such notice may be given by (i) personal delivery, (ii) depositing it, in a sealed envelope, in the United States mails, first class, postage prepaid, addressed, (iii) delivering to a company for overnight or second day mail or delivery, (iv) transmitting it via telecopier, or (v) any other reliable means permitted by applicable law (including electronic or Internet mail or transmission) in each case to such stockholder, director or member, either at the address of such stockholder, director or member as it appears on the records of the corporation or, in the case of such a director or member, at his or her business address; and such notice shall be deemed to be given at the time when it is thus personally delivered, deposited, delivered or transmitted, as the case may be. Such requirement for notice shall also be deemed satisfied, except in the case of stockholder meetings, if actual notice is received orally or by other writing by the person entitled thereto as far in advance of the event with respect to which notice is being given as the minimum notice period required by law or these by-laws.
delivering it to a telegraph company, charges prepaid, for transmission, or by
 
               (b) Without limiting the foregoing, any notice to stockholders given by the corporation pursuant to these by-laws shall be effective if given by a form of electronic transmission consented to by the stockholder to whom the notice is given. Any such consent shall be revocable by the stockholder by written notice to the corporation and shall also be deemed revoked if (1) the corporation is unable to deliver by electronic transmission two consecutive notices given by the corporation in accordance with such consent and (2) such inability becomes known to the Secretary of the corporation, the transfer agent or other person responsible for the giving of notice; provided, however, that the inadvertent failure to treat such inability as a revocation shall not invalidate any meeting or other action. Notice given by a form of electronic transmission in accordance with these by-laws shall be deemed given: (i) if by facsimile telecommunication, when directed to a number at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (ii) if by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the stockholder has consented to receive notice; (iii) if by a posting an electronic network, together with separate notice to the stockholder of such specific posting, upon the later of such posting and the giving of such separate notice; and (iv) if by another form of electronic transmission, when directed to the stockholder.
n
on
 
               Section 2. (a) Whenever notice is required to be given by law, the certificate of incorporation or these by-laws to any stockholder to whom (i) notice of two consecutive annual meetings of stockholders and all notices of meetings of stockholders during the period between such two consecutive annual meetings, or (ii) all, and at least two, payments (if sent by first class mail) of dividends or interest on securities of the corporation during a 12-month period, have been mailed addressed to such stockholder at the address of such stockholder as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable, the giving of such notice to such stockholder shall not be required. Any action or meeting which shall be taken or held without notice to such stockholder shall have the same force and effect as if such notice had been duly given. If any such stockholder shall deliver to the corporation a written notice setting forth the then current address of such stockholder, the requirement that notice be given to such stockholder shall be reinstated.
 
               (a) Whenever notice is required to be given by law, the certificate of incorporation or these by-laws to any person with whom communication is unlawful, the giving of such notice to such person shall not be required, and there shall be no duty to apply to any governmental authority or agency for a license or permit to give such notice to such person. Any action or meeting which shall be taken or held without notice to any such person with whom communication is unlawful shall have the same force and effect as if such notice had been duly given.
 
               Section 3. Any written waiver of notice, signed by the person entitled to notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to notice. Attendance of a person at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the person attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the stockholders, directors, or members of a committee or directors need be specified in any written waiver of notice.
 
 
 
 
               Section 1. The board of directors shall elect a Chairman of the Board from among its members. The board of directors shall also elect a Chief Executive Officer, Secretary and such other officers as the board of directors determines, none of whom need to be members of the board of directors.
 
               Section 2. The officers of the corporation shall hold office until their successors are chosen and qualify. Any officer of the corporation may be removed at any time by the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole board of directors.
 
               Section 3. The officers of the corporation shall have such powers and duties in the management of the corporation as may be prescribed by the board of directors and, to the extent not so provided, as generally pertain to their respective offices, subject to the control of the board of directors.
The board of directors may require any officer, agent or employee to give security for the faithful performance of his or her duties.
 
               Section 4. The Chief Executive Officer of the corporation shall in general supervise and control all of the business affairs of the corporation, subject to the direction of the board of directors. The Chief Executive Officer may execute, in the name and on behalf of the corporation, any deeds, mortgages, bonds, contracts or other instruments which the board of directors or a committee thereof has authorized to be executed, except in cases where the execution shall have been expressly delegated by the board of directors or a committee thereof to some other officer or agent of the corporation.
 
               Section 5. In addition to such other duties, if any, as may be assigned to the Secretary by the board of directors, the Chairman of the Board, or the Chief Executive Officer, the Secretary shall (i) keep the minutes of proceedings of the stockholders, the board of directors and any committee of the board of directors in one or more books provided for that purpose; (ii) see that all notices are duly given in accordance with the provisions of these by-laws or as required by law; (iii) be the custodian of the records and seal of the corporation; (iv) affix or cause to be affixed the seal of the corporation or a facsimile thereof, and attest the seal by his or her signature, to all certificates for shares of stock of the corporation and to all other documents the execution of which under seal is authorized by the board of directors; and (v) unless such duties have been delegated by the board of directors to a transfer agent of the corporation, keep or cause to be kept a register of the name and address of each stockholder, as the same shall be furnished to the Secretary by such stockholder, and have general charge of the stock transfer records of the corporation.
 
 
 
 
 
 
               Section 1. The corporation indemnify to the fullest extent that is lawful, any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (including an action by or in the right of the corporation) by reason of the fact that he is or was a directorofficer of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, against expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines, taxes, penalties and amounts paid in settlement actually and reasonably incurred by him in connection with such proceeding.
may
shall
(a proceeding)
,
or
, employee or agent
a director or officer of the corporation
action, suit or
               Section 2. The corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against any liability asserted against him and incurred by him in any such capacity, or arising out of his status as such, whether or not he would be entitled to indemnity against the same liability under the provisions of this article.
               Section 3. The corporation may enter into an indemnity agreement with any director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation, upon terms and conditions that the board of directors deems appropriate, as long as the provisions of the agreement are not inconsistent with this article.
 
               Section 4. The corporation pay or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred in defending any proceeding in advance of its final disposition an undertaking by such or to repay all amounts advanced if it should be ultimately determined that he or she is not entitled to be indemnified under this Article VI or otherwise. The corporation may require security for any such undertaking.
may
shall
(including attorneys fees)
by a director or officer of the corporation
if the corporation has received in advance
upon  receipt of
the person receiving
or on behalf of
payment
director
reimbursement
officer
 
               Section 5. The rights conferred on any person by this Article VI shall not be exclusive of any other rights which such person may have or hereafter acquire under any statute, provision of the certificate of incorporation, these by-laws, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors or otherwise.
 
               Section 6. If a claim for indemnification or payment of expenses under this Article VI is not paid in full within sixty days after a written claim therefor has been received by the corporation, the claimant may file suit to recover the unpaid amount of such claim and, if successful in whole or in part, shall be entitled to be paid the expense of prosecuting such claim. In any such action the corporation shall have the burden of proving that the claimant was not entitled to the requested indemnification or payment of expenses under applicable law.
 
               Section 7. The corporation's obligation, if any, to indemnify any person who was or is serving at its request as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture or other enterprise shall be reduced by any amount such person may collect as indemnification from such other corporation, partnership, joint venture or other enterprise.
, partner
, trust
, trust
               Section 8. Any repeal or modification of the foregoing provisions of this Article VI shall not adversely affect any right or protection hereunder of any person in respect of any act or omission occurring prior to the time of such repeal or modification.
 
 
               Section 1. Every holder of stock in the corporation shall be entitled to have a certificate, signed by, or in the name of the corporation by the Chairman of the Board, the President or a Vice President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the corporation, certifying the number of shares owned by him in the corporation. If the corporation shall be authorized to issue more than one class of stock or more than one series of any class, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional and other special rights of each class of stock or series thereof and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions or such preferences and rights shall be set forth in full or summarized on the face or back of certificate which the corporation shall issue to represent such class or series of stock; provided, however, that, to the full extent allowed by law, in lieu of the foregoing requirements, there may be set forth on the face or back of certificate which the corporation shall issue to represent such class or series of stock, a statement that the corporation will furnish without charge to each stockholder who so requests the designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class of stock or series thereof and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and rights.
Shares of the corporations stock may be certificated or uncertificated.  
the
any
the
any
 
               Section 2. certificate may be a facsimile. In case any officer, transfer agent, or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent, or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the corporation with the same effect as if he were such officer, transfer agent, or registrar at the date of issue.
If such certificate is countersigned (1) by a transfer agent, or (2) by a registrar, any other signature on the
Any or all the signatures on such
 
 
               Section 3. The board of directors may in place of any alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, in its discretion and as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, .
authorize the transfer agents and registrars of the corporation to issue and register, respectively, new certificates
direct a new certificate to be issued
certificates
certificate previously issued by the corporation
and
upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the person claiming the certificate of stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed.  When authorizing such issue of a new certificate, the board of directors may,
may prescribe such terms and conditions as it deems expedient, and may require such indemnities as it deems necessary to protect the corporation and said transfer agents and registrars
require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed certificate, or his or her legal representative, to advertise the same in such a manner as the board of directors shall require and/or to give the corporation a bond in such sum as it may direct as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the corporation with respect to the certificate alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed
 
 
               Section 4. Upon surrender to the corporation or the transfer agent of the corporation of a certificate for shares duly endorsed or accompanied by proper evidence of succession, assignment or authority to transfer, it shall be the duty of the corporation to issue a new certificate to the person entitled thereto, cancel the old certificate and record the transaction upon its books.
 
 
               Section 5. The corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, and to vote as such owner, and to hold liable for calls and assessments a person registered on its books as the owner of shares, and shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the party of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
 
 
 
 
               Section 1. Dividends upon the capital stock of the corporation, subject to the provisions of the certificate of incorporation, if any, may be declared by the board of directors at any regular or special meeting, pursuant to law. Dividends may be paid in cash, in property, or in shares of the capital stock, subject to the provisions of the certificate of incorporation.
 
               Section 2. Before payment of any dividend, there may be set aside out of any funds of the corporation available for dividends such sum or sums as the directors from time to time, in their absolute discretion, think proper as a reserve or reserves to meet contingencies, or for equalizing dividends, or for repairing or maintaining any property of the corporation, or for such other purpose as the directors shall think conducive to the interest of the corporation, and the directors may modify or abolish any such reserve in the manner in which it was created.
 
               
Section 3. The board of directors shall present at each annual meeting and when called for by vote of the stockholders at any special meeting of the stockholders, a full and clear statement of the business and condition of the corporation.
 
 
               
Section 4. All checks or demands for money and notes of the corporation shall be signed by such officer or officers or such other person or persons as the board of directors may from time to time designate. The board of directors, in its discretion, may delegate its responsibilities contained in this section to any officer or officers of the corporation.
 
 
               Section The fiscal year of the corporation shall begin on the first day of January, and terminate on the thirty-first day of December, in each year.
5.
3.
 
 
               Section The corporate seal shall have inscribed thereon the name of the corporation, the year of its organization and the words "Incorporated Delaware". The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced or otherwise.
6.
4.
, if any,
in
 
 
               Section (a) For purposes of these by-laws, "electronic transmission" means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved and reviewed by a recipient thereof, and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by such a recipient through an automated process.
7.
5.
 
               (b) For purposes of these by-laws, "public disclosure" shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by the Dow Jones News Service, Associated Press or comparable national news service, or in a document publicly filed by the corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
 
 
               
Section 1. This corporation shall be subject to Section 404(a) of the
Tennessee Authorized Corporation Protection Act.
 
 
 
               Section 1. The holders of shares of capital stock of the corporation entitled at the time to vote for the election of directors shall have the power to adopt, alter, amend, or repeal the by-laws of the corporation by vote of such percentage of such shares as is required by the Certificate of Incorporation, or if no percentage is specified by the Certificate of Incorporation, by vote of not less than 66-2/3% of such shares. The board of directors shall also have the power to adopt, alter, amend or repeal the by-laws of the corporation by vote of such percentage of the entire board as is required by the Certificate of Incorporation, or if no percentage is specified by the Certificate of Incorporation, by vote of not less than a majority of the entire board.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20100429073350.txt.gz
TIME:20100429073350
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]         Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]          Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 29, 2010, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2010. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its first quarter 2010 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.  In addition, Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future gro wth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

 
 
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the first quarter of 2010:
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Apr. 29, 2010
  
Total net sales of $844.4 million, up 15 percent versus 2009.
  
A net loss of $13.0 million, or $0.15 per diluted share, which includes $0.08 per diluted share of restructuring and impairment charges and $0.02 per diluted share of benefits from special tax items.
  
Operating earnings of $10.1 million, a $137.6 million improvement from prior year.
  
Cash totaled $552.4 million, up from 2009 year-end balance of $526.6 million.
  
Low beginning-of-year marine dealer inventories led to increased production and wholesale shipments.
The successful execution of our strategic initiatives over the past several quarters was a key factor in our improved first quarter results, said Brunswicks Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  Historically low marine dealer inventories as we entered the year led to improved wholesale shipments.  This, combined with significant fixed-cost reductions achieved over the past two years, enabled us to report our first quarterly operating profit since the first quarter of 2008.  In addition, our net debt declined by $22 million, as cash balances increased by $26 million.
 The factors that positively affected our revenues and earnings in the first quarter of 2010, compared to the previous year, included: higher overall unit production and sales levels and improved fixed-cost absorption in our marine businesses, combined with lower discounts required to facilitate retail boat sales.  During the quarter, we also benefited from lower special tax items, cost savings from our fixed-cost reduction activities, lower restructuring and impairment charges, as well as reduced pension and bad debt expense.  Partially offsetting these factors was higher interest expense, McCoy said.
First Quarter Results
For the first quarter of 2010, the company reported net sales of $844.4 million, up from $734.7 million a year earlier.  For the quarter, the company reported operating earnings of $10.1 million, which included $7.4 million of restructuring and impairment charges.  In the first quarter of 2009, the company had an operating loss of $127.5 million, which included $39.6 million of restructuring and impairment charges.
For the first quarter, Brunswick reported a net loss of $13.0 million, or $0.15 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $184.2 million, or $2.08 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2009.  The diluted loss per share for the first quarter of 2010 included restructuring and impairment charges of $0.08 per diluted share and $0.02 per diluted share of benefits from special tax items.  Diluted loss per share for the first quarter of 2009 included $0.45 per diluted share of restructuring and impairment charges, and $0.40 per diluted share of non-cash charges for special tax items.
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and cash equivalents were $552.4 million at the end of the first quarter, up $25.8 million from year-end 2009 levels.  The companys increased cash position reflects the receipt of a $109.5 million federal tax refund, which was more than offset by changes in certain current assets and current liabilities along with net losses experienced during the quarter. The change in certain current assets and current liabilities was largely the result of seasonal increases in the companys accounts and notes receivable and inventory, partially offset by increases in accounts payable.  The companys accrued expenses also decreased in the quarter.
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and cash equivalents) was $302.0 million, down $22.3 million from year-end 2009 levels.  The companys total liquidity (defined as cash and cash equivalents, plus amounts available under its asset-backed lending facilities) totaled $677 million, up $62 million from year-end 2009 levels.
 
 
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine service, parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $445.7 million in the first quarter of 2010, up 30 percent from $343.9 million in the year-ago first quarter.  International sales, which represented 47 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 37 percent. For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported operating earnings of $26.5 million, including restructuring charges of $2.4 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $50.6 million in the year-ago quarter, which included $11.7 million of restructuring charges.
Sales were higher across all Marine Engines main operations, except for low single-digit declines in the segments domestic marine service, parts and accessories businesses, which represented 22 percent of total segment sales in the quarter.  The segments sterndrive engine business experienced the greatest level of growth.
           Mercurys manufacturing facilities ramped up production during the quarter in response to customer inventory requirements.  Higher sales, increased fixed-cost absorption, lower restructuring charges, fixed-cost reductions, as well as reduced pension and lower bad debt expense, had a positive effect on operating earnings during the quarter.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 16 boat brands.  The Boat segment reported net sales of $243.6 million for the first quarter of 2010, an increase of 19 percent compared with $205.3 million in the first quarter of 2009. International sales, which represented 37 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 8 percent during the period.  For the first quarter of 2010, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $26.7 million, including restructuring and impairment charges of $4.1 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $72.3 million, including restructuring and impairment charges of $25.0 million, in the first quarter of 2009.
Boat manufacturing facilities began to ramp up production during the quarter to address inventory requirements of their dealers.  Higher sales, increased fixed-cost absorption, fixed-cost reductions, lower restructuring charges and reduced discounts required to support retail sales by dealers were the primary factors behind the segments reduction in operating losses in the quarter.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales in the first quarter of 2010 totaled $119.0 million, up slightly from $118.6 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 52 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 15 percent.  For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $9.5 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $0.3 million in the first quarter of 2009, which included restructuring charges of $1.0 million.
Commercial and consumer equipment sales were flat during the quarter.  Higher operating earnings in the first quarter of 2010, when compared with 2009, reflect the favorable effect of lower material and freight costs and other cost efficiencies.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards tables and accessories.  Segment sales in the first quarter of 2010 totaled $91.9 million, down 8 percent compared with $99.9 million in the year-ago quarter.  For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $14.9 million, including restructuring charges of $0.2 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $10.6 million, including restructuring charges of $0.8 million in the first quarter of 2009.
For the quarter, retail bowling equivalent-center sales declined by a low-single-digit percentage.  The bowling products and the billiards businesses also experienced declines, as bowling center operators and retail billiards customers remained cautious about purchases.  The increase in operating earnings in the first quarter of 2010, when compared with 2009, reflects fixed-cost reductions and lower pension expenses, partially offset by the unfavorable effect of the reduced sales.
 
 
 
Outlook
See Brunswicks Web Site for Supplemental Chart:
http://www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events.php
As we have said previously, our boat wholesale shipment and production planning in 2010 has been based on the assumption that the retail marketplace would decline by approximately 10 percent, McCoy said.  Preliminary data for the January to March period indicate a reduction in industry retail sales of about 20 percent.  Although the January to March preliminary industry data indicate this 20 percent reduction, the month of March preliminary data is significantly better and more consistent with our planning.  However, if the first quarter 20 percent reduction in retail demand were to continue into some or all of the second quarter, it would put pressure on our current planning assumption.  As we head into the heart of the marine selling season, we will monitor reta il demand closely, and will be prepared to adjust production and shipments to maintain appropriate levels of boat inventories with our dealers.
We continue to believe that wholesale shipments will increase throughout the year versus 2009, as we return to a more normal relationship where wholesale shipments approximate retail demand. In addition to higher revenues, we expect our earnings in 2010 will also reflect lower restructuring and impairment costs and reduced pension and bad debt expense.
We remain committed to the strategic focus that has ensured our financial strength and uniquely positioned us compared to most of our competitors in the marine, fitness and bowling and billiards segments.  We will continue our focus on liquidity, taking all reasonable actions to protect our dealer network, and doing the work necessary to come out of this downturn stronger than when we began the period.
 In 2010, in addition to liquidity, we will extend our focus to continuous improvement in both our financial results and relative strength versus the competition in all of our business segments.  We believe that by continuing to successfully execute against our strategies, absent a more pronounced decline in marine demand, we can achieve our objective of returning to profitability in 2011.
Although the economy, and the specific markets in which our businesses operate, may remain challenging, this transition requires that in 2010 and beyond, as the worlds economies improve, we remain disciplined to: generate positive cash flow, perform better than the market in each of our business segments, and demonstrate outstanding operating leverage, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
www.br
u
nswick.com
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call
(800) 798-2796 (passcode: Brunswick Q1).  Callers outside North America should call (617) 614-6204 (passcode: Brunswick Q1) to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Thursday, May  6, 2010, by calling (888) 286-8010 or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 72278918).  The replay will also be available at www.brunswick.com.
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswicks business.  These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the effect of adverse general economic conditions; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in the timeframe and cost anticipated; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of changes to legislation; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the success of new product introductions; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; shifts in currency exchange rates; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner; increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the ability to comply with environmental and zoning requirements, including environmental regulations for marine engines; the impact of international political instability and civil unrest on manufacturing operati ons and retail demand; and the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2009.  Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Ornvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables.  For more information, visit .
http://www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20100729073206.txt.gz
TIME:20100729073206
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
          BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 29, 2010, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2010. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its second quarter 2010 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States. 
 
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance.  Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiati ves. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities.  
 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

 
Exhibit 99.1
Brunswick Corporation  1 N. Field Court  Lake Forest, IL 60045
Telephone 847.735.4700  Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
   
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the second quarter of 2010:
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 29, 2010
The continued successful execution of our strategic initiatives over the past several quarters was a key factor in our improved second quarter results, said Brunswicks Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  Historically low marine dealer inventories as we entered the year led to improved wholesale shipments.  This, combined with significant fixed-cost reductions achieved over the past two years, enabled us to report our second consecutive quarterly operating profit.  In addition, during the first half of 2010, our cash balances increased by $93 million and net debt declined by $120 million.
The factors that positively affected our revenues and earnings in the second quarter of 2010, compared to the previous year, included higher overall unit production and sales levels, improved fixed-cost absorption in our marine businesses, and lower discounts required to facilitate retail boat sales.  During the quarter, we also benefited from reduced bad debt expense, lower restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as reduced pension expense.  Partially offsetting these factors were higher income taxes and interest expense, McCoy said.
 
 
Second Quarter Results
For the second quarter of 2010, the company reported net sales of $1,014.7 million, up from $718.3 million a year earlier.  For the quarter, the company reported operating earnings of $55.7 million, which included $24.2 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.  In the second quarter of 2009, the company had an operating loss of $145.4 million, which included $35.5 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
For the second quarter, Brunswick reported net earnings of $13.7 million, or $0.15 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $163.7 million, or $1.85 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2009.  The diluted earnings per share for the second quarter of 2010 included restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $0.26 per diluted share, and $0.02 per diluted share of expense from special tax items.  Diluted loss per share for the second quarter of 2009 included $0.40 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, and a $0.05 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and cash equivalents were $619.6 million at the end of the second quarter, up $93.0 million from year-end 2009 levels.  The companys increased cash position reflects net cash provided by operating activities of $138.1 million, which included the receipt of a $109.5 million federal tax refund.  Net cash provided by operating activities was negatively affected by changes in certain current assets and current liabilities during the first half of 2010.  These changes were largely the result of seasonal increases in the companys accounts and notes receivable and decreases in accrued expenses, partially offset by increases in accounts payable balances and decreases in net inventories.
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and cash equivalents) was $204.4 million, down $119.9 million from year-end 2009 levels.  The change in net debt reflects the $93 million increase in cash, along with reductions in debt resulting from debt repurchases.  The companys total liquidity (defined as cash and cash equivalents, plus amounts available under its asset-backed lending facilities) totaled $752 million, up $137 million from year-end 2009 levels.
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine service, parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $579.2 million in the second quarter of 2010, up 39 percent from $415.2 million in the year-ago second quarter.  International sales, which represented 41 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 28 percent.  For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported operating earnings of $89.2 million, including restructuring charges of $2.1 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $7.8 million in the year-ago quarter, which included $9.6 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
Sales were higher across all of the segments main operations, including a low-teen increase in the domestic marine service, parts and accessories businesses, which represented 28 percent of total segment sales in the quarter.  The segments sterndrive engine business experienced the greatest percentage sales growth.
           Mercurys manufacturing facilities continued to increase production during the quarter in response to customer inventory requirements.  Higher sales, lower bad debt expense, fixed-cost reductions, increased fixed-cost absorption, improved operating efficiencies, lower restructuring, exit and impairment charges and reduced pension expense all had a positive effect on operating earnings during the quarter.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 16 boat brands.  The Boat segment reported net sales of $296.6 million for the second quarter of 2010, an increase of 114 percent compared with $138.8 million in the second quarter of 2009.  International sales, which represented 38 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 64 percent during the period.  For the second quarter of 2010, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $23.6 million, including restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $21.7 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $107.9 million, including restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $17.9 million, in the second quarter of 2009.
Boat manufacturing facilities continued to increase production during the quarter to address inventory requirements of their dealers.  Higher sales, increased fixed-cost absorption, and reduced discounts required to support retail sales by dealers were the primary factors affecting the segments reduction in operating losses in the quarter.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which manufactures and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales in the second quarter of 2010 totaled $123.2 million, up 17 percent from $105.0 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 54 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 39 percent.  For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $8.7 million, including restructuring charges of $0.1 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $0.2 million in the second quarter of 2009, which included restructuring charges of $0.2 million.
Global commercial and consumer equipment sales increased during the quarter.  Higher operating earnings in the second quarter of 2010, when compared with 2009, reflect higher sales, a more favorable product sales mix, lower material and freight costs and other operating efficiencies.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards tables and accessories.  Segment sales in the second quarter of 2010 totaled $77.3 million, down slightly compared with $77.4 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 24 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 17 percent.  For the quarter, the segment reported an operating loss of $2.6 million, including restructuring charges of $0.2 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $5.9 million, including restructuring and exit charges of $3.2 million in the second quarter of 2009.
For the quarter, retail bowling equivalent-center sales declined by a mid-single-digit percentage.  Bowling products experienced a solid increase in sales, as international bowling center operators increased purchases.  The reduction in operating losses in the second quarter of 2010, when compared with 2009, reflects lower restructuring and exit charges and pension expense.
 
 
 
Outlook
See Brunswicks Web Site for Supplemental Chart:
H
U
http://www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events.php
U
We entered 2010 with planning assumptions that reflected continued challenging conditions in the economy and in the markets in which our businesses operate, McCoy said.  We further believed that if we continued to successfully execute against our strategic objectives, we would be able to generate positive cash flow and demonstrate outstanding operating leverage.  We have achieved these objectives in the first half of 2010.
Conditions in 2010 have indeed been difficult, with end-market results being mixed, not only throughout the U.S., but also globally.  Retail demand for our marine market products continues to be at historically record low levels, but the overall market rate of decline has eased.
During the second half of 2010, we will continue to focus on liquidity and closely manage our overall cost structure.  In addition, we plan to keep our production and wholesale shipment levels closely matched with retail demand and dealer stocking requirements, which will ensure the continuing health of our dealer pipeline inventories.
The continued execution of our strategic plans will help us maintain outstanding operating leverage in subsequent quarters and enable us to come out of this downturn stronger than we began the period.  As we continue to progress on this path, subject to the state of the global economy and retail marine markets, we maintain our objective of returning to profitability in 2011, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
H
www.br
u
nswick.com
H
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call
(866) 783-2140 (passcode: Brunswick Q2).  Callers outside North America should call (857) 350-1599 (passcode: Brunswick Q2) to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Thursday, Aug. 5, 2010, by calling (888) 286-8010 (passcode: 64626383) or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 64626383).  The replay will also be available at www.brunswick.com.
H
H
 
 
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswicks business.  These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the effect of adverse general economic conditions; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in the timeframe and cost anticipated; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to climate change; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particularly i n high-margin products; the ability to develop new and innovative products and ensure their success; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures, including increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost est imated; the ability to comply with environmental and zoning requirements, including environmental regulations for marine engines; the impact of international political instability and civil unrest on manufacturing operations and retail demand; the inherent risk of doing business in developing countries; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; and the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2009 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 3, 2010.  Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity (TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, Diversified Marine and Benrock parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Bermuda, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Ornvik, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Suncruiser, Triton, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables.  For more information, visit .
H
U
http://www.brunswick.com
U
H
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20101028073337.txt.gz
TIME:20101028073337
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
          (Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]         Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]          Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]          Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]          Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.          Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 28, 2010, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the third quarter of 2010. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its third quarter 2010 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to stockholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines fr ee cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions and investments) and excluding financing activities.  Brunswicks management believes that the measure total liquidity is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks available highly liquid assets and immediate sources of financing. Brunswick defines total liquidity as cash and cash equivalents as presented in its consolidated balance sheets, plus amounts available under its asset-based lending facilities. The measure diluted earnings (loss) per common share, as adjusted is also believed to be useful to investors because it represents a measure of Brunswicks earnings or losses, without the impact of restructuring, exit and impairment charges and special tax items.  Brunswick defines diluted earnings (loss) per common share, as adjusted, as diluted loss per common share, excluding the earnings or lo ss per share impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as special tax items.  Additionally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure net debt is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks ability to repay its outstanding debt using its current cash and cash equivalents.  Brunswick defines net debt as the sum of short-term and long-term debt, less cash and cash equivalents.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
  60; 
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Brunswick Corporation  1 N. Field Court  Lake Forest, IL  60045
Telephone 847.735.4700  Facsimile 847.735.4750
www.brunswick.com
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the third quarter of 2010:
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Oct. 28, 2010
Throughout the first nine months of 2010, we have successfully executed against our strategic initiatives, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  This is evidenced by the outstanding operating leverage that we have demonstrated on our revenue growth during the year.  For the nine months ended Oct. 2, 2010, excluding restructuring charges, our operating earnings increased by more than $410 million, as compared to 2009.  In addition, we have achieved our objective of being cash flow positive during this period. All of this has been accomplished against the backdrop of a very difficult marine market.
The factors that positively affected our revenues and earnings in the third quarter of 2010, compared to the previous year, included lower discounts required to facilitate retail boat sales, improved fixed-cost absorption as a result of higher overall unit production and higher sales levels in our marine businesses.  During the quarter, we also benefited from lower restructuring, exit and impairment charges, a reduction in variable compensation expense and lower pension expense.  Partially offsetting these factors were higher income taxes, McCoy said.
 
Third Quarter Results
For the third quarter of 2010, the company reported net sales of $815.4 million, up from $665.8 million a year earlier.  For the quarter, the company reported operating earnings of $25.2 million, which included $12.2 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.  In the third quarter of 2009, the company had an operating loss of $109.4 million, which included $28.8 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
For the third quarter of 2010, Brunswick reported a net loss of $7.2 million, or $0.08 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $114.3 million, or $1.29 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2009.  The diluted loss per share for the third quarter of 2010 included restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $0.14 per diluted share.  The loss per diluted share for the third quarter of 2009 included $0.32 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, and a $0.24 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and cash equivalents were $676.5 million at the end of the third quarter, up $149.9 million from year-end 2009 levels.  The companys increased cash position reflects net cash provided by operating activities of $192.6 million, which included the receipt of a $109.5 million federal tax refund.  Net cash provided by operating activities was negatively affected by changes in certain current assets and current liabilities during the first nine months of 2010.  These changes were largely the result of increases in net inventories and accounts and notes receivable.
 
 
 
 
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and cash equivalents) was $157.6 million, down $166.7 million from year-end 2009 levels.  The change in net debt reflects the $149.9 million increase in cash, along with reductions in debt resulting primarily from debt repurchases.  The companys total liquidity (defined as cash and cash equivalents, plus amounts available under its asset-backed lending facilities) was $780 million, up $165 million from year-end 2009 levels.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine service, parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $429.2 million in the third quarter of 2010, up 18 percent from $363.5 million in the third quarter of 2009.  International sales, which represented 38 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 5 percent.  For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported operating earnings of $49.0 million, including restructuring charges of $1.7 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $13.4 million in the year-ago quarter, which included $18.8 million of restructuring and impairment charges.
Sales were higher across all of the segments main operations, including a high single-digit increase in the domestic marine service, parts and accessories businesses, which represented 32 percent of total segment sales in the quarter.  The segments sterndrive engine business experienced the greatest percentage of sales growth.
Mercurys manufacturing facilities continued to increase production during the quarter in response to customer inventory requirements.  Higher sales, lower restructuring, exit and impairment charges, reduced pension expense, fixed-cost reductions, lower bad debt expense, increased fixed-cost absorption and improved operating efficiencies, all had a positive effect on operating earnings during the quarter. Partially offsetting these positive factors were gains from favorable settlements reached during the prior-year quarter.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 16 boat brands.  The Boat segment reported net sales of $209.2 million for the third quarter of 2010, an increase of 77 percent compared with $118.2 million in the third quarter of 2009.  International sales, which represented 34 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 39 percent during the period.  For the third quarter of 2010, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $26.3 million, including restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $10.2 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $86.7 million, including restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $6.6 million, in the third quarter of 2009.
Boat manufacturing facilities significantly increased production during the quarter, compared to the third quarter of 2009, to address inventory requirements of their dealers.  Reduced discounts required to support retail sales by dealers, increased fixed-cost absorption, higher sales and a reduction in variable compensation expense were the primary factors affecting the segments reduction in operating losses in the quarter.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which designs, manufactures, and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales in the third quarter of 2010 totaled $137.7 million, up 9 percent from $126.8 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 56 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 10 percent.  For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $17.0 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $12.5 million in the third quarter of 2009, which included restructuring charges of $0.4 million.
Global commercial equipment sales increased during the quarter, which were partially offset by a decline in U.S. consumer equipment sales.  Higher operating earnings in the third quarter of 2010, when compared with 2009, reflect higher sales, lower material costs and increased fixed-cost absorption.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards tables and accessories.  Segment sales in the third quarter of 2010 totaled $74.6 million, down 4 percent compared with $77.5 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 26 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 1 percent.  For the quarter, the segment reported break-even operating earnings, including restructuring charges of $0.2 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $3.8 million, including restructuring and exit charges of $0.8 million in the third quarter of 2009.
 
 
 
 
For the quarter, equivalent-center sales for retail bowling declined by a low-single-digit percentage.  Bowling products also experienced a modest decline in sales.  The reduction in operating losses in the third quarter of 2010, when compared with 2009, reflects reduced pension expense, lower restructuring and exit charges and lower bad debt expense.
Outlook
See Brunswicks Web Site for Supplemental Chart:
H
U
http://www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events.php
U
As we moved through the difficult economic and marine market conditions of the last three years, our performance has been excellent in addressing three fundamental requirements: improve and maintain our liquidity, take all reasonable actions to protect the health of our dealer network, and accomplish the actions necessary to come out of this downturn stronger than when we began the period, McCoy said.  Our significant cash position, strong dealer network with healthy pipelines and low percentage of aged inventory in the pipelines, along with dramatically lower fixed costs are evidence of our success in carrying out these requirements.
While our work against these requirements continues today, in 2010 we have also expanded our focus on those actions necessary to accomplish our goal of returning to profitability.  Although the economy and specific markets in which our businesses operate may remain challenging, becoming profitable requires that we remain disciplined to: generate positive free cash flow, perform better than the market in each of our business segments, and demonstrate outstanding operating leverage. Our free cash flow and operating leverage through the first three quarters of 2010 give us the confidence that we have the discipline and operating capabilities to generate strong earnings and improvements in cash flow as the worlds economies improve.
For the remainder of 2010, our production and wholesale shipments will be at levels necessary to achieve our dealers minimum stocking requirements. As a result, and in light of the weak retail demand in larger boats, we are planning that the rate of our Boat segments sales increase in the fourth quarter versus 2009, will be less than that experienced in the third quarter and more in line with that experienced in the first quarter of 2010.   Also, due to reduced fixed-cost absorption resulting from our planned fourth quarter plant shutdowns, the Boat segments operating leverage will be less than that experienced in the previous three quarters.
We continue to remain focused on meeting all of the requirements we have identified for ourselves in these difficult economic and market conditions, and subject to the state of the global economy and retail marine markets, we maintain our objective of returning to profitability in 2011, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
H
www.br
u
nswick.com
H
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call
(800) 260-8140 (passcode: Brunswick Q3).  Callers outside North America should call (617) 614-3672 (passcode: Brunswick Q3) to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Thursday, Nov. 4, 2010, by calling (888) 286-8010 (passcode: 91925417) or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 91925417).  The replay will also be available at www.brunswick.com.
H
H
 
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswicks business.  These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the effect of adverse general economic conditions; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to climate change; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particul arly in high-margin products; the ability to develop new and innovative products and ensure their success; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures, including increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the co st estimated; the ability to comply with environmental and zoning requirements, including environmental regulations for marine engines; the impact of international political instability and civil unrest on manufacturing operations and retail demand; the inherent risk of doing business in developing countries; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; and the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2009 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended July 3, 2010.  Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for cha nges made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Suncruiser, Triton Aluminum, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables.  For more information, visit
H
U
http://www.brunswick.com
U
H
.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20110127083524.txt.gz
TIME:20110127083524
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
    BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 27, 2011, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the fourth quarter and full year of 2010. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its fourth quarter and full year 2010 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to shareholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available for investment in future growth initiatives. Brunswick define s free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash used for acquisitions, investments, and purchases of marketable securities) and excluding financing activities.  Brunswicks management believes that the measure total liquidity is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks available highly liquid assets and immediate sources of financing. Brunswick defines total liquidity as cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities, as presented in its consolidated balance sheets, plus amounts available under its asset-based lending facilities. The measure diluted loss per common share, as adjusted is also believed to be useful to investors because it represents a measure of Brunswicks losses, without the impact of restructuring, exit and impairment charges and special tax items.  Brunswick defines diluted loss per commo n share, as adjusted, as diluted loss per common share, excluding the earnings or loss per share impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as special tax items.  Additionally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure net debt is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks ability to repay its outstanding debt using its current cash and cash equivalents.  Brunswick defines net debt as the sum of short-term and long-term debt, less cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

   
Exhibit 99.1
 Brunswick Corporation  1 N. Field Court  Lake Forest, IL  60045
   
 Telephone  847.735.4700  Facsimile 847.735.4750
   
 
 
Brunswick Reports Fourth Quarter Results
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the fourth quarter of 2010:
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Jan. 27, 2011
2010 Full-Year Results:
Throughout the past several years, Brunswick has undergone a profound transformation against the backdrop of very difficult global economic and marine markets, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  In 2010, we continued to make significant strides in rationalizing our manufacturing footprint and executing against strategies that have allowed us to operate our businesses more efficiently, contributing to strong levels of operating leverage.  During 2010, our annual revenues increased by 23 percent and, excluding restructuring charges, our operating earnings increased by approximately $477 million as compared to 2009.  In addition, we achieved our objective of being free cash flow positive during 2010.
For the year ended Dec. 31, 2010, the company reported net sales of $3,403.3 million, up from $2,776.1 million a year earlier, and operating earnings of $16.3 million, which included $62.3 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.  In 2009, the company had an operating loss of $570.5 million, which included $172.5 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
For 2010, the company reported a net loss of $110.6 million, or $1.25 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $586.2 million, or $6.63 per diluted share, for 2009.  The diluted loss per share for 2010 included restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $0.70 per diluted share, and a $0.03 per diluted share charge from special tax items. 
The loss per diluted share for 2009 included $1.95 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, and a $1.09 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.
Fourth Quarter Results
For the fourth quarter of 2010, the company reported net sales of $728.8 million, up from $657.3 million a year earlier.  For the quarter, the company reported an operating loss of $74.7 million, which included $18.5 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.  In the fourth quarter of 2009, the company had an operating loss of $188.2 million, which included $68.6 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
For the fourth quarter of 2010, Brunswick reported a net loss of $104.1 million, or $1.17 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $124.0 million, or $1.40 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2009.  The diluted loss per share for the fourth quarter of 2010 included restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $0.21 per diluted share and a $0.02 per diluted share charge for special tax items.  The loss per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2009 included $0.78 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, and a $1.20 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.
The factors that positively affected our revenues and earnings in the fourth quarter of 2010, compared to the previous year, included higher sales levels in our marine and fitness businesses and lower discounts required to facilitate retail boat sales.  During the quarter, we also benefited from lower restructuring charges and reduced losses on early extinguishment of debt, as well as lower pension and bad debt expenses.  Partially offsetting these factors were higher income tax provisions, McCoy said.
 
 
 
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and marketable securities totaled $657.1 million at the end of the fourth quarter, up $129.7 million from year-end 2009 levels.  This increase reflects net cash provided by operating activities of $205.4 million, which included the receipt of a $109.5 million federal tax refund.  Net cash provided by operating activities was positively affected by changes in certain current assets and current liabilities during 2010.  These changes were largely the result of increases in accrued expenses and accounts payable, partially offset by increases in net inventories.
 
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and marketable securities) was $173.5 million, down $150.0 million from year-end 2009 levels.  The change in net debt primarily reflects the $129.7 million increase in total cash and investments.  The companys total liquidity (defined as cash and marketable securities, plus amounts available under its asset-backed lending facilities) was $819 million, up $203 million from year-end 2009 levels.
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $353.3 million in the fourth quarter of 2010, up 17 percent from $302.4 million in the fourth quarter of 2009.  International sales, which represented 51 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 15 percent.  For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported an operating loss of $17.4 million, including restructuring charges of $7.4 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $59.4 million in the year-ago quarter, which included $8.2 million of restructuring and impairment charges.
Sales were higher across all of the segments main operations, including a 10 percent increase in the domestic marine parts and accessories businesses, which represented 21 percent of total segment sales in the quarter.  The segments outboard engine business experienced the greatest percentage sales growth.
Mercurys manufacturing facilities continued to increase production during the quarter in response to customer requirements.  Lower bad debt and pension expenses, incentives associated with Mercurys plant consolidation activities, higher sales, fixed-cost reductions, increased fixed-cost absorption and improved operating efficiencies, all had a positive effect on operating earnings during the quarter.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 16 boat brands.  The Boat segment reported net sales of $163.6 million for the fourth quarter of 2010, an increase of 7 percent compared with $153.4 million in the fourth quarter of 2009.  International sales, which represented 40 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 8 percent during the period.  For the fourth quarter of 2010, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $69.3 million, including restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $10.0 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $131.6 million, including restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $58.3 million, in the fourth quarter of 2009.
Boat segment production increased during the quarter, compared to the low levels in the fourth quarter of 2009, in response to the inventory requirements of dealers.  Lower restructuring, exit and impairment charges, reduced discounts required to support retail sales by dealers and higher sales had a positive effect on the segments reduction in operating losses in the quarter.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which designs, manufactures, and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment. 
Fitness segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2010 totaled $162.0 million, up 11 percent from $146.4 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 47 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by one percent.  For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $24.4 million, which included restructuring charges of $0.1 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $20.5 million in the fourth quarter of 2009, which included restructuring charges of $0.5 million.
Domestic commercial and consumer equipment sales increased during the quarter. Improved operating earnings in the fourth quarter of 2010, when compared with 2009, reflect higher sales and increased fixed-cost absorption.
 
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards tables and accessories.  Segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2010 totaled $79.5 million, down 3 percent compared with $82.2 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 23 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 12 percent.  For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $0.2 million, including restructuring and exit charges of $1.2 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $2.2 million, including restructuring and exit charges of $0.5 million in the fourth quarter of 2009.
 
For the quarter, equivalent-center sales for retail bowling were flat, while bowling products experienced a decline in sales.  The reduction in operating earnings in the fourth quarter of 2010, when compared with 2009, reflects lower sales, the effect of a write-down of a vacant property, and higher restructuring and exit charges, partially offset by lower pension and bad debt expenses.
 
 
 
 
 
Outlook
See Brunswicks Web Site for Supplemental Chart:
H
http://www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events-presentations.php
In 2011, we will continue to remain disciplined to generate positive free cash flow, perform better than the market and demonstrate outstanding operating leverage, McCoy said.
We currently expect to have positive earnings per share in 2011, beginning in the first quarter. We believe the significant decline in overall industry marine retail demand has bottomed in 2010, but at this early point in the marine selling season, we are unable to determine if 2011 marine retail demand will remain consistent with 2010 or improve.
We are also unable to determine the specific timing of any improvement and how each boat category will perform versus 2010 levels. Without a clear view of 2011 marine demand, we are currently expecting modest revenue growth for the consolidated company. In our marine segments, we believe that wholesale and production units will closely match retail demand on an annual basis.  Therefore, the level of 2011 revenue and earnings growth will be primarily governed by marine retail demand.
 
Our current manufacturing footprint and cost structure should allow us to report strong future earnings leverage. Without considering the effects of changes to our fixed manufacturing cost structure or operating expenses, our earnings leverage (on incremental revenue) should approximate 30 percent.  Our 2011 net income should also benefit from our previously announced marine plant consolidations, lower restructuring costs, net interest, depreciation and pension expenses, partially offset by a modest increase in our tax provision.
After taking all these factors into consideration, we expect our 2011 earnings per share to be in the range of $0.05 per share to $0.40 per share.  At the time of our first quarter earnings release, we should have a clearer view of marine retail demand for 2011 and we will provide an updated outlook for 2011, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CST, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, go to the Web site at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
H
www.br
u
nswick.com
H
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (866) 277-1182 (passcode: Brunswick Q4).  Callers outside North America should call (617) 597-5359 (passcode: Brunswick Q4) to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CST Thursday, Feb. 3, 2011, by calling (888) 286-8010 (passcode: 70808130) or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 70808130).  The replay will also be available at .
www.brunswick.com
H
H
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswicks business.  These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the effect of adverse general economic conditions; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the effect of higher product prices due to technology changes and added product features and components on consumer demand; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the effect of interest rates and fuel prices on demand for marine products; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to climate change; the financial strength of dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain mutually beneficial relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and to develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to maintain market share, particul arly in high-margin products; the ability to develop new and innovative products and ensure their success; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; competitive pricing pressures, including increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop cost-effective product technologies that comply with regulatory requirements; the ability to transition and ramp up certain manufacturing operations within time and budgets allowed; the ability to successfully develop and distribute products differentiated for the global marketplace; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; the success of global sourcing and supply chain initiatives; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the co st estimated; the ability to comply with environmental and zoning requirements, including environmental regulations for marine engines; the impact of international political instability and civil unrest on manufacturing operations and retail demand; the inherent risk of doing business in developing countries; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; and the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues.  Additional factors are included in the companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2009 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended April 3, 2010 and July 3, 2010.  Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Suncruiser, Triton Aluminum, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables.  For more information, visit .
http://www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20110322100058.txt.gz
TIME:20110322100058
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On March 21, 2011, Brunswick Corporation (the "") entered into a new Credit Agreement (the "") with the subsidiaries of the Company party thereto, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. The Credit Agreement replaces the Company's existing Credit Agreement, dated as of April 29, 2005, as amended and restated as of December 19, 2008 (the "") and the Mercury Marine division receivables asset-based facility, and contains terms that differ from the Prior Credit Agreement, including, among other things:
Company
Credit Agreement
Prior Credit Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Credit Agreement is attached as Exhibit 10.1. The foregoing description of the Credit Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Credit Agreement, which is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 2.03. Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The information set forth above under Item 1.01 is hereby incorporated by reference into this Item 2.03.
Item 7.01. Regulation FD Disclosure.
The news release announcing this matter is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein. The information in this Item 7.01 and Exhibit 99.1 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference into any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, except as expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
Statements made in this Current Report on Form 8-K that are forward-looking involve risks and uncertainties and are indicated by words such as "may," "expects" and other similar words or phrases. Actual events or results may differ materially from those described herein. These uncertainties include, but are not limited to, future economic conditions and other risks described in filings with the SEC such as Brunswick's most recent Forms 10-K and 10-Q.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 

Exhibit 10.1
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This CREDIT AGREEMENT (this ""), dated as of March 21, 2011, among BRUNSWICK CORPORATION, certain SUBSIDIARIES of Brunswick Corporation that may be SUBSIDIARY BORROWERS party hereto, certain SUBSIDIARIES of Brunswick Corporation and BRUNSWICK CORPORATION that shall be GUARANTORS party hereto, the LENDERS party hereto, JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent, J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES LLC, MERRILL LYNCH, PIERCE, FENNER & SMITH INCORPORATED and WELLS FARGO CAPITAL FINANCE, LLC, as Joint Lead Arrangers, J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES LLC, MERRILL LYNCH, PIERCE, FENNER & SMITH INCORPORATED and WELLS FARGO CAPITAL FINANCE, LLC, as Joint Bookrunners, BANK OF AMERICA, N.A. and WELLS FARGO CAPITAL FINANCE, LLC, as Syndication Agents, and SUNTRUST BANK and RBS BUSINESS CAPITAL, A DIVISION OF RBS ASSET FINANCE, INC., as Documentation Agents.
Agreement
The parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1.01 . As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "Commitment Termination Date".
Accelerated Maturity Date
"" means, individually and collectively, any "Account" referred to in the Security Agreement.
Account
"" means any Person obligated on an Account.
Account Debtor
"" means, with respect to any Eurocurrency Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to (a) the Eurocurrency Rate for such Interest Period (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate for such Interest Period.
Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate
multiplied by
"" has the meaning set forth in the Applicable Pricing Grid.
Adjustment Date
"" means JPMCB, in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder, and its successors in such capacity.
Administrative Agent
"" means an account designated by the Administrative Agent in a notice to the Company, the relevant Loan Party (if other than the Company) and the Lenders.
Administrative Agent's Account
"" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the BAC Joint Venture shall for so long as it is a Person be deemed an Affiliate of the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Affiliate
provided
"" means, individually and collectively, the Administrative Agent, the Syndication Agents and the Documentation Agents.
Agents
"" has the meaning set forth in the preamble hereto.
Agreement
"" means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate for such day 0.50% and (c) the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for a one month Interest Period on such day, without any adjustment for rounding, (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) plus 1%, provided that, for the avoidance of doubt, the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on the Reuters Screen LIBOR01 Page (or any successor or substitute page of such page) as of 11:00 A.M., London time, at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day. Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
plus
"" shall mean Pounds Sterling, euro or any other freely tradeable and convertible currency other than Dollars in which the Issuing Lender is willing to issue a Letter of Credit.
Alternative Currency
"" means 0.50% per annum; , that on and after the first Adjustment Date occurring after Closing Date, the Applicable Commitment Fee Rate will be determined pursuant to the Applicable Pricing Grid.
Applicable Commitment Fee Rate
provided
"" means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the Total Commitment represented by such Lender's Commitment; that each express reference to "Applicable Percentage" in Section 2.22 when a Defaulting Lender shall exist shall mean the percentage of the Total Commitment (disregarding each such Defaulting Lender's Commitment) represented by such Lender's Commitment. If the Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments and to any Lender's status as a Defaulting Lender at the time of determination.
Applicable Percentage
provided
 
"" means the table set forth below:
Applicable Pricing Grid
 
For the purposes of the Applicable Pricing Grid, changes in the Applicable Rate resulting from changes in the Leverage Ratio shall become effective on the date (the "") that is three Business Days after the date on which financial statements are delivered to the Lenders pursuant to Section 5.01 and shall remain in effect until the next change to be effected pursuant to this paragraph. If any financial statements referred to above are not delivered within the time periods specified in Section 5.01, then, until the date that is three Business Days after the date on which such financial statements are delivered, the highest rate set forth in each column of the Applicable Pricing Grid shall apply. In addition, at all times while an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, the highest rate set forth in each column of the Applicable Pricing Grid shall apply. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, to the extent that it is determined during the term of this Agreement that the Applicable Rate was incorrectly determined to be a lower rate because of information or statements provided by the Company, then the Company shall pay on demand to the Administrative Agent any amounts that the Company would have owed if such Applicable Rate had been initially determined correctly.
Adjustment Date
"" means for each Type of Loan, the rate per annum set forth under the relevant column heading below:
Applicable Rate
 
, , that on and after the first Adjustment Date occurring after the Closing Date, the Applicable Rate with respect to Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans will be determined pursuant to the Applicable Pricing Grid.
provided
"" means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
 
"" means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 10.04), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of Exhibit A or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
"" means (a) the Bowling Assets, (b) the Headquarters, (c) Foreign Receivables, assets of Foreign Holdcos and assets of Loan Parties that are located outside the United States or Canada at foreign branches of such Loan Parties and (d) Foreign Equity Interests.
Available Collateral
"" means the lesser of (a) up to 65%, as determined by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, of the following amount: the Loan Parties' Eligible Finished Goods Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first-out basis) or market value), any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto; and (b) the product of up to 85% multiplied by the Net Orderly Liquidation Value percentage identified in the most recent Inventory appraisal provided to the Administrative Agent in accordance with the terms hereof multiplied by the following amount: the Loan Parties' Eligible Finished Goods Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first-out basis) or market value), any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto.
Available Finished Goods Inventory
minus
minus
"" means the lesser of (a) up to 65%, as determined by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, of the following amount: the Loan Parties' Eligible Raw Materials Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first-out basis) or market value) any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto; and (b) the product of up to 85% of the Net Orderly Liquidation Value percentage identified in the most recent Inventory appraisal provided to the Administrative Agent in accordance with the terms hereof multiplied by the following amount: the Loan Parties' Eligible Raw Materials Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first-out basis) or market value), any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto.
Available Raw Materials Inventory
minus
minus
"" means, at any time, the Total Commitment then in effect the Credit Exposure of all Lenders at such time; , that in calculating the Credit Exposure of all Lenders for the purpose of determining the Available Revolving Commitment pursuant to Section 2.12(a), the aggregate principal amount of Swingline Loans then outstanding shall be deemed to be zero.
Available Revolving Commitment
minus
provided
"" means the lesser of (a) up to 65%, as determined by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, of the following amount: the Loan Parties" Eligible WIP Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first out basis) or market value), any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto; and (b) the product of up to 85% of the Net Orderly Liquidation Value percentage identified in the most recent Inventory appraisal provided to the Administrative Agent in accordance with the terms hereof multiplied by the following amount: the Loan Parties' Eligible WIP Inventory (valued at the lower of cost (determined on a first-in-first-out basis) or market value), any Inventory Reserves applicable thereto.
Available WIP Inventory
minus
minus
 
"" means, at any time, an amount in Dollars equal to the sum of (a) (i) the lesser of (A) the Total Commitment and (B) the Borrowing Base (ii) the Credit Exposure of all Lenders, and (b) the aggregate amount of cash and Cash Equivalents of the Loan Parties maintained as of the date as of which such Borrowing Base was determined in accounts with the Administrative Agent or any Lender or any Affiliate thereof that in each case are subject to Deposit Account Control Agreements or Securities Account Control Agreements, other than any Collateral Deposit Account or Lock Box subject to a Lock Box Agreement.
Availability
minus
"" means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Commitment Termination Date and the date of termination of the Commitments.
Availability Period
"" means Brunswick Acceptance Company, LLC, a joint venture company (a majority of the Equity Interests of which is owned on the Effective Date by General Electric Commercial Finance or one of its Subsidiaries and the remainder thereof by the Company and/or any Subsidiary of the Company) or any successor Person or contractual arrangement pursuant to which General Electric Commercial Finance or one of its Subsidiaries provides floorplan financing for the domestic boat and engine dealers of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. For the avoidance of doubt, it is understood and agreed that the BAC LLC Agreement may be amended or replaced in compliance with Section 6.10 with the result that the joint venture between the Company and General Electric Commercial Finance or one of its Subsidiaries will continue under contractual arrangements (notwithstanding that the Company may not have any Equity Interest in such joint venture) and that in such event the Company shall provide the Lenders with a copy of the contract or contracts providing for such arrangement and that thereafter such contract or contracts (as thereafter amended in accordance with Section 6.10) shall constitute the "" and the arrangements provided for therein shall constitute the "". The BAC Joint Venture existing on the Effective Date may in addition be replaced in whole or in part by one or more other joint ventures between the Company or one of its Subsidiaries and a financing party other than General Electric Commercial Finance or one of its Subsidiaries so long as (1) the differences between the terms of such joint venture and those of the BAC LLC Agreement are not materially adverse to the Lenders and (2) immediately before and immediately following the establishment of any such joint venture there shall not be a Default or Event of Default under paragraph (q) of Article VII. In such event, then "" shall mean such replacement joint venture (or shall mean joint ventures collectively if there is more than one) from and after its inception and the terms "BAC Joint Venture Obligations" and "BAC LLC Agreement" shall have correlative meanings in respect of the organizational documents and contractual obligations of any such replacement joint venture.
BAC Joint Venture
BAC LLC Agreement
BAC Joint Venture
BAC Joint Venture
"" means any and all agreements, undertakings, arrangements and other Contractual Obligations of the Company and its Subsidiaries to make loans or advances, or guarantee the obligations of, or purchase or otherwise acquire any capital stock, obligations or other securities of, make any capital contribution to, or otherwise invest in, or otherwise support the operations of, the BAC Joint Venture.
BAC Joint Venture Obligations
 
"" means that certain Limited Liability Company Agreement, dated as of October 24, 2002, between Brunswick Financial Services Corporation and CDF Ventures, LLC, as amended through the date hereof.
BAC LLC Agreement
"" means each and any of the following bank services provided prior to or after the date hereof to any Loan Party by any Lender or any of its Affiliates: (a) commercial credit cards and debit cards, (b) stored value cards, (c) purchasing cards and cardless e-payables services and (d) treasury, depositary or cash management services (including, without limitation, controlled disbursement, automated clearinghouse transactions, return items, overdrafts, and interstate depository network services) or any similar transactions.
Banking Services
"" of the Loan Parties means any and all obligations of the Loan Parties, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor) in connection with Banking Services.
Banking Services Obligations
"" means the provisions of Title 11 of the United States Code, 11 U.S.C.  101 , as amended, or any similar federal or state law for the relief of debtors.
Bankruptcy Code
et
seq
"" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America (or any successor thereto).
Board
"" means any of the Company and the Subsidiary Borrowers, as the context may require, and "" means all of the foregoing.
Borrower
Borrowers
"" means all unpaid principal of and accrued and unpaid interest on the Loans (or which would have accrued but for the commencement of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), all LC Exposure, all accrued and unpaid fees and all expenses, reimbursements, indemnities and other obligations of the Borrowers to any Secured Party or any indemnified party, whether direct or indirect, absolute or contingent, due or to become due, or now existing or hereafter incurred, which may arise under, out of, or in connection with, the Loan Documents, any Letter of Credit, any Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement, any Pari Secured Swap Agreement or any other document made, delivered or given in connection with any of the foregoing, in each case whether on account of principal, interest, reimbursement obligations, fees, indemnities, costs, expenses or otherwise (including, without limitation, all fees and disbursements of counsel to the Secured Parties).
Borrower Obligations
"" means (a) all Revolving Loans of the same Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurocurrency Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect, (b) a Swingline Loan and (c) a Protective Advance.
Borrowing
"" means the sum of:
Borrowing Base
(a) up to 85% of the following amount: the Loan Parties' Eligible Accounts at such time, the Dilution Reserve, any other Reserve applicable to Eligible Accounts,
minus
minus
plus
 
(b) the sum of (x) Available Finished Goods Inventory, (y) Available Raw Materials Inventory and (z) Available WIP Inventory,
plus
(c) after the Equipment Election Effective Date, the Equipment Component,
less
(d) without duplication of other Reserves included in the foregoing components of the Borrowing Base, any Swap Reserve and other Reserves established by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
but subject to the limitation that (1) if no appraisal was performed during the 6 month period ending on the applicable date of determination, then the portion of the Borrowing Base represented by Eligible Inventory consisting of boat finished goods and more than 90% complete boats work-in-process shall in no event exceed the lesser of (A) $60,000,000 and (B) 25% of the Borrowing Base, (2) if an appraisal was performed during such 6 month period, then the portion of the Borrowing Base represented by Eligible Inventory consisting of boat finished goods and more than 90% complete boats work-in-process shall in no event exceed the lowest of (x) $75,000,000, (y) 35% of the Borrowing Base and (z) such higher valuation, and (3) the portion of the Borrowing Base represented by Eligible Accounts consisting of Accounts of dealers in respect of purchases of boats shall in no event exceed the lesser of (A) $25,000,000 and (B) 12.5% of the Borrowing Base. The Administrative Agent may, in its Permitted Discretion and based on new information or a change in circumstances, adjust Reserves or reduce one or more of the other elements used in computing the Borrowing Base, with any such changes to be effective 3 Business Days after delivery of notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders. The Borrowing Base at any time shall be determined by reference to the most recent Borrowing Base Certificate delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(f) or 4.01(r), as applicable.
"" means a certificate, signed and certified as accurate and complete by a Financial Officer, in substantially the form of Exhibit F or another form which is acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion.
Borrowing Base Certificate
"" means the items described on Schedule 5.01(g).
Borrowing Base Supplemental Documentation
"" means a request by any Borrower for a Borrowing of Revolving Loans in accordance with Section 2.03.
Borrowing Request
"" means all the retail bowling centers of the bowling retail business of the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Bowling Assets
"" means the Company's business operations in the bowling and billiards industries.
Bowling & Billiards Division
"" means any day (a) on which commercial banks are not authorized or required by law to close in New York City and/or (b) if such day relates to a borrowing of, a payment or prepayment of principal of or interest on, a continuation or conversion of or into, or the Interest Period for, a Eurocurrency Borrowing (or any notice with respect thereto), that is
Business Day
 
also a day on which dealings in deposits denominated in Dollars are carried out in the London interbank market.
"" means, for any period, with respect to any Person, the aggregate of all expenditures by such Person and its Subsidiaries for the acquisition or leasing (pursuant to a Capital Lease) of fixed or capital assets or additions to equipment (including replacements, capitalized repairs and improvements during such period) that should be capitalized under GAAP on a consolidated balance sheet of such Person and its Subsidiaries; , , that Capital Expenditures for the Company and the Subsidiaries shall not include:
Capital Expenditures
provided
however
(a) expenditures to the extent they are made with proceeds of the issuance of Equity Interests of the Company,
(b) expenditures with proceeds of insurance settlements, condemnation awards and other settlements in respect of lost, destroyed, damaged or condemned assets, equipment or other property; that such expenditure is not made during a Cash Dominion Period,
provided
(c) interest capitalized during such period to the extent included in Consolidated Interest Expense,
(d) expenditures that are accounted for as capital expenditures of such Person and that actually are paid for by a third party (excluding the Company or any Subsidiary thereof) and for which neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has provided or is required to provide or incur, directly or indirectly, any consideration or obligation to such third party or any other Person (whether before, during or after such period),
(e) the book value of any asset owned by such Person prior to or during such period to the extent that such book value is included as a capital expenditure during such period as a result of such Person reusing or beginning to reuse such asset during such period without a corresponding expenditure actually having been made in such period,
(f) the purchase price of equipment purchased during such period to the extent the consideration therefor consists of any combination of (i) used or surplus equipment traded in at the time of such purchase and (ii) the proceeds of a concurrent sale of used or surplus equipment, in each case, in the ordinary course of business; that such purchase is not made during a Cash Dominion Period, and
provided
(g) the consideration paid in respect of a Permitted Acquisition.
"" means, as applied to any Person, any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, by that Person as lessee that, in conformity with GAAP, is, or is required to be, classified and accounted for as a capital lease on a balance sheet of such Person.
Capital Lease
 
"" of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any Capital Lease, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
"" means a period commencing when Availability becomes less than the greater of (x) 20% of the Total Commitments and (y) $50,000,000 for five consecutive Business Days; that the Cash Dominion Period shall be discontinued if Availability ceases to be less than the applicable level for sixty consecutive days; , however, that a Cash Dominion Period may be discontinued no more than twice in any period of twelve consecutive months.
Cash Dominion Period
provided
provided
further
"" means:
Cash Equivalents
(a) direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America (or by any agency thereof to the extent such obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America), in each case maturing within 24 months from the date of acquisition thereof;
(b) investments in commercial paper maturing within 270 days from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, the highest credit rating obtainable from S&P or from Moody's, and other investments in Indebtedness maturing within 12 months of the date of acquisition thereof that is rated, or the issuer of which has a rating of, A or higher by S&P and A2 or higher by Moody's;
(c) investments in certificates of deposit, banker's acceptances, time deposits and eurodollar time deposits maturing within 13 months from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank which has consolidated assets as determined in accordance with GAAP of not less than $10,000,000,000;
(d) fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (c) above;
(e) money market funds that (i) comply with the criteria set forth in SEC Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940, (ii) except with respect to the BlackRock Liquidity Funds TempCash Institutional Fund (TMCXX), are rated AA- or higher by S&P and Aa3 or higher by Moody's and (iii) have portfolio assets of at least $1,000,000,000; and
(f) in the case of any Foreign Subsidiary, other short-term investments that are liquid and are customarily used by companies in the jurisdiction of such Foreign Subsidiary for cash management purposes.
"" means (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of the Exchange Act and the rules of the SEC thereunder as in effect on the date hereof), of Equity Interests representing more than 30% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests of the Company; (b) with respect to a tender offer (for which a
Change in Control
 
filing has been made with the SEC which purports to comply with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules of the SEC thereunder as in effect on the date hereof) made for Equity Interests of the Company, which tender offer has not been negotiated and approved by the board of directors of the Company, the earlier of (i) any Business Day during such tender offer when the Person or group making such tender offer owns, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, and/or has accepted for payment Equity Interests representing 25% or more of the aggregate voting power represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests of the Company and (ii) three Business Days before such tender offer is to terminate unless the tender offer is withdrawn first if the Person or group making such tender offer could own, by the terms of the tender offer plus any Equity Interests owned by such Person or group, Equity Interests representing 50% or more of the aggregate voting power representing by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests of the Company when such tender offer terminates; (c) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of the Company by Persons who were neither (i) nominated by the board of directors of the Company nor (ii) appointed by directors so nominated; (d) the acquisition of direct or indirect Control of the Company by any Person or group; (e) the Company shall cease to own, free and clear of all Liens or other encumbrances (other than Liens created pursuant to any Loan Document), 100% of the outstanding voting Equity Interests of the Borrowers (other than the Company) on a fully diluted basis (other than any directors' qualifying shares of any Borrower); or (f) a Specified Change of Control.
"" means (a) the adoption of any law, rule, regulation, treaty, protocol, practice or concession after the date of this Agreement, (b) any change in any law, rule, regulation, practice or concession or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the date of this Agreement or (c) compliance by any Lender or any Issuing Lender (or, for purposes of Section 2.15(b), by any lending office of such Lender or such Issuing Lender or by such Lender's or such Issuing Lender's holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the date of this Agreement.
Change in Law
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are Revolving Loans, Swingline Loans or Protective Advances.
Class
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
"" means, at any time, any and all property of any Loan Party, now existing or hereafter acquired, that at such time is subject to a security interest or Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (on behalf of the Secured Parties) pursuant to the Collateral Documents in order to secure the Secured Obligations.
Collateral
"" means any landlord waiver or other agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, between the Administrative Agent and any third party (including any bailee, consignee, customs broker, or other similar Person) in possession of any Collateral or any landlord of any Loan Party for any real property where any Collateral is located, as such landlord waiver or other agreement may be amended, restated, or otherwise modified from time to time.
Collateral Access Agreement
 
"" means any "Collateral Deposit Account" referred to in the Security Agreement.
Collateral Deposit Account
"" means, individually and collectively, each Security Agreement and each other document granting a Lien upon the Collateral as security for payment of the Secured Obligations.
Collateral Document
"" means, individually and collectively, each "Collection Account" referred to in the Security Agreement.
Collection Account
"" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit, Protective Advances and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum possible aggregate amount of such Lender's Credit Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.09(b) and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 10.04. The amount of each Lender's Commitment as of the Effective Date is set forth on Schedule 1.01A. The aggregate amount of the Commitments is $300,000,000 as of the Effective Date.
Commitment
"" means March 21, 2016; that in the event that the Existing 2013 Notes are not refinanced, purchased or defeased (or otherwise subject to cash collateral or escrow arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent) such that no more than $50,000,000 of principal amount of the Existing 2013 Notes are Outstanding on May 15, 2013 (the ""), the Commitment Termination Date shall be the Early Maturity Date, unless the Liquidity Amount is equal to or greater than the amount that is $100,000,000 in excess of the principal amount of the Existing 2013 Notes Outstanding as of such date, in which case (x) the Early Maturity Date will be deemed not to have occurred and (y) the Commitment Termination Date shall continue to be the Original Maturity Date, unless as of any date (the "") after the Early Maturity Date on which more than $50,000,000 of principal amount of the Existing 2013 Notes are Outstanding, the Liquidity Amount is less than the amount that is $100,000,000 in excess of the principal amount of the Existing 2013 Notes Outstanding as of such date, in which event the Commitment Termination Date shall be the Accelerated Maturity Date.
Commitment Termination Date
provided
Early Maturity Date
Accelerated Maturity Date
"" means, on any date, the percentage equivalent to a fraction (a) the numerator of which is the Credit Exposure of all Lenders and (b) the denominator of which is the Total Commitment (or, on any day after termination of the Commitments, the Total Commitment in effect immediately preceding such termination)
Commitment Utilization Percentage
"" means Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation.
Company
"" means, for any Test Period, the sum, for the Company and its Subsidiaries (determined on a consolidated basis without duplication in accordance with GAAP), of the following: (a) Consolidated Net Income for such period (b) without duplication and to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income for such period, the sum of (i) interest expense for such period, (ii) income tax expense for such period,
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
 
(iii) all amounts attributable to depreciation and amortization for such period, (iv) all non-cash charges to the extent deducted in determining Consolidated Net Income, (v) any extraordinary losses or charges and (vi) cash restructuring charges incurred in the fiscal year ending on December 31, 2010 in an aggregate amount not to exceed $39,000,000, and (c) without duplication and to the extent included in determining such Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (i) interest income derived from the investment of cash and Cash Equivalents, (ii) any extraordinary income or gains, (iii) income tax credits (to the extent not netted from income tax expense) and (iv) any non-cash gains for such period (d) any cash payments made during such period in respect of items added back in a prior period in determining Consolidated EBITDA pursuant to clause (b)(v) above subsequent to the fiscal quarter in which the relevant non-cash charges were reflected as a charge in the statement of Consolidated Net Income. For the purposes of calculating Consolidated EBITDA for any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters (each, a "") pursuant to any determination of the Leverage Ratio or the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio, (i) if during such Reference Period the Company or any Subsidiary shall have made a Material Acquisition, Consolidated EBITDA for such Reference Period shall be calculated after giving effect thereto as if such Material Acquisition occurred on the first day of such Reference Period and (ii) if during such Reference Period the Company or any Subsidiary shall have made a Material Disposition, the Consolidated EBITDA for such Reference Period shall be reduced by an amount equal to the Consolidated EBITDA (if positive) attributable to the property that is the subject of such Material Disposition for such Reference Period (as determined by the Company in its reasonable good faith business judgment) or increased by an amount equal to the Consolidated EBITDA (if negative) attributable thereto for such Reference Period. As used in this definition, "" means any acquisition of property or series of related acquisitions of property that (I) constitutes assets comprising all or substantially all of an operating unit of a business or constitutes all or substantially all of the Equity Interests of a Person and (II) involves the payment of consideration by the Company and its Subsidiaries in excess of $10,000,000; and "" means any Disposition of property or series of related Dispositions of property that yields gross proceeds to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in excess of $10,000,000, that a Disposition of property or series of related Dispositions of property that yields gross proceeds to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of less than $10,000,000 shall constitute a Material Disposition in the event that such Disposition or series of Dispositions is of property of a business that has been treated as a discontinued operation for accounting purposes; , , that a discontinued operation (other than a discontinued operation that has been sold) that constitutes a Material Disposition will not be given the effect described above for purposes of calculating Consolidated EBITDA pursuant to any determination of the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
minus
minus
Reference Period
pro
forma
Material Acquisition
Material Disposition
provided
provided
further
pro
forma
"" means, for any Test Period, for the Company and its Subsidiaries (determined on a consolidated basis without duplication in accordance with GAAP), total interest expense (including the interest component of any payments in respect of Capital Lease Obligations) in respect of all outstanding Indebtedness accrued or capitalized during such period, in each case, to the extent paid in cash during such period (including all commissions, discounts and other fees and charges owed with respect to letters of credit and bankers' acceptance financing and net costs under Swap Agreements entered into to hedge interest rates to the extent such net costs are allocable to such period in accordance with GAAP, but excluding (i) the upfront fees and any other amounts paid in connection with refinancing the
Consolidated Interest Expense
 
Existing 2013 Notes, the Existing 2016 Notes or any other Indebtedness, in each case to the extent such amounts constitute interest expense in accordance with GAAP, (ii) any gain or loss realized with respect to the termination or settlement of any Swap Agreement that hedged interest rates on the potential issuance of Indebtedness, and (iii) fees and expenses associated with the Commitments and Loans under this Agreement).
"" means, for any period, the net income or loss of the Company and its Subsidiaries (determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP) for such period; that there shall be excluded (a) the income (or deficit) of any Person accrued prior to the date it becomes a Subsidiary of the Company or is merged into or consolidated with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (b) the income (or deficit) of any Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company) in which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has an ownership interest, except to the extent that any such income is actually received by the Company or such Subsidiary in the form of dividends or similar distributions, and (c) the undistributed earnings of any Subsidiary of the Company to the extent that the declaration or payment of dividends or similar distributions by such Subsidiary is not at the time permitted by the terms of any Contractual Obligation (other than under any Loan Document) or any organizational or governing documents, any law, treaty, rule or regulation or any determination of an arbitrator or a court or other Governmental Authority, in each case applicable to such Subsidiary.
Consolidated Net Income
provided
"" means, as of any date, without duplication, the aggregate principal amount of all Indebtedness for Borrowed Money of the Company and its Subsidiaries at such date (determined on a consolidated basis without duplication in accordance with GAAP) (to the extent otherwise included in the calculation of Consolidated Total Indebtedness) Indebtedness in respect of the Existing 2013 Notes and the Existing 2016 Notes to the extent such Existing 2013 Notes or Existing 2016 Notes are not Outstanding.
Consolidated Total Indebtedness
minus
"" means, as to any Person, any provision of any security issued by such Person or of any agreement, instrument or other undertaking to which such Person is a party or by which it or any of its property is bound.
Contractual Obligation
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.09.
Contributing Party
"" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether by contract or otherwise. "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto. Solely for purposes of the definition of "Affiliate", "" shall also mean the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to vote 10% or more of the securities having ordinary voting power for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of a Person.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
Control
"" means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the outstanding principal amount of such Lender's Revolving Loans, LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure at such time an amount equal to its Applicable Percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Protective Advances outstanding at such time.
Credit Exposure
plus
 
"" means inventory repurchase and customer finance program recourse obligations, including any obligation of the Company or any Subsidiary to repurchase products of the Company and its Subsidiaries or to purchase or repurchase receivables created in connection with the sale of products or related services of the Company and its Subsidiaries under any customer finance program, in each case incurred in the ordinary course of business and as described in the Company's annual audited financial statements.
Customer Finance Program Obligations
"" means any event or condition which constitutes an Event of Default or which upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
"" means any Lender, as determined by the Administrative Agent, that has (a) failed to fund any portion of its Loans or participations in Letters of Credit, Swingline Loans or Protective Advances within three Business Days of the date required to be funded by it hereunder, (b) notified any Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or any Lender in writing that it does not intend to comply with any of its funding obligations under this Agreement or has made a public statement to the effect that it does not intend to comply with its funding obligations under this Agreement or under other agreements in which it commits to extend credit, (c) failed, within three Business Days after a request by the Administrative Agent, to confirm that it will comply with the terms of this Agreement relating to its obligations to fund prospective Loans and participations in then outstanding Letters of Credit, Swingline Loans and Protective Advances; provided that any such Lender shall cease to be a Defaulting Lender after the provision of the confirmation referenced above, (d) otherwise failed to pay over to the Administrative Agent or any other Lender any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder within three Business Days of the date when due, unless the subject of a good faith dispute, or (e) (i) become or is insolvent or has a parent company that has become or is insolvent or (ii) become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee or custodian appointed for it, or has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment or has a parent company that has become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee or custodian appointed for it, or has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in any such proceeding or appointment, that for purposes of this clause (e), a Lender shall not qualify as a Defaulting Lender solely as a result of the acquisition or maintenance of an ownership interest in such Lender or any Person controlling such Lender, or of the exercise of control over such Lender or any Person controlling such Lender, by any Governmental Authority or instrumentality thereof.
Defaulting Lender
provided
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.19(b).
Departing Lender
"" means, individually and collectively, each "Deposit Account Control Agreement" referred to in the Security Agreement.
Deposit Account Control Agreement
"" means the Designation Letter entered into by the Company and a wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary of the Company pursuant to Section 2.21(b)(i) pursuant to which such Subsidiary shall (subject to the terms and conditions of Section 2.21) be
Designation Letter
 
designated as a Subsidiary Borrower, substantially in the form of Exhibit B or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
"" means, without duplication, with respect to any period, the aggregate amount of all deductions, credit memos, returns, adjustments, allowances, bad debt write-offs and other non-cash credits which are recorded to reduce accounts receivable in a manner consistent with current and historical accounting practices of the Loan Parties.
Dilution Factors
"" means, at any date, the amount (expressed as a percentage) equal to (a) the aggregate amount of the applicable Dilution Factors for the 12 most recently ended fiscal months by (b) total gross sales of the Loan Parties for the 12 most recently ended fiscal months.
Dilution Ratio
divided
"" means, at any date, the applicable Dilution Ratio by the Eligible Accounts on such date; provided that at all times that the Dilution Ratio is less than 5.0%, the Dilution Reserve shall be zero. The Dilution Reserve shall be the only Reserve with respect to the Dilution Factors.
Dilution Reserve
multiplied
"" means any sale, lease, license, transfer, assignment or other disposition of all or any portion of the business, assets, rights, revenues or property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (including any Equity Interests owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries).
Disposition
"" means, with respect to any Person, any Equity Interests of such Person which, by its terms, or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is putable or exchangeable, or upon the happening of any event, matures or is mandatorily redeemable (other than solely for Equity Interests that are not Disqualified Stock), other than as a result of a change of control or asset sale, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, or is redeemable at the option of the holder thereof (other than as a result of a change of control or asset sale to the extent the terms of such Equity Interests provide that such Equity Interests shall not be required to be repurchased or redeemed until the Commitment Termination Date has occurred or such repurchase or redemption is otherwise permitted by this Agreement (including as a result of a waiver hereunder)), in whole or in part, in each case prior to the date that is 91 days after the Commitment Termination Date hereunder; that if such Equity Interests are issued to any plan for the benefit of employees of the Company or its Subsidiaries or by any such plan to such employees, such Equity Interests shall not constitute Disqualified Stock solely because it may be required to be repurchased by the Company or its Subsidiaries in order to satisfy applicable statutory or regulatory obligations.
Disqualified Stock
provided
"" means, individually and collectively, SunTrust Bank and RBS Business Capital, a Division of RBS Asset Finance, Inc., in their capacity as Documentation Agents.
Documentation Agents
"" means, on any Business Day with respect to any amount denominated in an Alternative Currency, the amount of Dollars that would be required to purchase such amount of such Alternative Currency based upon the spot selling rate at which JPMCB London offers to sell such Alternative Currency for Dollars in the London foreign
Dollar Equivalent
 
exchange market at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such Business Day for delivery two Business Days later.
"" or "" refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
Dollars
$
"" means any Subsidiary that is organized under the laws of any jurisdiction within the United States of America.
Domestic Subsidiary
"" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "Commitment Termination Date".
Early Maturity Date
"" means the date on which the conditions specified in Section 4.01 are satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 10.02).
Effective Date
"" means, at any time, the Accounts of any Loan Party, other than any Account:
Eligible Accounts
(a) which is not subject to a first priority perfected security interest in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties);
(b) which is subject to any Lien other than (i) a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) and (ii) a Permitted Encumbrance which does not have priority over the Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties);
(c)(i) with respect to which the scheduled due date is more than 90 days after the original invoice date (other than (A) Accounts having extended payment terms which are reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent in an amount not to exceed $10,000,000 in the aggregate at any time outstanding, and (B) Accounts in respect of which the Account Debtor has provided a letter of credit reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent), (ii) which is unpaid more than 90 days after the date of the original invoice therefor (other than the Accounts described in the parenthetical in clause (i) above) or more than 60 days after the original due date (other than Accounts related to the Fitness Division or the Mercury Marine Division (in each case, other than any such Account owed by the government of the United States, or any department, agency, public corporation, or instrumentality thereof) in an amount not to exceed $10,000,000 in the aggregate at any time outstanding which may remain unpaid for up to 120 days after the date of the original invoice therefor or up to 90 days after the original due date), or (iii) which has been written off the books of the applicable Loan Party or otherwise designated as uncollectible (in determining the aggregate amount from the same Account Debtor that is unpaid hereunder there shall be excluded the amount of any net credit balances relating to Accounts due from an Account Debtor which are unpaid more than 90 (or, to the extent provided above, 120) days from the date of invoice or more than 60 (or, to the extent provided above, 90) days from the due date);
 
(d) which is owing by an Account Debtor for which more than 50% of the Accounts owing from such Account Debtor and its Affiliates are ineligible hereunder by reason of paragraph (c) above;
(e) other than a Specified Account, which is owing by an Account Debtor to the extent the aggregate amount of Accounts owing from such Account Debtor and its Affiliates to all Loan Parties exceeds 10% of the aggregate amount of Eligible Accounts of all Loan Parties; that Specified Accounts will not qualify as Eligible Accounts pursuant to this paragraph (e) to the extent they exceed the greater of 20% of the aggregate amount of Eligible Accounts of all Loan Parties and $25,000,000;
provided
(f) with respect to which any covenant, representation, or warranty contained in this Agreement or in any applicable Security Agreement has been breached or is not true, in each case in any material respect;
(g) which (i) does not arise from the sale of goods or performance of services in the ordinary course of business, (ii) is not evidenced by an invoice or other documentation reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent which has been sent to the Account Debtor, (iii) represents a progress billing, (iv) is contingent upon any Loan Party's completion of any further performance, (v) represents a sale on a bill-and-hold, guaranteed sale, sale-and-return, sale on approval, consignment, cash-on-delivery or any other repurchase or return basis or (vi) relates to payments of interest or service or finance charges (it being understood that any asset subject to a progress billing or sold on a bill-and-hold or cash-on-delivery basis shall continue to be treated as Eligible Inventory, provided that it otherwise qualifies as such, notwithstanding that it may no longer be inventory for GAAP purposes);
(h) for which the goods giving rise to such Account have not been shipped to the Account Debtor (it being understood that any such asset shall continue to be treated as Eligible Inventory, provided that it otherwise qualifies as such, notwithstanding that it may no longer be inventory for GAAP purposes) or for which the services giving rise to such Account have not been performed by the applicable Loan Party or which is otherwise recorded as deferred revenue or if such Account was invoiced more than once;
(i) with respect to which any check or other instrument of payment has been, to the knowledge of a Financial Officer, returned uncollected for any reason;
(j) which is owed by an Account Debtor which has (i) applied for or has been the subject of a petition or application for, suffered, or consented to the appointment of any receiver, custodian, trustee, administrator, liquidator or similar official for such Account Debtor of its assets, (ii) has had possession of all or a material part of its property taken by any receiver, custodian, trustee or liquidator, (iii) filed, or had filed against it, under any Insolvency Laws, any assignment, application, request or petition for liquidation, reorganization, compromise, arrangement, adjustment of debts, stay of proceedings, adjudication as bankrupt, winding-up, or voluntary or involuntary
 
case or proceeding (other than post-petition Accounts entitled to administrative expense or equivalent priority under applicable Insolvency Laws), (iv) admitted in writing its inability, or is generally unable, to pay its debts as they become due, (v) become insolvent, or (vi) ceased operation of its business; that the Administrative Agent shall include Accounts from such Account Debtors to the extent that such Accounts are fully backed by letters of credit acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
provided
(k) which is owed by any Account Debtor which, to the knowledge of a Financial Officer, has sold all or substantially all of its assets;
(l) which is owed by an Account Debtor which (i) does not maintain its chief executive office in the United States or Canada or (ii) is not organized under any applicable law of the United States, any state of the United States or the District of Columbia, Canada, or any province of Canada unless, in any such case, such Account is backed by a letter of credit acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
(m) which is owed in any currency other than Dollars;
(n) which is owed by (i) the government (or any department, agency, public corporation, or instrumentality thereof) of any country other than the United States unless such Account is backed by a letter of credit acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, or (ii) the government of the United States, or any department, agency, public corporation, or instrumentality thereof, unless the Federal Assignment of Claims Act of 1940, as amended (31 U.S.C.  3727 . and 41 U.S.C.  15 .), has been complied with; that the Administrative Agent may in its Permitted Discretion waive such compliance with respect to such Accounts in an aggregate amount of up to $10,000,000 at any time outstanding;
et
seq
et
seq
provided
(o) which is owed by any Affiliate, employee, officer or director of any Loan Party;
(p) which is owed by an Account Debtor or any Affiliate of such Account Debtor to which any Loan Party is indebted, but only to the extent of such indebtedness or is subject to any security, deposit, progress payment, unapplied cash, retainage or other similar advance made by or for the benefit of an Account Debtor, in each case to the extent thereof;
(q) which is subject to any counterclaim, deduction, defense, setoff or dispute but only to the extent of any such counterclaim, deduction, defense, setoff or dispute;
(r) which is evidenced by any promissory note, judgment, chattel paper, or instrument;
 
(t) with respect to which the applicable Loan Party has made any agreement with the Account Debtor for any reduction thereof, other than discounts and adjustments given in the ordinary course of business, or any Account which was partially paid and the applicable Loan Party created a new receivable for the unpaid portion of such Account;
(u) which does not comply in all material respects with the requirements of all applicable laws and regulations, whether federal, provincial, territorial, state or local, including without limitation the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, the Federal Truth in Lending Act and Regulation Z of the Board;
(v) which is for goods that have been sold under a purchase order or pursuant to the terms of a contract or other agreement or understanding (written or oral) that indicates or purports that any Person other than a Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries has an ownership interest in such goods, or which indicates any party other than any of the Loan Parties as payee or remittance party;
(w) which was created on cash on delivery terms;
(x) which is governed by the laws of any jurisdiction other than the United States, any state thereof or the District of Columbia, Canada or any province of Canada; that the Administrative Agent shall include such Accounts to the extent that they are fully backed by letters of credit acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
provided
(y) which was acquired or originated by any Person acquired after the date hereof (until such time as diligence in respect of such Person and such Accounts satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion has been completed); that the Administrative Agent may in its Permitted Discretion include such Accounts in an aggregate amount of up to $5,000,000 prior to completion of such diligence;
provided
(z) which is an Account to be sold pursuant to a definitive agreement or which is subject to a permitted receivables financing, unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
(aa) which is owed by an Account Debtor in respect of which, to the knowledge of a Financial Officer, the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has received notice of proceedings or actions which are threatened or pending against such Account Debtor in respect of such Account which would reasonably be expected to result in any material adverse change in such Account Debtor's financial condition; or
(bb) which is an Account repurchased by the applicable Loan Party pursuant to the recourse provisions of any permitted receivables financing, unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion.
 
In determining the amount of an Eligible Account, the face amount of an Account may, in the Administrative Agent's Permitted Discretion, be reduced by, without duplication, to the extent not reflected in such face amount, (i) the amount of all sales, advances or prepayments, accrued and actual discounts (including early pay discounts), claims, rebates, credits or credits pending, promotional program allowances, price adjustments, finance charges or other allowances (including any amount that any Loan Party may be obligated to rebate to an Account Debtor pursuant to the terms of any agreement or understanding (written or oral)) and (ii) the aggregate amount of all cash received in respect of such Account but not yet applied by such Loan Party to reduce the amount of such Account. Standards of eligibility may be made more restrictive (and such increased restrictiveness subsequently reversed in whole or part) from time to time solely by the Administrative Agent in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion and based on new information or a change in circumstances, with any such changes to be effective 3 Business Days after delivery of notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders.
"" means the equipment owned by a Loan Party and meeting each of the following requirements:
Eligible Equipment
(a) such Loan Party has good title to such equipment;
(b) such Loan Party has the right to subject such equipment to a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent; such equipment is subject to a first priority perfected Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent and is free and clear of all other Liens of any nature whatsoever (except for Permitted Encumbrances which do not have priority over the Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent);
(c) the full purchase price for such equipment has been paid by such Loan Party;
(d) such equipment is located on premises (i) owned by such Loan Party unless such premises are subject to a mortgage or other Lien in favor of any Person other than the Administrative Agent, or (ii) leased by such Loan Party where (x) the lessor has delivered to the Administrative Agent a Collateral Access Agreement or (y) a Reserve for rent, charges, and other amounts due or to become due with respect to such facility has been established by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
(e) such equipment is in good working order and condition (ordinary wear and tear excepted) and is used or held for use by such Loan Party in the ordinary course of business of the Loan Party;
(f) such equipment is not subject to any agreement which restricts the ability of such Loan Party to use, sell, transport or dispose of such equipment or which restricts the Administrative Agent's ability to take possession of, sell or otherwise dispose of such equipment;
(g) such equipment does not constitute "fixtures" under the applicable laws of the jurisdiction in which such equipment is located; and
(h) such equipment has been appraised to the satisfaction of the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion.
 
"" means Eligible Inventory consisting of finished goods available for sale (as determined in a manner acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion and consistent with past practices).
Eligible Finished Goods Inventory
"" means, at any time, without duplication of other Eligible Inventory, Inventory:
Eligible In-Transit Inventory
(a) for which title remains with a Loan Party;
(b) which is fully insured in such amounts, with insurance companies and subject to such deductibles as are satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
(c) which is in-transit in the United States between Loan Parties; and
(d) which otherwise would constitute Eligible Inventory.
"" means, at any time, the Inventory of the Loan Parties, other than any Inventory:
Eligible Inventory
(a) which is not subject to a first priority perfected Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties);
(b) which is subject to any Lien other than (i) a Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) and (ii) a Permitted Encumbrance which does not have priority over the Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of Secured Parties);
(c) which, in the Administrative Agent's Permitted Discretion, is determined to be slow moving, obsolete, unmerchantable, defective, used (including certified pre-owned), unfit for sale, not salable at prices approximating at least the cost of such Inventory in the ordinary course of business or unacceptable due to age, type, category and/or quantity;
(d) with respect to which any covenant, representation, or warranty contained in this Agreement or the Security Agreement has been breached or is not true, in each case in any material respect, and which does not conform in all material respects to all standards imposed by any Governmental Authority;
(e) in which any Person other than the applicable Loan Party shall (i) have any direct or indirect ownership, interest or title to such Inventory or (ii) be indicated on any purchase order or invoice with respect to such Inventory as having or purporting to have an interest therein;
(f) which constitutes spare or replacement parts (other than those held for sale in the ordinary course of business), subassemblies (other than those which could be sold, or could be included in other Inventory for sale, in the ordinary course of
 
business), packaging and shipping material, manufacturing supplies, samples, prototypes, displays or display items, goods that are returned or marked for return, repossessed goods, defective or damaged goods, goods held on consignment (other than those on consignment with customers and subject to a Collateral Access Agreement which is acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion), or goods which are not of a type held for sale in the ordinary course of business;
(g) which is not located in the United States or is in transit with a common carrier from vendors and suppliers other than Eligible In-Transit Inventory;
(h) which is located in any location leased by such Borrower unless (i) the lessor has delivered to the Administrative Agent a Collateral Access Agreement, (ii) a Rent Reserve has been established by the Administrative Agent or (iii) such Inventory is Eligible In-Transit Inventory;
(i) which is located in any third party warehouse or other storage facility or is in the possession of a bailee (other than a third party processor) and is not evidenced by a document, unless (i) such warehouseman or bailee has delivered to the Administrative Agent a Collateral Access Agreement and such other documentation as the Administrative Agent may require, (ii) a Rent Reserve has been established by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion or (iii) such Inventory is Eligible In-Transit Inventory;
(j) which is being processed offsite at a third party location or outside processor, or is in-transit to or from said third party location or outside processor;
(k) which is a discontinued product or component thereof unless the Administrative Agent has determined in its Permitted Discretion that such Inventory is Eligible Inventory;
(m) which is perishable;
(n) which contains or bears any intellectual property rights licensed to any Loan Party unless the Administrative Agent is satisfied in its Permitted Discretion that upon an Event of Default it may sell or otherwise dispose of such Inventory without (i) the consent of each applicable licensor, (ii) infringing the rights of such licensor, (iii) violating any contract with such licensor, or (iv) incurring any liability with respect to payment of royalties other than royalties incurred pursuant to sale of such Inventory under the current licensing agreement;
(o) which is not reflected in a current perpetual inventory report of any Loan Party, or a similar report used to track Inventory on hand; or
(q) which is designated to be returned to a vendor or which is damaged or off-quality or subject to warranty claims or not to customer specifications or which is remanufactured.
 
Standards of eligibility may be made more restrictive (and such increased restrictiveness subsequently reversed in whole or part) from time to time solely by the Administrative Agent in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion and based on new information or a change in circumstances, with any such changes to be effective 3 Business Days after delivery of notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders.
"" means Eligible Inventory consisting of raw materials (as determined in a manner acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion and consistent with past practices).
Eligible Raw Materials Inventory
"" means Eligible Inventory consisting of work-in-process related to the manufacturing of boats and engines (as determined in a manner acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion and consistent with past practices).
Eligible WIP Inventory
"" means all laws (including common law), rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by or with any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, or to the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material.
Environmental Laws
"" means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of the Company or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon (a) a violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment, disposal, or arrangement for disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the indoor or outdoor environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
"" means, at the time of any determination thereof, an amount equal to the lesser of (i) up to 60% of the Net Orderly Liquidation Value of the Loan Parties' Eligible Equipment, minus the Equipment Indenture Reserve and any other Reserves related to the Eligible Equipment; and (ii) the Equipment Value Cap.
Equipment Component
"" means the date, after the request by the Company to include the Equipment Component in the Borrowing Base, upon which the Administrative Agent has received appraisals, satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, of the Loan Parties' Eligible Equipment.
Equipment Election Effective Date
"" means, at any time, the amount by which (a) 60% of the Net Orderly Liquidation Value of the Eligible Equipment owned by the Company and Loan Parties that are "Restricted Subsidiaries" under the Existing Notes Indenture exceeds (b) the amount of the basket provided for in Section 5.05(b) of the Existing Notes Indenture, less the amount of other secured Indebtedness utilizing such basket.
Equipment Indenture Reserve
 
"" means the Initial Value amortized ratably on a quarterly basis over a five-year period commencing upon the last day of the first full fiscal quarter completed after the determination thereof.
Equipment Value Cap
"" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest.
Equity Interests
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with any Borrower, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code, or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
"" means (a) any "reportable event", as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30 day notice period referred to in Section 4043(c) of ERISA is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any Plan that is an "employee pension benefit plan" (as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA) of a non-exempt "prohibited transaction," as defined in Section 406 of ERISA and Section 4975(f)(3) of the Code; (c) any failure by any Plan to satisfy the "minimum funding standard" applicable to such Plan (as such term is defined in Section 412 or 430 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA), whether or not waived; (d) the filing pursuant to Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan, the failure to make by its due date a required installment under Section 430(j) of the Code with respect to any Plan or the failure of any Loan Party or ERISA Affiliate to make any required contribution to any Multiemployer Plan; (e) the incurrence by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan (other than PBGC premiums due but not delinquent under Section 4007 of ERISA) including, without limitation, the imposition of any Lien in favor of the PBGC or any Plan; (f) the receipt by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a Plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan under Section 4042 of ERISA; (g) a determination that any Plan is in "at risk" status (within the meaning of Section 430 of the Code or Section 303 of ERISA); (h) the incurrence by any Loan Party or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan (under Section 4062 or 4063 of ERISA) or Multiemployer Plan (under Section 4203 or 4205 of ERISA); or (i) the receipt by any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA, or in "endangered" or "critical" status within the meaning of Section 432 of the Code or Section 305 of ERISA.
ERISA Event
"" means the single currency of Participating Member States of the European Union.
euro
 
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate.
Eurocurrency
"" means, with respect to each day during each Interest Period pertaining to a Eurocurrency Borrowing, the rate per annum determined on the basis of the rate for deposits in Dollars for a period equal to such Interest Period commencing on the first day of such Interest Period appearing on the Reuters Screen LIBOR01 Page as of 11:00 A.M., London time, two Business Days prior to the beginning of such Interest Period. In the event that such rate does not appear on such page (or otherwise on such screen), the "" shall be determined by reference to such other comparable publicly available service for displaying eurodollar rates as may be selected by the Administrative Agent or, in the absence of such availability, by reference to the rate at which the Administrative Agent is offered Dollar deposits at or about 11:00 A.M., New York City time, two Business Days prior to the beginning of such Interest Period in the interbank eurodollar market where its eurodollar and foreign currency and exchange operations are then being conducted for delivery on the first day of such Interest Period for the number of days comprised therein.
Eurocurrency Rate
Eurocurrency Rate
"" has the meaning set forth in Article VII.
Event of Default
"" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time.
Exchange Act
"" means, "Excluded Property" referred to in the Security Agreement.
Excluded Property
"" means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Lender or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party hereunder or under any other Loan Document:
Excluded Taxes
(a) income or franchise Taxes imposed on (or measured by) such recipient's net income by the United States of America (or any political subdivision or state thereof) (each a ""), or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender or any Issuing Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located;
U.S. Taxing Authority
(b) any branch profits Taxes imposed by any U.S. Taxing Authority or any similar Tax imposed by any other jurisdiction described in clause (a) above;
(c) in the case of any Non-U.S. Lender, any U.S. federal withholding Tax that is imposed on payments to such Lender to the extent such Tax (i) is in effect and would apply as of the date such Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Company under Section 2.19(b)) becomes a party to this Agreement or (ii) relates to such payments that would be made to any new applicable lending office designated by such Lender and is in effect and would apply as of the time of such designation, except in the case of (i) and (ii), (x) to the extent that such Non-U.S. Lender's assignor (if any) was entitled, at the time of assignment (or designation of lending office) to receive additional
 
amounts from the Loan Parties pursuant to Section 2.17, (y) to the extent such withholding Tax is imposed as a result of a Change in Law, or (z) to the extent that such withholding Tax shall have resulted from the making of any payment by any Loan Party to a location other than the office designated by the Administrative Agent or the relevant Lender for the receipt of payments of the applicable type from such Loan Party;
(d) any United States federal withholding Tax that is attributable to such Non-U.S. Lender's failure to comply with Section 2.17(f).
(e) any United States federal withholding Tax imposed pursuant to FATCA.
"" means the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of April 29, 2005, as amended and restated as of December 19, 2008, among Brunswick Corporation as Borrower, the Subsidiary Borrowers party thereto, the Guarantors party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
Existing Credit Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.06(l).
Existing Letters of Credit
"" means the Company's outstanding notes issued under the Existing Notes Indenture.
Existing Notes
"" means the Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1987, between the Company and Bank of America, N.A. as successor in interest to Continental Illinois National Bank and Trust Company of Chicago, as trustee.
Existing Notes Indenture
"" means any (a) "Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement" under, and as defined in, the Existing Credit Agreement and (b) each other Swap Agreement or agreement with respect to Banking Services that is outstanding on the Effective Date and in respect of which the Lender party thereto or its Affiliate (other than JPMCB or any of its Affiliates) shall have within 30 days after the Effective Date delivered a written notice to the Administrative Agent that such transaction has been entered into and that the resulting Swap Obligation or Banking Services Obligation constitutes a Borrower Obligation entitled to the benefits of the Collateral Documents.
Existing Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement
"" means the Company's Notes due August 15, 2013 issued under the Existing Notes Indenture.
Existing 2013 Notes
"" means the Company's 11.25% Senior Secured Notes due 2016 issued under the Indenture, dated as of August 14, 2009, between the Company, the subsidiary guarantors party thereto and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as trustee.
Existing 2016 Notes
"" means the Company's 7.375% Debentures due September 1, 2023 issued under the Existing Notes Indenture.
Existing 2023 Debentures
"" means Section 1471 through 1474 of the Code, as of the date of this Agreement, and any current or future regulations or official interpretations thereof.
FATCA
 
"" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
"" means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of the Company.
Financial Officer
"" means the Company's business operations in the physical fitness equipment industry.
Fitness Division
"" means, the ratio, determined as of the end of any Test Period, of (a) Consolidated EBITDA Capital Expenditures paid in cash during such Test Period (other than those financed with Indebtedness (other than Revolving Loans) or with the proceeds of sale and leaseback transactions) during such Test Period income tax paid in cash net of refunds received during such Test Period, to (b) Fixed Charges, all calculated for the Company and its Subsidiaries for such Test Period on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
minus
minus
"" means, with reference to any Test Period, without duplication, Consolidated Interest Expense, scheduled principal repayments of long-term Indebtedness for Borrowed Money of the Company and its Subsidiaries made during such period (including Capital Lease Obligation payments, but excluding repayments made to the Company or any Subsidiary), Restricted Payments paid in cash, dividends or other payments made in cash on account of preferred Equity Interests, cash contributions to any qualified defined benefit pension Plan in respect of minimum ERISA funding requirements in excess of $60,000,000 for any four fiscal quarter period, all calculated for the Company and its Subsidiaries for such Test Period on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Fixed Charges
plus
plus
plus
plus
"" means, as of any date of determination, an amount equal to 90% of the net book value of Floorplan Borrowing Base Assets as of such date.
Floorplan Borrowing Base
"" means secured floorplan loans and similar financing arrangements made by the Company or any Subsidiary to boat and engine dealers.
Floorplan Borrowing Base Assets
"" means domestic marine receivables in respect of the sale of finished boats sold on terms longer than 45 days.
Floorplan Receivables
"" means, at any time, 40% of the greatest Floorplan Receivables Total Amount as of the last day of any fiscal quarter during the period commencing with the fourth fiscal-quarter-end prior to the applicable termination of dealer financing.
Floorplan Receivables Permitted Amount
 
"" means Indebtedness incurred to finance the extension by the Company and its Subsidiaries of financing to boat and engine dealers in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed the Floorplan Borrowing Base; that not later than the third Business Day prior to the initial incurrence of Indebtedness under any debt facility that will be Floorplan Receivables Permitted Indebtedness, the Company shall have provided the Administrative Agent with written notice of its intention to incur Indebtedness under such facility and with a statement showing a computation of the Floorplan Borrowing Base anticipated to be in effect in connection with such Indebtedness as of the date of such initial incurrence.
Floorplan Receivables Permitted Indebtedness
provided
"" means Liens to secure Floorplan Receivables Permitted Indebtedness on notes, loans, promissory notes and other evidences of Indebtedness and related Guarantees and collateral arrangements, and the proceeds thereof, arising from floorplan financing and similar arrangements to boat and engine dealers to promote the sale of inventory.
Floorplan Receivables Permitted Liens
"" means, as of the last day of any fiscal quarter, an amount equal to the sum as of such day of (a) the aggregate amount of outstanding dealer floor plan financing provided by third parties and (b) the aggregate amount of the Floorplan Receivables.
Floorplan Receivables Total Amount
"" means the Financing Agreement entered into on the 23rd day of December, 2009, by and among the City of Fond du Lac, Wisconsin and Fond du Lac County, Wisconsin and the Fond du Lac County Economic Development Corporation and the Company.
Fond du Lac Existing Indebtedness
"" means the manufacturing plants and facilities, distribution and warehouse facilities and executive offices of the Mercury Marine division located in or adjacent to Fond du Lac, Wisconsin, including all fixtures thereon and equipment and manufacturing-related tangible assets located therein from time to time, but excluding Inventory, raw materials and all production components thereof.
Fond du Lac Facility
"" means sale and leaseback transactions with respect to the Fond du Lac Facility.
Fond du Lac Sale and Leaseback Transactions
"" means any Equity Interest in any Person that is not organized under the laws of any jurisdiction within the United States of America.
Foreign Equity Interest
"" means each of Brunswick International Ltd., Marine Power International Limited, Marine Power New Zealand Limited, Life Fitness International Sales Inc., Marine Power International Pty. Ltd., Brunswick Marine in EMEA, Inc. and each other Domestic Subsidiary the business of which consists substantially entirely in holding Foreign Equity Interests and/or conducting operations through foreign branches.
Foreign Holdco
"" means (a) each account receivable owned by any Foreign Subsidiary or any Foreign Holdco and (b) each account receivable owned by a Loan Party that is owed by a Person that is not organized under any applicable law of the United States, any state of the United States or the District of Columbia, Canada, or any province of Canada.
Foreign Receivables
 
"" means any Subsidiary that is not a Domestic Subsidiary.
Foreign Subsidiary
"" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
"" means the government of the United States of America, or of any other nation, or any political subdivision thereof, whether state, provisional, territorial or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
"" of or by any Person (the "") means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the "") in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or other obligation; , that the term Guarantee shall not include (i) endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business, (ii) Customer Finance Program Obligations or (iii) the BAC Joint Venture Obligations.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.01.
Guaranteed Obligations
"" means, at any time, collectively and individually, the Company and each Domestic Subsidiary that has executed this Agreement or has executed a Joinder Agreement and has not been released from the Loan Guaranty.
Guarantor
"" means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates or fractions, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, urea-formaldehyde insulation, molds, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
"" means the real property located at 1 N. Field Court, Lake Forest, Illinois 60045.
Headquarters
"" means, at any date, any Domestic Subsidiary of the Company (other than a Subsidiary Borrower) that, together with its consolidated Subsidiaries, provides less than 5% of the consolidated revenues of, or holds less than 5% of the consolidated assets of, the Company and its Domestic Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis determined in accordance with GAAP; that, the aggregate revenues or assets of all Immaterial Subsidiaries, determined in accordance with GAAP, may not exceed 10% of consolidated revenues or consolidated assets, respectively, of the Company and its consolidated Domestic
Immaterial Subsidiary
provided
 
Subsidiaries, collectively, at any time (and the Company will designate in writing to the Administrative Agent from time to time the Subsidiaries which will cease to be treated as "Immaterial Subsidiaries" in order to comply with the foregoing limitation). Each computation of consolidated assets and revenues made in determining whether a Subsidiary is an Immaterial Subsidiary shall exclude all assets consisting of Foreign Equity Interests.
"" means a notice substantially in the form of Exhibit I.
Increased Facility Activation Notice
"": any Business Day designated as such in an Increased Facility Activation Notice.
Increased Facility Closing Date
"" means, without duplication, with respect to any Person (including the Company and its Subsidiaries), (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than accounts payable arising in the ordinary course of business which, to the knowledge of a Financial Officer, are not more than 45 days past due or are being disputed in good faith) and other accrued expenses and deferred compensation incurred in the ordinary course of business, (c) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (d) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers' acceptances, (e) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (f) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property (including accounts and contract rights) owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed (and in each case valued at the lesser of the amount of such Indebtedness and the fair market value of the assets subject to such Lien), (g) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (h) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit, letters of guaranty that support or secure Indebtedness, surety bonds or similar arrangements, (i) for purposes of Section 7(f) only, all obligations of such Person in respect of Swap Agreements and (j) any other Off-Balance Sheet Liability. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such Person's ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor. The term Indebtedness shall not include Customer Finance Program Obligations.
Indebtedness
"" means, on any date, the amount of debt of the Company and its Subsidiaries set forth on, or that would be required to be set forth on, the consolidated balance sheet of the Company as of such date in accordance with GAAP.
Indebtedness for Borrowed Money
"" means Taxes (including Other Taxes) other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.03(b).
Indemnitee
 
"" means senior, unsecured, long-term indebtedness for borrowed money of the Company that is not guaranteed by any other Person or subject to any other credit enhancement.
Index Debt
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.12.
Information
"" means the value of the Loan Parties' Eligible Equipment as determined by the appraisals of the Loan Parties' Eligible Equipment described in the definition of Equipment Component; that the Initial Value shall not exceed $25,000,000.
Initial Value
provided
"" means the Bankruptcy Code and any other applicable state, provincial, territorial or federal bankruptcy laws, each as now and hereafter in effect, any successors to such statutes and any other applicable insolvency or other similar law of any jurisdiction, including any law of any jurisdiction permitting a debtor to obtain a stay or a compromise of the claims of its creditors against it and including any rules and regulations pursuant thereto.
Insolvency Laws
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.05(b).
Intellectual Property
"" means the Intercreditor Agreement, dated as of August 14, 2009 (as it may be amended, restated or otherwise modified from time to time), among JP Morgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent for the First Priority Secured Parties (as defined therein), The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Collateral Agent for the Second Priority Secured Parties (as defined therein), the Company and each of the other Loan Parties.
Intercreditor Agreement
"" means a request by any Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing of Revolving Loans in accordance with Section 2.08.
Interest Election Request
"" means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan), each Quarterly Date, (b) with respect to any Eurocurrency Loan, the last day of each Interest Period therefor and, in the case of any Interest Period for a Eurocurrency Loan of more than three months' duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at three-month intervals after the first day of such Interest Period, (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid and (d) with respect to any Loan, the Commitment Termination Date.
Interest Payment Date
"" means for any Eurocurrency Loan or Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Loan or Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six (or, with the consent of each Lender, nine or twelve) months thereafter, as specified in the applicable Borrowing Request or Interest Election Request; that (i) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless, in the case of a Eurocurrency Borrowing only, such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day, and (ii) any Interest Period pertaining to a Eurocurrency Borrowing that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on
Interest Period
provided
 
the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Loan initially shall be the date on which such Loan is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Loan, and the date of a Borrowing consisting of Loans that have been converted or continued shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Loans.
"" means, individually and collectively, "Inventory", as referred to in the Security Agreement.
Inventory
"" means a reserve calculated by the Company and satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion for repurchases of Inventory to be made by Loan Parties.
Inventory Buyback Reserve
"" shall mean reserves against Inventory equal to the sum of the following:
Inventory Reserves
(a) a reserve for shrink, or discrepancies that arise pertaining to inventory quantities on hand between a Borrower's perpetual accounting system, and physical counts of the inventory which will be based on the applicable Loan Party's historical practice and experience and in an amount acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion;
(b) a reserve determined by the Company in accordance with GAAP and satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion for Inventory that is discontinued, obsolete, slow-moving, unmerchantable, defective or unfit for sale;
(c) a lower of the cost or market reserve for any differences between a Borrower's actual cost to produce versus its selling price to third parties; and
(d) any other reserve as deemed appropriate by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, from time to time.
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.06.
Investment
"" means JPMCB, The Bank of New York, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, Bank of America, N.A., and each other Lender designated by the Company as an "Issuing Lender" hereunder that has agreed to such designation (and is reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent), each in its capacity as an issuer of one or more Letters of Credit hereunder, and its successors in such capacity as provided in Section 2.06(j), in each case so long as such Person shall remain an Issuing Lender hereunder. Any Issuing Lender may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of such Issuing Lender, in which case the term "Issuing Lender" shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Lender
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.13.
Joinder Agreement
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., a national banking association, in its individual capacity, and its successors.
JPMCB
 
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.06(k).
LC Collateral Account
"" means $125,000,000.
LC Commitment
"" means a payment made by any Issuing Lender pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
"" means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of any Borrower at such time; that, with respect to any component of any such amount in an Alternative Currency, such amount shall be the Dollar Equivalent thereof. The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
provided
"" means with respect to any Lender, any Person as to which such Lender is, directly or indirectly, a Subsidiary.
Lender Parent
"" means (a) on the Effective Date, the Persons listed on Schedule 1.01A hereto and (b) thereafter, any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term "Lenders" includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
"" means any letter of credit issued or continued pursuant to this Agreement.
Letter of Credit
"" means, as of the last day of any Test Period of the Company, the ratio of (a) Consolidated Total Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for such period.
Leverage Ratio
"" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
"" means, as of any time, the sum, without duplication, of (a) Availability (b) the aggregate amount of unrestricted and unencumbered cash and Cash Equivalents of the Company and its subsidiaries.
Liquidity Amount
plus
"" means, collectively, this Agreement, any promissory notes issued pursuant to this Agreement, any Letters of Credit, any Designation Letters and the Collateral Documents. Any reference in this Agreement or any other Loan Document to a Loan Document shall include all appendices, exhibits or schedules thereto, and all amendments, restatements, supplements or other modifications thereto, and shall refer to this Agreement or such Loan Document as the same may be in effect at any and all times such reference becomes operative.
Loan Documents
 
"" means Article IX of this Agreement.
Loan Guaranty
"" means, individually and collectively, the Company, the other Borrowers, the Company's Domestic Subsidiaries that are Guarantors and any other Person who becomes a party to this Agreement pursuant to a Joinder Agreement and their respective successors and assigns.
Loan Parties
"" means the loans and advances made by the Lenders to the Borrowers pursuant to this Agreement, including Swingline Loans and Protective Advances.
Loans
"" means any "Lock Box" referred to in the Security Agreement.
Lock Box
"" means any "Lock Box Agreement" referred to in the Security Agreement.
Lock Box Agreement
"" means "margin stock" within the meaning of Regulations T, U and X of the Board.
Margin Stock
"" means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, condition, financial or otherwise, prospects or results of operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of any Loan Party to perform any of its obligations under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents to which it is a party, (c) the Collateral, the Administrative Agent's Lien (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) on the Collateral or the priority of such Liens, or (d) the rights of or benefits available to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders or any Issuing Lender under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents.
Material Adverse Effect
"" means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of the Company and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $35,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the "" of the obligations of any Person in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that such Person would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
principal amount
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Moody's
"" means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA which is contributed to by either the Company or an ERISA Affiliate.
Multiemployer Plan
"" means, with respect to Inventory or equipment of any Person, the orderly liquidation value thereof as determined in a manner acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion by an appraiser acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion, net of all costs of liquidation thereof.
Net Orderly Liquidation Value
"" means, with respect to any event, (a) the cash proceeds and Cash Equivalents received in respect of such event including (i) any cash received in respect of any
Net Proceeds
 
non-cash proceeds (including any cash payments received by way of deferred payment of principal pursuant to a note or installment receivable or purchase price adjustment receivable or otherwise, but excluding any interest payments), but only as and when received, (ii) in the case of a casualty, insurance proceeds and (iii) in the case of a condemnation or similar event, condemnation awards and similar payments, net of (b) the sum of (i) all reasonable fees and out-of-pocket expenses paid to third parties (other than Affiliates) in connection with such event, (ii) in the case of a sale, transfer or other disposition of an asset (including pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction or a casualty or a condemnation or similar proceeding), the amount of all payments required to be made as a result of such event to repay Indebtedness (other than Loans) secured by such asset (so long as such Lien is permitted hereunder) and (iii) the amount of all taxes paid (or reasonably estimated to be payable) and the amount of any reserves established to fund contingent liabilities reasonably estimated to be payable, in each case during the year that such event occurred or the next succeeding year and that are directly attributable to such event (as determined reasonably and in good faith by a Financial Officer).
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.23(b).
New Lender
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.23(b).
New Lender Supplement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.02(d).
Non-Consenting Lender
"" means, at any date, any Subsidiary of the Company (other than a Subsidiary Borrower) that, together with its consolidated Subsidiaries, provides less than 5% of the consolidated revenues of, or holds less than 5% of the consolidated assets of, the Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis determined in accordance with GAAP; that, the aggregate revenues or assets of all Non-Material Subsidiaries, determined in accordance with GAAP, may not exceed 10% of consolidated revenues or consolidated assets, respectively, of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries, collectively, at any time (and the Company will designate in writing to the Administrative Agent from time to time the Subsidiaries which will cease to be treated as "Non-Material Subsidiaries" in order to comply with the foregoing limitation).
Non-Material Subsidiary
provided
"" means any Lender or Issuing Lender that is not a "United States Person" as defined in Section 7701(a)(30) of the Code.
Non-U.S. Lender
"" of a Person means any indebtedness, liability or obligation under any so-called "synthetic lease" transaction entered into by such Person.
Off-Balance Sheet Liability
"" means any and all present or future stamp, court or documentary Taxes or any other excise, property, intangible, recording, filing or similar Taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made under any Loan Document or from the execution, delivery, performance or enforcement or registration of, or from the receipt or perfection of a security interest under, or otherwise with respect to, any Loan Document, but excluding Excluded Taxes.
Other Taxes
"" means, with respect to any Existing 2013 Notes or Existing 2016 Notes, that such notes remain outstanding and have not been purchased by the Company or a
Outstanding
 
Subsidiary of the Company or defeased (or otherwise made subject to cash collateral or escrow arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent).
"" means a Swap Agreement with respect to which at or prior to the time that such Swap Agreement is executed, each of the Company and the Lender party thereto or its Affiliate shall have delivered a written notice to the Administrative Agent that such transaction has been or will be entered into, that the resulting Pari Swap Obligation constitutes a Borrower Obligation entitled to the benefits of the Collateral Documents and that a Swap Reserve shall be established in an amount equal to such Pari Swap Obligation.
Pari Secured Swap Agreement
"" means all Swap Obligations, up to the maximum amount (which shall be included in the Swap Reserve) specified by the Company, which amount may be established or increased (by further written notice from the Company to the Administrative Agent from time to time) as long as no Default or Event of Default exists and establishment of a Swap Reserve for such amount and all other Pari Swap Obligations would not result in the total Credit Exposures exceeding the lesser of (x) the Total Commitment or (y) the Borrowing Base then in effect.
Pari Swap Obligations
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.04(c).
Participant
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.04(c).
Participant Register
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.16.
Patriot Act
"" means (a) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and (b) either (i) (A) the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio is not less than 1.10 to 1.00 and (B) Availability is at least the greater of (x) $45,000,000 and (y) 17.5% of the Total Commitments or (ii) Availability is at least the greater of (1) $60,000,000 and (2) 25% of the Total Commitments.
Payment Conditions
"" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
"" means any acquisition by the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary, whether by purchase, merger or otherwise, of all or substantially all of the assets of, all of the Equity Interests of, or a business line or unit or a division of, any Person; that:
Permitted Acquisition
provided
(a) such acquisition shall be consensual;
(b) such acquisition shall be consummated in accordance with all Requirements of Law, except where the failure to so comply would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect;
(c) in the case of the acquisition of Equity Interests, all of the Equity Interests (except for any such securities in the nature of directors' qualifying shares) acquired or otherwise issued by such Person (or, in the case of an acquisition of a group of companies, the parent company of such group) or any newly formed Subsidiary of any Borrower in connection with
 
such acquisition shall be directly and beneficially owned 100% by the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary; and
(d) in the case of any acquisition in excess of $25,000,000 (whether paid in cash, securities, the assumption of debt or otherwise), the Company shall furnish to the Administrative Agent at least five Business Days prior to such proposed acquisition a certificate from a Financial Officer evidencing compliance with Section 6.06(k), together with such detailed information relating thereto as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request to demonstrate such compliance; and
, that it is understood that to the extent the assets acquired are to be included in the Borrowing Base, due diligence in respect of such acquired assets satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, in its Permitted Discretion, shall have been completed prior to such inclusion.
provided
further
"" means a determination made in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable (from the perspective of a secured asset-based lender) business judgment.
Permitted Discretion
"" means:
Permitted Encumbrances
(a) Liens imposed by law for Taxes, assessments or governmental charges or levies on property that are not yet due and payable or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
(b) carriers', warehousemen's, mechanics', materialmen's, repairmen's, servicemen's and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that are not overdue by more than 60 days or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
(c) pledges and deposits (including letters of credit (and deposits securing letters of credit), surety bonds and other escrowed or trust holdings) made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers' compensation laws, unemployment, general liability and other insurance, old age pensions and other social security or retirement benefits, or similar laws or regulations;
(d) Liens incurred over cash deposits and other investments to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
(e) judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under clause (j) of Article VII;
(f) easements, zoning or other land use restrictions (including restrictive covenants or deed restrictions in connection with environmental cleanup obligations), rights-of-way and similar encumbrances or charges on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not materially detract from the value of
 
the affected property or interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Company or any Subsidiary; and
(g) bankers' liens and rights of setoff arising by operation of law and contractual rights of setoff or any contractual Liens or netting rights, in each case, in favor of the relevant depository institutions in connection with any cash management services provided to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business;
provided that the term "Permitted Encumbrance" shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
"" means any of one or more financing facilities, as amended, supplemented, modified, extended, renewed, restated, refunded, replaced or refinanced from time to time, the obligations of which are non-recourse (except for Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction Undertakings) to the Company or any Subsidiary (other than any Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction Subsidiary), pursuant to which the Company or any Subsidiary sells Floorplan Borrowing Base Assets and related assets or interests therein to either (a) a Person that is not a Subsidiary or (b) a Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction Subsidiary that in turn sells its assets to a Person that is not a Subsidiary.
Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction
"" means representations, warranties, covenants and indemnities entered into by the Company or any Subsidiary that it has determined in good faith to be customary in financings similar to a Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction, including, without limitation, those relating to the servicing of the assets of a Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction Subsidiary.
Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction Undertakings
"" means any Subsidiary formed solely for the purpose of engaging, and that engages only, in one or more Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transactions.
Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction Subsidiary
"" means any acquisition that would be a Permitted Acquisition if each reference to "Domestic Subsidiary" in the definition of Permitted Acquisition were replaced with a reference to "Foreign Subsidiary".
Permitted Foreign Acquisition
"" means sale and leaseback transactions with respect to the property or assets of Foreign Subsidiaries and Foreign Holdcos outside the United States of America.
Permitted Foreign Sale and Leaseback Transactions
"" means any of one or more receivables financing facilities, as amended, supplemented, modified, extended, renewed, restated, refunded, replaced or refinanced from time to time, the obligations of which are non-recourse (except for Permitted Foreign Securitization Standard Undertakings) to the Company or any Subsidiary (other than any Permitted Foreign Securitization Subsidiary), pursuant to which the Company or any Subsidiary sells accounts, payment intangibles and related assets or interests therein in each case in respect of Foreign Receivables to either (a) a Person that is not a Subsidiary or (b) a Permitted Foreign Securitization Subsidiary that in turn sells its accounts, payment intangibles and related assets to a Person that is not a Subsidiary.
Permitted Foreign Securitization
 
"" means any obligation of the Company or any Subsidiary that is a seller of assets in a Permitted Foreign Securitization to repurchase the assets it sold thereunder as a result of a breach of a representation, warranty or covenant or otherwise, including as a result of a receivable or portion thereof becoming subject to any asserted defense, dispute, offset or counterclaim of any kind as a result of any action taken by, any failure to take action by or any other event relating to the seller.
Permitted Foreign Securitization Repurchase Obligation
"" means representations, warranties, covenants and indemnities entered into by the Company or any Subsidiary that it has determined in good faith to be customary in financings similar to a Permitted Foreign Securitization, including, without limitation, those relating to the servicing of the assets of a Permitted Foreign Securitization Subsidiary, it being understood that any Permitted Foreign Securitization Repurchase Obligation shall be deemed to be a Permitted Foreign Securitization Standard Undertaking.
Permitted Foreign Securitization Standard Undertakings
"" means any Subsidiary formed solely for the purpose of engaging, and that engages only, in one or more Permitted Foreign Securitizations.
Permitted Foreign Securitization Subsidiary
"": any Lien permitted pursuant to the terms of Section 6.02 and any reference to such Liens.
Permitted Lien
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.04.
Permitted Non-Cash Sales
"" means sale and leaseback transactions with respect to the Available Collateral.
Permitted Other Sale and Leaseback Transactions
"" means sale and leaseback transactions with respect to the Available Collateral, provided that all the proceeds of such transactions are applied immediately to redeem (or make subject to cash collateral or escrow arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent pending the redemption of) the Existing 2013 Notes or the Existing 2016 Notes and pay any premiums and any fees and expenses incurred in connection with such redemption.
Permitted Refinancing Sale and Leaseback Transactions
"" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
"" means any employee pension benefit plan (as defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA), including any employee welfare benefit plan (as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA), any employee pension benefit plan (as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA), and any plan which is both an employee welfare benefit plan and an employee pension benefit plan, and in respect of which any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA, except for any Multiemployer Plan.
Plan
"" means the lawful money of the United Kingdom.
Pounds Sterling
"" means:
Prepayment Event
 
(a) any sale, transfer or other disposition (including pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction) of any property or asset of any Loan Party, other than dispositions described in 6.04(a), (b), (c), (d), (e) (with respect to Permitted Refinancing Sale and Leaseback Transactions only), (f), (h), (j), (k), (l) or (m);
(b) any casualty or other insured damage to, or any taking under power of eminent domain or by condemnation or similar proceeding of, any property or asset of any Loan Party with a fair value immediately prior to such event equal to or greater than $10,000,000; or
(c) the incurrence by any Loan Party of any Indebtedness, other than Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01A.
"" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMCB as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
"" means, with respect to any test hereunder in connection with any event, that such test shall be calculated after giving effect on a basis for the period of such calculation to (i) such event as if it happened on the first day of such period or (ii) the incurrence of any Indebtedness by the Company or any Subsidiary and any incurrence, repayment, issuance or redemption of other Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary occurring at any time subsequent to the last day of the Test Period and on or prior to the date of determination, as if such incurrence, repayment, issuance or redemption, as the case may be, occurred on the first day of the Test Period (it being understood that, in connection with any such calculation prior to the delivery of financial statements for the first fiscal quarter ended after the Effective Date, such calculation shall be made in a manner satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion).
Pro Forma Basis
pro
forma
pro
forma
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.01(e).
Projections
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.04.
Protective Advance
"" means, at any time, the aggregate principal amount of all Protective Advances outstanding at such time. The Protective Advance Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Protective Advance Exposure at such time.
Protective Advance Exposure
"" means the last Business Day of March, June, September and December in each year, the first of which shall be the first such day after the date hereof.
Quarterly Dates
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.04(b).
Register
"" means, with respect to any specified Person, such Person's Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(b)(ii).
Relevant Jurisdiction
 
"" means with respect to any store, docking facility, bowling facility, warehouse distribution center, regional distribution center or depot where any Inventory subject to Liens arising by operation of law is located and with respect to which no Collateral Access Agreement is in effect, a reserve equal to three months' rent at such store, warehouse, cross-docking facility, distribution center, regional distribution center or depot.
Rent Reserve
"" means reports prepared by the Administrative Agent or another Person showing the results of appraisals, field examinations or audits pertaining to the assets of any Loan Party from information furnished by or on behalf of any Loan Party, after the Administrative Agent has exercised its rights of inspection pursuant to this Agreement, which Reports shall be distributed to the Lenders by the Administrative Agent.
Report
"" means, at any time, Lenders having Commitments representing more than 50% of the Total Commitment at such time; that, for purposes of declaring the Loans to be due and payable pursuant to Article VII, and for all purposes after the Loans become due and payable pursuant to Article VII or the Commitments expire or terminate, "" means, Lenders having Credit Exposures representing more than 50% of the total Credit Exposures at such time.
Required Lenders
provided
Required Lenders
"" means, as to any Person, the Certificate of Incorporation and By Laws or other organizational or governing documents of such Person, and any law, treaty, rule or regulation or determination of an arbitrator or a court or other Governmental Authority, in each case applicable to or binding upon such Person or any of its property or to which such Person or any of its property is subject.
Requirement of Law
"" means Rent Reserves, Inventory Reserves, Inventory Buyback Reserves, Swap Reserves and any other reserves which the Administrative Agent deems necessary, in its Permitted Discretion, to maintain (including, without limitation, reserves for accrued and unpaid interest on the Secured Obligations, reserves for consignee's, warehousemen's and bailee's charges) with respect to the Collateral or any Loan Party.
Reserves
"" means any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in the Company or any Subsidiary, or any payment (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any such Equity Interests in the Company, whether now or hereafter outstanding, or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests in the Company; , , that any payments or issuances pursuant to Section 6.05(g) or (h) or the 2005 Elective Deferred Incentive Compensation Plan shall not constitute Restricted Payments.
Restricted Payment
provided
however
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans constituting such Borrowing, are made pursuant to Section 2.01.
Revolving
"" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
 
"" means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, together with any successor agency responsible for the administration and enforcement of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended from time to time, and the Exchange Act.
SEC
"" means the Borrower Obligations and the Guaranteed Obligations.
Secured Obligations
"" means any of the Agents, the Lenders (and, in the case of any Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement or Pari Secured Swap Agreements, Affiliates of Lenders) and the Issuing Lenders, as well as any other holder of a Secured Obligation.
Secured Party
"" means, individually and collectively, each "Securities Account Control Agreement" referred to in the Security Agreement.
Securities Account Control Agreement
"" means that certain Pledge and Security Agreement, dated as of the date hereof, between the Loan Parties party thereto and the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, and any other pledge or security agreement entered into, after the date of this Agreement by any other Loan Party (as required by this Agreement or any other Loan Document for the purpose of creating a Lien on the property of any Loan Party), or any other Person, as the same may be amended, restated or otherwise modified from time to time.
Security Agreement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(d).
Settlement
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.05(d).
Settlement Date
"" means Accounts owing by Account Debtors identified to and approved by the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion and which are not unpaid more than 90 days after the date of the original invoice therefor.
Specified Accounts
"" means a "Change of Control" (or other defined term having a similar purpose) as defined in the Existing Notes or in any document governing any refinancing thereof.
Specified Change of Control
"" means (a) a Swap Agreement or agreement with respect to Banking Services with respect to which at or prior to the time that such Swap Agreement is executed or such Banking Services are engaged, the Lender party thereto or its Affiliate (other than JPMCB or any of its Affiliates) shall have delivered a written notice to the Administrative Agent that such transaction has been or will be entered into and that the resulting Swap Obligation or Banking Services Obligation constitutes a Borrower Obligation entitled to the benefits of the Collateral Documents, and (b) each Existing Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement.
Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement
"" means, for the Interest Period for any Eurocurrency Borrowing, a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one the arithmetic mean, taken over each day in such Interest Period, of the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject for eurocurrency funding (currently
Statutory Reserve Rate
minus
 
referred to as "Eurocurrency Liabilities" in Regulation D of the Board). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D. Eurocurrency Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
"" of any Person means any Indebtedness of such Person the payment of which is subordinated to payment of the Secured Obligations to the written satisfaction of the Administrative Agent.
Subordinated Indebtedness
"" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity of which securities or other ownership interests representing more than 50% of the equity or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held. Unless otherwise specified, "Subsidiary" means a Subsidiary of the Company.
Subsidiary
parent
"" means (a) each wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary of the Company that is listed under the caption "Subsidiary Borrowers" on the signature pages hereof and (b) each other wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary of the Company that shall become a Subsidiary Borrower pursuant to Section 2.21, in each case so long as such Subsidiary shall remain a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder.
Subsidiary Borrower
"" means, at any time, Lenders having Credit Exposure and unused Commitments representing at least 66
Supermajority Lenders
 2
/
3
% of the sum of the total Credit Exposure and unused Commitments at such time.
"" means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Company or the Subsidiaries shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
"" of a Person means any and all obligations of such Person, whether absolute or contingent and howsoever and whensoever created, arising, evidenced or acquired (including all renewals, extensions and modifications thereof and substitutions therefor), under (a) any and all Swap Agreements, and (b) any and all cancellations, buy backs, reversals, terminations or assignments of any Swap Agreement transaction.
Swap Obligations
 
"" means the aggregate amount of reserves established by Administrative Agent in amounts set forth in the written notices to the Administrative Agent referenced in the definition of "Pari Swap Obligations" and as such amount may be adjusted by the Administrative Agent based on such notices or otherwise increased, in its Permitted Discretion, from time to time in respect of Pari Swap Obligations.
Swap Reserve
"" means, at any time, the aggregate principal amount of all Swingline Loans outstanding at such time. The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Exposure
"" means JPMCB, in its capacity as the lender of Swingline Loans hereunder, and its successors and assigns in such capacity.
Swingline Lender
"" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.05.
Swingline Loan
"" means, individually and collectively, Bank of America, N.A. and Wells Fargo Capital Finance, LLC, in their capacity as Syndication Agents.
Syndication Agents
"" means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions or withholdings, assessments, fees or other charges imposed by any Governmental Authority including any interest, additions to tax or penalties applicable thereto.
Taxes
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.21(c).
Termination Letter
"" means the most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company ended on or prior to such time (taken as one accounting period) in respect of which financial statements for each quarter or fiscal year in such period have been (or were required to be) delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b), as applicable.
Test Period
"" means, at any date, the amount that would, in conformity with GAAP, be set forth opposite the caption "total assets" (or any like caption) on a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and the Subsidiaries.
Total Assets
"" means, at any time, the aggregate amount of the Commitments as in effect at such time.
Total Commitment
"" means the execution, delivery and performance by the Company, each Subsidiary Borrower and each other Loan Party of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, the creation of the Liens in the Collateral in favor of the Administrative Agent, the borrowing of Loans and other credit extensions, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder.
Transactions
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
"" means, at any time, any Secured Obligations (or portion thereof) that are contingent in nature or unliquidated at such time, including any Secured
Unliquidated Obligations
 
Obligation that is: (i) an obligation to reimburse a bank for drawings not yet made under a letter of credit issued by it; (ii) any other obligation (including any Guarantee) that is contingent in nature at such time; or (iii) an obligation to provide collateral to secure any of the foregoing types of obligations.
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.17(f).
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
"" means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
SECTION 1.02 . For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Class (e.g., a "Revolving Loan"), by Type (e.g., a "Eurocurrency Loan") or by Class and Type (e.g., a "Eurocurrency Revolving Loan"). Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Class (e.g., a "Revolving Borrowing" or "Borrowing of Revolving Loans"), by Type (e.g., a "Eurocurrency Borrowing") or by Class and Type (e.g., a "Eurocurrency Revolving Borrowing" or a "Eurocurrency Borrowing of Revolving Loans").
Classification of Loans and Borrowings
SECTION 1.03 . The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall". Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (c) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights. References to the "date hereof" and similar locutions shall mean the date hereof.
Terms Generally
SECTION 1.04 . Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that, if the Company notifies the Administrative Agent that the Company requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or any change in the application of GAAP on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Company that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in
Accounting Terms; GAAP; Fiscal Year
provided
 
effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith. In the event that historical accounting practices, systems or reserves relating to the components of the Borrowing Base are modified in a manner that is adverse to the Lenders in any material respect, the Borrowers will give the Administrative Agent prompt written notice thereof. To enable the ready and consistent determination of compliance with the covenants set forth in Article VI, the Company will not change its fiscal year from a fiscal year consisting of four fiscal quarters ending on December 31, each fiscal quarter of which is comprised of three fiscal months consisting of a first fiscal month of four calendar weeks, a second fiscal month of four calendar weeks and a third fiscal month of five calendar weeks.
SECTION 2.01 .
The Commitments
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender agrees to make Revolving Loans in Dollars to the Company and the Subsidiary Borrowers from time to time during the Availability Period if after giving effect thereto:
(i) such Lender's Credit Exposure would not exceed such Lender's Commitment; and
(ii) the total Credit Exposures would not exceed the lesser of (x) the Total Commitment and (y) the Borrowing Base.
(b) Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow its Revolving Loans.
SECTION 2.02 .
Loans and Borrowings
(a) . Each Revolving Loan to the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower shall be made as part of a Borrowing comprised of Loans of the same Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments. Each Protective Advance and Swingline Loan shall be made in accordance with Sections 2.04 and 2.05, respectively. The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder; that the Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lender's failure to make Loans as required.
Obligations of Lenders
provided
(b) . Subject to Section 2.14 each Revolving Borrowing by the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in Dollars as the relevant Borrower may request in accordance herewith. Each Swingline Loan shall be an ABR Loan. Each ABR Loan (whether a Revolving Loan or a Swingline Loan) shall be denominated in Dollars.
Type of Loans
 
Each Lender at its option may make any Eurocurrency Loan by causing any U.S. or non-U.S. branch or any Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the relevant Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
(c) . Each Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount of $5,000,000 or a larger multiple of $1,000,000. Each Revolving ABR Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount equal to $2,500,000 or a larger multiple of $500,000; that an ABR Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the Total Commitment or that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.06(f). Each Swingline Loan shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $250,000 and not less than $250,000. Borrowings of more than one Class and Type may be outstanding at the same time; that there shall not at any time be more than a total of ten Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowings outstanding.
Minimum Amounts; Limitation on Number of Borrowings
provided
provided
(d) . Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, neither the Company nor any other Borrower shall be entitled to request (or to elect to convert to or continue as a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing) any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested therefor would end after the Commitment Termination Date.
Limitations on Interest Periods
SECTION 2.03 .
Requests for Revolving Borrowings
(a) . To request a Revolving Borrowing, the Company (on behalf of itself or the relevant Borrower) or the relevant Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone:
Borrowing Requests
(i) in the case of a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing by the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing; or
(ii) in the case of an ABR Borrowing by the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing.
(iii) Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Company (on behalf of itself or the relevant Borrower) or the relevant Borrower.
(b) . Each telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Sections 2.01 and 2.02:
Content of Borrowing Requests
(i) the name of the relevant Borrower;
(ii) the aggregate amount of the requested Borrowing;
(iii) the date of such Borrowing (which shall be a Business Day);
 
(iv) whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurocurrency Borrowing;
(v) in the case of a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing, the initial Interest Period therefor, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period" and permitted under Section 2.02(d); and
(vi) the location and number of the relevant Borrower's account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of Section 2.07.
(c) . Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request for a Borrowing by the Company or a Subsidiary Borrower in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
Notice by Administrative Agent; Determination of Lender Ratable Shares
(d) . With respect to any Borrowing Request in respect of a Revolving Borrowing by the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower:
Failure to Elect
(A) if no election as to the Type of such Revolving Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing; and
(B) if no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing, the applicable Borrower shall be deemed to have requested an ABR Borrowing.
SECTION 2.04 . (a) Subject to the limitations set forth below, the Administrative Agent is authorized by the Borrowers and the Lenders, from time to time in the Administrative Agent's sole discretion (but shall have absolutely no obligation), to make Loans to the Company, on behalf of all Lenders, which the Administrative Agent, in its Permitted Discretion, deems necessary or desirable (i) to preserve or protect the Collateral, or any portion thereof, (ii) to enhance the likelihood of, or maximize the amount of, repayment of the Loans and other Borrower Obligations, or (iii) to pay any other amount chargeable to or required to be paid by any of the Borrowers pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, including payments of reimbursable expenses (including costs, fees, and expenses as described in Section 10.03) and other sums payable under the Loan Documents (any of such Loans are herein referred to as "Protective Advances"); that, the aggregate amount of Protective Advances outstanding at any time shall not (x) at any time exceed $15,000,000 or (y) when added to the total Credit Exposure, exceed the Total Commitment. Protective Advances may be made even if the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have not been satisfied. The Protective Advances shall be secured by the Liens in favor of the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) in and to the Collateral and shall constitute Borrower Obligations hereunder. All Protective Advances shall be ABR Borrowings. The Administrative Agent's authorization to make Protective Advances may be revoked at any time by the Required Lenders. Any such revocation must be in writing and shall become effective prospectively upon the Administrative Agent's receipt thereof. At any time that the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have been satisfied, the Administrative Agent may request the Revolving Lenders to make a
Protective Advances
provided
 
Revolving Loan to repay a Protective Advance. At any other time the Administrative Agent may require the Lenders to fund their risk participations described in Section 2.04(b).
(b) Upon the making of a Protective Advance by the Administrative Agent (whether before or after the occurrence of a Default), each Lender shall be deemed, without further action by any party hereto, to have unconditionally and irrevocably purchased from the Administrative Agent without recourse or warranty, an undivided interest and participation in such Protective Advance in proportion to its Applicable Percentage. From and after the date, if any, on which any Lender is required to fund its participation in any Protective Advance purchased hereunder, the Administrative Agent shall promptly distribute to such Lender, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of all payments of principal and interest and all proceeds of Collateral received by the Administrative Agent in respect of such Protective Advance.
SECTION 2.05 .
Swingline Loans
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Swingline Lender agrees to make Swingline Loans in Dollars to any Borrower from time to time during the Availability Period if, after giving effect thereto:
(i) the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Swingline Loans would not exceed $25,000,000; and
(ii) the sum of the total Credit Exposures would not exceed the lesser of (x) the Total Commitment and (y) the Borrowing Base;
(iii) provided that the Swingline Lender shall not be required to make a Swingline Loan to refinance an outstanding Swingline Loan. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrowers may borrow, prepay and reborrow Swingline Loans.
(b) To request a Swingline Loan, the Company (on behalf of itself or, if applicable, the relevant Borrower) or the relevant Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (confirmed by facsimile), not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the day of a proposed Swingline Loan. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify:
(i) the name of the relevant Borrower;
(ii) the date of the requested Swingline Loan (which shall be a Business Day);
(iii) the amount of such Swingline Loan; and
(iv) the location and number of such Borrower's account to which funds are to be disbursed. The Administrative Agent will promptly advise the Swingline Lender of any such notice received from the Company or the relevant Borrower. The Swingline Lender shall make each Swingline Loan available to the relevant Borrower in accordance with such request (or, in the case of a Swingline Loan made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.06(f), by remittance to the relevant
 
Issuing Lender) by 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on the requested date of such Swingline Loan.
(c) The Swingline Lender may by written notice given to the Administrative Agent not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on any Business Day require the Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of the Swingline Loans outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate amount of Swingline Loans in which Lenders will participate. Promptly upon receipt of such notice, the Administrative Agent will give notice thereof to each Lender, specifying in such notice such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Swingline Loans pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Swingline Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Company of any participations in any Swingline Loan acquired pursuant to this paragraph, and thereafter payments in respect of such Swingline Loan shall be made to the Administrative Agent and not to the Swingline Lender. Any amounts received by the Swingline Lender from the relevant Borrower (or other party on behalf of such Borrower) in respect of a Swingline Loan after receipt by the Swingline Lender of the proceeds of a sale of participations therein shall be promptly remitted to the Administrative Agent; any such amounts received by the Administrative Agent shall be promptly remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Lenders that shall have made their payments pursuant to this paragraph and to the Swingline Lender, as their interests may appear; that any such payment so remitted shall be repaid to the Swingline Lender or to the Administrative Agent, as applicable, if and to the extent such payment is required to be refunded to the relevant Borrower for any reason. The purchase of participations in a Swingline Loan pursuant to this paragraph shall not relieve the relevant Borrower of any default in the payment thereof.
mutatis mutandis
provided
(d) The Administrative Agent, on behalf of the Swingline Lender, shall request settlement (a "") with the Lenders on at least a weekly basis or on any earlier date that the Administrative Agent elects, by notifying the Lenders of such requested Settlement by facsimile, telephone, or e-mail no later than 12:00 noon New York City time on the date of such requested Settlement (the ""). Each Lender (other than the Swingline Lender, in the case of the Swingline Loans) shall transfer the amount of such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the outstanding principal amount of the applicable Loan with respect to which Settlement is requested to the Administrative Agent, to such account of the Administrative Agent as the Administrative Agent may designate, not later than 2:00 p.m., New York City time, on such Settlement Date. Settlements may occur during the existence of a Default and whether or not the applicable conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 have then been satisfied.
Settlement
Settlement Date
 
Such amounts transferred to the Administrative Agent shall be applied against the amounts of the Swingline Lender's Swingline Loans and, together with Swingline Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan, shall constitute Revolving Loans of such Lenders, respectively. If any such amount is not transferred to the Administrative Agent by any Lender on such Settlement Date, the Swingline Lender shall be entitled to recover such amount on demand from such Lender together with interest thereon as specified in Section 2.07.
SECTION 2.06 .
Letters of Credit
(a) . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, in addition to the Loans provided for herein, from time to time during the Availability Period, a Borrower may request any Issuing Lender to issue Letters of Credit denominated in Dollars or an Alternative Currency for the account of such Borrower. Each Letter of Credit shall be in such form as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the relevant Issuing Lender in its reasonable determination. Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including the Dollar Equivalent of Letters of Credit denominated in any Alternative Currency, shall constitute utilization of the Commitments.
General
(b) . To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), a Borrower shall deliver by hand or facsimile (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the relevant Issuing Lender of such Letter of Credit) to such Issuing Lender and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (d) of this Section), the amount and currency of such Letter of Credit, the name of the account party (which shall be a Borrower or a Subsidiary and a Borrower as co-applicants), the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If requested by such Issuing Lender, such Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on such Issuing Lender's standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by a Borrower to, or entered into by a Borrower with, any Issuing Lender relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal or Extension
(c) . A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the relevant Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the aggregate LC Exposure shall not exceed the LC Commitment, (ii) if denominated in any Alternative Currency, the aggregate LC Exposure in any Alternative Currency shall not exceed the Dollar Equivalent of $15,000,000, and (iii) the sum of the total Credit Exposures would not exceed the lesser of (x) the Borrowing Base and (y) the Total Commitment.
Limitations on Amounts
 
(d) . No Letter of Credit shall have a stated expiry date that is later than the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date twelve months after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, twelve months after the then-current expiration date of such Letter of Credit, so long as such renewal or extension occurs within three months of such then-current expiration date) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Commitment Termination Date; that any Letter of Credit may contain customary automatic renewal provisions agreed upon by the applicable Borrower and the applicable Issuing Lender pursuant to which the expiration date of such Letter of Credit shall automatically be extended for a period of up to 12 months (but not to a date later than the date set forth in clause (ii) above), subject to a right on the part of such Issuing Lender to prevent any such renewal from occurring by giving notice to the beneficiary in advance of any such renewal.
Expiration Date
provided
(e) . By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) by the Issuing Lender, and without any further action on the part of the Issuing Lender of such Letter of Credit or the Lenders, the Issuing Lender hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from such Issuing Lender a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations
In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each relevant Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees, upon receipt of a notice as provided for in the final paragraph of Section 2.06(f), to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the relevant Issuing Lender of each Letter of Credit such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the amount of each LC Disbursement, or the Dollar Equivalent of the amount of each LC Disbursement made in an Alternative Currency, made by such Issuing Lender promptly upon the request of such Issuing Lender at any time from the time of such LC Disbursement until such LC Disbursement is reimbursed by the relevant Borrower or at any time after any reimbursement payment is required to be refunded to such Borrower for any reason. Such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each such payment shall be made in the same manner as provided in Section 2.07 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.07 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the relevant Issuing Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the relevant Borrower pursuant to the next following paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to such Issuing Lender or, to the extent that the Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse such Issuing Lender, then to such Lenders and such Issuing Lender as their interests may appear. Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse an Issuing Lender for any LC Disbursement shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the relevant Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
mutatis mutandis
 
(f) . If an Issuing Lender shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the relevant Borrower shall reimburse such Issuing Lender in respect of such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the relevant Borrower receives notice that such LC Disbursement has been made, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the relevant Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time; that the relevant Borrower may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.03 or Section 2.05 that such payment be financed with all or any portion of a Revolving ABR Borrowing or a Swingline Loan, as applicable, in an amount permitted under Section 2.02(c) (in the event that such LC Disbursement was made in an Alternative Currency, such Borrowing Request shall be for the Dollar Equivalent of the amount of such LC Disbursement) and, to the extent so financed, the relevant Borrower's obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting Revolving ABR Borrowing or Swingline Loan (or the applicable portion thereof). Each such payment shall be made to the Issuing Lender in the currency in which such Letter of Credit is denominated (except that, in the case of any Letter of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency, in the event that such payment is not made to the Issuing Lender within three Business Days of the date of receipt by the relevant Borrower of such notice, upon notice by the Issuing Lender to the Borrower, such payment shall be made in Dollars, in an amount equal to the Dollar Equivalent of the amount of such payment) and in immediately available funds. Any conversion by the Issuing Lender of any payment to be made by a Borrower in respect of any Letter of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency into Dollars in accordance with this Section 2.06(f) shall be conclusive and binding upon such Borrower and the Lenders in the absence of manifest error; that upon the request of any Lender, the Issuing Lender shall provide to such Lender a certificate including reasonably detailed information as to the calculation of such conversion. If a Borrower's reimbursement of, or obligation to reimburse, any amounts in any Alternative Currency would subject the Administrative Agent, the applicable Issuing Lender or any Lender to any duty, charge or stamp duty, ad valorem charge or similar tax that would not be payable if such reimbursement were made or required to be made in Dollars, the Borrower shall pay the amount of any such duty, charge or tax requested by the Administrative Agent, the relevant Issuing Lender or Lender.
Reimbursement
provided
provided
If any Borrower fails to make payment when due in respect of any LC Disbursement relating to a Letter of Credit issued for its account, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from such Borrower and such Lender's Applicable Percentage thereof.
(g) . Each Borrower's obligations to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in Section 2.06(f) shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by any Issuing Lender under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply strictly with the terms of such Letter of Credit, (iv) at any time or from time to time,
Obligations Absolute
 
without notice to any Borrower or any other Person, the time for any performance of or compliance with any of such reimbursement obligations of any other Borrower shall be waived, extended or renewed, (v) any of such reimbursement obligations of any other Borrower shall be amended or otherwise modified in any respect, or the Guarantee of any of such reimbursement obligations or any security therefor shall be released, substituted or exchanged in whole or in part or otherwise dealt with, (vi) any lien or security interest granted to, or in favor of, the Administrative Agent or any of the Lenders as security for any of such reimbursement obligations shall fail to be perfected, (vii) the occurrence of any Default, (viii) the existence of any proceedings of the type described in Section 7(g) or (h) with respect to any other Loan Party, (ix) any lack of validity or enforceability of any of such reimbursement obligations against any other Loan Party, or (x) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the obligations of any Borrower hereunder.
Neither the Administrative Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Lenders, nor any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit by the Issuing Lender thereof or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the Issuing Lender of such Letter of Credit; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse such Issuing Lender from liability to any Borrower or to any Lender which has funded its participation hereunder in such Letter of Credit to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Loan Parties and the Lenders to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by any Borrower or any such Lender, as the case may be, that are caused by such Issuing Lender's failure to exercise the standard of care agreed hereunder to be applicable when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that such standard of care shall be as follows, and that such Issuing Lender shall be deemed to have exercised such standard of care in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct on its part (as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment):
provided
(i) an Issuing Lender of a Letter of Credit may accept documents that appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, and may make payment upon presentation of documents that appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit; and
(ii) an Issuing Lender of a Letter of Credit shall have the right, in its sole discretion, to decline to accept such documents and to make such payment if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
 
(h) . Upon presentation of documents with respect to a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit, each Issuing Lender in respect of such Letter of Credit shall (i) promptly notify the Administrative Agent, the Company and (if different) the relevant Borrower by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of such demand for payment, (ii) promptly following its receipt of such documents, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit and (iii) promptly after such examination notify the Administrative Agent, the Company and (if different) the relevant Borrower by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) whether the Issuing Lender has made or will make an LC Disbursement under such Letter of Credit; that any failure to give or delay in giving any such notice shall not relieve such Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such Issuing Lender and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures
provided
(i) . If any Issuing Lender shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the relevant Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to, but excluding, the date that such Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, (i) in the case of LC Disbursements made in Dollars, at the rate per annum then applicable to Revolving ABR Loans and (ii) in the case of LC Disbursements made in an Alternative Currency, at the overnight London interbank offered rate for the relevant Alternative Currency determined by the Administrative Agent in good faith plus the rate per annum then applicable to Eurocurrency Borrowings; that, if such Borrower fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to Section 2.06(f), then Section 2.13(c) shall apply. In the case of LC Disbursements made in an Alternative Currency, the amount of interest due with respect thereto shall be payable in the applicable Alternative Currency; that, if the Borrower's payment obligation with respect to a LC Disbursement made in an Alternative Currency has been converted pursuant to Section 2.06(f) into an obligation to pay the Dollar Equivalent of such amount, then interest payable thereon shall be payable in Dollars in the amount equal to the Dollar Equivalent thereof. Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of such Issuing Lender, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to Section 2.06(e) to reimburse such Issuing Lender shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
Interim Interest
provided
provided
(j) . An Issuing Lender may be added, or an existing Issuing Lender may be terminated, under this Agreement at any time by written agreement between the Company, the Administrative Agent and the relevant Issuing Lender. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such addition or termination. At the time any such termination shall become effective, the Borrowers shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the Issuing Lender being terminated pursuant to Section 2.12(b)(i). From and after the effective date of any such addition, the new Issuing Lender shall have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Lender under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued thereafter. References herein to the term "Issuing Lender" shall be deemed to refer to each new Issuing Lender or to any previous Issuing Lender, or to such new Issuing Lender and all previous Issuing Lenders, as the context shall require. After the termination of an Issuing Lender hereunder, the terminated Issuing Lender shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Lender under this Agreement with respect to any outstanding Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such
Additional Issuing Lenders; Termination of Issuing Lenders
 
termination, but shall not be required to issue any new Letters of Credit or to renew or extend any such outstanding Letters of Credit.
(k) . If (i) an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and the Company receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders (or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated, Lenders with LC Exposure representing more than 50% of the total LC Exposure) demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, (ii) the Early Maturity Date or the Accelerated Maturity Date occurs or (iii) any of the other provisions of this Agreement require cash collateralization, the Company shall immediately deposit into an account established and maintained on the books and records of the Administrative Agent, which account may be a "securities account" (within the meaning of Section 8-501 of the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect in the State of New York), in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Secured Parties (the ""), an amount in immediately available funds in Dollars equal to 105% of the LC Exposure as of such date any accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such amount shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default described in clause (h) or (i) of Article VII; , , that the portions of such amount attributable to undrawn Letters of Credit issued in an Alternative Currency shall be deposited in the relevant Alternative Currency. Such deposits shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the LC Exposure under this Agreement and for the payment and performance of the Secured Obligations, and for this purpose the Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over the LC Collateral Account, the LC Collateral Account shall be subject to a Deposit Account Control Agreement, as applicable, and each Borrower hereby grants a security interest to the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties in the LC Collateral Account and in any financial assets (as defined in the Uniform Commercial Code) or other property held therein. Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent (in accordance with its usual and customary practices for investments of this type) and at the Borrower's risk and reasonable expense, such deposits shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in the LC Collateral Account. Moneys and financial assets in the LC Collateral Account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the applicable Issuing Lender for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrowers for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of Lenders with LC Exposure representing more than 50% of the total LC Exposure), be applied to satisfy other Secured Obligations. The Administrative Agent shall cause all such cash collateral (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) to be returned to the Company within three Business Days after (A) in the case of clause (i) above, the applicable Event of Default shall have been cured or waived (so long as no other Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at such time) or (B) in the case of clause (ii) above, such cash collateral shall no longer be required pursuant to the applicable provision hereof.
Cash Collateralization
LC Collateral Account
plus
provided
provided
further
 
(l) . Each of the letters of credit listed on Schedule 2.06(l) shall automatically, and without any action on the part of any Person, be deemed a Letter of Credit issued and continued hereunder as of the Effective Date.
Existing Letters of Credit
(m) . The Administrative Agent shall determine the Dollar Equivalent of the LC Exposure with respect to Letters of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency as of the end of each fiscal quarter of the relevant Borrower. If after giving effect to any such determination of the Dollar Equivalent of such LC Exposure, the LC Exposure exceeds 105% of the LC Commitment, the Borrowers shall, within five Business Days of receipt of notice thereof from the Administrative Agent setting forth such calculation in reasonable detail, deposit cash collateral in the LC Collateral Account pursuant to Section 2.06 in an amount equal to such excess.
Dollar Equivalent Determination
(n) . Unless otherwise requested by the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender shall (i) provide to the Administrative Agent copies of any notice received from any Borrower pursuant to Section 2.06(b) no later than the Business Day after receipt thereof and (ii) report in writing to the Administrative Agent (A) on the first Business Day of each week, the activity for each day during the immediately preceding week in respect of Letters of Credit issued by it, including all issuances, extensions, amendments and renewals, all expirations and cancellations and all disbursements and reimbursements, (B) on or prior to each Business Day on which such Issuing Lender expects to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, the date of such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension, whether such Letter of Credit is a trade, financial or performance Letter of Credit, and the aggregate face amount of the Letters of Credit to be issued, amended, renewed or extended by it and outstanding after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (and whether the amount thereof changed), and no Issuing Lender shall be permitted to issue, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit without first obtaining written confirmation from the Administrative Agent that such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension is then permitted by the terms of this Agreement, (C) on each Business Day on which such Issuing Lender makes any LC Disbursement, the date of such LC Disbursement and the amount and currency of such LC Disbursement and (D) on any other Business Day, such other information as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request, including but not limited to prompt verification of such information as may be requested by the Administrative Agent.
Reporting
SECTION 2.07 .
Funding of Borrowings
(a) . Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 1:00 p.m., New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders; that Swingline Loans shall be made available as provided in Section 2.05. The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the relevant Borrower by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of such Borrower designated by such Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request; that (i) Revolving ABR Borrowings made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.06(f) shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the relevant Issuing Lender and (ii) a Protective Advance shall be retained by the Administrative Agent.
Funding by Lenders
provided
provided
 
(b) . Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the relevant Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the relevant Lender and the Borrowers agree (jointly and severally with each other Borrower, but severally and not jointly with the applicable Lenders) to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to such Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or (ii) in the case of such Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing. With respect to any share of a Borrowing not made available by a Lender as contemplated above, if such Lender subsequently pays its share of such Borrowing to the Administrative Agent, then the Administrative Agent shall promptly repay any corresponding amount paid by the relevant Borrower to the Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph (including interest thereon to the extent received by the Administrative Agent); that such repayment to such Borrower shall not operate as a waiver or any abandonment of any rights or remedies of such Borrower with respect to such Lender.
Presumption by the Administrative Agent
provided
SECTION 2.08 .
Interest Elections
(a) . The Loans constituting each Revolving Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request. Thereafter, the relevant Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a Borrowing of a different Type or to continue such Borrowing as a Borrowing of the same Type and, in the case of a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing, may elect the Interest Period therefor, all as provided in this Section. A Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the relevant Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing. This Section shall not apply to Swingline Borrowings or Protective Advances, which may not be converted or continued.
Elections by the Borrowers for Revolving Borrowings
(b) . To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Company (on behalf of itself or the relevant Borrower) or the relevant Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if such Borrower were requesting a Revolving Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election. Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Company (on behalf of itself or the relevant Borrower) or the relevant Borrower.
Notice of Elections
 
(c) . Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
Content of Interest Election Requests
(i) the Borrower and the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) of this paragraph shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
(ii) the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
(iii) whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurocurrency Borrowing; and
(iv) if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurocurrency Borrowing, the Interest Period therefor after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period" and permitted under Section 2.02(d).
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurocurrency Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrowers shall be deemed to have requested an ABR Borrowing.
(d) . Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lender's portion of each resulting Borrowing.
Notice by the Administrative Agent to the Lenders
(e) . If the Company or the relevant Subsidiary Borrower fails to deliver a timely and complete Interest Election Request with respect to a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing by a Borrower prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Company and the relevant Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (A) no outstanding Revolving Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing and (B) unless repaid, each Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
Failure to Elect; Events of Default
SECTION 2.09 .
Termination and Reduction of the Commitments
(a) . Unless previously terminated, the Commitments shall terminate on the Commitment Termination Date.
Scheduled Termination
(b) . The Company may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Commitments; that (i) each reduction of the Commitments shall be in an amount that is $25,000,000 or a larger multiple of $5,000,000; and (ii) the Company shall not terminate or reduce the Commitments if, after giving effect to any
Voluntary Termination or Reduction
provided
 
concurrent prepayment of the Revolving Loans in accordance with Section 2.11, the sum of the Credit Exposures would exceed the lesser of (x) the Total Commitment and (y) the Borrowing Base.
(c) . The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Company pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Commitments delivered by the Company may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Company (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied.
Notice of Voluntary Termination or Reduction
provided
(d) . Any termination or reduction of the Commitments shall be permanent. Each reduction of the Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments.
Effect of Termination or Reduction
SECTION 2.10 .
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt
(a) .
Repayment
(i) The Borrowers hereby unconditionally promise to pay to the Administrative Agent (i) for the account of the Lenders the outstanding principal amount of the Revolving Loans on the Commitment Termination Date and (ii) the then unpaid amount of each Protective Advance on the earlier of the Commitment Termination Date and demand by the Administrative Agent.
(ii) Each Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the Swingline Lender the outstanding amount of each Swingline Loan made to such Borrower on the earlier of the Commitment Termination Date and the fifth Business Day after such Swingline Loan is made; that on each date that a Revolving Borrowing is made to the Company or any Subsidiary Borrower, the Company or such Subsidiary Borrower, as applicable, shall repay all Swingline Loans made to it then outstanding.
provided
(b) . During any Cash Dominion Period, on each Business Day, the Administrative Agent shall apply all funds credited to any applicable Collection Account as of 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such Business Day (whether or not immediately available) to prepay any Protective Advances that may be outstanding, pro rata, and to prepay the Revolving Loans (including Swingline Loans) (without a corresponding reduction in Commitments) and to cash collateralize outstanding LC Exposure.
Cash Dominion
first
second
(c) . Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice records evidencing the indebtedness of each Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender to such Borrower, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
Maintenance of Records by Lenders
 
(d) . The Administrative Agent shall maintain records in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Class and Type thereof and each Interest Period therefor, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from each Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the relevant Lenders and each such Lender's share thereof.
Maintenance of Records by the Administrative Agent
(e) . The entries made in the records maintained pursuant to paragraph (c) or (d) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such records or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the relevant Borrower to repay the Loans made to such Borrower in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Effect of Entries
prima facie
provided
(f) . Any Lender may request that Loans made by it to any Borrower be evidenced by a promissory note. In such event, the relevant Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to such Lender and its registered assigns and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent. Thereafter, the Loans to such Borrower evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 10.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to such payee and its registered assigns.
Promissory Notes
SECTION 2.11 .
Prepayment of Loans
(a) . Each Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to the requirements of this Section.
Optional Prepayments
(b) .
Mandatory Prepayments
(i) In the event and on such occasion that:
(A) the Credit Exposure of any Lender exceeds such Lender's Commitment; or
(B) the sum of the total Credit Exposures (including the Dollar Equivalent of any LC Exposure with respect to a Letter of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency) exceeds the lesser of (x) the Total Commitment or (y) the Borrowing Base;
the Borrowers shall promptly prepay the Revolving Loans and/or Swingline Loans in an aggregate amount equal to such excess; that if the aggregate principal amount of Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans then outstanding is less than the amount of such excess (because LC Exposure constitutes a portion thereof), the Borrowers shall, to the extent of the balance of such excess, deposit an amount in cash in the LC Collateral Account. If the Borrowers are required to provide (and have provided the required amount of) cash collateral pursuant to this Section 2.11(b) and such excess is subsequently reduced, cash collateral in an amount equal to the lesser of (x) any such reduction and (b) the amount of such cash collateral
provided
 
(to the extent not applied as set forth in Section 2.06(k)) shall be returned to the Borrowers within two Business Days after any such reduction.
(ii) . In the event and on each occasion that, during any Cash Dominion Period, any Net Proceeds are received by or on behalf of any Loan Party in respect of any Prepayment Event, the Borrowers shall, immediately after such Net Proceeds are received by any Loan Party, prepay the Borrower Obligations as set forth in Section 2.11(c) below in an aggregate amount equal to 100% of such Net Proceeds.
Prepayment Event
(c) All such amounts pursuant to Section 2.11(b) shall be applied to prepay the Revolving Loans (including Swingline Loans) without a corresponding reduction in the Total Commitment and to cash collateralize outstanding LC Exposure.
(d)  The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent (and, in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of any prepayment hereunder:
Notices, Etc.
(i) in the case of prepayment of a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment;
(ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 9:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of prepayment; or
(iii) in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, not later than 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date of prepayment.
Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date, the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid and, in the case of a mandatory prepayment, a reasonably detailed calculation of the amount of such prepayment; that, if a notice of prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Commitments as contemplated by Section 2.09, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with Section 2.09. Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Revolving Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of a Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02, except as necessary to apply fully the required amount of a mandatory prepayment. Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.13 and shall be made in the manner specified in Section 2.18(a).
provided
SECTION 2.12 .
Fees
(a) . The Borrowers agree to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Commitment Fee Rate on the average daily amount of the Available Revolving Commitment of such Lender during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the Commitment Termination Date. Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on each Quarterly Date and on the Commitment Termination Date, commencing on the first such date to
Commitment Fee
 
occur after the date hereof. All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
(b) . The Company agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the Applicable Rate applicable to Eurocurrency Loans on the average daily amount of such Lender's LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lender's Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure.
Letter of Credit Fees
(i) The relevant Borrower with respect to each Letter of Credit agrees to pay to the Issuing Lender of such Letter of Credit (A) a fronting fee, which shall accrue at a rate per annum equal to 0.25% , or such other rate as agreed between the Company and the relevant Issuing Lender, of the average daily amount of the LC Exposure with respect to such Letter of Credit (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the date of issuance of such Letter of Credit to but excluding the date on which there ceases to be any such LC Exposure under such Letter of Credit and (B) such Issuing Lender's standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder.
(ii) Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of each calendar quarter shall be payable on the third Business Day following such last day, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date; that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. Any other fees payable to any Issuing Lender pursuant to clause (B) of paragraph (b)(i) above shall be payable at the times separately agreed upon between the Company or the relevant Borrower and such Issuing Lender or otherwise within 10 days after demand. All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
provided
(c) . The Company agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees payable in the amounts and at the times separately agreed upon between the Company and the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Agent Fees
(d) . All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in Dollars and immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the relevant Issuing Lender, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders entitled thereto. Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
Payment of Fees
 
SECTION 2.13 .
Interest
(a) . The Loans constituting each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan and each Protective Advance) shall bear interest at a rate per annum equal to the Alternate Base Rate the Applicable Rate.
ABR Loans
plus
(b) . The Loans comprising each Eurocurrency Borrowing shall bear interest at a rate per annum equal to the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing the Applicable Rate.
Eurocurrency Loans
plus
(c) . Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by any Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration, by mandatory prepayment or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided above or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% the rate applicable to ABR Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
Default Interest
plus
plus
(d) . Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and upon termination of the Commitments; that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of a Revolving ABR Loan prior to the Commitment Termination Date), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Borrowing shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
Payment of Interest
provided
(e) . All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). The applicable Alternate Base Rate, Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate or Eurocurrency Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Computation
SECTION 2.14 . If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for any Eurocurrency Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest
(a) the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that (i) adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for such Interest Period or (ii) the making of any Eurocurrency Borrowing would be illegal or conflict with any Requirement of Law; or
(b) the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect
 
the cost to such Lenders (or Lender) of making or maintaining their respective Loans (or its Loan) included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders by telephone or facsimile as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Company and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Revolving Borrowing to, or the continuation of any Revolving Borrowing as, a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing shall be ineffective and such Revolving Borrowing (unless prepaid) shall be continued as, or converted to, a Revolving ABR Borrowing, (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as a Revolving ABR Borrowing and (iii) in the case of clause (a)(ii) above, the Administrative Agent shall have the option to convert any outstanding Revolving Eurocurrency Borrowings into Revolving ABR Borrowings regardless of whether the conditions in Section 4.02 have been satisfied or waived.
SECTION 2.15 .
Increased Costs
(a) . If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs Generally
(i) impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate) or any Issuing Lender; or
(ii) impose on any Lender or any Issuing Lender or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement or Eurocurrency Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining any Eurocurrency Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan) or to increase the cost to such Lender or such Issuing Lender of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or such Issuing Lender hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Company will pay to such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
(b) . If any Lender or any Issuing Lender determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or such Issuing Lender's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or such Issuing Lender's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Lender, to a level below that which such Lender or such Issuing Lender or such Lender's or such Issuing Lender's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or such Issuing Lender's policies and the policies of such Lender's or such Issuing Lender's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Company will pay to such Lender or such Issuing
Capital Requirements
 
Lender, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Issuing Lender or such Lender's or such Issuing Lender's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
(c) . A certificate of a Lender or an Issuing Lender setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or such Issuing Lender or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section shall be delivered to the Company and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Company shall pay such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
Certificates from Lenders
(d) . Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or any Issuing Lender to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or such Issuing Lender's right to demand such compensation; that the Company shall not be required to compensate a Lender or an Issuing Lender pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than six months prior to the date that such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, notifies the Company of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lender's or such Issuing Lender's intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the six-month period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
Delay in Requests
provided
provided further
(e) . Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith shall be deemed to be a Change in Law, regardless of the date enacted, adopted or issued.
Dodd-Frank Act
SECTION 2.16 . In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurocurrency Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Revolving Eurocurrency Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Eurocurrency Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice is permitted to be revocable under Section 2.11(d) and is revoked in accordance therewith) or (d) the assignment as a result of a request by the Company pursuant to Section 2.19(b) of any Revolving Eurocurrency Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, the Company shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. In the case of a Eurocurrency Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender attributable to any such event shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be equal to the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest that such Lender would pay for a deposit equal to the principal amount of such Loan for the period from the date of such payment, conversion, failure or assignment to the last day of the then current Interest Period for such Loan (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, the duration of the Interest Period that would have resulted from such borrowing, conversion or continuation) if the interest rate payable on such deposit were equal to the Adjusted Eurocurrency Rate for such Interest Period, over (ii) the amount of interest that such Lender would earn on such principal amount for such period if such Lender were to invest such principal amount for such period at the interest rate that would be bid
Break Funding Payments
 
by such Lender (or an Affiliate of such Lender) for deposits denominated in Dollars from other banks in the eurocurrency market at the commencement of such period. A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be delivered to the Company and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Company shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
SECTION 2.17 .
Taxes
(a) . Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party hereunder or under any other Loan Document (including, for these purposes, any such payment made by the Administrative Agent) shall be made free and clear of and without deduction or withholding for any Indemnified Taxes; that if any Indemnified Taxes are required to be withheld or deducted from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, a Lender (or with respect to a Lender treated as a partnership for U.S. federal income tax purposes its direct or indirect partners) or an Issuing Lender (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) such Loan Party shall make such deductions and (iii) such Loan Party shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Payments Free of Taxes
provided
(b) . In addition, the Loan Parties shall timely pay, or at the option of the Administrative Agent, timely reimburse it for the payment of, any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Payment of Other Taxes
(c) . Without duplication of the obligations of each Loan Party pursuant to Section 2.17(a) or (b), each Loan Party shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and each Issuing Lender, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes (including Indemnified Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, and any penalties, interest and reasonable out-of-pocket expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority, in each case on or with respect to payments by or on account of any obligations of any Loan Party hereunder or under any other Loan Document. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to any Loan Party by a Lender or an Issuing Lender, or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or an Issuing Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Indemnification of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders
(d) . As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes by a Loan Party to a Governmental Authority, such Loan Party shall deliver to the Administrative Agent for its own account, the account of the relevant Lender or the relevant Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Evidence of Payments
 
(e) . Each Lender and Issuing Lender shall, within 10 days after demand therefor, indemnify the Administrative Agent for the full amount of any Taxes and indemnify each Loan Party for the full amount of any Excluded Taxes, in each case, attributable to such Lender that are payable or paid by the Administrative Agent or such Loan Party, as the case may be, and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to any Lender by the Administrative Agent or any Loan Party shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Indemnification of the Administrative Agent and the Loan Parties
(f) . Any Non-U.S. Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of any applicable withholding tax with respect to payments hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall deliver to the relevant Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate of withholding. In addition, any Non-U.S. Lender, if requested by a Borrower or the Administrative Agent, shall deliver such other documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent as will enable the Borrower or the Administrative Agent to determine whether or not such Lender is subject to backup withholding or information reporting requirements. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the preceding two sentences, in the case of any withholding tax other than U.S. federal withholding tax, the completion, execution and submission of such forms shall not be required if in the Non-U.S. Lender's reasonable judgment such completion, execution or submission would subject such Non-U.S. Lender to any material unreimbursed cost or expense or would materially prejudice the legal or commercial position of such Non-U.S. Lender.
Non-U.S. Lenders
Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, any Non-U.S. Lender shall, to the extent it is legally entitled to do so, deliver to the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Non-U.S. Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the request of a Borrower or the Administrative Agent), whichever of the following is applicable:
(i) duly completed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8BEN claiming eligibility for benefits of an income tax treaty to which the United States of America is a party,
(ii) duly completed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8ECI,
(iii) in the case of a Non-U.S. Lender claiming the benefits of the exemption for portfolio interest under section 881(c) of the Code, (x) a certificate substantially in the Form of Exhibit H to the effect that (i) such Non-U.S. Lender is not (A) a "bank" within the meaning of section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, (B) a "10 percent shareholder" of any Borrower within the meaning of section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code, and (C) a "controlled foreign corporation" described in section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code, and (ii) the interest payments in question are not effectively connected with the United States trade or
 
business conducted by such Lender (a "") and (y) duly completed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W-8BEN,
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
(iv) to the extent a Non-U.S. Lender is not the beneficial owner (for example, where the Non-U.S. Lender is a partnership or participating Lender granting a typical participation), an Internal Revenue Service Form W-8IMY, accompanied by a Form W-8ECI, W-8BEN, U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate, Form W-9, and/or other certification documents from each beneficial owner, as applicable; that, if the Non-U.S. Lender is a partnership (and not a participating Lender) and one or more beneficial owners of such Non-U.S. Lender are claiming the portfolio interest exemption, such Non-U.S. Lender may provide a U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate on behalf of each such beneficial owner,
provided
(v) any other form prescribed by applicable law as a basis for claiming exemption from or a reduction in U.S. federal withholding tax duly completed together with such supplementary documentation as may be prescribed by applicable law to permit the Borrowers to determine the withholding or deduction required to be made, or
(vi) If a payment made to a Non-U.S. Lender under any Loan Document would be subject to U.S. federal withholding Tax imposed by FATCA if such Non-U.S. Lender were to fail to comply with the applicable reporting requirements of FATCA (including those contained in Section 1471(b) or 1472(b) of the Code, as applicable), such Lender shall deliver to the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent at the time or times prescribed by law and at such time or times reasonably requested by a Borrower or the Administrative Agent such documentation prescribed by applicable law (including as prescribed by Section 1471(b)(3)(C)(i) of the Code) and such additional documentation reasonably requested by a Borrower or the Administrative Agent as may be necessary for the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent to comply with their obligations under FATCA and to determine that such Lender has complied with such Lender's obligations under FATCA or to determine the amount to deduct and withhold from such payment. Solely for purposes of this Section 2.17(f), the term "FATCA" shall include any amendments made to FATCA after the date of this Agreement.
Each Lender agrees that if any form or certification it previously delivered expires or becomes obsolete or inaccurate in any respect, it shall update such form or certification or promptly notify Borrower and the Administrative Agent in writing of its legal inability to do so.
In the event the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender shall become subject to Taxes because of its failure to deliver a form required under this Section, the Company (and, if applicable, the relevant Loan Party) shall take such steps as the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or such Lender, as the case may be, shall reasonably request to assist it to recover such Taxes; that, in the reasonable judgment of the Company (or such Loan Party), such steps shall not subject the Company (or such Loan Party) to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to the Company (or such Loan Party) in any material respect.
provided
 
(g) . If the Administrative Agent, a Lender or an Issuing Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Indemnified Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by any Loan Party or with respect to which any Loan Party has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section, it shall pay over such refund to such Loan Party (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by such Loan Party under this Section with respect to the Indemnified Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); that such Loan Party, upon the request of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to such Loan Party (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Lender in the event the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. This Section shall not be construed to require the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its Taxes that it deems confidential) to any Loan Party or any other Person.
Refunds
provided
(h) . The agreements in this Section shall survive the termination of this Agreement and the payment of the Loans and all other amounts payable hereunder.
Survival
SECTION 2.18
Payments Generally; Allocation of Proceeds; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs.
(a) . (i) Each Loan Party shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or under Section 2.15, 2.16 or 2.17, or otherwise) or under any other Loan Document (except to the extent otherwise provided therein) on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim. Any amounts received after 12:00 noon, New York City time on any such due date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at the Administrative Agent's Account, except as otherwise expressly provided in the relevant Loan Document and except payments to be made directly to an Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender as expressly provided herein and payments pursuant to Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 10.03, which shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment hereunder shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. At all times during a Cash Dominion Period, solely for purposes of determining the amount of Loans available for borrowing purposes, checks (in addition to immediately available funds applied pursuant to Section 2.10(b)) from collections of items of payment and proceeds of any Collateral shall be applied in whole or in part against the Borrower Obligations, on the Business Day after receipt, subject to actual collection.
Payments by Loan Parties
 
(ii) Prior to any repayment of any Borrowings hereunder (other than the repayment in full of all outstanding Borrowings on the scheduled date of such repayment), the Borrowers shall select the Borrowing or Borrowings to be paid and shall notify the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of such selection not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the scheduled date of such repayment; that each repayment of Borrowings shall be applied to repay any outstanding ABR Borrowings before any other Borrowings. If a Borrower fails to make a timely selection of the Borrowing or Borrowings to be repaid (in accordance with the immediately preceding sentence) or prepaid (in accordance with Section 2.11(d)), such payment shall be applied, first, to pay any outstanding ABR Borrowings and, second, to other Borrowings in the order of the remaining duration of their respective Interest Periods (the Borrowing with the shortest remaining Interest Period to be repaid first). Each repayment or prepayment of a Revolving Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in such Borrowing.
provided
(iii) All amounts owing under this Agreement are payable in Dollars, except as expressly provided for herein.
(b) Any proceeds of Collateral or any other amounts received by the Administrative Agent (i) not constituting either (A) a specific payment of principal, interest, fees or other sum payable under the Loan Documents (which shall be applied as set forth herein), (B) a mandatory prepayment (which shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.11) or (C) amounts to be applied from the Collection Account during a Cash Dominion Period (which shall be applied in accordance with Section 2.10(b)) or (ii) after an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent so elects or the Required Lenders so direct shall be applied ratably , to pay any fees, indemnities, or expense reimbursements including amounts then due to the Administrative Agent and any Issuing Lender from the Borrowers (other than in connection with Banking Services Obligations, Swap Obligations or Pari Swap Obligations), , to pay any fees, indemnities or expense reimbursements then due to the Lenders from the Borrowers (other than in connection with Banking Services Obligations, Swap Obligations or Pari Swap Obligations), , to pay interest due in respect of the Protective Advances, , to pay the principal of the Protective Advances, , to pay interest then due and payable on the Loans (other than the Protective Advances) or unreimbursed LC Disbursements ratably, , to prepay principal on the Loans (other than the Protective Advances), unreimbursed LC Disbursements and Pari Swap Obligations (in an amount not to exceed the Swap Reserve then in effect) ratably, , to pay an amount to the Administrative Agent equal to one hundred five percent (105%) of the aggregate undrawn face amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit and the aggregate amount of any unpaid LC Disbursements, to be held as cash collateral for such Obligations, , to payment of any amounts owing with respect to Banking Services and Swap Obligations that are Secured Obligations, and , to the payment of any other Secured Obligation due to the Administrative Agent or any Lender by the BorrowersNotwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, unless so directed by the Company, or unless a Default is in existence, neither the Administrative Agent nor any Lender shall apply any payment which it receives to any Eurocurrency Loan, except (x) on the expiration date of the Interest Period applicable to any such Eurocurrency Loan or (y) in the event, and only to the extent, that there are no outstanding ABR Loans of the same Class and, in any such event, the
first
second
third
fourth
fifth
sixth
seventh
eighth
ninth
.
 
Borrowers shall pay the break funding payment required in accordance with Section 2.16. The Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall have the continuing and exclusive right to apply and reverse and reapply any and all such proceeds and payments to any portion of the Secured Obligations.
(c) . Except to the extent otherwise provided herein: (i) subject to Section 2.03(c), each Revolving Borrowing shall be made from the relevant Lenders and each termination or reduction of the amount of the Commitments under Section 2.09 shall be applied to the respective Commitments of the Lenders, pro rata according to the amounts of their respective Commitments; (ii) each Revolving Borrowing shall be allocated pro rata among the relevant Lenders to such Borrower according to the amounts of their respective Commitments (in the case of the making of Revolving Loans) or their respective Loans that are to be included in such Borrowing (in the case of conversions and continuations of Loans); (iii) each payment or prepayment of principal of Revolving Loans by a Borrower shall be made for the account of the relevant Lenders pro rata in accordance with the respective unpaid principal amounts of the Revolving Loans made to such Borrower held by them; (iv) each payment of interest on Revolving Loans by a Borrower shall be made for the account of the relevant Lenders pro rata in accordance with the amounts of interest on such Loans then due and payable to the respective Lenders and (v) each payment of commitment fees under Section 2.12 shall be made for the account of the Lenders pro rata in accordance with the amounts of commitment fees then due and payable to the respective Lenders.
Pro Rata Treatment
(d) . If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Revolving Loans or participations in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans and accrued interest thereon then due than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by any Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to any Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply). Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against such Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
Sharing of Payments by Lenders
provided
 
(e) . Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Company or the relevant Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of a Lender or an Issuing Lender hereunder that the Company, such Borrower as the case may be, will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Company or such Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to such Lender or such Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if the Company or such Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the relevant Lenders or the relevant Issuing Lender, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or such Issuing Lender with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the Federal Funds Effective Rate.
Presumptions of Payment
(f) . If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.06(e), 2.07(a) or 2.18(e), then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lender's obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid.
Certain Deductions by the Administrative Agent
SECTION 2.19 .
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders
(a) . If any Lender or any Issuing Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if any Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender or any Issuing Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, then such Lender or such Issuing Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans, LC Disbursements or participations in LC Disbursements hereunder (as applicable) or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or Affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender or such Issuing Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.15 or 2.17, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) would not subject such Lender or such Issuing Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender or such Issuing Lender; provided that, upon any such change in any lending office or assignment, such Lender or such Issuing Lender shall provide or cause to be delivered to the Administrative Agent and the Company (and, if applicable, the relevant Subsidiary Borrower) the appropriate forms specified in and to the extent by Section 2.17. The Company hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender or any Issuing Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Designation of a Different Lending Office
(b) . If any Lender or any Issuing Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, if any Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender, any Issuing Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender or any Issuing Lender pursuant to Section 2.17 or if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the Company may, at its sole expense and effort, require such Lender or such Issuing Lender (each a ""), upon notice to such Departing Lender and
Replacement of Lenders or Issuing Lenders
Departing Lender
 
the Administrative Agent, to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 10.04), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender or another Issuing Lender, if a Lender or Issuing Lender accepts such assignment); that (i) the Company shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender and the Swingline Lender (which consent in each case shall not unreasonably be withheld), (ii) the Departing Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans, LC Disbursements and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans (as applicable), accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the relevant Borrower (in the case of all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.15 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.17, such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments. A Departing Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or such Issuing Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Company to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
provided
SECTION 2.20 . If after receipt of any payment which is applied to the payment of all or any part of the Borrower Obligations, the Administrative Agent or any Lender is for any reason compelled to surrender such payment or proceeds to any Person because such payment or application of proceeds is invalidated, declared fraudulent, set aside, determined to be void or voidable as a preference, impermissible setoff, or a diversion of trust funds, or for any other reason, then the Borrower Obligations or part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued and this Agreement shall continue in full force as if such payment or proceeds had not been received by the Administrative Agent or such Lender. The provisions of this Section 2.20 shall be and remain effective notwithstanding any contrary action which may have been taken by the Administrative Agent or any Lender in reliance upon such payment or application of proceeds. The provisions of this Section 2.20 shall survive the termination of this Agreement.
Returned Payments
SECTION 2.21 .
Designation of Subsidiary Borrowers
(a) . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Section (including paragraph (b) of this Section), the Company may, at any time or from time to time upon not less than 20 Business Days' notice to the Administrative Agent (or such other period which is acceptable to the Administrative Agent), request that a wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary specified in such notice become a party to this Agreement as a Subsidiary Borrower; that each such designation shall be subject to the prior approval of the Administrative Agent (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld). The Administrative Agent shall upon receipt of such notice from the Company promptly notify each Lender of the Company's designation. Upon such approval and the satisfaction of the conditions specified in paragraph (b) of this Section, such Subsidiary shall become a party to this Agreement as a Subsidiary Borrower and entitled to borrow Loans on and subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the Lenders of such designation.
Designation of Subsidiary Borrowers
provided
 
(b) . The designation by the Company of any wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary as a Subsidiary Borrower hereunder shall not become effective until the date on which the Administrative Agent shall have received each of the following documents (each of which shall be in satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in form and substance):
Conditions Precedent to Designation Effectiveness
(i) . A Designation Letter, duly completed and executed by the Company and the relevant Subsidiary, delivered to the Administrative Agent at least 5 Business Days before the date on which such Subsidiary is proposed to become a Subsidiary Borrower;
Designation Letter
(ii) . If requested by the Administrative Agent, a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and dated the date of the related Designation Letter) of counsel to such Subsidiary satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in the jurisdiction in which such Subsidiary is organized (the ""), (and the Company and such Subsidiary Borrower hereby and by delivery of such Designation Letter instruct such counsel to deliver such opinion to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent, if such opinion is so requested), as to such other matters as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request (which may include the due incorporation of such Subsidiary under the laws of the Relevant Jurisdiction, the due authorization, execution and delivery by such Subsidiary of such Designation Letter and of any Borrowings to be made by it hereunder, the obtaining of all licenses, approvals and consents of, and the making of all filings and registrations with, any applicable Governmental Authority required in connection therewith (or the absence of any thereof), and the legality, validity and binding effect and enforceability thereof);
Opinion of Counsel
Relevant Jurisdiction
(iii) . Such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request (including certified copies of the organizational documents of such Subsidiary and of resolutions of its board of directors authorizing such Subsidiary Borrower becoming a Borrower hereunder, and of all documents evidencing all other necessary corporate or other action required with respect to such Subsidiary Borrower becoming party to this Agreement);
Corporate Documents
(iv) . Receipt of such other documents relating thereto as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request, which may include other documents that are consistent with conditions for Subsidiary Borrowers set forth in Section 4.01.
Other Documents
(c) . The Company may, at any time at which no Loans or any other amounts hereunder or under any other Loan Documents shall be outstanding to any Subsidiary Borrower, terminate such Subsidiary Borrower as a Borrower hereunder by delivering an executed notice thereof (each a ""), substantially in the form of Exhibit E, to the Administrative Agent (it being understood and agreed that any such termination shall not affect any obligations such Subsidiary Borrower may have as a Guarantor hereunder). Any Termination Letter furnished hereunder shall be effective upon receipt thereof by the Administrative Agent (which shall promptly so notify the relevant Lenders and Issuing Lenders (as applicable)) and all commitments of the relevant Lenders to make Loans
Termination of Subsidiary Borrowers
Termination Letter
 
to such Subsidiary Borrower and all of rights of such Subsidiary Borrower hereunder shall terminate and such Subsidiary Borrower shall immediately cease to be a Borrower hereunder. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the delivery of a Termination Letter with respect to any Subsidiary Borrower shall not terminate (i) for the avoidance of doubt, any obligation of such Subsidiary Borrower that remains unpaid at the time of such delivery (including any obligation arising thereafter in respect of such Subsidiary Borrower under Section 2.17) or (ii) the obligations of any other Loan Party under Article IX with respect to any such unpaid obligations.
SECTION 2.22 Defaulting Lenders. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the following provisions shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender:
(a) fees shall cease to accrue on the unfunded portion of the Commitment of such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.12(a);
(b) the Commitments and Credit Exposure of such Defaulting Lender shall not be included in determining whether all Lenders or the Required Lenders have taken or may take any action hereunder (including any consent to any amendment or waiver pursuant to Section 10.02), provided that any waiver, amendment or modification requiring the consent of all Lenders or each affected Lender which affects such Defaulting Lender differently than other affected Lenders shall require the consent of such Defaulting Lender;
(c) if any Swingline Exposure, LC Exposure or Protective Advance Exposure exists at the time a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender then:
(i) all or any part of such Swingline Exposure, LC Exposure and Protective Advance Exposure shall be reallocated among the non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages but only to the extent (x) the sum of the outstanding principal amount of all non-Defaulting Lenders' Revolving Loans plus such Defaulting Lender's Swingline Exposure, LC Exposure and Protective Advance Exposure does not exceed the total of all non-Defaulting Lenders' Commitments and (y) the conditions set forth in Section 4.02 are satisfied at such time; and
(ii) if the reallocation described in clause (i) above cannot, or can only partially, be effected, the Borrowers shall within one Business Day following notice by the Administrative Agent (x) first, prepay such Swingline Exposure and Protective Advance Exposure, ratably, and (y) second, cash collateralize such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure (after giving effect to any partial reallocation pursuant to clause (i) above) in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.06(k) for so long as such LC Exposure is outstanding;
(iii) if the Borrowers cash collateralize any portion of such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure pursuant to Section 2.22(c), the Borrowers shall not be required to pay any fees to such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.12(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure during the period such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is cash collateralized;
 
(iv) if the LC Exposure of the non-Defaulting Lenders is reallocated pursuant to Section 2.22(c), then the fees payable to the Lenders pursuant to Section 2.12(a) and Section 2.12(b) shall be adjusted in accordance with such non-Defaulting Lenders' Applicable Percentages; or
(v) if any Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is neither cash collateralized nor reallocated pursuant to Section 2.22(c), then, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of the Issuing Lender or any Lender hereunder, all facility fees that otherwise would have been payable to such Defaulting Lender (solely with respect to the portion of such Defaulting Lender's Commitment that was utilized by such LC Exposure) and letter of credit fees payable under Section 2.12(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure shall be payable to the Issuing Lender until such LC Exposure is cash collateralized and/or reallocated;
(d) so long as any Lender is a Defaulting Lender, the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loan and the Issuing Lender shall not be required to issue, amend or increase any Letter of Credit, unless it is satisfied that the related exposure will be 100% covered by the Commitments of the non-Defaulting Lenders and/or cash collateral will be provided by the Borrowers in accordance with Section 2.22(c), and participating interests in any such newly issued or increased Letter of Credit or newly made Swingline Loan shall be allocated among non-Defaulting Lenders in a manner consistent with Section 2.22(c)(i) and in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages (and Defaulting Lenders shall not participate therein); and
(e) any amount payable to such Defaulting Lender hereunder (whether on account of principal, interest, fees or otherwise and including any amount that would otherwise be payable to such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.18(d) but excluding Section 2.19) shall, in lieu of being distributed to such Defaulting Lender, be retained by the Administrative Agent in a segregated account and, subject to any applicable requirements of law, be applied at such time or times as may be determined by the Administrative Agent (i) first, to the payment of any amounts owing by such Defaulting Lender to the Administrative Agent hereunder, (ii) second, pro rata, to the payment of any amounts owing by such Defaulting Lender to the Issuing Lender or Swingline Lender hereunder, (iii) third, if so determined by the Administrative Agent or requested by an Issuing Lender or Swingline Lender, held in such account as cash collateral for future funding obligations of the Defaulting Lender in respect of any existing or future participating interest in any Swingline Loan or Letter of Credit, (iv) fourth, to the funding of any Loan in respect of which such Defaulting Lender has failed to fund its portion thereof as required by this Agreement, as determined by the Administrative Agent, (v) fifth, if so determined by the Administrative Agent and the Company, held in such account as cash collateral for future funding obligations of the Defaulting Lender in respect of any Loans under this Agreement, (vi) sixth, to the payment of any amounts owing to the Lenders or an Issuing Lender or Swingline Lender as a result of any judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction obtained by any Lender or such Issuing Lender or Swingline Lender against such Defaulting Lender as a result of such Defaulting Lender's breach of its obligations under this Agreement, (vii) seventh, to the payment of any amounts owing to any Borrower as a result of any judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction obtained by any Borrower against such Defaulting Lender as a result of such Defaulting Lender's breach of its obligations under this Agreement, and (viii) eighth, to such
 
Defaulting Lender or as otherwise directed by a court of competent jurisdiction, provided, with respect to this clause (viii), that if such payment is (x) a prepayment of the principal amount of any Loans or reimbursement obligations in respect of LC Disbursements which a Defaulting Lender has funded its participation obligations and (y) made at a time when the conditions set forth in Section 4.02 are satisfied, such payment shall be applied solely to prepay the Loans of, and reimbursement obligations owed to, all non-Defaulting Lenders pro rata prior to being applied to the prepayment of any Loans, or reimbursement obligations owed to, any Defaulting Lender.
If (i) a Bankruptcy Event with respect to a Lender Parent of any Lender shall occur following the date hereof and for so long as such event shall continue or (ii) the Swingline Lender or the Issuing Lender has a good faith belief that any Lender has defaulted in fulfilling its obligations under one or more other agreements in which such Lender commits to extend credit, the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loan and the Issuing Lender shall not be required to issue, amend or increase any Letter of Credit, unless the Swingline Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, shall have entered into arrangements with the Borrower or such Lender, satisfactory to the Swingline Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, to defease any risk to it in respect of such Lender hereunder. For purposes of this paragraph, "Bankruptcy Event" means, with respect to any Person, such Person becomes the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee, administrator, custodian, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar Person charged with the reorganization or liquidation of its business appointed for it, or, in the good faith determination of the Administrative Agent, has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of, or acquiescence in, any such proceeding or appointment, provided that a Bankruptcy Event shall not result solely by virtue of any ownership interest, or the acquisition of any ownership interest, in such Person by a Governmental Authority or instrumentality thereof, provided, further, that such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Person with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Person (or such Governmental Authority or instrumentality) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made by such Person.
In the event that the Administrative Agent, the Company, the Issuing Lender and the Swingline Lender each agrees that a Defaulting Lender has adequately remedied all matters that caused such Lender to be a Defaulting Lender, then the Swingline Exposure and LC Exposure of the Lenders shall be readjusted to reflect the inclusion of such Lender's Commitment and on such date such Lender shall purchase at par such of the Loans of the other Lenders (other than Swingline Loans) as the Administrative shall determine may be necessary in order for such Lender to hold such Loans in accordance with its Applicable Percentage.
SECTION 2.23
Incremental Revolving Commitments
(a) The Company and any one or more Lenders (including New Lenders but without the consent of any other Lender) may from time to time agree that such Lenders shall make, obtain or increase the amount of their Commitments by executing and delivering to the Administrative Agent an Increased Facility Activation Notice specifying (i) the amount of such increase and (ii) the applicable Increased Facility Closing Date. Notwithstanding the foregoing,
 
(i) without the consent of the Required Lenders, the aggregate amount of incremental Commitments obtained after the Effective Date pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed $100,000,000 and (ii) without the consent of the Administrative Agent, (x) each increase effected pursuant to this paragraph shall be in a minimum amount of at least $25,000,000 and (y) no more than 4 Increased Facility Closing Dates may be selected by the Company after the Effective Date. No Lender shall have any obligation to participate in any increase described in this paragraph unless it agrees to do so in its sole discretion.
(b) Any additional bank, financial institution or other entity which, with the consent of the Company and the Administrative Agent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld), elects to become a "Lender" under this Agreement in connection with any transaction described in Section 2.23(a) shall execute a New Lender Supplement (each, a ""), substantially in the form of Exhibit J, whereupon such bank, financial institution or other entity (a "") shall become a Lender for all purposes and to the same extent as if originally a party hereto and shall be bound by and entitled to the benefits of this Agreement.
New Lender Supplement
New Lender
(c) Unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent, on each Increased Facility Closing Date (i) the Borrowers shall borrow Revolving Loans under the relevant increased Commitments from each Lender participating in the relevant increase in an amount determined by reference to the amount of each Type of Loan (and, in the case of Eurocurrency Loans, of each Eurodollar Borrowing) which would then have been outstanding from such Lender if (x) each such Type or Eurocurrency Borrowing had been borrowed or effected on such Increased Facility Closing Date and (y) the aggregate amount of each such Type or Eurocurrency Borrowing requested to be so borrowed or effected had been proportionately increased, and (ii) each Lender immediately prior to such increase will automatically and without further act be deemed to have assigned to each New Lender, and each such New Lender will automatically and without further act be deemed to have assumed, a portion of such Lender's participations hereunder in outstanding Swingline Loans, Protective Advances and Letters of Credit such that, after giving effect to such Commitment increase and each such deemed assignment and assumption of participations, the percentage of the aggregate outstanding participations hereunder in Swingline Loans, Protective Advances and Letters of Credit held by each Lender (including each such New Lender) will equal such Lender's Applicable Percentage after giving effect to the new Commitments. The Eurocurrency Rate applicable to any Eurocurrency Loan borrowed pursuant to the preceding sentence shall equal the Eurocurrency Rate then applicable to the Eurocurrency Loans of the other Lenders in the same Eurocurrency Borrowing (or, until the expiration of the then-current Interest Period, such other rate as shall be agreed upon between the applicable Borrower and the relevant Lender).
Each Loan Party represents and warrants to the Lenders that:
SECTION 3.01 . Each of the Loan Parties and each of their Subsidiaries (other than Immaterial Subsidiaries) is duly organized or incorporated, validly
Organization; Powers
 
existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization or incorporation and has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted. Each of the Loan Parties and each of their Subsidiaries (other than Immaterial Subsidiaries) is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required, except where the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
SECTION 3.02 . The Transactions are within each Loan Party's corporate, limited liability company or other like powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate, limited liability company or other like action and, if required, by all necessary shareholder, member, partner or other like action. The Loan Documents to which each Loan Party is a party have been duly executed and delivered by such Loan Party and constitute a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Loan Party, enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (a) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws of general applicability affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and (b) the application of general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
Authorization; Enforceability
SECTION 3.03 . The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect, (b) will not (i) violate in any material respect any applicable law or regulation or any order of any Governmental Authority binding upon the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or (ii) violate the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any material indenture, agreement or other instrument binding upon the Company, any Loan Party or any of their Subsidiaries or their assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by any such Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries, and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, except Liens pursuant to the Loan Documents.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts
SECTION 3.04 .
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change
(a) . The Company has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, shareholders' equity and cash flows as of and for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, reported on by its independent public accountants. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP. As of the Effective Date, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any material Guarantee obligations, contingent liabilities and liabilities for taxes, or any long-term leases or unusual forward or long-term commitments, including any interest rate or foreign currency swap or exchange transaction or other obligation in respect of derivatives, that in accordance with GAAP would be required to be disclosed in the most recent financial statements referred to in this paragraph but are not reflected in such financial statements.
Financial Condition
 
(b) . Since December 31, 2010, no event, change or condition has occurred that has had, or could reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect.
No Material Adverse Effect
SECTION 3.05 .
Properties
(a) . Each of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries has good and marketable title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all the real and personal property that is material to its business, free of all Liens other than Liens permitted by Section 6.02.
Property Generally
(b) . Except where such failure would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, each of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, tradenames, domain names, copyrights, patents, technology, trade secrets, know-how and other intellectual property rights ("") material to the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, free and clear of all Liens other than Liens permitted by Section 6.02(b), and the use thereof and the conduct of their business by each of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries does not infringe in any material respect upon the rights of any other Person. Each such registration and application that is material to the conduct of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole is subsisting, and has not expired or been abandoned or cancelled.
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property
SECTION 3.06 .
Litigation and Environmental Matters
(a) . Except as disclosed in Schedule 3.06(a), there are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority now pending against or, to the knowledge of any Loan Party, threatened against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that (i) could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect or (ii) involve this Agreement, any other Loan Document or the Transactions.
Actions, Suits and Proceedings
(b) . Except as disclosed in Schedule 3.06(b), and except with respect to any matters that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, registration, exemption, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received written notice of any pending or threatened claim with respect to any Environmental Liability and (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
Environmental Matters
SECTION 3.07 . Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is an "investment company" as defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or is subject to registration under that Act.
Investment Company Act
SECTION 3.08 . Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it (including in its capacity as withholding agent), except (a) Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which such Person has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) where
Taxes
 
the failure to do so could not reasonably be expected to individually or in the aggregate result in a Material Adverse Effect. No material Tax liens have been filed and no material claims are being asserted with respect to any Taxes.
SECTION 3.09 . No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan (based on the assumptions used for purposes Accounting Standards Codification No. 715: Compensation-Retirement Benefits) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed the fair market value of the assets of such Plan by an amount that could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
ERISA
SECTION 3.10 . Each Borrower has disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which it or any of its Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to it, that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. None of the reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of any Loan Party to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or delivered hereunder or thereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished), when taken as a whole, contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that (a) with respect to projected financial information, the Borrowers represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time and (b) it is understood and agreed that uncertainty is inherent in any forecasts or projections and no assurances can be given by the Company of the future achievement of such performance.
Disclosure
provided
SECTION 3.11 . Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is engaged principally, or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose, whether immediate, incidental or ultimate, of buying or carrying Margin Stock, and no part of the proceeds of any extension of credit hereunder will be used to buy or carry any Margin Stock.
Use of Credit
SECTION 3.12 . Each Loan Party and its Subsidiaries are in compliance with all Requirements of Law applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements
SECTION 3.13 . No Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
No Default
SECTION 3.14 . Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Effective Date and on the date of each Borrowing, (i) the fair value of the consolidated assets of the Company, at a fair valuation, exceeds its consolidated debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise; (ii) the present fair saleable value of the
Solvency
 
consolidated property of the Company is greater than the amount that is required to pay the probable liability of its consolidated debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and other liabilities become absolute and matured; (iii) the Company and the Loan Parties, on a consolidated basis, are able to pay their consolidated debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and liabilities become due, absolute and matured; and (iv) the Company does not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct the business in which it is engaged as such business is now conducted and is proposed to be conducted after the Effective Date.
SECTION 3.15 . The Security Agreement shall be effective to create in favor of the Administrative Agent for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties (as defined in the Security Agreement) a valid and enforceable security interest in the Collateral (as defined therein) and the proceeds thereof and (i) when the Collateral (as described therein) constituting certificated securities (as defined in the Uniform Commercial Code (as defined in the Security Agreement)) is delivered to the Administrative Agent thereunder together with instruments of transfer duly endorsed in blank, the security interest of the Administrative Agent therein will constitute a perfected Lien on, and security interest in, all right, title and interest of the Grantors (as defined in the Security Agreement) in such Collateral, prior and superior in right to any other Person (subject only to Liens permitted under Section 6.02 which by operation of law or contract would have priority over the Liens securing the Secured Obligations hereunder), and (ii) when financing statements in appropriate form are filed in the offices specified on Schedule D to the Security Agreement, the security interest of the Administrative Agent will constitute a perfected Lien on and security interest in all right, title and interest of the Grantors (as defined in the Security Agreement) in the other Collateral (as described therein) and the proceeds thereof to the extent perfection can be obtained by filing Uniform Commercial Code financing statements, prior and superior to the rights of any other Person (subject only to Liens permitted under Section 6.02 which by operation of law or contract would have priority over the Liens securing the Secured Obligations hereunder).
Security Interest in Collateral
SECTION 3.16 . Each Loan Party has determined that execution, delivery, and performance of this Agreement and any other Loan Documents to be executed by such Loan Party is within its purpose, will be of direct and indirect benefit to such Loan Party, and is in its best interest.
Consideration
SECTION 3.17 .  sets forth, as of the Effective Date, (a) a correct and complete list of the name and relationship to the Company of each and all of the Company's Subsidiaries, (b) a true and complete listing of each class of authorized Equity Interests of each Borrower (other than the Company), of which all of such issued shares are validly issued, outstanding, fully paid and non-assessable (to the extent such concepts are applicable), and owned beneficially and of record by the Persons identified on , and (c) the type of entity of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries. All of the issued and outstanding Equity Interests owned by any Loan Party in its Subsidiaries has been (to the extent such concepts are relevant with respect to such ownership interests) duly authorized and issued and is fully paid and non assessable.
Capitalization and Subsidiaries
Schedule 3.17
Schedule 3.17
SECTION 3.18 . As of the Effective Date, the insurance required under Section 5.05 is in effect and all premiums in respect of such insurance have been paid.
Insurance
 
The Borrowers believe that the insurance maintained by or on behalf of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries are adequate.
SECTION 3.19 . As of the Effective Date, there are no strikes, lockouts or slowdowns, and no material unfair labor practice charges, against any Loan Party or its Subsidiaries pending or, to the knowledge of the Borrowers, threatened. The terms and conditions of employment, hours worked by and payments made to employees of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries have not been in material violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act, or any other applicable federal, provincial, territorial, state, local or foreign law dealing with such matters. All material payments due from any Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries, or for which any claim may be made against any Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries, on account of wages, vacation pay and employee health and welfare insurance and other benefits, have been paid or accrued as a liability on the books of the Loan Party or such Subsidiary.
Employment Matters
SECTION 3.20 . (a) No Loan Party (i) is a person whose property or interest in property is blocked or subject to blocking pursuant to Section 1 of Executive Order 13224 of September 23, 2001 Blocking Property and Prohibiting Transactions With Persons Who Commit, Threaten to Commit, or Support Terrorism (66 Fed. Reg. 49079 (2001)), (ii) engages in any dealings or transactions prohibited by Section 2 of such executive order, or is otherwise associated with any such person in any manner violative in any material respect of Section 2, or (iii) is a person on the list of Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons or subject to the limitations or prohibitions under any other U.S. Department of Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control regulation or executive order.
Anti Terrorism Laws
(b) Each Loan Party is in compliance, in all material respects, with (i) the Trading with the Enemy Act, as amended, and each of the foreign assets control regulations of the United States Treasury Department (31 CFR, Subtitle B, Chapter V, as amended) and any other enabling legislation or executive order relating thereto, and (ii) the Uniting And Strengthening America By Providing Appropriate Tools Required To Intercept And Obstruct Terrorism (USA Patriot Act of 2001). No part of the proceeds of the Loans will be used to make any payments to any governmental official or employee, political party, official of a political party, candidate for political office, or anyone else acting in an official capacity, in order to obtain, retain or direct business or obtain any improper advantage, in violation of the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended.
SECTION 3.21 . As of the Effective Date, the Company has heretofore furnished to the Lenders complete and accurate copies of the BAC LLC Agreement, all other material documents relating to the BAC Joint Venture, and all material documents relating to other material floor plan financing and securitization programs, in each case, as amended as of the date hereof. Each of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders acknowledges that it has been advised of the confidentiality requirements that apply under Article IX of the BAC LLC Agreement and agrees that it will comply in all respects therewith.
Delivery of Certain Documentation
 
SECTION 4.01 . This Agreement shall become effective on the date (the "") on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 10.02):
Effective Date
Effective Date
(a) . The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received (i) from the Company, each direct and indirect wholly owned Domestic Subsidiary of the Company (other than Immaterial Subsidiaries) and each Person listed on Schedule 1.01A either (x) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (y) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include facsimile transmission of a signed signature page to this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement and (ii) duly executed copies (which may include facsimile transmission of a signed signature page) of the Loan Documents and such other certificates, documents, instruments and agreements as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
Executed Counterparts
(b) . The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and dated the Effective Date) of Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, counsel to the Loan Parties, substantially in the form of Exhibit C and such other counsel for the Loan Parties satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, and covering such other matters relating to the Loan Parties, this Agreement or the Transactions as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request (and the Company hereby instructs such counsel to deliver such opinion to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent), in each case in form and substance reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
Opinion of Counsel to the Loan Parties
(c) . The Administrative Agent shall have received satisfactory (i) quarterly projections through 2011 and (ii) annual projections for 2012 through 2015.
Financial Projections
(d) . The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) a certificate of each Loan Party, dated the Effective Date and executed by its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, which shall (A) certify the resolutions of its Board of Directors, members or other body authorizing the execution, delivery and performance of the Loan Documents to which it is a party, (B) identify by name and title and bear the signatures of the Financial Officers and any other officers or managers of such Loan Party authorized to sign the Loan Documents to which it is a party, and (C) contain appropriate attachments, including the certificate or articles of incorporation or organization of each Loan Party certified by the relevant authority of the jurisdiction of organization of such Loan Party and a true and correct copy of its by-laws or operating, management or partnership agreement, and (ii) a good standing certificate for each Loan Party from its jurisdiction of organization.
Closing Certificates; Certified Certificate of Incorporation; Good Standing Certificates
 
(e) . The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, signed by a Financial Officer and dated the Effective Date (i) stating that no Default has occurred and is continuing, (ii) stating that the representations and warranties contained in Article III are true and correct as of such date, and (iii) certifying any other factual matters as may be reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent.
No Default Certificate
(f) . The Lenders and the Agents shall have received all fees required to be paid, and all expenses for which invoices have been presented (including the reasonable fees and expenses of legal counsel), on or before the Effective Date.
Fees
(g) . The Administrative Agent shall have received the results of a recent lien search in the jurisdictions of organization of the Loan Parties, and such search shall reveal no Liens on any of the assets of the Loan Parties except for Liens permitted by Section 6.02 or to be discharged pursuant to documentation satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Lien Searches
(h) . Each document (including any Uniform Commercial Code financing statement) required by the Collateral Documents or under law or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to be filed, registered or recorded in order to create in favor of the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a perfected Lien on the Collateral described therein, prior and superior in right to any other Person (other than with respect to Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02 which by operation of law or contract would have priority over the Liens securing the Secured Obligations hereunder), shall be in proper form for filing, registration or recordation or the Administrative Agent shall be satisfied with arrangements in respect thereof.
Filings, Registrations and Recordings
(i) . The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) the certificates representing the shares of Equity Interests of Domestic Subsidiaries pledged pursuant to the Security Agreement as of the Effective Date, together with an undated stock power for each such certificate executed in blank by a duly authorized officer of the pledgor thereof and (ii) each promissory note (if any) pledged to the Administrative Agent pursuant to the Security Agreement that is required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to the Security Agreement as of the Effective Date endorsed (without recourse) in blank (or accompanied by an executed transfer form in blank) by the pledgor thereof.
Pledged Stock; Stock Powers; Pledged Notes
(j) . The Administrative Agent shall have received each Deposit Account Control Agreement required to be provided pursuant to Section 7.1 of the Security Agreement; that to the extent such agreements are not provided on the Effective Date, such agreements shall be provided to the Administrative Agent within 60 days, or such other period as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its sole discretion, of the Effective Date.
Control Agreements
provided
(k) . The Administrative Agent shall have received satisfactory evidence that (i) the Existing Credit Agreement and all commitments thereunder shall have been terminated and all amounts thereunder shall
Termination of Existing Credit Agreement
 
have been paid in full and (ii) satisfactory arrangements shall have been made for the termination of all Liens granted in connection therewith.
(l) . An appraiser satisfactory to the Administrative Agent shall have been engaged and shall have commenced an appraisal of the Loan Parties' Inventory and the Administrative Agent shall be reasonably satisfied with the status thereof.
Appraisals
(m) . A field examination of the Accounts, Inventory, related working capital matters, financial information and, if requested by the Administrative Agent, the equipment of the Company and its Subsidiaries and of the related data processing and other systems shall have been commenced and the Administrative Agent shall be reasonably satisfied with the status thereof.
Field Examinations
(n) . All governmental and third-party approvals necessary in connection with the financing contemplated hereunder and the continuing operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries (including shareholder and lender approvals, if any) shall have been obtained and shall be in full force and effect, and all applicable waiting periods shall have expired without any action being taken or threatened by any competent authority that would restrain, prevent or otherwise impose burdensome conditions on the financing contemplated hereby.
Governmental and Third-Party Approval
(o) . Brunswick Financial Services Corporation shall have entered into an amendment to or an agreement to amend the BAC LLC Agreement to conform the financial covenant therein to the ratio in Section 6.11.
BAC LLC Agreement Amendment
(p) . All legal (including tax implications) and regulatory matters shall be reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, including but not limited to compliance with all applicable requirements of Regulations U, T and X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
Legal and Regulatory Matters
(q) . The Administrative Agent shall have received, for each Subsidiary Borrower designated as a Subsidiary Borrower as of the Effective Date, such documents and certificates required to be delivered under Section 2.21 to the extent such other documents and certificates are not already being delivered hereunder.
Subsidiary Borrowers
(r) . The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) a Borrowing Base Certificate which calculates the Borrowing Base, and supporting information in connection therewith, together with any additional reports with respect to the Borrowing Base as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request and (ii) all Borrowing Base Supporting Documentation, in each case for the month of February 2011.
Borrowing Base Documents
(s) . Each Lender shall have received all documentation and other information required by regulatory authorities with respect to the Loan Parties under applicable "know your customer" and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including, without limitation, the Patriot Act, that has been requested by such Lender.
Other Documents
 
Any determination by the Administrative Agent that the provisions of this Section 4.01 have been satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 10.02) shall be conclusive and binding unless any Lender shall object prior to the Effective Date. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Company and the Lenders of the Effective Date, which must occur on or prior to 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on April 15, 2011, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding.
SECTION 4.02 . The obligation of each Lender to make any Loan, and of the Issuing Lenders to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is additionally subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event
(a) the representations and warranties of the Loan Parties set forth in this Agreement and in the other Loan Documents shall be true and correct on and as of the date of such Loan or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit (or, if any such representation or warranty is expressly stated to have been made as of a specific earlier date, as of such specific date), as applicable;
(b) at the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Loan or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing; and
(c) at the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Loan or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, the total Credit Exposures shall not exceed the lesser of (x) the Total Commitment or (y) the Borrowing Base then in effect.
The making of each Loan and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrowers on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this Section.
Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full in cash and all Letters of Credit shall have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each Loan Party executing this Agreement covenants and agrees, jointly and severally with all of the Loan Parties, with the Lenders that:
SECTION 5.01 . The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements; Borrowing Base and Other Information
(a) as soon as available, but in any event within 75 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company (or such lesser number of days within which the Company shall be required to file its Annual Report on Form 10-K for such fiscal year with the SEC), the audited consolidated balance sheet and related statements of income, shareholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the end of
 
and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all reported on by independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a "going concern" or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
(b) as soon as available, but in any event within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Company (or such lesser number of days within which the Company shall be required to file its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for such fiscal quarter with the SEC), the consolidated balance sheet and related statements of income, shareholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of such fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by a Financial Officer as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
(c) within the time specified for delivery of financial statements under clause (a) or (b) of this Section, (I) a certificate of a Financial Officer certifying, in the case of financial statements delivered pursuant to clause (b) above, (i) as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes, (ii) as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto and (iii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations (A) demonstrating compliance with (x) the last sentence of Section 6.10 and (y) Section 6.11 (to the extent applicable) and (B) of the Leverage Ratio and (II) if there shall have been any material change in GAAP or in the application thereof that applies to the Company or any Subsidiary since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04(a) (unless such change shall theretofore have been notified under this subclause (II)), a notification from a Financial Officer as to such change, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such notification;
(d) concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) of this Section, a certificate of the accounting firm that reported on such financial statements stating whether they obtained knowledge during the course of their examination of such financial statements of any Default or Event of Default with respect to Section 6.11 (which certificate may be limited to the extent required by accounting rules or guidelines);
 
(e) as soon as available, but in any event not more than 30 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, a copy of the plan and forecast (including a projected consolidated and consolidating balance sheet, income statement and funds flow statement in form acceptable to the Administrative Agent) of the Company for each fiscal quarter of the upcoming fiscal year (the "") in form reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent;
Projections
(f) as soon as available, but in any event within 15 Business Days of the end of each calendar month (or (1) when such calendar month is the final full month of any fiscal quarter, within 15 Business Days of the end of such fiscal quarter, or (2) within three Business Days of the end of each week at any time that Availability is less than the greater of (x) 20% of the Total Commitments and (y) $60,000,000), a Borrowing Base Certificate which calculates the Borrowing Base, and supporting information in connection therewith, together with any additional reports with respect to the Borrowing Base as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request; and, after the Equipment Election Effective Date, the Equipment Component of the Borrowing Base shall be updated (i) from time to time upon receipt of periodic valuation updates received from the Administrative Agent's asset valuation experts, or (ii) in the event that the aggregate value of such assets is otherwise impaired to the extent that the Net Orderly Liquidation Value of the equipment included in the Collateral would reasonably be expected to be less than 150 % of the Equipment Component, as determined in the Administrative Agent's Permitted Discretion;
(g) as soon as available but in any event within 15 Business Days of the end of each calendar month (or (1) when such calendar month is the final full month of any fiscal quarter, within 15 Business Days of the end of such fiscal quarter, or (2) within three Business Days of the end of each week at any time that Availability is less than the greater of (x) 20% of the Total Commitments and (y) $60,000,000) and at such other times as may be requested by the Administrative Agent, as of the period then ended, all Borrowing Base Supplemental Documentation;
(h) promptly (i) after the filing thereof, copies of all periodic and other reports, periodic and other certifications of the chief executive officer and chief financial officer of the Company, registration statements and other publicly available materials filed by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with the SEC, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of the SEC, or with any national securities exchange (other than any exhibits to any of the foregoing which are too voluminous to furnish and which are made available by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries on such Person's website and any registration statement on Form S-8 or its equivalent) and (ii) after the distribution thereof, copies of all financial statements, reports, proxy statements and other materials distributed by the Company to its shareholders generally;
(i) promptly after Moody's or S&P shall have announced a change in the rating established or deemed to have been established for the Index Debt, written notice of such rating change;
 
(j) promptly following receipt thereof, copies of any documents described in Sections 101(k) or 101(l) of ERISA that any Loan Party or any ERISA Affiliate may request with respect to any Multiemployer Plan; , that if the Loan Parties or any of the ERISA Affiliates have not requested such documents or notices from the administrator or sponsor of the applicable Multiemployer Plan, then, upon reasonable request of the Administrative Agent, the Loan Parties and/or the ERISA Affiliates shall promptly make a request for such documents or notices from such administrator or sponsor and the Borrowers shall provide copies of such documents and notices promptly after receipt thereof; and
provided
(k) promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or compliance with the terms of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request.
Financial statements and other documents required to be delivered pursuant to clause (a), (b), (d) or (h) of this Section (to the extent any such financial statements or other documents are included in reports or other materials otherwise filed with the SEC) may be delivered electronically and if so delivered, shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date on which (i) the Company posts such financial statements or other documents, or provides a link thereto, on the Company's website on the Internet or (ii) such financial statements or other documents are posted on the Company's behalf on an Internet or intranet website, if any, to which each Lender and the Administrative Agent have access (whether a commercial, third-party website or whether sponsored by the Administrative Agent); provided that: (i) the Company shall deliver paper copies of such financial statements and other documents to the Administrative Agent or any Lender that requests the Company to deliver such paper copies until a written request to cease delivering paper copies is given by the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be, and (ii) the Company shall notify the Administrative Agent of the posting of any such financial statements and other documents and provide to the Administrative Agent electronic versions (i.e., soft copies) thereof.
SECTION 5.02 . The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender prompt written notice of the following:
Notices of Material Events
(a) the occurrence of any Default or Event of Default;
(b) any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of, or any receipt of any notice of, any governmental investigation or any litigation, arbitration or administrative proceeding commenced or, to the knowledge of a Financial Officer, threatened against any Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries that (i) could reasonably be expected to result in damages in excess of $35,000,000, (ii) seeks injunctive relief, (iii) alleges criminal misconduct by any Loan Party or any of their Subsidiaries, (iv) contests any tax, fee, assessment, or other governmental charge in excess of $35,000,000, or (v) involves any material product recall;
 
(c) any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of any Lien (other than Permitted Encumbrances) or claim made or asserted against all or any material portion of the Collateral;
(d) any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of any loss, damage, or destruction to all or any material portion of the Collateral, whether or not covered by insurance;
(e) any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of the occurrence of any ERISA Event or breach of the representations and warranties in Section 3.09 that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events or breaches of such representations and warranties that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Loan Parties and their Subsidiaries, whether directly or by virtue of their affiliation with any ERISA Affiliate, in an aggregate amount exceeding $35,000,000;
(f) any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of any event, notice or circumstance or any correspondence with any Governmental Authority (including with respect to any release into the indoor or outdoor environment of any Hazardous Material that is required by any applicable Environmental Law to be reported to a Governmental Authority) which could reasonably be expected to lead to (i) any Environmental Liability in excess of $35,000,000, or (ii) any material adverse change in the matter set forth in Schedule 5.02(f);
(g) any actual knowledge of a Financial Officer of any default notice received under or with respect to any leased location or public warehouse where Collateral is located that is material to the conduct of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole (which shall be delivered within 5 Business Days after receipt thereof);
(h) the termination of the BAC Joint Venture; and
(i) any event or development that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Company setting forth in reasonable detail the nature of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
SECTION 5.03 . Each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, other than in the case of any Immaterial Subsidiary, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and, except where any of the following could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, the rights, qualifications, licenses, permits, privileges, governmental authorizations, intellectual property rights and franchises used or useful in the conduct of its business, and maintain all requisite authority to conduct its business in each jurisdiction in which its business is conducted; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under Section 6.03.
Existence; Conduct of Business
provided
 
SECTION 5.04 . Each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay or discharge all Material Indebtedness and all other material liabilities, including Taxes before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and such Loan Party or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP or (b) the failure to make payment could not reasonably be expected to individually or in the aggregate result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes and Other Obligations
SECTION 5.05 . Each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, (a) keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted, and (b) maintain with financially sound and reputable insurance companies having a financial strength rating of at least A- by A.M. Best Company (x) insurance in such amounts (with no greater risk retention) and against such risks (including loss or damage by fire and loss in transit; theft, burglary, pilferage, larceny, embezzlement, and other criminal activities; business interruption; and general liability) and such other hazards, as is customarily maintained by companies of established repute engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations and (y) all insurance required pursuant to the Collateral Documents. The Loan Parties will furnish to the Lenders, upon request of the Administrative Agent, information in reasonable detail as to the insurance so maintained, which may be a Memorandum of Insurance. The Loan Parties shall require all such policies to name the Administrative Agent (on behalf of the Agents, the Lenders and the Issuing Lenders) as additional insured or loss payee, as applicable.
Maintenance of Properties; Insurance
SECTION 5.06 . Without limiting Sections 5.10 or 5.11 hereof, each Loan Party will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, (i) keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities and (ii) permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender (including employees of the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any consultants, accountants, lawyers and appraisers retained by the Administrative Agent or any Lender), upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested and all with a representative of the Company present. The Loan Parties acknowledge that the Administrative Agent, after exercising its rights of inspection, may prepare and distribute to the Lenders certain Reports pertaining to the Loan Parties' and their respective Subsidiaries' assets for internal use by the Administrative Agent and the Lenders.
Books and Records; Inspection Rights
SECTION 5.07 .
Compliance with Laws and Obligations
(a) Each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all Requirements of Law applicable to it or its property and all Contractual Obligations, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(b) The Loan Parties and each of their Subsidiaries shall, and shall require that all of its tenants, subtenants, contractors, subcontractors and invitees shall, (i) be at all times in compliance with all Environmental Laws and (ii) ensure that their assets and operations are in compliance with all Environmental Laws (including with respect to any Hazardous Materials that are discharged, emitted, released, generated, used, stored, managed, transported or otherwise dealt with). For purposes of this Section 5.07(b), noncompliance with either of subclauses (i) and (ii) shall be deemed not to constitute a breach of this covenant if upon learning of any actual or alleged noncompliance, such Loan Party shall promptly undertake reasonable efforts to achieve compliance and provided that any failure to comply with any of the foregoing could not, either individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
SECTION 5.08 . The proceeds of the Loans will be used, and Letters of Credit will be issued, only for general corporate purposes of the Company and its Subsidiaries including acquisitions otherwise permitted hereunder. No part of the proceeds of any Loan and no Letter of Credit will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations T, U and X as in effect from time to time.
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit
SECTION 5.09 . Each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, promptly from time to time obtain or make and maintain in full force and effect all licenses, consents, authorizations and approvals of, and filings and registrations with, any Governmental Authority from time to time necessary under the laws of the jurisdiction in which each Loan Party is located for the making and performance by each such Loan Parties of the Loan Documents.
Governmental Authorizations
SECTION 5.10 . On no more than one occasion per calendar year, at the request of the Administrative Agent, the Loan Parties will provide the Administrative Agent with appraisals or updates thereof of their Inventory (and, if applicable, their Eligible Equipment) from an appraiser selected and engaged by the Administrative Agent, and prepared on a basis satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, such appraisals and updates to include, without limitation, information required by applicable law and regulations; , that (a) if the Commitment Utilization Percentage is greater than 50% during a period of fifteen consecutive days in any calendar year, at the Administrative Agent's discretion an additional appraisal shall be permitted for such calendar year and (b) if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, there shall be no limitation on the number of such appraisals. For purposes of this Section 5.10, it is understood and agreed that a single appraisal may consist of examinations conducted at multiple relevant sites and involve one or more relevant Loan Parties and their assets. All such appraisals shall be at the sole expense of the Loan Parties.
Appraisals
provided
however
SECTION 5.11 . On no more than one occasion per calendar year, at the request of the Administrative Agent, the Loan Parties will permit, upon reasonable notice, the Administrative Agent to conduct a field examination to ensure the adequacy of Collateral included in the Borrowing Base and related reporting and control systems , (a) if the Commitment Utilization Percentage is greater than 50% during a period of fifteen consecutive days in any calendar year, at the Administrative Agent's discretion an additional field examination shall be permitted for such calendar year and (b) that if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, there shall be no limitation on the number or frequency
Field Examinations
provided
 
of field examinations. For purposes of this Section 5.11, it is understood and agreed that a single field examination may be conducted at multiple relevant sites and involve one or more relevant Loan Parties and their assets. All such field examinations shall be at the sole expense of the Loan Parties.
SECTION 5.12 . The Borrowers (a) will furnish to the Administrative Agent (for delivery to the Lenders) prompt written notice of any casualty or other insured damage to any material portion of the Collateral or the commencement of any action or proceeding for the taking of any material portion of the Collateral or interest therein under power of eminent domain or by condemnation or similar proceeding and (b) will ensure that the net proceeds of any such event (whether in the form of insurance proceeds, condemnation awards or otherwise) are collected and applied in accordance with the applicable provisions of this Agreement and the Collateral Documents.
Casualty and Condemnation
SECTION 5.13 .
Additional Collateral; Further Assurances
(a) Subject to applicable law, the Borrowers and each Subsidiary that is a Loan Party may at its election cause any of its Subsidiaries, and shall (within 30 days after such formation or acquisition, or determination that such Subsidiary is no longer an Immaterial Subsidiary, or such longer period as may be agreed to by the Administrative Agent) cause each of its wholly owned Domestic Subsidiaries (other than Immaterial Subsidiaries) formed or acquired after the Effective Date or which ceases to be an Immaterial Subsidiary after the Effective Date, in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, to (A) become a Loan Party by executing the Joinder Agreement set forth as Exhibit G hereto (the "") and (B) to execute and deliver such amendments, supplements or documents of accession to any Collateral Documents as the Administrative Agent deems necessary for such Subsidiary to grant to the Administrative Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) a perfected first priority security interest in the Collateral described in such Collateral Document with respect to such Subsidiary, subject only to Liens permitted under Section 6.02. Upon execution and delivery of such documents and agreements, each such Person (i) shall automatically become a Guarantor hereunder and thereupon shall have all of the rights, benefits, duties, and obligations in such capacity under the Loan Documents and (ii) will grant Liens to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties), in any property of such Loan Party which constitutes Collateral.
Joinder Agreement
(b) The Borrowers and each Subsidiary that is a Loan Party will cause 100% of the issued and outstanding Equity Interests owned by it in each of its Domestic Subsidiaries to be subject at all times to a first priority, perfected Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Loan Documents as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request.
(c) Without limiting the foregoing, each Loan Party will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, execute and deliver, or cause to be executed and delivered, to the Administrative Agent such documents, agreements and instruments, and will take or cause to be taken such further actions (including the filing and recording of financing statements, fixture filings, mortgages, deeds of trust and other documents and such other actions or deliveries of the type required by Section 4.01, as applicable), which may be required by law or which the Administrative Agent may, from time to time, reasonably request to carry out the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and to ensure perfection and
 
priority of the Liens created or intended to be created by the Collateral Documents, all at the expense of the Loan Parties. In addition, each Loan Party will execute and deliver, or cause to be executed and delivered, to the Administrative Agent filings with any governmental recording or registration office in any jurisdiction required by the Administrative Agent, in the exercise of its Permitted Discretion, in order to perfect or protect the Liens of the Administrative Agent granted under any Collateral Document in any Intellectual Property.
(d) If any material assets (other than Foreign Equity Interests, real estate or other Excluded Property) are acquired by the Borrowers or any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party after the Effective Date (other than assets constituting Collateral under the Security Agreement that become subject to the Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties upon acquisition thereof), the Borrowers will notify the Administrative Agent and the Lenders thereof, and, if requested by the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders, the Borrowers, pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Loan Documents, will, subject to paragraph (e) below, cause such assets to be subjected to a first priority, perfected Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties, subject only to Liens permitted under Section 6.02, pursuant to the terms and conditions of the Loan Documents and will take, and cause the other Loan Parties to take, such actions as shall be necessary or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to grant and perfect such Liens, including actions described in paragraph (c) of this Section, all at the expense of the Loan Parties.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement or any Loan Document to the contrary, Excluded Property will be excluded from the requirements of paragraphs (a) through (d) above. Without limiting the foregoing, (A) no real estate shall be required to be made subject to a mortgage; (B) no Loan Party shall be required to pledge any Foreign Equity Interest; and (C) no Loan Party shall be required to pledge any Equity Interest in Brunswick Financial Services Corporation and Brunswick Financial Services Corporation shall not be required to become a Loan Party.
SECTION 5.14 . The Company shall determine the aggregate balance of cash and Cash Equivalents of all Loan Parties in accounts (other than each account all the cash and Cash Equivalents contained in which are subject to a Lien (i) described in clause (c) of the definition of Permitted Encumbrances, that the aggregate amount of cash and Cash Equivalents contained at any time in accounts referred to in this clause (i) shall not exceed $50,000,000, or (ii) permitted by Section 6.02(p)) not subject to Deposit Account Control Agreements, Securities Account Control Agreements or other appropriate control agreements in favor of the Administrative Agent in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent at each time when the Company determines account balances for purposes of Borrowing Base reporting, and if such aggregate balance shall at any time of determination exceed $10,000,000 the Company shall promptly eliminate such excess from such accounts or shall within 30 days enter into one or more Deposit Account Control Agreements, Securities Account Control Agreements or other appropriate control agreements in favor of the Administrative Agent in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent so that there shall not thereafter be any such excess.
Deposit Accounts
provided
 
Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees, expenses and other amounts payable under any Loan Document have been paid in full in cash and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Loan Parties covenant and agree, jointly and severally, with the Lenders that:
SECTION 6.01 .
Indebtedness; Preferred Stock
SECTION 6.01A
Indebtedness
No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, create, incur or suffer to exist any Indebtedness, except:
(a) the Secured Obligations;
(b) Indebtedness existing on the date hereof and set forth on Schedule 6.01A and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness in accordance with clause (f) hereof;
(c) Indebtedness of any Borrower to any Subsidiary or any other Borrower and of any Subsidiary to any Borrower or any other Subsidiary, that (i) Indebtedness of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to any Borrower or any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.06 and (ii) Indebtedness of any Borrower to any Subsidiary and Indebtedness of any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party to any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be subordinated in bankruptcy to the Secured Obligations on terms reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (it being understood that the Company shall have in place agreements for such subordination within 60 days, or such other period as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its sole discretion, of the Effective Date);
provided
(d) Guarantees by any Borrower of Indebtedness of any Subsidiary or any other Borrower and by any Subsidiary of Indebtedness of any Borrower or any other Subsidiary, that (i) the Indebtedness so Guaranteed is permitted by this Section 6.01A, (ii) Guarantees by any Borrower or any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party of Indebtedness of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.06 and (iii) Guarantees permitted under this clause (d) shall be subordinated to the Secured Obligations of the applicable Subsidiary if, and on the same terms as, the Indebtedness so Guaranteed is subordinated to the Secured Obligations;
provided
(e) Indebtedness of any Borrower or any Subsidiary incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets (whether or not constituting purchase money Indebtedness), including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof; that (i) such Indebtedness is incurred
provided
 
prior to or within 180 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (e), together with the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated pursuant to clause (i) of Section 6.07, shall not exceed $50,000,000 at any time outstanding;
(f) Indebtedness which represents an extension, refinancing, replacement or renewal of any of the Indebtedness described in clauses (b), (e), (i), (j), (k), (l) or (u) hereof; provided that, (i) the principal amount of such Indebtedness is not increased (except to the extent used to finance accrued interest and premium (including tender or makewhole premiums) thereon and underwriting discounts, defeasance costs, fees, commissions and expenses), (ii) any Liens securing such Indebtedness are not extended to any additional property of any Loan Party or any of their respective Subsidiaries or, if the original Indebtedness was unsecured, then the refinancing, renewal or extension Indebtedness shall be unsecured (other than with Available Collateral), (iii) no Loan Party or Subsidiary of any Loan Party that is not originally obligated with respect to repayment of such Indebtedness is required to become obligated with respect thereto, (iv) such extension, refinancing or renewal does not result in a shortening of the average weighted maturity of the Indebtedness so extended, refinanced or renewed and (v) if the Indebtedness that is refinanced, renewed, or extended was subordinated in right of payment to the Secured Obligations, then the terms and conditions of the refinancing, renewal, or extension Indebtedness must include subordination terms and conditions that are at least as favorable to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders as those that were applicable to the refinanced, renewed, or extended Indebtedness;
(g) Indebtedness owed to any Person providing workers' compensation, health, disability or other employee benefits or property, casualty or liability insurance, pursuant to reimbursement or indemnification obligations to such Person, in each case incurred in the ordinary course of business;
(h) Indebtedness of any Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of performance bonds, bid bonds, appeal bonds, surety bonds and similar obligations, in each case provided in the ordinary course of business;
(i) Indebtedness of the Company, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary that owns Available Collateral or Collateral incurred to refinance in whole or in part Existing 2013 Notes or Existing 2016 Notes or for any other purpose (it being understood that the proceeds of any such Indebtedness incurred to refinance Existing 2013 Notes or Existing 2016 Notes may be deposited in an account subject to a control agreement reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent pending the application of such proceeds to refinance such Existing 2013 Notes or Existing 2016 Notes (which control agreement shall provide that the Administrative Agent shall have a security interest therein, and control over such proceeds, for the benefit of the Secured Parties subject only to the right of the Borrower, so long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, to use such proceeds to refinance Existing 2013 Notes or Existing 2016 Notes)); that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness at any time outstanding in reliance on this paragraph (i) (net of the amount of any proceeds on deposit in any control account as described above) shall not, when taken together with (1) the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Existing 2013 Notes and the Existing 2016 Notes (or any refinancing or replacement of the Existing 2013 Notes or the Existing 2016
provided
 
Notes incurred in reliance on paragraph (f) above (disregarding any principal amount in excess of the original principal amount thereof permitted to be incurred pursuant to the parenthetical contained in clause (i) of such paragraph (f)), other than a refinancing or replacement that can be incurred under clause (j) below, which shall be deemed to use the basket under clause (j) and not the basket under this clause (i)), and (2) the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated pursuant to clause (ii) or (iii) of Section 6.07, exceed $500,000,000; that immediately after giving pro forma effect to the incurrence of any Indebtedness pursuant to this paragraph (i), no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing;
provided
further
(j) unsecured Indebtedness of the Company (including preferred Equity Interests) and unsecured Indebtedness of other Loan Parties having no scheduled principal payments or prepayments prior to the Commitment Termination Date; that both immediately before and immediately after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing; the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this paragraph (j), together with the liquidation value of all preferred Equity Interests (excluding the liquidation value of any preferred Equity Interests issued as pay-in-kind dividends or distributions) of the Company issued pursuant to Section 6.01B after the Effective Date, shall not exceed $250,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
pro
forma
provided
further
(k) Indebtedness of Foreign Subsidiaries or of Foreign Holdcos and unsecured Guarantees of such Indebtedness by the Company; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this paragraph (k), together with the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated pursuant to clause (iv) of Section 6.07, at any time outstanding shall not exceed the greater of (x) $100,000,000 and (y) 4.0% of the aggregate assets held by, or related to, the Foreign Subsidiaries of the Company determined at any time in accordance with GAAP as disclosed in the financial statements or in the footnotes to the financial statements of the Company most recently delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) (or, prior to the first such delivery of financial statements, in the financial statements referred to in Section 3.04(a)).
provided
(l) Indebtedness of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the date hereof; that (i) such Indebtedness exists at the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such Person becoming a Subsidiary and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (l) at any time outstanding shall not exceed the greater of $35,000,000 and the amount of such Indebtedness permitted at such time to be outstanding under Section 3.3(b)(vi) of the indenture for the Existing 2016 Notes;
provided
(m) Indebtedness arising out of Capital Leases incurred in connection with sale and leaseback transactions permitted by Section 6.07;
(n) [reserved];
(o) Indebtedness arising out of customer deposits in the ordinary course of business;
 
(p) Indebtedness with respect to surety bonds and similar arrangements incurred in the ordinary course of business;
(q) Indebtedness arising in connection with (i) any Permitted Foreign Securitization or (ii) any Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction;
(r) Indebtedness of the Company incurred in connection with insurance premium financing arrangements not to exceed $10,000,000 in the aggregate at any time outstanding;
(s) Guarantees of obligations of Persons other than Subsidiaries that are permitted Investments under Section 6.06;
(t) other Indebtedness not to exceed $15,000,000 at any time outstanding;
(u) Indebtedness of the Company, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary that owns a Fond du Lac Facility, including the Fond du Lac Existing Indebtedness, that is secured by assets included in the Fond du Lac Facility; provided that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this paragraph (u), together with the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated pursuant to clause (v) of Section 6.07 and the aggregate amount of any refinancing Indebtedness in respect of such Indebtedness incurred in reliance on paragraph (f) above, shall not exceed $70,000,000 at any time outstanding; and
(v) Floorplan Receivables Permitted Indebtedness.
SECTION 6.01B
Preferred Stock
The Company will not issue any preferred Equity Interests, except preferred Equity Interests the liquidation value of which (excluding the liquidation value of any preferred Equity Interests issued as pay-in-kind dividends or distributions), together with the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness incurred pursuant to Section 6.01A(j), shall not exceed $250,000,000 at any time outstanding, that both immediately before and immediately after giving effect to any such issuance of preferred Equity Interests, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
provided
pro
forma
SECTION 6.02 . No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof except:
Liens
(a) Liens created pursuant to any Loan Document;
(b) Permitted Encumbrances;
(c) any Lien on any property or asset of any Borrower or any Subsidiary existing on the date hereof and listed in Schedule 6.02; that (i) no such Lien shall
provided
 
extend to any other property or asset of any Borrower or any Subsidiary and (ii) any such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that are permitted hereby;
(d) Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by any Borrower or any Subsidiary; that (i) such security interests secure Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A(e), (ii) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 180 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement, (iii) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the cost of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets and (iv) such security interests shall not apply to any other property or assets of such Borrower or Subsidiary or any other Borrower or Subsidiary;
provided
(e) any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by any Borrower or any Subsidiary or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary or is merged or consolidated with any Borrower or any Subsidiary after the date hereof prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary or is so merged or consolidated securing Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01A(l); that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition, merger or consolidation or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of such Borrower or Subsidiary or any other Borrower or Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of such acquisition, merger or consolidation or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that are permitted hereby;
provided
(f) interests of a lessor under any Capital Lease entered into in connection with sale and leaseback transactions permitted pursuant to Section 6.07;
(g) Liens granted by a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party in favor of any Borrower or another Loan Party in respect of Indebtedness owed by such Subsidiary;
(h) Liens on property or assets of Foreign Subsidiaries and Foreign Holdcos outside the United States of America, Liens on Foreign Equity Interests and Liens on Foreign Receivables securing Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A(k);
(i) Liens securing Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A(i); that such Liens are limited to (i) Liens on the Available Collateral and (ii) second priority (or more junior) Liens on the Collateral (subject to the delivery of an intercreditor agreement in form customary for financings of such type and otherwise satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its Permitted Discretion); and Liens on cash and Cash Equivalents securing Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A(o) or (p);
provided
(j) Liens on (i) Foreign Receivables and related assets arising in connection with any Permitted Foreign Securitization and (ii) Liens on Floorplan Borrowing Base Assets and related assets or interests therein arising in connection with any Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction;
 
(k) Liens consisting of rights of first refusal, put/sale options and other customary arrangements with respect to, and restrictions on, the sale, pledge or other transfer of Equity Interests in Persons in which not all the Equity Interests are owned by the Company and its Subsidiaries;
(l) Liens arising from precautionary UCC financing statements or other Lien filings made in respect of any lease or other Disposition permitted by this Agreement;
(m) Liens on rights in respect of insurance premiums paid on behalf of the Company securing Indebtedness permitted pursuant to Section 6.01A(r);
(n) other Liens securing obligations in an aggregate amount outstanding at any time not in excess of $15,000,000;
(o) Liens on the Fond du Lac Facility securing Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A(u) or any refinancing thereof permitted by Section 6.01A(f);
(p)(i) Liens on proceeds of dispositions of assets pledged in compliance with this Agreement to secure other Indebtedness to the extent such proceeds are held following such disposition pending application thereof in accordance with the requirements of such other Indebtedness and (ii) Liens on cash or Cash Equivalents of the Company or any Subsidiary arising in connection with defeasing Existing 2013 Notes or Existing 2016 Notes or otherwise making them subject to cash collateral or escrow arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent; and
(q) Floorplan Receivables Permitted Liens.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, none of the Liens permitted pursuant to this Section 6.02 may at any time attach to any Loan Party's (i) Accounts, other than involuntary Permitted Encumbrances and those permitted under paragraph (a), (c), (e), (g), (h), (i), (j), (l) or (q), (ii) Inventory, other than involuntary Permitted Encumbrances and those permitted under paragraph (a), (c), (e), (g), (h), (i), (j), (l) or (q) above and (iii) assets (other than the Headquarters) to the extent such Liens would constitute a utilization of Section 5.05(b) of the Existing Notes Indenture, other than those permitted under paragraphs (a) or (o) above. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement or any Collateral Document (including any provision for, reference to, or acknowledgement of, any Lien), nothing herein and no approval by the Administrative Agent or the Lenders of any Lien (whether such approval is oral or in writing) shall be construed as or deemed to constitute a subordination by the Administrative Agent or the Lenders of any security interest or other right, interest or Lien in or to the Collateral or any part thereof in favor of any Lien or any holder of any Lien.
SECTION 6.03 .
Fundamental Changes
(a) No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing (i) any Borrower (other than the Company) or any Subsidiary of a Borrower may merge into a Borrower in a transaction in
 
which a Borrower is the surviving entity, (ii) any Loan Party (other than a Borrower) may merge into any Loan Party in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Loan Party, (iii) any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party may liquidate or dissolve if the Company determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Company and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders, (iv) any non-Loan Party may merge into, or consolidate with, a Loan Party in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Loan Party, (v) any non-Loan Party may merge into, or consolidate with, another non-Loan Party and (vi) any Subsidiary (other than a Borrower) may merge into or consolidate with any Person in a transaction permitted under Section 6.04 in which the surviving entity is not a Subsidiary; that any such merger involving a Person that is not a wholly-owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by Section 6.06.
provided
(b) No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by any of the Borrowers and their Subsidiaries on the date of execution of this Agreement and businesses reasonably related thereto.
SECTION 6.04 . No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, make any Disposition of its property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired (including receivables and leasehold interests and any Equity Interest owned by it), nor will any Loan Party permit any of its Subsidiaries to issue any additional Equity Interest in such Subsidiary (other than to another Borrower or another Subsidiary in compliance with Section 6.05), except for:
Dispositions
(a) sales, transfers and dispositions of inventory in the ordinary course of business;
(b) Dispositions to any Borrower or any other Subsidiary, provided that any such Dispositions by a Loan Party to a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be deemed to be an Investment and shall be made in compliance with Section 6.06;
(c) Dispositions of accounts receivable in connection with the compromise, settlement or collection thereof in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices;
(d) Dispositions that are Investments permitted by Section 6.06;
(e) sales to effect sale and leaseback transactions permitted by Section 6.07;
(f) Dispositions resulting from any casualty or other insured damage to, or any taking under power of eminent domain or by condemnation or similar proceeding of, any property or asset of any Borrower or any Subsidiary;
(g) Dispositions of assets (other than Equity Interests in a Subsidiary of the Company unless all such Equity Interests in such Subsidiary are sold) that are not permitted by any other paragraph of this Section, that the fair market value of all assets sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of in reliance upon this paragraph (g) shall not exceed $360,000,000 in the aggregate, net of the aggregate fair market value of
provided
 
all assets of the Bowling & Billiards Division and the Fitness Division acquired after December 31, 2010, and, in any fiscal year, shall not exceed $120,000,000 in the aggregate, net of the aggregate fair market value of all assets of the Bowling & Billiards Division and the Fitness Division acquired after December 31, 2010; that (i) no more than $37,000,000 in the aggregate of the assets of the Bowling & Billiards Division, net of the aggregate fair market value of all assets of the Bowling & Billiards Division acquired after December 31, 2010, may be sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of in reliance upon this paragraph (g), and (ii) and no more than $67,000,000 in the aggregate of the assets of the Fitness Division, net of the aggregate fair market value of all assets of the Fitness Division acquired after December 31, 2010, may be sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of in reliance upon this paragraph (g);
provided
further
(h) Restricted Payments permitted by Section 6.08;
(i) Dispositions listed on Schedule 6.04;
(j) Dispositions of cash and Cash Equivalents in the ordinary course of business or in connection with a transaction otherwise permitted under this Agreement;
(k) Dispositions in connection with (i) a Permitted Foreign Securitization or (ii) a Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction;
(l) Dispositions of receivables, leases and secured loans in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices in connection with customer finance programs or Dispositions of receivables, leases and secured loans in the ordinary course of business in connection with any Floorplan Receivables Permitted Indebtedness;
(m) Dispositions of Inventory between or among any Borrower and any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices; and
(n) Dispositions of any interests in the BAC Joint Venture in connection with any amendment, modification, replacement or termination thereof permitted under Section 6.10;
that all Dispositions permitted hereby (other than those permitted by paragraphs (b) (to the extent the applicable transaction is solely among Loan Parties), and (f), (h) and (m) above) shall be made for fair value and (other than Permitted Non-Cash Sales and other than those permitted by paragraphs (b), (c), (d), (f), (h), (j), (k) and (m) above) for at least 75% cash consideration. "" means Dispositions for less than 75% cash consideration that taken together include assets having a fair value (net of liabilities assumed by the purchasers in connection with such Dispositions) of not more than $35,000,000, it being understood that a Disposition shall be deemed to be for 75% cash consideration from and after the date on which the aggregate cash consideration realized in respect of such Disposition (whether through cash payments made in respect of notes taken as initial consideration or cash payments received in respect of a further Disposition of any initial consideration or otherwise) equals or exceeds 75% of the total consideration received in respect thereof.
provided
Permitted Non-Cash Sales
SECTION 6.05 . No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, lease or otherwise transfer any property or assets to, or
Transactions with Affiliates
 
purchase, lease or otherwise acquire any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) transactions that are at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to such Borrower or such Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arm's-length basis from unrelated third parties, (b) transactions solely between or among any Borrower and any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party not involving any other Affiliate, (c) any loans, advances, Guarantees and other Investments permitted by Section 6.06(b), (c), (d), (f), (i) or (l), (d) any Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01A(b), (c), (d) or, to the extent relating to the foregoing, (f), (e) any Restricted Payment permitted by Section 6.08, (f) loans or advances to employees permitted under Section 6.06, (g) the payment of reasonable fees to directors of any Borrower or any Subsidiary who are not employees of such Borrower or Subsidiary, and compensation and employee benefit arrangements paid to, and indemnities provided for the benefit of, directors, officers or employees of the Borrowers or their Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business, (h) any issuances of securities or other payments, awards or grants in cash, securities or otherwise pursuant to, or the funding of, employment agreements, stock options, equity incentive and stock ownership plans approved by a Borrower's or Subsidiary's board of directors and the 2005 Elective Deferred Incentive Compensation Plan, (i) transactions with the BAC Joint Venture consisting of (x) receivables securitizations entered into in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices and (y) cash equity contributions by the Company and/or any Subsidiary to the BAC Joint Venture permitted by Section 6.06(n), (j) transactions arising in connection with any Permitted Foreign Securitization or any Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction, and (k) sales of Inventory permitted by Section 6.04(m).
SECTION 6.06 . No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a Loan Party and a wholly owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any Equity Interests, evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances or extensions of credit to, Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person constituting a business unit (whether through purchase of assets, merger or otherwise) (each such transaction, an ""), except:
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions
Investment
(a) Cash Equivalents;
(b) Investments in existence on the date of this Agreement and described on Schedule 6.06;
(c) intercompany Investments (including intercompany Guarantees of Indebtedness) by the Company in any Subsidiary or by any Subsidiary in the Company or any other Subsidiary; that the aggregate amount of any Investments made after the Effective Date in reliance on this paragraph (c) by Loan Parties in Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties (other than Investments arising as a result of cash management transactions in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices and Guarantees permitted under Section 6.01A(k)) shall not exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding plus, so long as both
provided
 
immediately before and immediately after giving effect thereto the Payment Conditions are satisfied, additional amounts;
pro
forma
(d) Guarantees constituting Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01A; that the aggregate amount of any Guarantees incurred in reliance on this paragraph (d) by any Loan Party of any Indebtedness of Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties shall not exceed $10,000,000;
provided
(e) loans or advances made by any Loan Party and the Subsidiaries to their employees on an arms'-length basis in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices for travel and entertainment expenses, relocation costs and similar purposes up to a maximum of $10,000,000 in the aggregate at any time outstanding;
(f) notes payable, or stock or other securities issued by Account Debtors to any Loan Party pursuant to negotiated agreements with respect to settlement of such Account Debtor's Accounts and other Investments arising in connection with the compromise, settlement or collection of accounts receivable, in each case in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices;
(g) Investments in the form of Swap Agreements permitted by Section 6.12;
(h) Investments of any Person existing at the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary of the Company or consolidates or merges with the Company or any of the Subsidiaries (including in connection with a Permitted Acquisition) so long as such Investments were not made in contemplation of such Person becoming a Subsidiary or of such merger;
(i) Investments received in connection with the dispositions of assets permitted by Section 6.04;
(j) Investments constituting deposits described in clauses (c) and (d) of the definition of the term "Permitted Encumbrances.";
(k) Permitted Acquisitions, so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Permitted Acquisition, the Payment Conditions are satisfied;
pro
forma
(l) Guarantees of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of leases (other than Capital Leases) or of other obligations that do not constitute Indebtedness, in each case entered into in the ordinary course of business;
(m) so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Investment, the Payment Conditions are satisfied, any other Investment;
pro
forma
(n) Investments in the BAC Joint Venture (A) existing on the Effective Date, and (B) made after the Effective Date pursuant to the BAC Joint Venture Obligations in accordance with the BAC LLC Agreement as in effect on the Effective Date (or as amended or replaced in accordance with Section 6.10); and Investments made in Brunswick Financial
 
Services Corporation to the extent the proceeds thereof are applied to make any such Investment in the BAC Joint Venture;
(o)(i) Investments in the joint ventures identified on Schedule 6.06(o) from and after the Effective Date in an aggregate amount not to exceed $10,000,000 at any time outstanding; that immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Investment, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result therefrom; (ii) Investments to acquire minority interests in Foreign Subsidiaries from and after the Effective Date in an aggregate amount not to exceed $10,000,000 at any time outstanding; that immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Investment, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result therefrom; and (iii) additional Investments in joint ventures and Permitted Foreign Acquisitions, in each case, so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Investment or Permitted Foreign Acquisitions the Payment Conditions are satisfied;
provided
pro
forma
provided
pro
forma
pro
forma
(p) Investments acquired as a result of the performance of Customer Finance Program Obligations and other Investments arising in connection with the compromise, settlement or collection of such Investments in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices; Investments consisting of Indebtedness of customers held pending Disposition pursuant to a customer finance program in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices; and Investments in an aggregate amount not to exceed $5,000,000 at any time outstanding of Blue Water Dealer Services, Inc. consisting of Indebtedness of retail customers held until funded by a retail finance lender;
(q) Investments arising in connection with any Permitted Foreign Securitization or any Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction and Investments that are Floorplan Borrowing Base Assets;
(r) Investments to acquire Bowling Assets in an aggregate amount not to exceed $20,000,000 at any time outstanding; that immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such Investment, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would result therefrom; and
provided
pro
forma
(s) other Investments not otherwise permitted by this Section 6.06 in an aggregate amount not to exceed $25,000,000 at any time outstanding.
SECTION 6.07 . No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, whereby it shall sell or transfer any property, real or personal, used or useful in its business, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, and thereafter rent or lease such property or other property that it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property sold or transferred, except for (i) any such sale of any fixed or capital assets by any Borrower or any Subsidiary that is made for cash consideration in an amount not less than the fair value of such fixed or capital asset and is consummated within 180 days after such Borrower or such Subsidiary acquires or completes the construction of such fixed or capital asset, provided that the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated pursuant to this clause (i), together with the aggregate
Sale and Leaseback Transactions
 
principal amount of Indebtedness incurred under Section 6.01A(e) at any time outstanding, shall not exceed $50,000,000, (ii) Permitted Refinancing Sale and Leaseback Transactions in an aggregate amount at any time outstanding, together with the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated under clause (iii) below and the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness incurred under Section 6.01A(i), not to exceed $500,000,000, (iii) Permitted Other Sale and Leaseback Transactions in an aggregate amount at any time outstanding not to exceed $70,000,000 or, together with the aggregate amount of sale and leaseback transactions consummated under clause (ii) above and the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness incurred under Section 6.01A(i), not to exceed $500,000,000, (iv) Permitted Foreign Sale and Leaseback Transactions in an aggregate amount, together with the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness incurred under Section 6.01A(k) at any time outstanding, not to exceed the greater of (x) $100,000,000 and (y) 4.0% of the aggregate assets held by, or related to, the Foreign Subsidiaries of the Company determined at any time in accordance with GAAP as disclosed in the financial statements or in the footnotes to the financial statements of the Company most recently delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) (or, prior to the first such delivery of financial statements, in the financial statements referred to in Section 3.04(a)), and (v) Fond du Lac Sale and Leaseback Transactions in an aggregate amount, together with the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness incurred under Section 6.01A(u) and the aggregate amount of any refinancing Indebtedness in respect of such Indebtedness incurred in reliance on Section 6.01A(f) at any time outstanding, not to exceed $70,000,000.
SECTION 6.08 .
Restricted Payments; Certain Payments of Indebtedness
(a) No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, declare or make, or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, or incur any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to do so, except (i) each Loan Party and its Subsidiaries may declare and pay dividends or other distributions with respect to its common Equity Interests payable solely in additional shares of its common Equity Interests, and, with respect to its preferred Equity Interests, payable solely in additional shares of such preferred Equity Interests or in shares of its common Equity Interests, (ii) Subsidiaries may declare and pay dividends ratably with respect to their Equity Interests, (iii) the Company may make Restricted Payments, not exceeding $2,000,000 during any fiscal year, pursuant to and in accordance with stock option plans or other benefit plans for management or employees of the Company and any of its Subsidiaries and for deceased and terminated employees and present and former directors (including their estates), (iv) the Company may declare and pay dividends with respect to any preferred Equity Interests issued pursuant to Section 6.01B and (v) so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, the Company may make other Restricted Payments in an aggregate amount not to exceed $35,000,000 plus, so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect thereto the Payment Conditions are satisfied, additional amounts.
pro
forma
pro
forma
(b) No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, make or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) of or in respect of principal of or interest on any Indebtedness, or any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or
 
similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any Indebtedness, except:
(i) payment of Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents;
(ii) payment of regularly scheduled interest and principal payments as and when due in respect of any Indebtedness, other than payments in respect of the Subordinated Indebtedness prohibited by the subordination provisions thereof;
(iii) refinancings of Indebtedness to the extent permitted by Section 6.01A;
(iv) payment of secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the Disposition of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
(v) payment of Indebtedness owed to the Company or any other Loan Party, payment of Indebtedness owed to any Subsidiary arising in respect of cash management transactions in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices, and payment of any Indebtedness owed to any Subsidiary that was originally incurred as a cash management transaction in the ordinary course of business and consistent with past practices;
(vi) payment of Indebtedness under overdraft facilities and under short-term or demand credit facilities;
(vii) so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, repayments or repurchases of the Existing 2013 Notes; and
pro
forma
(viii) so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, other payments in respect of Indebtedness in an aggregate amount not to exceed $35,000,000 plus, so long as both immediately before and immediately after giving effect thereto the Payment Conditions are satisfied, additional amounts.
pro
forma
pro
forma
SECTION 6.09 . No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that prohibits, restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of such Loan Party or any of its Subsidiaries to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its property or assets to secure the Secured Obligations, (b) the ability of any Subsidiary to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to any of its Equity Interests or to make or repay loans or advances to, or other Investments in, any Borrower or any other Subsidiary or to Guarantee the Secured Obligations or (c) the ability of any Subsidiary to transfer any of its assets to the Borrowers or any other Subsidiary of the Borrowers; provided that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by any Loan Document, (ii) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions existing on the date hereof identified on Schedule 6.09 (or to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification thereof (or, in the case of any such restriction or condition contained in any agreement relating to the BAC Joint Venture, any replacement thereof, whether contained in the same or a different document),
Restrictive Agreements
 
to the extent the scope of any such restriction or condition is not expanded in any material respect), (iii) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to (A) Indebtedness secured by, or sale and leaseback transactions in respect of, Available Collateral, provided such restrictions apply solely to the assets included in the Available Collateral and the Subsidiaries that own the Available Collateral, (B) (i) any Permitted Foreign Securitization, provided such restrictions apply solely to the applicable Foreign Receivables and related assets, any applicable Permitted Foreign Securitization Subsidiary and the Subsidiaries that own such Foreign Receivables, or (ii) any Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction, such restrictions apply solely to the applicable Floorplan Borrowing Base Assets and related assets or interests therein, any applicable Permitted Floorplan Vehicle Transaction Subsidiary and the Company and any Subsidiaries that own such Floorplan Borrowing Base Assets and related assets or interests therein, (C) any Indebtedness incurred under Section 6.01A(k), provided such restrictions apply solely to the applicable Foreign Subsidiary or Foreign Holdco and its Subsidiaries, or (D) Indebtedness secured by, or sale and leaseback transactions in respect of, the Fond du Lac Facility, provided such restrictions apply solely to the Fond du Lac Facility and the Subsidiaries that own the Fond du Lac Facility, (iv) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Subsidiary or assets pending such sale, provided such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Subsidiary or assets to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (v) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to (x) the Mercury Facility or any other secured Indebtedness or any sale and leaseback transaction permitted by this Agreement if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the property or assets securing such Indebtedness or (y) any Indebtedness of any Foreign Subsidiary if such restrictions or conditions apply only to property or assets of Foreign Subsidiaries, (vi) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to customary provisions in leases restricting the assignment thereof, and (vii) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed on any Subsidiary by agreements relating to Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01A(l) and in existence at the time such Subsidiary became a Subsidiary.
provided
SECTION 6.10 . No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive any of its rights under (a) any agreement relating to any Subordinated Indebtedness, the Existing Notes (including the Existing Notes Indenture), the Existing 2016 Notes, the Existing 2023 Debentures, the BAC LLC Agreement or any Material Indebtedness permitted pursuant to Section 6.01A(i) or (j) or (b) its certificate of incorporation, by-laws, operating, management or partnership agreement or other organizational documents, in each case to the extent any such amendment, modification or waiver would be materially adverse to the Lenders. For the avoidance of doubt, and without limitation, the following amendments, modifications, replacements or waivers of the BAC LLC Agreement shall be deemed not to be materially adverse to the Lenders: (1) any increase in pricing, (2) any termination thereof or any change of the term so long as both immediately before and after giving effect thereto there shall not be an Event of Default under paragraph (q) of Article VII, (3) any change in Customer Finance Program Obligations so long as at the time of such amendment, modification or waiver the aggregate amount of any incremental Customer Finance Program Obligations to be incurred as a result thereof would be permitted under the next succeeding sentence, (4) any agreement to incur any Indebtedness, to provide any Lien or to make any Investment so long as at the time of such amendment, modification or waiver such Indebtedness, Lien or Investment would be permitted
Amendment of Material Documents; Customer Finance Program Obligations
 
to be incurred under Section 6.01A, 6.02 or 6.06 respectively, and (5) any modification or replacement resulting in one or more successor joint ventures to Brunswick Acceptance Company, LLC, or in one or more successor contractual arrangements, pursuant to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries obtains floorplan financing for the domestic boat and engine dealers of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries whether or not such Person or arrangement (x) involves Brunswick Acceptance Company, LLC, (y) is structured as a joint venture or (z) is owned in any part by the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company. As at the last day of any fiscal quarter of the Company ending after the Effective Date, the aggregate amount of (A) Customer Finance Program Obligations that are inventory repurchase obligations shall not exceed the greater of (x) 25% of the aggregate outstanding amount as of such day of the dealer obligations in respect of products of the Company and its Subsidiaries financed though any customer finance program and (y) $235,000,000, and (B) Customer Finance Program Obligations that are recourse obligations shall not exceed the greater of (x) 40% of the aggregate outstanding amount as of such day of the dealer obligations in respect of products of the Company and its Subsidiaries financed though any customer finance program and (y) $130,000,000.
SECTION 6.11 . In the event that Availability is at any time less than the greater of (x) 12.5% of the Total Commitments and (y) $37,500,000, and ending after Availability is greater than such amounts, the Loan Parties will not permit the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio as at the last day of any Test Period (including the last Test Period prior to the date on which Availability is first less than such amount for which financial statements for the quarter or fiscal year then ended have been (or were required to be) delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or 5.01(b), as applicable) to be less than 1.00 to 1.00.
Minimum Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
SECTION 6.12 . No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any Swap Agreement, except (a) Swap Agreements entered into to hedge or mitigate risks to which any Borrower or any Subsidiary has actual exposure (other than those in respect of Equity Interests of any Subsidiary of the Company, except for Swap Agreements having an aggregate notional amount for all such Swap Agreements not to exceed $50,000,000 that are entered into for the purpose of hedging (i) the distribution of proceeds to be received from the disposition of an asset or (ii) the anticipated earnings of a Subsidiary) and (b) Swap Agreements entered into in order to effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of any Borrower or any Subsidiary or with respect to any refinancing or replacement of any such liability or investment or any potential issuance of Indebtedness.
Swap Agreements
SECTION 6.13 . No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, permit the fiscal year of any Loan Party to end on a day other than December 31 or change a Loan Party's method of determining fiscal quarters.
Changes in Fiscal Periods
SECTION 6.14 . No Loan Party will, nor will it permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any business, either directly or through any Subsidiary, except for those businesses in which the Loan Party and its Subsidiaries are engaged on the date of this Agreement or that are reasonably related thereto.
Lines of Business
 
If any of the following events ("") shall occur:
Events of Default
(a) any Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
(b) any Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement or under any other Loan Document, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days or more;
(c) any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of any Loan Party or any of their Subsidiaries in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or thereof or waiver hereunder or thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or thereof or waiver hereunder or thereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made or furnished;
(d) any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 4.01(j), 5.02(a), 5.03 (with respect to any Loan Party's existence) or 5.08 or Article VI, or, during a Cash Dominion Period, commit a material breach of any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 7.1 of the Security Agreement;
(e) any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in this Agreement (other than those specified in clause (a), (b), (c) or (d) of this Article) or any other Loan Document and such failure shall continue unremedied (i) for a period of 5 or more days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender) if such breach relates to terms or provisions of Section 5.01(f) or 5.01(g), (ii) for a period of 15 or more days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender) if such breach relates to terms or provisions of Section 5.10 or 5.11 or (iii) for a period of 30 or more days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender) if such breach relates to terms or provisions of any other Section of this Agreement or any other Loan Document;
(f) any Loan Party or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness, when and as the same shall become due and payable, or any event or condition occurs
 
that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (f) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
provided
(g) an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) bankruptcy, liquidation, winding up, dissolution, reorganization, examination, suspension of general operations or other relief in respect of a Loan Party or any Subsidiary (other than any Non-Material Subsidiary) of a Loan Party or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Insolvency Law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for any Loan Party or any Subsidiary (other than any Non-Material Subsidiary) of any Loan Party or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for a period of 60 or more days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
(h) any Loan Party or any Subsidiary (other than any Non-Material Subsidiary) of any Loan Party shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Insolvency Law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (g) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for any Loan Party or any Subsidiary (other than any Non-Material Subsidiary) of a Loan Party or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
(i) any Loan Party or any Subsidiary (other than any Non-Material Subsidiary) of a Loan Party shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
(j) one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $35,000,000 shall be rendered against any Loan Party or any Subsidiary of any Loan Party or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor to attach or levy upon any assets of any Loan Party or any Subsidiary of any Loan Party to enforce any such judgment;
(k)(i) an ERISA Event shall have occurred, (ii) a trustee shall be appointed by a United States district court to administer any Plan, (iii) the PBGC shall institute proceedings to terminate any Plan(s), (iv) any Loan Party or any of their respective ERISA Affiliates shall have been notified by the sponsor of a Multiemployer Plan that it has incurred or will be assessed Withdrawal Liability to such Multiemployer Plan, or (v)
 
any other event or condition shall occur or exist with respect to a Plan; and in each case in clauses (i) through (v) above, such event or condition, that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
(l) a Change in Control shall occur;
(m) the Loan Guaranty shall fail to remain in full force or effect with respect to any Guarantor or any action shall be taken by any Guarantor to discontinue or to assert the invalidity or unenforceability of the Loan Guaranty with respect to any Guarantor, or any Guarantor shall deny that it has any further liability under the Loan Guaranty, or shall give notice to such effect, or shall contest the enforceability of the Loan Guaranty;
(n) any Collateral Document shall for any reason fail to create a valid and perfected first priority security interest in any material portion of the Collateral (in the reasonable determination of the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders) purported to be covered thereby, except as permitted by the terms of the Loan Documents, or any material Collateral Document shall fail to remain in full force or effect or any action shall be taken by any Loan Party to discontinue or to assert the invalidity or unenforceability of any material Collateral Document, except in each case from the failure of the Administrative Agent, through no fault of any Loan Party, to maintain possession of certificates delivered to it representing securities pledged under any Collateral Document;
(o) any Loan Party or any Subsidiary of any Loan Party shall (i) be the subject of any proceeding or investigation pertaining to the release of any Hazardous Material into the indoor or outdoor environment, or (ii) violate any Environmental Law, which, in the case of any event described in clause (i) or clause (ii), has resulted in an Environmental Liability in an amount which, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, which Environmental Liability is not properly reserved against, paid, bonded or otherwise discharged within thirty (30) days or which is not being reasonably contested in good faith; provided that, after taking into account any such reserve, or the terms of any such payment, bond or discharge, or the pendency of any such contestment, such Environmental Liability could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect;
(p) or any Loan Party shall challenge the enforceability of any Loan Document or shall assert in writing, or engage in any action or inaction based on any such assertion, that any Loan Document has ceased to be or otherwise is not valid, binding and enforceable in accordance with its terms; or
(q) termination of the financing under the BAC LLC Agreement or any other domestic floor plan financing which reduces the aggregate amount of available domestic floor plan financing if, at any time thereafter prior to the replacement of the applicable floor plan financing, (x) the Company and its Subsidiaries have Floorplan Receivables in an aggregate amount greater than the greater of (A) $150,000,000 and (B) the Floorplan Receivables Permitted Amount and (y) Availability is less than $100,000,000;
 
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to any of the Borrowers described in clause (g) or (h) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Company (on behalf of itself and all other Loan Parties), take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times: (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Loan Parties accrued hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Loan Parties; in case of any event with respect to the Borrowers described in clause (g) or (h) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Loan Parties accrued hereunder, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Loan Parties. Upon the occurrence and the continuance of an Event of Default, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, exercise any rights and remedies provided to the Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents or at law or equity, including all remedies provided under the Uniform Commercial Code.
Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Lenders hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent hereunder and under the other Loan Documents and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf, including execution of the other Loan Documents, and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof or thereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
The Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such Person and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, invest in and generally engage in any kind of business with the Loan Parties or any Subsidiary of a Loan Party or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated hereby or by the other Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing as directed by
 
the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 10.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth herein and in the other Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to any Loan Party or any Subsidiary of any Loan Party that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 10.02) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall not be deemed to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by the Company or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or thereunder or in connection herewith or therewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth herein or therein, (iv) the adequacy, accuracy or completeness of any information (whether oral or written) set forth herein or therein, or in connection herewith or therewith, (v) the validity, enforceability, adequacy, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document, (vi) the creation, perfection or priority of Liens on the Collateral or the existence of the Collateral, or (vii) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, (i) any representation, notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing or communication believed by it to be genuine and to have been authorized, signed or sent by the proper Person, (ii) any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made or authorized by the proper Person or (iii) any statement made by a director, authorized signatory or employee of any Person regarding any matters which may reasonably be assumed to be within his or her knowledge or within his or her power to verify. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
 
The Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Lenders and the Company. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right to appoint a successor with (unless an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing) the prior written consent of the Company (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld). If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent's resignation shall nonetheless become effective and (1) the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder and (2) the Required Lenders shall perform the duties of the Administrative Agent (and all payments and communications provided to be made by, to or through the Administrative Agent shall instead be made by or to each Lender directly) until such time as the Required Lenders appoint a successor agent as provided for above in this paragraph. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges, obligations and duties of the retiring (or retired) Administrative Agent and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder (if not already discharged therefrom as provided above in this paragraph). The fees payable by the Company to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Company and such successor. After the Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and Section 10.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
Each Lender hereby agrees that (a) it has requested a copy of each Report prepared by or on behalf of the Administrative Agent; (b) the Administrative Agent (i) makes no representation or warranty, express or implied, as to the completeness or accuracy of any Report or any of the information contained therein or any inaccuracy or omission contained in or relating to a Report and (ii) shall not be liable for any information contained in any Report; (c) the Reports are not comprehensive audits or examinations, and that any Person performing any field examination will inspect only specific information regarding the Loan Parties and will rely significantly upon the Loan Parties' books and records, as well as on representations of the Loan Parties' personnel and that the Administrative Agent undertakes no obligation to update, correct or supplement the Reports; (d) it will keep all Reports confidential and strictly for its internal use, and it will not share the Report with any other Person except as otherwise permitted pursuant to Section 10.12 of this Agreement; and (e) without limiting the generality of any other indemnification provision contained in this Agreement, it will pay and protect, and indemnify, defend, and hold the Administrative Agent and any such other Person preparing a Report harmless from and against, the claims, actions, proceedings, damages, costs, expenses, and other
 
amounts (including reasonable attorney fees) incurred by as the direct or indirect result of any third parties who might obtain all or part of any Report through the indemnifying Lender (except as permitted pursuant to Section 10.12 of this Agreement).
Except as otherwise provided in Section 10.02(b) with respect to this Agreement, the Administrative Agent may, with the prior consent of the Required Lenders (but not otherwise), consent to any modification, supplement or waiver under any of the Loan Documents.
Each Lender, Issuing Lender and Agent hereby authorizes and directs the Administrative Agent to enter on its behalf into the intercreditor agreement contemplated by clause (ii) of Section 6.02(i) if the Company shall request that the Administrative Agent do so.
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Joint Lead Arrangers, Joint Bookrunners, Syndication Agent and Documentation Agents named on the cover page of this Agreement shall not have any duties or liabilities under this Agreement, except in their capacity, if any, as Lenders.
SECTION 9.01 . Each Guarantor hereby agrees that it is jointly and severally liable for, and, as primary obligor and not merely as surety, absolutely and unconditionally guarantees to each Secured Party and their respective successors and assigns the prompt payment in full when due (whether by acceleration or otherwise) of the principal of and interest on the Loans made by the Lenders to each Borrower and all reimbursement obligations in respect of LC Disbursements and all interest thereon payable by each Borrower pursuant to this Agreement, and all other amounts from time to time owing to the Secured Parties by each Borrower under this Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents, any Letter of Credit, any Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement, any Pari Secured Swap Agreement or any other document made, delivered or given in connection with any of the foregoing, in each case whether on account of principal, interest, reimbursement obligations, fees, indemnities, costs, expenses or otherwise (including, without limitation, all fees and disbursements of counsel to the Secured Parties, in each case strictly in accordance with the terms thereof (such obligations being herein collectively called the "Guaranteed Obligations"). Each Guarantor hereby further agrees that if any Borrower shall fail to pay in full when due (whether by acceleration or otherwise) any of the Guaranteed Obligations, such Guarantor will promptly pay the same, without any demand or notice whatsoever, and that in the case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, the same will be promptly paid in full when due (whether by acceleration or otherwise) in accordance with the terms of such extension or renewal.
The Guarantee
SECTION 9.02 . The Guaranteed Obligations of each Guarantor are absolute and unconditional, irrespective of the value, genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the obligations of the Borrowers under this Agreement, the other Loan Documents or any other agreement or instrument referred to herein, or any substitution, release or exchange of any other guarantee of or security for any of the Guaranteed Obligations,
Obligations Unconditional
 
and, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, irrespective of any other circumstance whatsoever that might otherwise constitute a legal or equitable discharge or defense of a surety or guarantor, it being the intent of this Section that the obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall be absolute and unconditional under any and all circumstances. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, it is agreed that the occurrence of any one or more of the following shall not alter or impair the liability of any Guarantor hereunder, which shall remain absolute and unconditional as described above:
(i) at any time or from time to time, without notice to such Guarantor, the time for any performance of or compliance with any of the Guaranteed Obligations shall be extended, or such performance or compliance shall be waived;
(ii) any of the acts mentioned in any of the provisions of this Agreement or any other agreement or instrument referred to herein shall be done or omitted;
(iii) the maturity of any of the Guaranteed Obligations shall be accelerated, or any of the Guaranteed Obligations shall be modified, supplemented or amended in any respect, or any right under this Agreement or any other agreement or instrument referred to herein shall be waived or any other guarantee of any of the Guaranteed Obligations or any security therefor shall be released or exchanged in whole or in part or otherwise dealt with; or
(iv) any lien or security interest granted to, or in favor of, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or Issuing Lenders or any Lender or Lenders as security for any of the Guaranteed Obligations shall fail to be perfected.
Each Guarantor hereby expressly waives diligence, presentment, demand of payment, protest and all notices whatsoever, and any requirement that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender exhaust any right, power or remedy or proceed against any Borrower or Guarantor under this Agreement or any other agreement or instrument referred to herein, or against any other Person under any other guarantee of, or security for, any of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Each Guarantor represents and warrants that in executing and delivering this Agreement as guarantor, such Guarantor has (i) without reliance on any Lender, any Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent or any information received from any Lender, any Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent and based upon such documents and information such Guarantor deems appropriate, made an independent investigation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the other Loan Parties, their respective business, assets, operations, prospects and condition, financial or otherwise, and any circumstances which may bear upon such transactions, the other Loan Parties or the obligations and risks undertaken herein with respect to the Guaranteed Obligations; (ii) adequate means to obtain from the other Loan Parties on a continuing basis information concerning the other Loan Parties; (iii) full and complete access to the Loan Documents and any other documents executed in connection with the Loan Documents; and (iv) not relied and will not rely upon any representations or warranties of any Lender, any Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent not embodied herein or any acts heretofore or hereafter taken by any
 
Lender, any Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent (including any review by any Lender, any Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or the Administrative Agent of the affairs of any other Loan Party).
SECTION 9.03 . The obligations of each Guarantor under this Article shall be automatically reinstated if and to the extent that for any reason any payment by or on behalf of any Borrower in respect of the Guaranteed Obligations is rescinded or must be otherwise restored by any holder of any of the Guaranteed Obligations, whether as a result of any proceedings in bankruptcy or reorganization or otherwise, and such Guarantor agrees that it will indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender and each Lender on demand for all reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable fees of counsel) incurred by the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or such Lender in connection with such rescission or restoration, including any such reasonable costs and expenses incurred in defending against any claim alleging that such payment constituted a preference, fraudulent transfer or similar payment under any bankruptcy, insolvency or similar law.
Reinstatement
SECTION 9.04 . Each Guarantor hereby agrees that until the payment and satisfaction in full of all Secured Obligations and the expiration or termination of all Letters of Credit and all Commitments, it shall not exercise any right or remedy arising by reason of any performance by it of its guarantee in Section 9.01, whether by subrogation or otherwise, against any Loan Party or any other guarantor of any of the Guaranteed Obligations or any security for any of the Guaranteed Obligations.
Subrogation
SECTION 9.05 . Each Guarantor agrees that, as between each Guarantor on the one hand and the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lenders and the Lenders on the other, the obligations of each Borrower under this Agreement may be declared to be forthwith due and payable as provided in Article VII (and shall be deemed to have become automatically due and payable in the circumstances provided in Article VII) for purposes of Section 9.01 notwithstanding any stay, injunction or other prohibition preventing such declaration (or such obligations from becoming automatically due and payable) as against such Borrower and that, in the event of such declaration (or such obligations being deemed to have become automatically due and payable), such obligations (whether or not due and payable by such Borrower) shall forthwith become due and payable by the Guarantors for purposes of Section 9.01.
Remedies
SECTION 9.06 . Each Guarantor hereby acknowledges that the guarantee in this Article constitutes an instrument for the payment of money, and consents and agrees that any Issuing Lender, any Lender or the Administrative Agent, at its sole option, in the event of a dispute by any Guarantor in the payment of any moneys due hereunder, shall have the right to bring motion-action under New York CPLR Section 3213.
Instrument for the Payment of Money
SECTION 9.07 . The guarantee in this Article is a continuing guarantee, and shall apply to all Guaranteed Obligations whenever arising until the expiration or termination of the Commitments and payment in full of the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees and other amounts payable hereunder and the expiration or termination of all Letters of Credit and the reimbursement of all LC Disbursements.
Continuing Guarantee
 
SECTION 9.08 . In addition to all such rights of indemnity and subrogation as the Guarantors may have under applicable law (but subject to Section 9.10), the Company agrees that (a) in the event a payment in respect of any Guaranteed Obligation or Secured Obligation shall be made by any Guarantor under this Agreement, the Company shall indemnify such Guarantor for the full amount of such payment and such Guarantor shall be subrogated to the rights of the Person to whom such payment shall have been made to the extent of such payment and (b) in the event any assets of any Guarantor shall be sold pursuant to this Agreement or any Collateral Document to satisfy in whole or in part any Guaranteed Obligation or Secured Obligation owed to any Secured Party, the Company shall indemnify such Guarantor in an amount equal to the greater of the book value or the fair market value of the assets so sold.
Indemnity and Subrogation
SECTION 9.09 . Each Guarantor (a "") agrees (subject to Section 9.10) that, in the event a payment shall be made by any other Guarantor hereunder in respect of any Guaranteed Obligation or any assets of any other Guarantor (other than the Company) shall be sold pursuant to any Security Document to satisfy any Secured Obligation owed to any Secured Party and such other Guarantor (the "Claiming Party") shall not have been fully indemnified by the Company as provided in Section 9.08, the Contributing Party shall indemnify the Claiming Party in an amount equal to the amount of such payment or the greater of the book value or the fair market value of such assets, as the case may be, in each case multiplied by a fraction of which the numerator shall be the net worth of the Contributing Party on the date hereof and the denominator shall be the aggregate net worth of all the Guarantors (other than the Company) on the date hereof (or, in the case of any Guarantor becoming a party hereto after the date hereof, the date on which it became a Guarantor). Any Contributing Party making any payment to a Claiming Party pursuant to this Section 9.09 shall (subject to Section 9.10) be subrogated to the rights of such Claiming Party under Section 9.08 to the extent of such payment.
Contribution and Subrogation
Contributing Party
SECTION 9.10 . Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, all rights of the Guarantors under Sections 9.08 and 9.09 and all other rights of the Guarantors of indemnity, contribution or subrogation under applicable law or otherwise shall be fully subordinated to the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Secured Obligations. No failure on the part of the Company or any Guarantor to make the payments required by Sections 9.08 and 9.09 (or any other payments required under applicable law or otherwise) shall in any respect limit the obligations and liabilities of any Guarantor with respect to its obligations hereunder, and each Guarantor shall remain liable for the full amount of the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder.
Subordination
SECTION 9.11 . Anything herein or in any other Loan Document to the contrary notwithstanding, the maximum liability of each Guarantor under Section 9.01 and under the other Loan Documents shall in no event exceed the amount which is permitted under applicable federal and state laws relating to the insolvency of debtors (after giving effect to the right of contribution established in the last paragraph of this Section 9.11).
Maximum Liability and Contribution
(a) Each Guarantor agrees that the Guaranteed Obligations may at any time and from time to time exceed the amount of the liability of such Guarantor hereunder without impairing
 
the guarantee contained in this Article IX or affecting the rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent or any Lender hereunder.
Each Guarantor hereby agrees that to the extent that a Guarantor shall have paid more than its proportionate share of any payment made hereunder, such Guarantor shall be entitled to seek and receive contribution from and against any other Guarantor hereunder which has not paid its proportionate share of such payment. Each Guarantor's right of contribution shall be subject to the terms and conditions of Section 9.04. The provisions of this paragraph shall in no respect limit the obligations and liabilities of any Guarantor to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, and each Guarantor shall remain liable to the Administrative Agent and the Secured Parties for the full amount guaranteed by such Guarantor hereunder.
SECTION 10.01 . (a) Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by facsimile, as follows:
Notices
(i) if to the Company, to it at 1 N. Field Court, Lake Forest, Illinois 60045, Attention of William Metzger, Vice President and Treasurer (Facsimile No. (847) 735-4359; Telephone No. (847) 735-4364);
(ii) if to any other Loan Party, to the Company at the address set forth above (with a copy to such Loan Party at its address (or facsimile number), if any, (x) in the case of any Loan Party party hereto on the Effective Date, provided below its signature hereto (if any) or (y) in the case of any Loan Party that becomes party hereto after the Effective Date, set forth in the Designation Letter to which it is a party (if any);
(iii) if to the Administrative Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 1111 Fannin, 10
th
Floor, Houston, Texas 77002-8069, Attention of Loan and Agency Services Group (Telephone No. (713) 750-2199; Facsimile No. (713) 427-6889), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York 10017, Attention of Tony Yung (Facsimile No. (212) 270-6637; Telephone No. (212) 270-0586);
(iv) if to an Issuing Lender, to it at its address (or facsimile number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire;
(v) if to the Swingline Lender, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 1111 Fannin Street, 10
th
Floor, Houston, Texas 77002-8069, Attention of Loan and Agency Services (Telephone No. (713) 750-2199; Facsimile No. (713) 427-6889), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, 270 Park Avenue, New York 10017, Attention of Tony Yung (Facsimile No. (212) 270-6637; Telephone No. (212) 270-0586); and
 
(vi) if to a Lender, to it at its address (or facsimile number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
All such notices and other communications (i) sent by hand or overnight courier service, or mailed by certified or registered mail, shall be deemed to have been given when received or (ii) sent by facsimile shall be deemed to have been given when sent, that if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient.
provided
(b) Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; that the foregoing shall not apply to notices to any Lender pursuant to Article II unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and such Lender. The Administrative Agent or the Company (on behalf of itself and all other Loan Parties) may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications. All such notices and other communications (i) sent to an e-mail address shall be deemed received upon the sender's receipt of an acknowledgement from the intended recipient (such as by the "return receipt requested" function, as available, return e-mail or other written acknowledgement), provided that if not given during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next Business Day for the recipient, and (ii) posted to an Internet or intranet website shall be deemed received upon the deemed receipt by the intended recipient at its e-mail address as described in the foregoing clause (b)(i) of notification that such notice or communication is available and identifying the website address therefor. Without limiting the foregoing, the Administrative Agent agrees that, unless it shall otherwise advise the Company, notices to be delivered by any Borrower to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Article II (including any such notices permitted to be given by telephone or facsimile) may be delivered by e-mail transmissions to the Administrative Agent at such e-mail address (or addresses) as the Administrative Agent shall from time to time notify the Company.
provided
provided
(c) Any party hereto may change its address or facsimile number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto (or, in the case of any such change by a Lender, by notice to the Company and the Administrative Agent).
SECTION 10.02 .
Waivers; Amendments
(a) . No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lenders and the Lenders hereunder are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of this Agreement or consent to any departure by any Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and
No Deemed Waivers; Remedies Cumulative
 
for the purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Lender may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
(b) . Except as provided in Section 2.23, neither this Agreement, nor the other Loan Documents, nor any provision hereof or thereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Company (on behalf of itself and all other Loan Parties) and the Required Lenders or by the Company (on behalf of itself and all other Loan Parties) and the Administrative Agent with the written consent of the Required Lenders; that no such agreement shall
Amendments
provided
(i) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender;
(ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby;
(iii) postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby;
(iv) change Section 2.09(d) without the consent of each Lender affected thereby;
(v) change the obligations of the Company pursuant to Article IX without the written consent of each Lender;
(vi) change any of the provisions of this Section or the percentage in the definition of the term "Required Lenders", "Supermajority Lenders" or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender;
(vii) subject to the requirements of clause (viii) below, change the definition of Borrowing Base or any eligibility criteria incorporated therein that, in each case, have the effect of increasing Availability without the written consent of the Supermajority Lenders;
(viii) permit any Loan Party to assign its rights hereunder, increase the advance rates set forth in the definition of Borrowing Base, release all or substantially all of the Collateral or, except as otherwise expressly permitted herein, release any material Guarantor from its Loan Guaranty without the consent of each Lender;
 
(ix) change any of the provisions of Section 2.22 without the written consent of each of the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Lenders;
(x) subordinate any Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent or Lenders or subordinate payment under any Loan Document without the written consent of each Lender; or
(xi) change any of the provisions of Section 2.18(b) without the written consent of each Lender.
further that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be.
provided
(c) The Lenders hereby irrevocably authorize the Administrative Agent (i) to take all actions specified in Section 10.18 with respect to any termination of the Guarantee of a Guarantor or the release of any Collateral, and (ii) at its option and in its sole discretion, to release any Lien granted to it by any Loan Party on any Collateral that it subsequently determines in accordance the provisions of Section 5.13(e) need not have been made subject to a Lien. Except as provided in the immediately preceding sentence, the Administrative Agent will not release any Liens on Collateral without the prior written authorization of the Required Lenders (or all of the Lenders as set forth above). Any such release shall not in any manner discharge, affect, or impair the Secured Obligations or any Liens (other than those expressly being released) upon (or obligations of the Loan Parties in respect of) all interests retained by the Loan Parties, including the proceeds of any sale, all of which shall continue to constitute part of the Collateral.
(d) If, in connection with any proposed amendment, waiver or consent requiring the consent of "each Lender" or "each Lender affected thereby", the consent of the Supermajority Lenders is obtained, but the consent of other necessary Lenders is not obtained (any such Lender whose consent is necessary but not obtained being referred to herein as a ""), then the Borrowers may elect to replace a Non-Consenting Lender as a Lender party to this Agreement, that, concurrently with such replacement, (i) another bank or other entity (other than the Company or any of its Affiliates) which is reasonably satisfactory to the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent shall agree, as of such date, (x) to purchase for cash the Loans and other Borrower Obligations due to the Non-Consenting Lender pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption and to become a Lender for all purposes under this Agreement and to assume all obligations of the Non-Consenting Lender to be terminated as of such date, (y) to comply with the requirements of paragraph (b) of Section 10.04 (with the Borrowers or the replacement Lender being responsible for any applicable processing or recordation fee) and (z) to consent to the relevant proposed amendment, and (ii) the Borrowers shall pay to such Non-Consenting Lender in same day funds on the day of such replacement (1) all interest, fees and other amounts then accrued but unpaid to such Non-Consenting Lender by the Borrowers hereunder to and including the date of termination, including without limitation payments due to such Non-Consenting Lender under Sections 2.15 and 2.17, and (2) an amount, if any, equal to the payment which would have been due to such Lender on the day of such
Non-Consenting Lender
provided
 
replacement under Section 2.16 had the Loans of such Non-Consenting Lender been prepaid on such date rather than sold to the replacement Lender. Each Lender agrees that an assignment required to be made by it pursuant to this paragraph may be effected pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption executed by the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent and the assignee and that the Lender required to make such assignment need not be a party thereto.
SECTION 10.03 .
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
(a) . The Loan Parties shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Administrative Agent, in connection with the syndication and distribution (including, without limitation, via the internet or through a service such as Intralinks) of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of this Agreement and any other Loan Document or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions hereof or thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by any Issuing Lenders in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement, collection or protection of its rights in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit. Expenses being reimbursed by the Loan Parties under this Section include, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, costs and expenses incurred in connection with:
Costs and Expenses
(i) appraisals and insurance reviews;
(ii) field examinations and the preparation of Reports based on the fees charged by a third party retained by the Administrative Agent or the internally allocated fees for each Person employed by the Administrative Agent with respect to each field examination, together with the reasonable fees and expenses associated with collateral monitoring services performed by the Specialized Due Diligence Group of the Administrative Agent (and the Loan Parties agree to modify or adjust the computation of the Borrowing Basewhich may include maintaining additional Reserves, modifying the advance rates or modifying the eligibility criteria for the components of the Borrowing Baseto the extent required by the Administrative Agent as a result of any such evaluation, appraisal or monitoring);
(iii) taxes, fees and other charges for (A) lien and title searches and title insurance and (B) recording the Collateral Documents, filing financing statements and continuations, and other actions to perfect, protect, and continue the Administrative Agent's Liens;
 
(iv) sums paid or incurred to take any action required of any Loan Party under the Loan Documents that such Loan Party fails to pay or take; and
(v) forwarding loan proceeds, collecting checks and other items of payment, and establishing and maintaining the accounts and lock boxes, and costs and expenses of preserving and protecting the Collateral.
(b) . The Loan Parties shall, jointly and severally, indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an ""), against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of the Loan Documents or any agreement or instrument pursuant thereto, the performance by the parties thereto of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions in connection therewith, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by any Issuing Lender to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials under, at, on or from any property owned, leased or operated by the Loan Parties or any of their Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to the Loan Parties or any of their Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
Indemnification by the Loan Parties
Indemnitee
provided
(c) . To the extent that the Loan Parties fail to pay any amount required to be paid by them to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, such Lender's Applicable Percentage (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount; that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such.
Reimbursement by Lenders
provided
(d)  To the extent permitted by applicable law, no Loan Party shall assert, and each hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (including exemplary damages and as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
Waiver of Consequential Damages, Etc.
 
(e) . All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly after written demand therefor.
Payments
SECTION 10.04 .
Successors and Assigns
(a) . The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of any Issuing Lender that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) no Loan Party may assign or otherwise transfer any of its respective rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by any Loan Party without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of any Issuing Lender that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lenders, the Swingline Lender and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Assignments Generally
(b) . (i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
Assignments by Lenders
(A) the Company, that no consent of the Company shall be required (i) for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund or (ii) if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, for an assignment to any other Person;
provided
(B) the Administrative Agent; that no consent of the Administrative Agent shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund;
provided
(C) each Issuing Lender; that no consent of any Issuing Lender shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund; and
provided
(D) the Swingline Lender; that no consent of the Swingline Lender shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund.
provided
(ii) Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
(A) except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment or Loans of any Class, the amount of the Commitment or Loans of the
 
assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Company and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent; that no such consent of the Company shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing;
provided
(B) each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement;
(C) the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500, that assignments made pursuant to Section 2.19(b) or 10.02(d) shall not require the signature of the assigning Lender to become effective; and
provided
(D) the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire in which the assignee designates one or more credit contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain material non-public information about the Company, the Loan Parties and their Related Parties or their respective securities) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the assignee's compliance procedures and applicable laws, including federal, provincial, territorial and state securities laws.
(iii) Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraphs (b)(iv) and (b)(v) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 10.03). Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 10.04 shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
(iv) The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of each Borrower, each Issuing Lender and each Lender, shall maintain at one of its offices in New York City a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of (w) the names and addresses of the Lenders, (x) the designation of any Lender as an Issuing Lender, (y) the Commitment of, and outstanding principal amount of each Loan made by, each Lender and (z) the outstanding amount of each Letter of Credit issued by, and of each unreimbursed LC Disbursement made by, each Issuing Lender (together with a notation of each Lender's participation therein pursuant to Section 2.06(e)), in all cases pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ""). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Loan Parties, the
Register
 
Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as an Issuing Lender or a Lender, as the case shall be, hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Loan Parties, any Issuing Lender and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
(v) Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignee's completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in this paragraph (b) and any written consent to such assignment required by this paragraph (b), the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register; that if either the assigning Lender or the assignee shall have failed to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.05, 2.06(e), 2.06(f), 2.07(b), 2.18(d) or 10.03(c), the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information therein in the Register unless and until such payment shall have been made in full, together with all accrued interest thereon. No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
provided
(c) . (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of any Loan Party, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any other Lender, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (a "") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (A) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Loan Parties, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lenders and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. For the avoidance of doubt, each Lender shall be responsible for the indemnity under Section 2.17(e) with respect to any payments made by such Lender to its Participant(s). Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 10.02(b) that affects such Participant. Subject to paragraph (c)(i) of this Section, the Borrowers agree that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits and subject to the limitations of Sections 2.15, 2.16 and 2.17 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant of which the Company has been given prior written notice also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 10.08 as though it were a Lender, that such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.18(d) and Section 2.19 as though it were a Lender. Each Lender that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrowers, maintain a register on which it enters the name and address of each Participant
Participations
Participant
provided
provided
provided
 
and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each Participant's interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement (the ""). The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary
Participant Register
(d)(ii) A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.15, 2.16 or 2.17 than the relevant Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Company's prior written consent (not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed); that the Participant complies with all obligations under or relating to Section 2.18(d) and Section 2.19, in all cases as though it were a Lender.
provided
(e) . Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any such pledge or assignment to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
Certain Pledges
provided
(f) . Anything in this Section to the contrary notwithstanding, no Lender may assign or participate any interest in any Loan or LC Exposure held by it hereunder to the Company or any of its Affiliates or Subsidiaries without the prior consent of each Lender.
No Assignments to the Company or Affiliates
SECTION 10.05 . All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties herein and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document (including the Designation Letters) shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17, 10.03 and 10.12 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the Transactions, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Survival
SECTION 10.06 . This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract between and
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness
 
among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. Except as provided in Section 4.01, this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page to this Agreement by facsimile shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
SECTION 10.07 . Any provision of this any Loan Document held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions thereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability
SECTION 10.08 . If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Loan Party against any of and all the Secured Obligations held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under the Loan Documents and although such obligations may be unmatured. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff
SECTION 10.09
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Judicial Proceedings; Etc.
(a) . This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
Governing Law
(b) . Each of the Loan Parties hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the state of New York, the courts of the United States for the Southern District of New York, and appellate courts from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement of any other Loan Document against any Loan Party or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
Submission to Jurisdiction
 
(c) . Each of the Loan Parties hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
Waiver of Venue
(d) . Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 10.01. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
Appointment of Agent for Service of Process
(e) . Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 10.01. Each Borrower hereby consents to process being served in any suit, action or proceeding of the nature referred to in Section 10.09(b) in any federal or New York State court sitting in New York City by service of process upon its agent appointed as provided in Section 10.09(d); that, to the extent lawful and possible, notice of said service upon such agent shall be mailed by registered or certified air mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to the Company and (if applicable to) such Borrower at its address set forth in the Designation Letter to which it is a party or to any other address of which such Borrower shall have given written notice to the Administrative Agent (with a copy thereof to the Company). Each Borrower irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, all claim of error by reason of any such service in such manner and agrees that such service shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon such Borrower in any such suit, action or proceeding and shall, to the fullest extent permitted by law, be taken and held to be valid and personal service upon and personal delivery to such Borrower. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
Service of Process
provided
SECTION 10.10 . EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY OR THEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
SECTION 10.11 . Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings
 
SECTION 10.12 . Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lenders and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (i) to its and its Affiliates' directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (ii) to the extent requested by any regulatory or self-regulatory authority, (iii) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (iv) to any other party to this Agreement, (v) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or under any other Loan Document or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder, (vi) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this paragraph, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Loan Parties and their respective obligations, (vii) with the consent of the Company or (viii) to the extent such Information (A) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this paragraph or (B) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis from a source other than any Borrower. For the purposes of this paragraph, "Information" means all information received from the Company or any of its Subsidiaries relating to the Company, its Subsidiaries or their respective business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis prior to disclosure by the Company; provided that, in the case of information received from the Company after the date hereof, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential. Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, after a Lender ceases to be a Lender under this Agreement, the provisions of this paragraph shall expire and cease to be effective with respect to such Lender on the date that is two years after the date such Lender ceased to be a Lender.
Confidentiality
EACH LENDER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT INFORMATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 10.12 FURNISHED TO IT PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY INCLUDE MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING THE COMPANY AND ITS AFFILIATES AND THEIR RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES, AND CONFIRMS THAT IT HAS DEVELOPED COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES REGARDING THE USE OF MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION AND THAT IT WILL HANDLE SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THOSE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL, PROVINCIAL, TERRITORIAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
ALL INFORMATION, INCLUDING REQUESTS FOR WAIVERS AND AMENDMENTS, FURNISHED BY THE BORROWERS OR THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT PURSUANT TO, OR IN THE COURSE OF ADMINISTERING, THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE SYNDICATE-LEVEL INFORMATION, WHICH MAY
 
CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION ABOUT THE COMPANY, THE LOAN PARTIES AND THEIR RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES. ACCORDINGLY, EACH LENDER REPRESENTS TO THE BORROWERS AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT THAT IT HAS IDENTIFIED IN ITS ADMINISTRATIVE QUESTIONNAIRE A CREDIT CONTACT WHO MAY RECEIVE INFORMATION THAT MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL, PROVINCIAL, TERRITORIAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
SECTION 10.13 . The Lenders agree that, as of the Effective Date, the Total Commitment (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement immediately prior to the Effective Date) shall be reduced by $100,000,000 and each Lender's Commitment (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement immediately prior to the Effective Date) shall be reduced by its Applicable Percentage (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement immediately prior to the Effective Date) thereof. This Agreement constitutes notice thereof and pursuant hereto the requirement contained in Section 2.09(c) of the Existing Credit Agreement that three Business Days' (as defined therein) notice of such reduction be given to the administrative agent thereunder is hereby waived.
Reduction of Commitments under Existing Credit Agreement
SECTION 10.14 . The respective obligations of the Lenders hereunder are several and not joint and the failure of any Lender to make any Loan or perform any of its obligations hereunder shall not relieve any other Lender from any of its obligations hereunder. Each Lender hereby represents that it is not relying on or looking to any Margin Stock for the repayment of the Borrowings provided for herein. Anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, neither any Issuing Lender nor any Lender shall be obligated to extend credit to the Borrowers in violation of any Requirement of Law.
Several Obligations; Nonreliance; Violation of Law
SECTION 10.15 . In the event of any conflict between the terms of this Agreement and the terms of any other Loan Document, the terms of this Agreement shall, to the extent of such conflict, prevail.
Conflicts
SECTION 10.16 . Each Lender hereby notifies the Loan Parties that pursuant to the requirements of the USA PATRIOT Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the ""), such Lender may be required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Loan Parties, which information includes the names and addresses of the Loan Parties and other information that will allow such Lender to identify the Loan Parties in accordance with said Act.
USA PATRIOT Act
Patriot Act
SECTION 10.17 . Each Subsidiary Borrower party hereto as of the Effective Date, by its signature below, and each Subsidiary Borrower designated after the Effective Date as a "Subsidiary Borrower" pursuant to Section 2.21, by its acknowledgment to the Designation Letter relating to such Subsidiary Borrower, as applicable:
Appointment of Company as Agent
 
(a) appoints and authorizes the Company for the purposes of (i) signing documents deliverable by or on behalf of such Subsidiary Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document, (ii) providing notices to or making requests of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender on behalf of such Subsidiary Borrower, (iii) receiving notices and documents from the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender on behalf of such Subsidiary Borrower, and (iv) taking any other action on behalf such Subsidiary Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document, in each case to the extent specifically provided for hereunder or thereunder, and such Subsidiary Borrower agrees to be irrevocably bound by all such actions being taken on behalf of such Subsidiary Borrower by the Company and all such notices received by the Company on behalf of such Subsidiary Borrower; that another Person may be appointed to act in substitution for the Company with the power and authority granted thereto by such Subsidiary Borrower under this clause (a) so long as such Person shall have been certified as such in a single writing executed by such Subsidiary Borrower and delivered to the Administrative Agent;
provided
(b) authorizes the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender and each Lender to treat (i) each document signed by, each notice given or received by, each document delivered or received by and each request made by the Company on its behalf and (ii) each other action which specifically provides herein or therein that the Company acts on behalf, or at the direction, of such Subsidiary Borrower as if such Subsidiary Borrower (and not the Company) had in fact signed such document, given or received such notice, delivered or received such document, made such request or taken such action; and
(c) acknowledges that the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Lender and each Lender are relying upon the appointments and authorizations set forth in this Section in connection with the making of their Commitments and credit extensions hereunder.
In the event the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Lender or any Lender reasonably believes that it has received a conflicting notice or instruction from the Company and/or his or her designees, the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Lender or such Lender may refrain from action upon such notice or instruction and shall promptly request the Company for clarification regarding such notice or instruction.
SECTION 10.18 . A Guarantor shall automatically be released from its obligations under the Loan Documents and all security interests in the Collateral of such Guarantor, and in the Equity Interests in such Guarantor, shall be automatically released upon the consummation of any transaction permitted by this Agreement as a result of which such Guarantor ceases to be a Subsidiary. Upon any sale, lease, transfer or other Disposition by any Guarantor of any Collateral that is permitted under this Agreement to any Person that is not another Guarantor or, upon the effectiveness of any release of the security interest granted hereby in any Collateral pursuant to Section 10.02(c), the security interest in such Collateral shall be automatically released. Upon the incurrence of any Indebtedness secured by any Available Collateral or Fond du Lac Facility or any Floorplan Borrowing Base Assets, or the consummation of any sale and leaseback transaction in respect of any Available Collateral or Fond du Lac Facility, in each case that is permitted by this
Release of Liens and Guarantees
 
Agreement, the security interest in such Available Collateral or Fond du Lac Facility or Floorplan Borrowing Base Assets shall be automatically released. In connection with any termination or release pursuant to this Section, the Administrative Agent, upon receipt of such certificates or other documents reasonably requested by it to confirm compliance with this Agreement, shall promptly execute and deliver to any Guarantor, at such Guarantor's expense, all documents that such Guarantor shall reasonably request to evidence such termination or release.
SECTION 10.19 . Any reference in any of the Loan Documents to a Permitted Lien is not intended to subordinate or postpone, and shall not be interpreted as subordinating or postponing, or as any agreement to subordinate or postpone, any Lien created by any of the Loan Documents to any Permitted Lien.
Permitted Liens; Certain Subordinations
SECTION 10.20 . The Lenders party hereto on the Effective Date that are "Lenders" under the Existing Credit Agreement taken together constitute the "Required Lenders" under the Existing Credit Agreement and hereby waive the requirement under Section 2.09(c) of the Existing Credit Agreement that notice of termination of the commitments under the Existing Credit Agreement be delivered not less than three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination, provided that such notice is delivered on or prior to the Effective Date.
Existing Credit Agreement
The Lenders party hereto on the Effective Date that are (i) "Lenders" under the Existing Credit Agreement and (ii) party to (or their Affiliate is party to) any Existing Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreements, hereby agree that such Existing Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreements shall constitute a Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement hereunder and be subject to the provisions applicable to such Specified Swap or Banking Services Agreement as set hereunder .
SECTION 10.21 . Each party hereto agrees that (i) the Existing First Priority Agreement (as defined in the Intercreditor Agreement) is being replaced by this Agreement and (ii) for purposes of the Intercreditor Agreement, this Agreement is a First Priority Agreement (as defined in the Intercreditor Agreement) and a Replacement First Priority Agreement (as defined in the Intercreditor Agreement), each Collateral Document is a First Priority Security Document (as defined in the Intercreditor Agreement), each Secured Party is a First Priority Creditor (as defined in the Intercreditor Agreement), the Administrative Agent is the First Priority Representative, and the Secured Obligations are First Priority Obligations.
Intercreditor Agreement
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the liens and security interests granted to the Administrative Agent pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document and the exercise of any right or remedy by any of the Administrative Agent hereunder or under any other Loan Document are subject to the provisions of the Intercreditor Agreement. In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement, this Agreement and any other Loan Document, the terms of the Intercreditor Agreement shall govern and control with respect to any right or remedy.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Release: IMMEDIATE
 
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that it has entered into a new $300 million revolving credit facility. This facility replaces the Company's existing $400 million revolving credit facility and $100 million Mercury Marine receivables facility. There were no loan borrowings outstanding under either of these facilities. At Dec. 31, 2010, the Company had $71 million of letters of credit outstanding under its revolving credit facility.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., March 22, 2011 
The Company believes the new facility provides adequate levels of credit availability and supplements its current strong cash position. Additionally, the facility provides improved terms and conditions that enhance the Company's overall financial flexibility and lower its interest costs. The new facility has a term of five years.
The available borrowing capacity under the new facility is a function of its borrowing base, less the amount of outstanding letters of credit. The borrowing base reflects a portion of the value of eligible accounts receivable and inventory of certain of the Company's domestic subsidiaries. Although the commitments under the current facilities have been reduced from $500 million to $300 million under the new facility, the Company's available borrowing capacity, based on the borrowing base under the new facility, is expected to be comparable to the amounts that were available under the previous facilities.
 
Brunswick Corporation
March 22, 2011
Page 2 of 3
 
The new facility was led by J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, with Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and Wells Fargo Capital Finance, LLC also serving as joint lead arrangers.
Additional information concerning the new revolving credit facility, including a copy of the entire Revolving Credit Agreement, can be found under the related Form 8-K filing.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswick's business. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability of dealers to secure adequate access to financing and the Company's ability to access capital and credit markets; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the protection of the Company's brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the need to meet pension funding obligations; the effect of higher energy costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Company's results; competitive pricing pressures, including increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop new and innovative products that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with the sale of products; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, taxes and employee benefits; the
 
Brunswick Corporation
March 22, 2011
Page 3 of 3
 
ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; fluctuations in the Company's stock price due to external factors; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to increase manufacturing operations and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and the risk of experiencing a failure of the Company's information technology systems. Additional factors are included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2010. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Suncruiser, Triton Aluminum, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables. For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20110428073349.txt.gz
TIME:20110428073349
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]          Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 28, 2011, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the first quarter of 2011. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its first quarter earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to shareholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available to fund investments in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash provided by or used for acquisitions, investments, and purchases or sales of marketable securities).  Brunswicks management believes that the measure total liquidity is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks available highly liquid assets and immediate sources of financing. Brunswick defines total liquidity as cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities, as presented in its consolidated balance sheets, plus amounts available under its asset-based lending facilities. The measure diluted earnings (loss) per common share, as adjusted is also believed to be useful to investors because it represents a measure of Brunswicks earnings or losses, without the impact of restructuring, exit and impairment charges and special tax items.  Brunswick defines diluted earnings (loss) per common share, as adjusted, as diluted earnings (loss) per common share, excluding the earnings or loss per share impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as special tax items.  Additionally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure net debt is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks ability to repay its outstanding debt using its current cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.  Brunswick defines net debt as the sum of short-term and long-term debt, less cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities.
 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01.                      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits: 
 
 
        
Exhibit No.
   
Description of Exhibit
 
99.1   
 
     
   News Release, dated April 28, 2011, of Brunswick Corporation, announcing its first quarter 2011 earnings.
   
   
 
 
 
   
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 
 

 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the first quarter of 2011:
LAKE FOREST, Ill., April 28, 2011
Our first quarter results reflected higher marine wholesale shipments compared to the prior year, together with outstanding operating leverage achieved by our operating businesses, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. Shipments into our dealer pipeline continue to be consistent with our strategy to closely match wholesale and retail demand units on an annual basis.  The higher quarterly wholesale shipments reflect our plan that retail demand in 2011 will be stable, compared to the declining market in 2010, as well as our plan to ensure that our dealers have the appropriate levels of inventory to meet early season demand.
Our Marine Engine segment performed well across its entire product offering, including its parts and accessories business. In addition, our Life Fitness segment experienced strong revenue and earnings growth in the quarter.
First Quarter Results
For the first quarter of 2011, the Company reported net sales of $985.9 million, up from $844.4 million a year earlier.  For the quarter, the Company reported operating earnings of $67.0 million, which included $5.3 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.  In the first quarter of 2010, the Company had operating earnings of $10.1 million, which included $7.4 million of restructuring and impairment charges.
For the first quarter of 2011, Brunswick reported net earnings of $27.5 million, or $0.30 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $13.0 million, or a $0.15 per diluted share loss, for the first quarter of 2010.  The diluted earnings per share for the first quarter of 2011 included restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $0.05 per diluted share.  The loss per diluted share for the first quarter of 2010 included $0.08 per diluted share of restructuring and impairment charges, and a $0.02 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.
The factors that positively affected our revenues and earnings in the first quarter of 2011, compared to the previous year, included higher sales levels in our marine and fitness businesses and companywide fixed-cost reductions.  Partially offsetting these factors were a higher income tax provision and losses on early extinguishment of debt, McCoy said.
 
 
 
 
 
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and marketable securities totaled $548.7 million at the end of the first quarter, down $108.4 million from year-end 2010 levels.  This decrease reflects net cash used for operating activities of $83.1 million.  Net cash used for operating activities was affected by changes in working capital during the quarter. These changes in working capital were largely the result of increases in accounts and notes receivable and inventory to support the seasonal requirements of our marine customers, and decreases in accrued expenses, partially offset by increases in accounts payable.
 
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and marketable securities) was $263.0 million, up $89.5 million from year-end 2010 levels.  The increase in net debt reflects the $108.4 million decrease in total cash and marketable securities, partially offset by an $18.9 million decrease in total debt, largely related to debt retirement in the quarter.  The Companys total liquidity (defined as cash and marketable securities, plus amounts available under its new asset-based revolving credit facility) was $756 million.
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $520.5 million in the first quarter of 2011, up 17 percent from $445.7 million in the first quarter of 2010.  International sales, which represented 43 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 6 percent.  For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported operating earnings of $51.6 million, including restructuring charges of $4.3 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $26.5 million in the first quarter of 2010, which included $2.4 million of restructuring charges.
Sales were higher across all of the segments main operations.  The segments global sterndrive engine product category experienced the greatest percentage sales growth.
Mercurys manufacturing facilities continued to increase production during the quarter in response to customer requirements.  Higher sales, the combined effect of cost reductions, increased fixed-cost absorption and improved operating efficiencies, as well as a gain on the sale of a distribution facility all had a positive effect on operating earnings during the quarter.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 16 boat brands.  The Boat segment reported net sales of $283.6 million for the first quarter of 2011, an increase of 16 percent compared with $243.6 million in the first quarter of 2010.  International sales, which represented 37 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 18 percent during the period.  For the first quarter of 2011, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $3.8 million, including restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $1.0 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $26.7 million, including restructuring charges of $4.1 million, in the first quarter of 2010.
Boat segment production and wholesale shipments increased during the quarter, compared with the first quarter of 2010, in response to the seasonal inventory requirements of dealers, who are not anticipating the annual declines in the retail market that were experienced in 2010.  The increase in wholesale unit shipments was partially offset by the effect of a higher mix of smaller boat sales.  Higher sales, increased fixed-cost absorption, fixed-cost reductions and lower restructuring, exit and impairment charges had a positive effect on the segments improved quarterly results.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which designs, manufactures, and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales in the first quarter of 2011 totaled $156.4 million, up 31 percent from $119.0 million in the first quarter of 2010.  International sales, which represented 55 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 40 percent.  For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $23.4 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $9.5 million in the first quarter of 2010.
Commercial equipment sales benefited from a large order from one of its customer categories during the quarter. Improved operating earnings in the first quarter of 2011, when compared with 2010, reflect higher sales, a more favorable product mix and increased fixed-cost absorption.
 
 
 
 
 
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards tables and accessories.  Segment sales in the first quarter of 2011 totaled $87.3 million, down 5 percent compared with $91.9 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 21 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 4 percent.  For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $13.2 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $14.9 million, including restructuring charges of $0.2 million, in the first quarter of 2010.
For the quarter, equivalent-center sales for retail bowling were flat, while bowling products experienced a decline in sales.  The reduction in operating earnings in the first quarter of 2011, when compared with 2010, reflects lower sales, partially offset by cost reductions.
 
Outlook
H
In 2011, our strategy is to remain disciplined to generate positive free cash flow, perform better than the market and demonstrate outstanding operating leverage, McCoy said.
The retail marine market for 2011 is unfolding as expected for the year. We continue to believe that the significant decline in overall industry marine retail demand bottomed in 2010. However, with the majority of the selling season still ahead of us, we are not yet able to determine if our 2011 retail demand will match our plan for a flat market.
The range of 2011 revenue and earnings growth expectations for the Companys results will continue to be governed primarily by marine retail demand, as well as by the success of the Companys efforts to improve market share in all of its business segments.  In the event of a declining retail marine market, the remainder of the year would be at risk to lower levels of marine wholesale unit shipments in order to keep dealer inventories at desired levels.  As we look at 2011 retail demand, we are continuing to watch the potential impact of higher crude oil prices and the headwind they are creating in the economy.
We continue to believe that our 2011 net income will benefit from our previously announced marine plant consolidations, lower restructuring costs, and reductions in net interest, depreciation and pension expenses.
After taking all these factors into consideration, we expect our 2011 earnings per share to be in the range of $0.30 per share to $0.50 per share.  As a result of the seasonality of our marine businesses, we expect to report a profitable second quarter, followed by a net loss in the second half of the year, McCoy concluded.
 
 
 
 
 
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, go to the website at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
H
www.br
u
nswick.com
H
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (866) 804-6922 (passcode: Brunswick Q1).  Callers outside of North America should call (857) 350-1668 (passcode: Brunswick Q1) to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Thursday, May 5, 2011, by calling (888) 286-8010 (passcode: 35575481) or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 35575481).  The replay will also be available at www.brunswick.com.
H
H
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswicks business.  These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability of dealers to secure adequate access to financing and the Companys ability to access capital and credit markets; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the protection of the Companys brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the need to meet pension funding obligations; the effect of higher energy costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Companys results; competitive pricing pressures, including increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop new and innovative products that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with the sale of products; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, taxes and employee benefits; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; fluctuations in the Companys stock price due to external factors; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to increase manufacturing operations and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and the risk of experiencing a failure of the Companys information technology systems.  Additional factors are included in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2010.  Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity (TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Suncruiser, Triton Aluminum, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables.  For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20110728074155.txt.gz
TIME:20110728074155
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 28, 2011, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the second quarter of 2011. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its second quarter earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to shareholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available to fund investments in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash provided by or used for acquisitions, investments, and purchases or sales of marketable securities).  Brunswicks management believes that the measure total liquidity is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks available highly liquid assets and immediate sources of financing. Brunswick defines total liquidity as cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities, as presented in its consolidated balance sheets, plus amounts available under its asset-based lending facility. The measure diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted is also believed to be useful to investors because it represents a measure of Brunswicks earnings without the impact of restructuring, exit and impairment charges and special tax items.  Brunswick defines diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted, as diluted earnings per common share, excluding the earnings or loss per share impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as special tax items.  Additionally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure net debt is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks ability to repay its outstanding debt using its current cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.  Brunswick defines net debt as the sum of short-term and long-term debt, less cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.                    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the second quarter of 2011:
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 28, 2011
Our second quarter results reflected higher marine wholesale shipments compared to the prior year, together with outstanding operating leverage achieved by our operating businesses, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. Shipments of boats and engines were supported by solid retail growth experienced at our dealers, reflecting a stable marine market combined with market share growth in our boat and marine engine segments.  Our Life Fitness segment also generated significant growth in the quarter.
 
Second Quarter Results
For the second quarter of 2011, the Company reported net sales of $1,096.3 million, up from $1,014.7 million a year earlier.  For the quarter, the Company reported operating earnings of $107.9 million, which included a gain from restructuring activities of $0.3 million, primarily resulting from the sale of certain idled marine properties.  In the second quarter of 2010, the Company had operating earnings of $55.7 million, which included $24.2 million of restructuring and impairment charges.
For the second quarter of 2011, Brunswick reported net earnings of $69.3 million, or $0.75 per diluted share, compared with net earnings of $13.7 million, or $0.15 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2010.  The diluted earnings per share for the second quarter of 2011 included a $0.02 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.  The earnings per diluted share for the second quarter of 2010 included $0.26 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, and a $0.02 per diluted share of expense from special tax items.
The factors that positively affected our revenues and earnings in the second quarter of 2011, compared to the previous year, included higher sales levels in our marine and fitness businesses, lower restructuring and impairment charges, companywide fixed-cost reductions and lower net interest expense.  Partially offsetting these factors were higher material costs and variable compensation expense, McCoy said.
 
 
 
 
 
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and marketable securities totaled $676.8 million at the end of the second quarter, up $19.7 million from year-end 2010 levels.  This increase reflects net cash provided by operating activities of $81.2 million.  Net cash provided by operating activities was unfavorably affected by changes in working capital during the first half of 2011.  These changes in working capital were largely the result of seasonal increases in accounts and notes receivable and decreases in accrued expenses, partially offset by an increase in accounts payable.
 
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and marketable securities) was $110.1 million, down $63.4 million from year-end 2010 levels.  The decrease in net debt reflects a $19.7 million increase in total cash and marketable securities, as well as a $43.7 million reduction in total debt.  The Companys total liquidity (defined as cash and marketable securities, plus amounts available under its asset-based revolving credit facility) was $906 million.
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $618.5 million in the second quarter of 2011, up 7 percent from $579.2 million in the second quarter of 2010.  International sales, which represented 41 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 6 percent.  For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported operating earnings of $95.5 million, which included a gain from restructuring activities of $0.3 million, primarily related to the sale of certain idled properties.  This compares with operating earnings of $89.2 million in the second quarter of 2010, which included $2.1 million of restructuring charges.
The segments domestic outboard engine product category experienced the greatest percentage sales growth during the quarter.  Higher sales and cost reductions had a positive effect on operating earnings during the quarter.  Partially offsetting these positive factors were a less favorable product mix, higher variable compensation costs, and an increase in research and development spending.
 
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 16 boat brands.  The Boat segment reported net sales of $326.7 million for the second quarter of 2011, an increase of 10 percent compared with $296.6 million in the second quarter of 2010.  International sales, which represented 39 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 14 percent during the period.  For the second quarter of 2011, the Boat segment reported operating earnings of $9.4 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $23.6 million, including restructuring charges of $21.7 million, in the second quarter of 2010.
Boat segment production and wholesale shipments increased during the quarter, compared with the second quarter of 2010, in response to solid retail demand and market share gains among Brunswick boat brands. Revenue growth resulted from an increase in wholesale unit shipments, partially offset by the effect of a slightly greater mix of smaller boat sales.  Higher sales, lower restructuring, exit and impairment charges, increased fixed-cost absorption, and fixed-cost reductions all had a positive effect on the segments improved quarterly results.
 
 
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which designs, manufactures, and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales in the second quarter of 2011 totaled $141.6 million, up 15 percent from $123.2 million in the second quarter of 2010.  International sales, which represented 53 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 13 percent.  For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $19.1 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $8.7 million in the second quarter of 2010.
Global commercial sales increased during the quarter, compared with the second quarter of 2010, reflecting growth in sales to all of the segments major distribution channels. Improved operating earnings in the second quarter of 2011 resulted from higher sales, a more favorable product mix, and improved warranty experience.
 
 
 
 
 
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards tables and accessories.  Segment sales in the second quarter of 2011 totaled $77.5 million, up slightly compared with $77.3 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 25 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 4 percent.  For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $1.5 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $2.6 million, including restructuring charges of $0.2 million, in the second quarter of 2010.
For the quarter, equivalent-center sales for retail bowling were up by a low-single-digit percentage, while bowling products experienced a slight decline in sales.  The improvement in operating earnings in the second quarter of 2011, when compared with 2010, reflects an absence of a second quarter 2010 facility write-down, improved operating efficiencies and lower bad debt expense.
 
Outlook
H
In 2011, our strategy is to remain disciplined to generate substantial free cash flow, perform better than the market and demonstrate outstanding operating leverage, McCoy said.
The retail marine market for 2011 is unfolding generally as we expected. We continue to believe that the significant decline in overall industry marine retail demand bottomed in 2010.
The range of 2011 revenue and earnings growth expectations for the Companys results will continue to be governed primarily by marine retail demand, as well as by the success of the Companys efforts to improve market share in all of its business segments.
We continue to believe that our 2011 net income will benefit from our previously announced marine plant consolidations, lower restructuring costs, reductions in interest, depreciation and pension expenses, as well as from a lower effective tax rate.
After taking all these factors into consideration, we currently expect our 2011 earnings per share to be in the range of $0.60 per share to $0.75 per share, McCoy concluded.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, please go to the website at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
H
www.br
u
nswick.com
H
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (866) 831-6291 (passcode: Brunswick Q2).  Callers outside of North America should call (617) 213-8860 (passcode: Brunswick Q2) to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Thursday, Aug. 4, 2011, by calling (888) 286-8010 (passcode: 12010794) or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 12010794).  The replay will also be available at www.brunswick.com.
H
H
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswicks business.  These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability of dealers to secure adequate access to financing and the Companys ability to access capital and credit markets; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the protection of the Companys brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the need to meet pension funding obligations; the effect of higher energy costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Companys results; competitive pricing pressures, including increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop new and innovative products that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with the manufacture and sale of products; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, taxes and employee benefits; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; fluctuations in the Companys stock price due to external factors; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to increase manufacturing operations and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and the risk of experiencing a failure of the Companys information technology systems.  Additional factors are included in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2010 and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 2, 2011.  Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Sealine, Suncruiser, Triton Aluminum, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables.  For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20110831173924.txt.gz
TIME:20110831173924
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]         Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]          Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 30, 2011, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) sold its equity interest in Sealine International Limited, the entity that holds its Sealine brand of boats, based in Kidderminster, United Kingdom, to The Oxford Investment Group, Inc.  Brunswick expects that it will incur a pretax loss and resulting charge on the loss in connection with the sale of this business.  Brunswick is unable at this time to make an estimate of the amount, or range of amounts, of the resulting charge.
The news release announcing this action is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 

 
 
 
 
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today announced that it has sold its Sealine brand of boats, based in Kidderminster, UK, to The Oxford Investment Group. Terms of the transaction were not disclosed.  The Company is currently determining the amount of the restructuring charge associated with the transaction.
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Aug. 31, 2011 
This decision was part of our strategic review to further refine our product portfolio and to best concentrate our resources on our continuing brands and the marine segments in which we compete, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.  A primary goal at Brunswick going forward is to better exploit our opportunities for organic growth and to gain share in the marketplace.  For the past several years, we have been steadily transforming our operating model and business structure to be more consistent with the changing marine market.  With the global presence of Sea Ray, Bayliner, Meridian, Hatteras and Boston Whaler, as well as our involvement in regional brands around the globe, Brunswick maintains its leading presence in the worlds marine markets.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Suncruiser, Triton Aluminum, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables.  For more information, visit .
http://www.brunswick.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20110913164814.txt.gz
TIME:20110913164814
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.05             Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities.
 
 
As previously disclosed in the Companys Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 31, 2011 (the Initial 8-K), Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) sold its equity interest in Sealine International Limited, the entity that holds its Sealine brand of boats, based in Kidderminster, United Kingdom, to The Oxford Investment Group, Inc., on August 30, 2011.  In the Initial 8-K, the Company disclosed that it expected to incur a pre-tax loss and resulting charge in connection with the sale, but that it was unable at that time to make an estimate of the amount, or range of amounts, of the charge.
On September 12, 2011, Brunswick made a determination that it expects to record a pre-tax non-cash charge of approximately $10 million USD during the third quarter in connection with the sale of this business.  This is in addition to the full-year restructuring charge estimate in the range of $6 to $10 million USD previously discussed in Brunswicks second quarter earnings conference call.
This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements regarding future charges that Brunswick may incur, as indicated by words such as estimate, expects and other similar words or phrases.  Actual events or results may differ materially from those described herein.  Among the important factors that could cause future events or results to vary are the uncertainties and risks arising from Brunswicks ability to execute its restructuring activities as planned, the potential for unexpected liabilities related to the disposition of certain assets, and the possibility that the final accounting and valuation of the assets involved could vary from the estimates set forth herein.  Additional factors that might affect these forward-looking statements are described in filings with the SEC such as Brunswicks most recent Forms 10-K and 10-Q.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20111013163344.txt.gz
TIME:20111013163344
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02.  Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
As previously disclosed in Brunswick Corporations (the Company) Current Reports on Form 8-K filed on October 30, 2008 and May 5, 2009, the Company entered into Terms and Conditions of Employment with Peter B. Hamilton, the Companys Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, on October 29, 2008 and a letter amendment to such agreement on May 5, 2009 (as amended, the CFO Ts&Cs).  The CFO Ts&Cs provide that their applicable term shall automatically terminate when Mr. Hamilton attains age 65.
 
On October 12, 2011, the Company and Mr. Hamilton entered into a second letter amendment to the CFO Ts&Cs (the Second Amendment).  Pursuant to the Second Amendment, the clause providing for automatic termination of the CFO Ts&Css term upon Mr. Hamiltons attainment of age 65 is deleted in its entirety.
 
The Second Amendment is attached as Exhibit 10.1. The foregoing description of the Second Amendment is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Second Amendment, which is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01.                            Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
October 11, 2011
Mr. Peter B. Hamilton
Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Brunswick Corporation
1 N. Field Court
Lake Forest, IL  60045
Dated October 29, 2008
Dear Peter:
As we have discussed, this amendment letter (the Second Amendment) shall constitute an amendment to the Terms and Conditions of Employment (the Agreement) entered into between you and Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) on October 29, 2008, in accordance with Section 16 of the Agreement.  The Second Amendment is in addition to the Amendment dated May 5, 2009 (the Amendment) entered into between you and Brunswick.
The purpose of the Second Amendment is to eliminate a provision of the Agreement that would automatically terminate the Term of the Agreement upon your attaining the age of 65.
All capitalized terms used in this Second Amendment but not otherwise defined herein will have the same meaning as defined in the Agreement, and all section references are to a section of the Agreement, unless otherwise specified.
Accordingly, you and Brunswick hereby agree that, notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in the Agreement, Section 14 of the Agreement (Termination Provisions) will be amended to remove the provision that the Term will automatically terminate upon your attaining age 65.  Thus, Section 14 of the Agreement will read as follows:
The Term may be terminated at any time by the Company upon six (6) months advance written notice to the Executive; provided, however, that if a Change in Control occurs prior to the expiration of the Term, the Term shall not terminate prior to the second (2) anniversary of the date on which the Change in Control occurs.
nd
For the avoidance of doubt, except to the extent expressly modified by this Second Amendment, all other terms of the Agreement and Amendment will remain in full force and effect.
The validity, interpretation, construction and performance of this Second Amendment shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois, without regard to its choice of law provisions.
This Second Amendment, together with the Amendment and the Agreement and appendices attached thereto, contains the entire agreement between you and Brunswick concerning the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements, understandings, discussions, negotiations and undertakings, whether written or oral, between you and Brunswick.  This Second Amendment may not be modified or amended except by a writing signed by each of the parties hereto.
This Second Amendment may be executed in two or more counterparts, any one of which shall be deemed the original without reference to the others.
Intending to be legally bound hereby, the parties have executed this Second Amendment on the dates set forth next to their names below.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20111027075025.txt.gz
TIME:20111027075025
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 27, 2011, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the third quarter of 2011. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its third quarter earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to shareholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available to fund investments in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash provided by or used for acquisitions, investments, transfers to restricted cash and purchases or sales of marketable securities).  Brunswicks management believes that the measure total liquidity is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks available highly liquid assets and immediate sources of financing. Brunswick defines total liquidity as cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities, as presented in its consolidated balance sheets, plus amounts available under its asset-based lending facility. The measure diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted is also believed to be useful to investors because it represents a measure of Brunswicks earnings, without the impact of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Brunswick defines diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted, as diluted earnings per common share, excluding the earnings or loss per share impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as the loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Additionally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure net debt is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks ability to repay its outstanding debt using its current cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.  Brunswick defines net debt as the sum of short-term and long-term debt, less cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities.
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
 
 
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
   
   
   
  
  
   
  
   
   
   
   
   
   
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the third quarter of 2011:
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Oct. 27, 2011
 
Our third quarter results reflected higher shipments of engines and boats that were supported by solid retail growth experienced at our dealers, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. Our Life Fitness segment continued its outstanding performance during 2011 by generating significant growth in the quarter.  On a consolidated basis, our year-to-date operating leverage continues to be strong and at targeted levels. Finally, our third quarter and nine-month operating earnings achieved their highest levels since 2006.
 
Third Quarter Results
For the third quarter of 2011, the Company reported net sales of $876.7 million, up from $815.4 million a year earlier.  For the quarter, the Company reported operating earnings of $35.6 million, which included restructuring and exit charges of $13.2 million.  In the third quarter of 2010, the Company had operating earnings of $25.2 million, which included $12.2 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
 
For the third quarter of 2011, Brunswick reported net earnings of $4.7 million, or $0.05 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $7.2 million, or $0.08 loss per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2010.  The diluted earnings per share for the third quarter of 2011 included restructuring and exit charges of $0.14 per diluted share, loss on early extinguishment of debt of $0.13 per diluted share and a $0.01 per diluted share expense from special tax items.  The earnings per diluted share for the third quarter of 2010 included $0.14 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges and a $0.01 per diluted share loss on early extinguishment of debt.
The factors that positively affected our revenues and earnings in the third quarter of 2011, compared to the previous year, included higher sales levels reflecting market share gains in our continuing marine businesses, as well as in our Fitness and Bowling & Billiards segments, combined with companywide fixed-cost reductions.  Partially offsetting these factors were higher variable compensation expense and losses on early extinguishment of debt, McCoy said.
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and marketable securities totaled $546.7 million at the end of the third quarter, down $110.4 million from year-end 2010 levels.  This decrease primarily reflects the impact of $145.0 million of cash used towards the Companys previously stated objective of reducing debt.  Partially offsetting this use of cash was net cash provided by operating activities of $81.2 million.  Net cash provided by operating activities was unfavorably affected by changes in non-cash working capital during the first nine months of 2011.
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and marketable securities) was $156.6 million, down $16.9 million from year-end 2010 levels.  The decrease in net debt reflects a $127.3 million reduction in total debt, partially offset by a $110.4 million decrease in total cash and marketable securities.  The Companys total liquidity (defined as cash and marketable securities, plus amounts available under its asset-based revolving credit facility) was $790 million.
 
 
 
 
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $467.2 million in the third quarter of 2011, up 9 percent from $429.2 million in the third quarter of 2010.  International sales, which represented 39 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 12 percent.  For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported operating earnings of $44.5 million, which included $4.2 million of restructuring charges.  This compares with operating earnings of $49.0 million in the third quarter of 2010, which included $1.7 million of restructuring charges.
The segments outboard engine product category experienced the greatest percentage sales growth during the quarter.  The decline in operating earnings reflects higher material costs, a less favorable product mix, higher variable compensation costs and restructuring charges, as well as an increase in research and development spending.  Partially offsetting these factors were benefits from higher sales and cost reductions.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 15 boat brands.  The Boat segment reported net sales of $209.2 million for the third quarter of 2011, equal to the $209.2 million reported in the third quarter of 2010.  International sales, which represented 29 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 16 percent during the period.  For the third quarter of 2011, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $17.9 million, including restructuring charges of $8.7 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $26.3 million, including restructuring charges of $10.2 million, in the third quarter of 2010.
Boat segment production and wholesale unit shipments increased during the quarter, compared with the third quarter of 2010, in response to solid retail demand for Brunswicks boat brands.  Revenue growth from the increase in wholesale unit shipments was partially offset by the timing of the sale of its Sealine brand on Aug. 31, 2011, which resulted in only a partial recognition of third quarter 2011 sales for Sealine, versus a full quarter of sales included in 2010.  A greater sales mix of smaller boats and lower sales to non-U.S. markets also had a negative effect on sales during the quarter.  Increased fixed-cost absorption and cost reductions had a positive effect on the segments improved quarterly results.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which designs, manufactures, and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales in the third quarter of 2011 totaled $157.2 million, up 14 percent from $137.7 million in the third quarter of 2010.  International sales, which represented 49 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by one percent.  For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $22.6 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $17.0 million in the third quarter of 2010.
 
U.S. commercial sales increased during the quarter, compared with the third quarter of 2010, reflecting sales growth in all of the segments major distribution channels. Improved operating earnings in the third quarter of 2011 resulted from higher sales and a more favorable product mix, partially offset by higher freight costs.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards tables and accessories.  Segment sales in the third quarter of 2011 totaled $79.5 million, up 7 percent from $74.6 million in the year-ago quarter.  International sales, which represented 25 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by one percent.  For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $1.8 million.  This compares with break-even operating results in 2010.
For the quarter, bowling products experienced a strong increase in sales, while equivalent-center sales for retail bowling were flat.  The improvement in operating earnings in the third quarter of 2011, when compared with 2010, reflects the increase in sales and improved operating efficiencies.
 
 
 
 
 
 
See Brunswicks Website for Supplemental Charts:
http://www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events-presentations.php
Outlook
H
For the first nine months of 2011, we have successfully executed our core strategy of generating free cash flow, performing better than the market and demonstrating outstanding operating leverage, McCoy said.
The marine retail market for 2011 is unfolding generally as we expected, with the aluminum and fiberglass outboard boat markets experiencing solid growth and the fiberglass sterndrive boat markets continuing to decline, albeit at a more moderate pace.
As we enter the final quarter of 2011, we will continue to focus on this core strategy as well as pursue various operational and financial strategic initiatives that should enable us to continue to deliver future revenue and earnings growth.  We will continue to position our marine products to give our dealers and distributors an opportunity to gain market share.
In addition, we believe our Fitness and Bowling & Billiards businesses can continue to benefit from their market-leading positions and overall operating strengths to deliver strong earnings and cash flow.
For the year, net income will benefit from our previously announced marine plant consolidations and asset sales, lower restructuring costs, reductions in interest, depreciation and pension expenses, as well as from lower tax expense.  After taking all these factors into consideration, we currently expect our 2011 earnings per share to be in the range of $0.65 per share to $0.75 per share.
As we look forward to 2012, we continue to believe that the global economic and marine market outlook will remain challenging.  As a result, our entire organization is focused on maintaining its favorable cost position and generating continued revenue and earnings growth through a focus on organic growth initiatives. We further believe that our 2012 net income will benefit from our announced marine cost reduction activities, lower restructuring costs and a reduction in interest expense, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, please go to the website at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
H
www.br
u
nswick.com
H
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (866) 277-1184 (passcode: Brunswick Q3).  Callers outside of North America should call (617) 597-5360 (passcode: Brunswick Q3) to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Thursday, Nov. 3, 2011, by calling (888) 286-8010 (passcode: 70804514) or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 70804514).  The replay will also be available at www.brunswick.com.
H
H
 
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswicks business.  These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; credit and collection risks, including the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the ability of dealers and customers to secure adequate access to financing and the Companys ability to access capital and credit markets; the need to meet pension funding obligations; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, taxes and employee benefits; the strength and protection of the Companys brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; competitive pricing pressures, including the impact of inflation and increased competition from Asian competitors; competition from new technologies; the ability to develop new and innovative products in response to changing retail demands and expectations that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of higher energy and logistics costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Companys results; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with the sale of products; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; the ability to respond to the need for increased manufacturing levels and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; fluctuations in the Companys stock price due to external factors; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and risks associated with the Companys information technology systems, including the continued use of legacy systems and the risk of a failure of or attacks on the Companys information systems, which could result in data security breaches, lost or stolen assets or information, and associated remediation costs.
 
Additional factors are included in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2010 and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended July 2, 2011.  Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill Genuine Ingenuity (TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Suncruiser, Triton Aluminum, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; and Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables.  For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20120126074521.txt.gz
TIME:20120126074521
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 26, 2012, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the fourth quarter and full year 2011. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its fourth quarter and full year 2011 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to shareholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available to fund investments in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash provided by or used for acquisitions, investments, transfers to restricted cash and purchases or sales of marketable securities).  Brunswicks management believes that the measure total liquidity is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks available highly liquid assets and immediate sources of financing. Brunswick defines total liquidity as cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities, as presented in its consolidated balance sheets, plus amounts available under its asset-based lending facility. The measure diluted earnings (loss) per common share, as adjusted is also believed to be useful to investors because it represents a measure of Brunswicks earnings, without the impact of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Brunswick defines diluted earnings (loss) per common share, as adjusted, as diluted earnings (loss) per common share, excluding the earnings or loss per share impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as the loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Additionally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure net debt is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks ability to repay its outstanding debt using its current cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.  Brunswick defines net debt as the sum of short-term and long-term debt, less cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities as presented in its consolidated balance sheets.
 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01.                      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
                   
Exhibit No.
Description of Exhibit
 
99.1      News Release, dated January 26, 2012, of Brunswick Corporation, announcing its fourth quarter and full year 2011 earnings.
   
   
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

 
 
 
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the fourth quarter of 2011:
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Jan. 26, 2012
2011 Full-Year Results:
 
 
In 2011, our Company made significant progress in growing our revenue and improving our earnings, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. We achieved double-digit revenue growth and an increase in operating earnings of $176 million despite a flat overall marine market and challenging global economic conditions.  Our ability to achieve market share gains throughout our segments, combined with continuing success in improving production and operating efficiencies, enabled us to report our highest level of operating earnings since 2006. In addition, we continued to reduce our debt levels, ending 2011 with net debt at $185 million.
For the year ended Dec. 31, 2011, the Company reported net sales of $3,748.0 million, up from $3,403.3 million a year earlier. For the year, operating earnings were $192.4 million, which included $22.7 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.  In 2010, the Company reported operating earnings of $16.3 million, which included $62.3 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges. 
For 2011, the Company reported net earnings of $71.9 million, or $0.78 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $110.6 million, or $1.25 per diluted share, for 2010.  The diluted earnings per share for 2011 included restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $0.25 per diluted share, losses on early extinguishment of debt of $0.21 per diluted share and a $0.07 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.  The loss per diluted share for 2010 included $0.70 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, $0.06 per diluted share of losses on early extinguishment of debt and a $0.03 per diluted share charge from special tax items.
 
Fourth Quarter Results
For the fourth quarter of 2011, the Company reported net sales of $789.1 million, up from $728.8 million a year earlier.  For the quarter, the Company reported an operating loss of $18.1 million, which included restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $4.5 million.  In the fourth quarter of 2010, the Company had an operating loss of $74.7 million, which included $18.5 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
For the fourth quarter of 2011, Brunswick reported a net loss of $29.6 million, or $0.33 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $104.1 million, or $1.17 loss per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2010.  The diluted loss per share for the fourth quarter of 2011 included restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $0.05 per diluted share, loss on early extinguishment of debt of $0.03 per diluted share and a $0.05 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.  The loss per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2010 included $0.21 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges and a $0.02 per diluted share charge from special tax items.
The factors that positively affected our earnings in the fourth quarter of 2011, compared to the previous year, included higher sales levels resulting from market share gains in our marine businesses, as well as in our Fitness and Bowling & Billiards segments, combined with company wide cost reductions and lower warranty costs, restructuring charges and tax provision.  Partially offsetting these factors were higher variable compensation expense, losses on early extinguishment of debt and a charge pertaining to the announced dissolution of a marine engine joint venture, McCoy said.
 
 
 
 
 
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet 
Cash and marketable securities totaled $507.8 million at the end of 2011, down $149.3 million from year-end 2010 levels.  This decrease primarily reflects the impact of $163.3 million of cash used towards the retirement of debt, partially offset by net cash provided by operations, less net cash used for investing and other financing activities.  Net cash provided by operating activities was unfavorably affected by contributions made to the Companys defined benefit pension plans and changes in working capital, excluding cash. 
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and marketable securities) was $185.0 million, an increase of $11.5 million from year-end 2010 levels.  The increase in net debt reflects a $137.8 million reduction in total debt, which was more than offset by a $149.3 million decrease in total cash and marketable securities.  The Companys total liquidity (defined as cash and marketable securities, plus amounts available under its asset-based revolving credit facility) was $739 million.
Marine Engine Segment 
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $373.3 million in the fourth quarter of 2011, up 6 percent from $353.3 million in the fourth quarter of 2010.  U.S. sales, which represented 52 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 10 percent, while international sales decreased by 2 percent.  For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported an operating loss of $2.3 million, which included $3.8 million of restructuring and impairment charges.  This compares with an operating loss of $17.4 million in the fourth quarter of 2010, which included $7.4 million of restructuring charges.
The segments outboard engine and parts and accessories businesses experienced solid sales growth during the quarter.  The decline in operating losses reflects higher sales and cost reductions, as well as lower warranty costs and restructuring charges.  Partially offsetting these factors were higher material and higher variable compensation costs.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 15 North American-based boat brands.  The Boat segment reported net sales of $196.8 million for the fourth quarter of 2011, up 20 percent from the $163.6 million reported in the fourth quarter of 2010.  U.S. sales, which represented 69 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 34 percent. International sales decreased by 10 percent, which was driven largely by the absence of sales related to the Sealine brand, which was divested in the third quarter of 2011.  For the fourth quarter of 2011, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $28.4 million, which included a gain from restructuring activities of $0.9 million.  This compares with an operating loss of $69.3 million, including restructuring charges of $10.0 million, in the fourth quarter of 2010.
Boat segment production and wholesale unit shipments increased during the quarter, compared with the fourth quarter of 2010, in response to solid retail demand for Brunswicks boat brands.  Revenue growth from the increase in wholesale unit shipments was partially offset by the absence of sales from the Sealine brand, which was divested on Aug. 30, 2011. A greater sales mix of smaller boats also had a negative effect on sales during the quarter.  The decline in operating losses reflects higher sales, increased fixed-cost absorption, cost reductions and lower restructuring costs.  Partially offsetting these factors were a less favorable product mix and higher variable compensation costs.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which designs, manufactures, and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment.  Fitness segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2011 totaled $180.0 million, up 11 percent from $162.0 million in the fourth quarter of 2010.  U.S. sales, which represented 55 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 14 percent, while international sales increased by 7 percent.  For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $28.3 million.  This compares with operating earnings of $24.4 million in the fourth quarter of 2010.
Commercial sales increased during the quarter, compared with the fourth quarter of 2010, reflecting sales growth in all of the segments major distribution channels. Improved operating earnings in the fourth quarter of 2011 resulted from higher sales and a more favorable product mix, partially offset by higher variable compensation expense.
 
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of: Brunswick retail bowling centers; bowling equipment and products; and billiards tables and accessories.  Segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2011 totaled $80.9 million, which is comparable to the $79.5 million reported in the year-ago quarter.  U.S. sales, which represented 79 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 4 percent, while international sales decreased by 6 percent.  For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $3.0 million, which included $1.6 million of restructuring and impairment charges.  This compares with operating earnings of $0.2 million in 2010, which included $1.2 million of restructuring charges.
For the quarter, bowling products experienced a solid increase in sales, while equivalent-center sales for retail bowling were up slightly.  The improvement in operating earnings in the fourth quarter of 2011, when compared with 2010, reflects lower bad debt expense and improved operating efficiencies.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Outlook
H
In 2012, we will remain focused on revenue and earnings growth, McCoy said.  We believe that the global economic and marine market outlook will continue to be challenging and that demand characteristics will be comparable to those demonstrated in 2011.  The successful execution of our various operational and financial strategic initiatives during these past several quarters gives us the confidence that we can achieve sustainable revenue and earnings growth, even in a relatively flat marketplace.
Our entire organization will concentrate its efforts on maintaining its favorable cost position and generating growth through the continuation of market share gains and the execution of organic growth initiatives.
To support our growth plans, we expect our capital expenditures, SG&A and research and development expenses to be greater than those experienced in 2011.  However, even at these higher levels, we plan to continue to generate positive free cash flow and execute our ongoing strategic financial objectives of reducing debt levels and improving the funded status of pension liabilities.
In addition to solid top-line growth, we expect net income will benefit from our previously announced marine plant consolidations and asset sales, lower restructuring costs, and reductions in interest, depreciation, variable compensation and pension expenses.  After taking all these factors into consideration, we currently expect our 2012 earnings per share to be in the range of $1.20 per share to $1.50 per diluted share, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CST, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president  corporate and investor relations.
 
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at .  To listen to the call, please go to the website at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
www.brunswick.com
See Brunswicks Website for slides used to supplement conference call remarks:
http://www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events-presentations.php
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (800) 798-2884 (passcode: Brunswick Q4).  Callers outside of North America should call (617) 614-6207 (passcode: Brunswick Q4) to be connected.  These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call.  A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CST Thursday, Feb. 2, 2012, by calling (888) 286-8010 (passcode: 48912621) or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 48912621).  The replay will also be available at .
H
www.brunswick.com
H
 
 
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswicks business.  These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release.  These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability of dealers to secure adequate access to financing and the Companys ability to access capital and credit markets; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the protection of the Companys brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the need to meet pension funding obligations; the effect of higher energy costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Companys results; competitive pricing pressures, including increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop new and innovative products that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with the manufacture and sale of products; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, taxes and employee benefits; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; fluctuations in the Companys stock price due to external factors; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to increase manufacturing operations and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and the risk of experiencing a failure of the Companys information technology systems.
Additional factors are included in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2010 and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended July 2, 2011.  Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Arvor, Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Suncruiser, Triton Aluminum, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; and Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables.  For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20120419080135.txt.gz
TIME:20120419080135
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  April 19, 2012
 
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 7.01.                  Regulation FD Disclosure
Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") changed its segment reporting structure and reporting of pension costs during the quarter ended March 31, 2012. This Form 8-K provides restated historical segment results for the three months and year-to-date periods ended during each quarterly period for 2010 and 2011, all reflecting the change in the reporting structure of the Company. These changes do not revise or restate information previously reported in the Consolidated Statements of Operations, Consolidated Balance Sheets, Consolidated Statements of Shareholders' Equity or Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Company and consolidated subsidiaries for any period.
Fiscal Year 2012 Changes to Global Marine Organization Structure
Effective during the quarter ended March 31, 2012, the Company realigned its global marine operations, which resulted in changes to the components of the Marine Engine and Boat reportable segments. Several Brunswick boat brands based in Europe and Asia, which include Quicksilver, Rayglass, Uttern and Valiant boats, each of which were previously included in the Marine Engine segment, are now managed and included as part of the Boat segment.
This alignment allows for a comprehensive strategic approach to boat market opportunities around the globe, and enables us to better share and concentrate our worldwide resources to develop new boats, products and features, and augment our dealer network. This realignment also allows Mercury to focus its full time and attention on implementing its significant growth plans in marine engine and related markets.
Fiscal Year 2012 Changes to Reporting of Pension Costs
Effective during the quarter ended March 31, 2012, the Company started evaluating segment results exclusive of certain costs associated with its defined benefit pension plans. As a result of freezing benefit accruals in its defined benefit pension plans, the Company has elected to allocate only service related costs to the operating segment results and report all other components of pension expense on a separate line included in the segment tables presented below. As a result, Interest cost, Expected return on plan assets, Amortization of net actuarial losses and Curtailment losses previously reported in the Marine Engine and Bowling & Billiards segments, as well as Corporate/Other, are now being reported in Pension - non-service costs. Pension costs associated with Service cost and Amortization of prior service cost, while not significant, remain in the reporting segments as presented in the tables below.
The above changes will be reflected in the management discussion and analysis and the notes to consolidated financial statements for segment reporting beginning in fiscal year 2012, starting with the Form 10-Q for the three months ended March 31, 2012. In advance of the Form 10-Q filing, this document provides restated Net sales, Operating earnings (loss) and Restructuring segment information for the three months and year-to-date periods ended during each quarterly period for 2010 and 2011.
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20120426073729.txt.gz
TIME:20120426073729
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  April 26, 2012
 
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 26, 2012, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the first quarter 2012. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its first quarter earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to shareholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available to fund investments in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash provided by or used for acquisitions, investments, transfers to restricted cash and purchases or sales of marketable securities). The measure diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted is also believed to be useful to investors because it represents a measure of Brunswicks earnings, without the impact of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Brunswick defines diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted, as diluted earnings per common share, excluding the earnings or loss per share impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as the loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Additionally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure net debt is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks ability to repay its outstanding debt using its current cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.  Brunswick defines net debt as the sum of short-term and long-term debt, less cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities as presented in its condensed consolidated balance sheets.
 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01.                      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
Exhibit No.
                   
Description of Exhibit
 
99.1            News Release, dated April 26, 2012, of Brunswick Corporation, announcing its first quarter 2012 earnings. 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                                                                                            
Brunswick Reports First Quarter Results
Ninth Consecutive Quarter of Earnings Per Share Growth
2012 GAAP Earnings Guidance Increased to $1.30 to $1.50
LAKE FOREST, Ill., April 26, 2012
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the first quarter of 2012:
Our first quarter increase in earnings per share demonstrates the continuing success of our business strategy, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. Short-term financial performance continues to improve, even as we make increased investments for long-term organic growth. In addition, we are pleased to see U.S. marine industry retail demand up in the first quarter, with strong growth in the aluminum and fiberglass outboard product categories.
First Quarter Results
For the first quarter of 2012, the Company reported net sales of $974.2 million, down from $985.9 million a year earlier. For the quarter, the Company reported operating
earnings of $67.6 million, which included $0.2 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges. In the first quarter of 2011, the Company had operating earnings of $67.0 million, which included $5.3 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
For the first quarter of 2012, Brunswick reported net earnings of $39.7 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, compared with $27.5 million, or $0.30 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2011. The earnings per diluted share for the first quarter of 2012 included a $0.02 per diluted share charge from special tax items. The earnings per diluted share for the first quarter of 2011 included $0.05 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, and a $0.05 per diluted share loss on early extinguishment of debt.
As anticipated, our first quarter consolidated sales were modestly lower due to specific factors affecting our Marine Engine and Life Fitness segments. Our first quarter gross margin of 24.2 percent reflects an increase of 20 basis points from the prior year. Selling, general and administrative expense, combined with research and development expense, increased by 3 percent, which is inclusive of company-wide investments in growth initiatives. Lower net interest expense and a reduced income tax provision during the quarter contributed to our higher reported net earnings, McCoy said.
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and marketable securities totaled $426.9 million at the end of the first quarter, down $80.9 million from year-end 2011 levels. This decrease primarily reflects net cash used for operating activities of $69.7 million. Net cash used for operating activities was affected by changes in working capital during the quarter. These changes in working capital were largely the result of increases in accounts and notes receivable and inventory to support the seasonal requirements of our marine customers, and decreases in accrued expenses, partially offset by increases in accounts payable.
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and marketable securities) at the end of the first quarter was $269.1 million, an increase of $84.1 million from year-end 2011 levels. The increase in net debt reflects the $80.9 million decrease in total cash and marketable securities, combined with a slight increase in debt levels.
Change in Segment Reporting
On April 19, 2012, the Company filed a Current Report on Form 8-K, which included revised segment reporting for 2010 and 2011, by quarter. These changes do not revise or restate the information previously reported in the Consolidated Statements of Operation, Consolidated Balance Sheets, Consolidated Statements of Shareholders' Equity or Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Company and consolidated subsidiaries for any period.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $489.4 million in the first quarter of 2012, down 2 percent from $501.1 million in the first quarter of 2011. International sales, which represented 39 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 7 percent. For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported operating earnings of $47.9 million, including restructuring charges of $1.7 million. This compares with operating earnings of $57.7 million in the first quarter of 2011, which included $4.3 million of restructuring charges.
Sales were higher in the segment's U.S. outboard and parts and accessories businesses. This growth was more than offset by global sales declines in the segment's sterndrive engine product category.
During the quarter, Mercury's manufacturing facilities, when compared to the prior year, increased production of its outboard engines in response to market demand. Mercury produced fewer sterndrive units in the quarter versus the prior year quarter, as it experienced operating constraints resulting from sterndrive ramp-up issues following its recently completed plant consolidation. In addition, the absence of a gain on the sale of a distribution facility and a favorable recovery against an insurance policy in 2011 contributed to the decrease in operating earnings in the first quarter of 2012. Partially offsetting these factors was the effect of lower variable compensation expense, successful cost reduction activities and lower restructuring charges.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 18 boat brands. The Boat segment reported net sales of $306.4 million for the first quarter of 2012, an increase of one percent compared with $303.5 million in the first quarter of 2011. International sales, which represented 38 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 7 percent during the period. For the first quarter of 2012, the Boat segment reported operating earnings of $2.8 million, including a gain of $1.5 million from restructuring activities. This compares with an operating loss of $4.8 million, including restructuring charges of $1.0 million, in the first quarter of 2011.
Boat segment production and wholesale shipments increased during the quarter, compared with the first quarter of 2011. The increase in wholesale unit shipments was partially offset by the effect of a higher mix of smaller boat sales and the absence of sales from the Sealine brand, which was divested on Aug. 30, 2011. Higher sales and lower restructuring, exit and impairment charges had a positive effect on the segment's improved quarterly results.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which designs, manufactures, and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment. Fitness segment sales in the first quarter of 2012 totaled $157.1 million, up slightly from $156.4 million in the first quarter of 2011. International sales, which represented 48 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 13 percent. For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $23.7 million. This compares with operating earnings of $23.4 million in the first quarter of 2011.
Sales increased slightly when compared with the prior year's first quarter, despite commercial equipment sales and operating earnings benefiting from a large order from one of its customer categories in the first quarter of 2011. Operating earnings increased by one percent in the first quarter of 2012, when compared with 2011, as a result of the modest increase in revenues and reduced operating expenses.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers, bowling equipment and products, and billiards tables and accessories. Segment sales in the first quarter of 2012 totaled $89.9 million, up 3 percent compared with $87.3 million in the year-ago quarter. International sales, which represented 19 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 5 percent. For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $14.4 million, compared with operating earnings of $14.2 million in the first quarter of 2011.
For the quarter, bowling products experienced a solid increase in sales, while equivalent-center sales for retail bowling were down slightly. The improvement in operating earnings in the first quarter of 2012, when compared with 2011, reflects contributions from higher sales.
Outlook
On the basis of our solid performance in the first quarter, and early season improvements in the retail marine marketplace, we are increasing our 2012 earnings per share expectation to a range of $1.30 to $1.50 per diluted share, McCoy said. Although a number of the factors that negatively affected sales and earnings in the first quarter will continue into the second, we are planning for significant sales and earnings growth in the second half of this year.
Each of our business segments will continue to concentrate their efforts on maintaining a favorable cost position and generating growth through market share gains and the execution of organic growth initiatives. In addition, our 2012 plan continues to reflect the generation of positive free cash flow, the further reduction of debt outstanding and improvements to the funded status of our pension liabilities.
Our outlook beyond 2012 remains consistent with the growth plans we described during our February 16, 2012 investor event. Over the next few years, these plans build on our recent financial progress, and further anticipate the successful execution of our various operational and capital structure strategic initiatives, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president - corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at
H
www.brunswick.com
H
. To listen to the call, go to the website at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
See Brunswick's Website for slides used to supplement conference call remarks at
www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events-presentations.php
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (866) 730-5763 (passcode: Brunswick Q1). Callers outside of North America should call (857) 350-1587 (passcode: Brunswick Q1) to be connected. These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call. A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Thursday, May 3, 2012, by calling (888) 286-8010 (passcode: 34720402) or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 34720402). The replay will also be available at
H
www.brunswick.com
H
.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release
are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswick's business. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability of dealers and customers to secure adequate access to financing and the Company's ability to access capital and credit markets; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; credit and collections risks, including the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the strength and protection of the Company's brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the need to meet pension funding
obligations; the effect of higher energy and logistics costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Company's results; competitive pricing pressures, including the impact of inflation and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop new and innovative products in response to changing retail demands and expectations that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with the manufacture and sale of products; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, taxes and employee benefits; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; fluctuations in the Company's stock price due to external factors; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to increase manufacturing operations and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and risks associated with the Company's information technology systems, including the continued use of legacy systems and the risk of a failure of or attacks on the Company's information systems, which could result in data security breaches, lost or stolen assets or information, and associated remediation costs.
Additional factors are included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2011. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this
news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Brunswick Commercial and Government Products, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables. For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20120726073902.txt.gz
TIME:20120726073902
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  July 26, 2012
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
N/A
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 26, 2012, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the second quarter 2012. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its second quarter earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statement of operations, balance sheet or statement of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to shareholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure free cash flow is also useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available to fund investments in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash provided by or used for acquisitions, investments, transfers to restricted cash and purchases or sales of marketable securities). The measure diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted is also believed to be useful to investors because it represents a measure of Brunswicks earnings, without the impact of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Brunswick defines diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted, as diluted earnings per common share, excluding the earnings or loss per share impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as the loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Additionally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure net debt is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks ability to repay its outstanding debt using its current cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.  Brunswick defines net debt as the sum of short-term and long-term debt, less cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities as presented in its condensed consolidated balance sheets.
 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.                      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
Exhibit No.
                   
Description of Exhibit
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                                                                                        
Brunswick Reports Second Quarter Results
Tenth Consecutive Quarter of Earnings Per Share Growth
2012 GAAP Earnings Guidance Increased to $1.45 to $1.60 Per Share
LAKE FOREST, Ill., July 26, 2012
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the second quarter of 2012:
Despite challenging global economic conditions, we are pleased to report solid earnings growth in the quarter achieved by continuing to successfully execute our business strategy, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. We are benefiting from strong U.S. retail growth in the aluminum and fiberglass outboard marine markets, and steady fundamentals in the fitness industry. However, weak demand in global fiberglass sterndrive categories has extended into the second quarter, and the overall European marketplace has deteriorated further. Our European sales, excluding divested operations, declined by $41 million or 23 percent in the quarter.
Second Quarter Results
For the second quarter of 2012, the Company reported net sales of $1,067.0 million, down from $1,096.3 million a year earlier. For the quarter, the Company reported operating earnings of
$114.8 million, which included $1.0 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges. In the second quarter of 2011, the Company had operating earnings of $107.9 million, which included a $0.3 million gain from restructuring activities.
For the second quarter of 2012, Brunswick reported net earnings of $83.6 million, or $0.90 per diluted share, compared with $69.3 million, or $0.75 per diluted share, for the second quarter of 2011. The earnings per diluted share for the second quarter of 2012 included $0.01 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, a $0.05 per diluted share loss on early extinguishment of debt and a $0.03 per diluted share benefit from special tax items. The earnings per diluted share for the second quarter of 2011 included a $0.02 per diluted share benefit from special tax items and a $0.01 per diluted share loss on early extinguishment of debt.
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and marketable securities totaled $508.9 million at the end of the second quarter, up $1.1 million from year-end 2011 levels. This increase reflects the impact of net cash provided by operations and other financing activities, less net cash used for the retirement of debt and other investing activities.
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and marketable securities) at the end of the second quarter was $166.4 million, a decrease of $18.6 million from year-end 2011 levels. The decrease in net debt primarily reflects a $17.5 million decrease in debt levels.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $591.2 million in the second quarter of 2012, up slightly from $589.0 million in the second quarter of 2011. International sales, which represented 34 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 9 percent. For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported operating earnings of $104.9 million, including restructuring charges of $0.9 million. This compares with operating earnings of $99.9 million in the second quarter of 2011, which included a $0.3 million gain from restructuring activities.
Sales were higher in the segment's parts and accessories and outboard engine businesses in the U.S. This growth was partially offset by sales declines in its global sterndrive engine product category and non-U.S. outboard engine and parts and accessories businesses.
Lower warranty and variable compensation expense, as well as successful cost reduction activities, contributed to the increase in operating earnings in the second quarter of 2012. Partially offsetting these factors was the effect of increased investments for long-term growth and higher material costs.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 18 boat brands. The Boat segment reported net sales of $321.9 million for the second quarter of 2012, a decrease of 10 percent compared with $356.0 million in the second quarter of 2011. International sales, which represented 36 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 26 percent during the period. For the second quarter of 2012, the Boat segment reported operating earnings of $8.4 million, including restructuring charges of $0.3 million. This compares with operating earnings of $10.1 million, which included a gain from restructuring activities of $0.1 million, in the second quarter of 2011.
Although the Company's dealers experienced growth at retail, the Boat segment's wholesale shipments decreased during the quarter, compared with the second quarter of 2011, as the seasonal reductions in dealer inventories were greater than the prior year. The decrease in wholesale unit shipments, including significant declines in European markets, and the absence of sales from the Sealine brand (divested on August 30, 2011) were the main factors contributing to the decline in revenues and operating earnings.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which designs, manufactures, and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment. Fitness segment sales in the second quarter of 2012 totaled $143.3 million, up one percent from $141.6 million in the second quarter of 2011. International sales, which represented 48 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 7 percent. For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $19.9 million. This compares with operating earnings of $19.1 million in the second quarter of 2011.
Sales increased modestly when compared with the prior year's second quarter, as strong U.S. sales were partially offset by declines in Europe. Operating earnings increased as a result of the
sales increase and lower variable compensation expense, partially offset by increased investments for long-term growth.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers, bowling equipment and products, and billiards tables and accessories. Segment sales in the second quarter of 2012 totaled $72.6 million, down 6 percent compared with $77.5 million in the prior year's second quarter. International sales, which represented 25 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 7 percent. For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $2.4 million, compared with operating earnings of $2.5 million in the second quarter of 2011.
Revenue reductions in the quarter were a function of lower international bowling products sales, fewer retail bowling centers, and a small decline in equivalent center sales. The reduction in operating earnings in the second quarter of 2012 was the result of lower revenues, when compared with 2011, partially offset by improved operating efficiencies.
Outlook
H
We anticipate continued growth in the aluminum and fiberglass outboard marine retail markets and steady fundamentals in the fitness industry, McCoy said. These positive trends, however, are expected to be partially offset by weak demand in fiberglass sterndrive categories. We further anticipate that sales into European markets will remain under significant pressure.
During the second half of 2012, the successful execution of our strategic initiatives will contribute to strong operating earnings growth for the year. Additionally, we expect our net income for the year to benefit from lower net interest, depreciation and pension expenses, as well as from a lower effective tax rate and reduced restructuring charges.
After taking all these factors into consideration, we currently expect our 2012 GAAP earnings per share to be in the range of $1.45 to $1.60 per diluted share, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president - corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at
H
www.brunswick.com
H
. To listen to the call, go to the website at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
See Brunswick's website for slides used to supplement conference call remarks at
www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events-presentations.php
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (866) 700-6979 (passcode: Brunswick Q2). Callers outside of North America should call (617) 213-8836 (passcode: Brunswick Q2) to be connected. These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call. A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT on Thursday, Aug. 2, 2012, by calling (888) 286-8010 (passcode: 57481910) or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 57481910). The replay will also be available at
H
www.brunswick.com
H
.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release
are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswick's business. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability of dealers and customers to secure adequate access to financing and the Company's ability to access capital and credit markets; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; credit and collections risks, including the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the strength and protection of the Company's brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the need to meet pension funding
obligations; the effect of higher energy and logistics costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Company's results; competitive pricing pressures, including the impact of inflation and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop new and innovative products in response to changing retail demands and expectations that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with the manufacture and sale of products; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, healthcare costs, taxes and employee benefits; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; fluctuations in the Company's stock price due to external factors; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to increase manufacturing operations and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and risks associated with the Company's information technology systems, including the continued use of legacy systems and the risk of a failure of or attacks on the Company's information systems, which could result in data security breaches, lost or stolen assets or information, and associated remediation costs.
Additional factors are included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2011. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Brunswick Commercial and Government Products, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables. For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20120730110625.txt.gz
TIME:20120730110625
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  July 24, 2012
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
N/A
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 5.02.                      Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers.
On July 24, 2012, the Board of Directors of Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) elected David C. Everitt and Roger J. Wood to the Board of Directors, effective September 1, 2012. In addition, the Board of Directors appointed Mr. Everitt to the Finance Committee and the Human Resources and Compensation Committee and appointed Mr. Wood to the Finance Committee and the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee.
The compensation of Messrs. Everitt and Wood will be consistent with that provided to all Brunswick non-employee directors, as described in Brunswick's most recent proxy statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 22, 2012.
The news release announcing the elections of Mr. Everitt and Mr. Wood to the Brunswick Board of Directors is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01.                      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
Exhibit No.
                   
Description of Exhibit
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                                                                                            
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION ELECTS
DAVID C. EVERITT, ROGER J. WOOD TO BOARD OF DIRECTORS
LAKE FOREST, Ill. July 30, 2012 -
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that David C. Everitt, President, Agricultural and Turf Division - North America, Asia, Australia, and Sub-Saharan and South Africa, and Global Tractor and Turf Products for Deere & Company, and Roger J. Wood, President and Chief Executive Officer of Dana Holding Corporation, have been elected to its board of directors.
We are pleased to welcome both David and Roger to Brunswick's board of directors, said Dustan E. McCoy, Brunswick's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer. Their combined expertise and experience in the global marketplace will prove invaluable to Brunswick moving forward.
David Everitt, 60, has been with Deere & Company since 1975, when he joined Deere as an engineer following his graduation from Kansas State University with a bachelor's degree in industrial engineering. Over the next nearly four decades, Mr. Everitt has held positions of increasing responsibility and is currently responsible for the sales and marketing of all Deere tractors and turf and utility products throughout the majority of the world. He also serves on the board of directors for Harsco Corporation and Gates Corporation.
Roger Wood, 50, joined Dana Holding Corporation as its president and chief executive officer in 2011, following a 26-year career with BorgWarner Inc., where he was most recently executive vice president and group president, engine. Mr. Wood has a bachelor's degree in engineering technology from State University College in Buffalo, N.Y., and an MBA from Syracuse University. He is a member of Dana Holding Corporation's board of directors, the Manufacturer's Alliance/MAPI organization, and is on the CEO Council for Original Equipment Suppliers Association (OESA) and
The Wall Street Journal
.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Brunswick Commercial and Government Products, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables. For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20121025073648.txt.gz
TIME:20121025073648
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  October 25, 2012
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
N/A
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 25, 2012, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the third quarter 2012. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its third quarter earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statements of operations, balance sheets or statements of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used certain of the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to shareholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "free cash flow" is useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available to fund investments in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash provided by or used for acquisitions, investments, transfers to restricted cash and purchases or sales of marketable securities). The measures "diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted" and "adjusted net earnings" are also believed to be useful to investors because they represent measures of Brunswicks earnings, without the impact of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Brunswick defines diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted, as diluted earnings per common share, excluding the earnings or loss per share impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as the loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items, and defines adjusted net earnings as net earnings, excluding the earnings or loss impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as the loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Additionally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure net debt is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks ability to repay its outstanding debt using its current cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.  Brunswick defines net debt as the sum of short-term and long-term debt, less cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities as presented in its condensed consolidated balance sheets. Finally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure "operating earnings, excluding restructuring, exit and impairment charges" is useful to investors because it provides a necessary and important perspective on Brunswick's operating performance and improves comparability of performance against prior periods. Brunswick defines operating earnings, excluding restructuring, exit and impairment charges as operating earnings, excluding the earnings impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges as presented in its comparative consolidated statements of operations.
 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.                      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
Exhibit No.
                   
Description of Exhibit
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                                                                                        
Brunswick Reports Third Quarter Results
Strong Gross Margin Improvement with Modest Revenue Growth
LAKE FOREST, Ill., October 25, 2012
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the third quarter of 2012:
        
A reconciliation of GAAP to non-GAAP financial measures is provided in the supplemental information sections of the consolidated financial statements accompanying this release.
We continue to successfully execute our business strategy despite challenging global economic conditions, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. Despite a 19 percent reduction in sales from Europe, the Company experienced slight revenue growth.
Further, excluding restructuring items, debt extinguishment losses and special tax items, our gross profit, operating earnings and net earnings per share each increased by double-digit percentages versus the third quarter of 2011.
Third Quarter Results
For the third quarter of 2012, the Company reported net sales of $884.8 million, up from $876.7 million a year earlier. For the quarter, the Company reported operating earnings of $37.5 million, which included $28.2 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges. In the third quarter of 2011, the Company had operating earnings of $35.6 million, which included $13.2 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
For the third quarter of 2012, Brunswick reported net earnings of $2.0 million, or $0.02 per diluted share, compared with $4.7 million, or $0.05 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2011. The earnings per diluted share for the third quarter of 2012 included $0.31 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, an $0.08 per diluted share loss on early extinguishment of debt and a $0.02 per diluted share charge from special tax items. The earnings per diluted share for the third quarter of 2011 included $0.14 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, a $0.13 per diluted share loss on early extinguishment of debt and a $0.01 per diluted share charge from special tax items.
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and marketable securities totaled $455.4 million at the end of the third quarter, down $52.4 million from year-end 2011 levels. This decrease primarily reflects the impact of net cash used for the retirement of debt, partially offset by approximately $60 million of positive free cash flow.
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and marketable securities) at the end of the third quarter was $142.3 million, a decrease of $42.7 million from year-end 2011 levels. The decrease in net debt reflects a $95.1 million reduction in debt levels.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $503.5 million in the third quarter of 2012, up 11 percent from $455.6 million in the third quarter of 2011.
International sales, which represented 34 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 2 percent. For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported operating earnings of $74.5 million, including
restructuring charges of $0.4 million. This compares with operating earnings of $52.9 million in the third quarter of 2011, which included restructuring charges of $4.2 million.
Sales were higher in the segment's outboard engine and parts and accessories businesses. This growth was partially offset by sales declines in its sterndrive engine product category.
Higher sales and engine production, a decrease in restructuring charges, as well as successful cost reduction activities contributed to the increase in operating earnings in the third quarter of 2012. Partially offsetting these factors was the effect of increased investments for long-term growth.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 18 boat brands. The Boat segment reported net sales of $205.8 million for the third quarter of 2012, a decrease of 7 percent compared with $221.1 million in the third quarter of 2011. Excluding divested brands, third quarter net sales decreased by 5 percent compared to the prior year. International sales, which represented 34 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 2 percent during the period. Excluding divested brands, third quarter international sales increased by 6 percent compared to the prior year. For the third quarter of 2012, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $43.5 million, including restructuring and impairment charges of $27.7 million. This compares with an operating loss of $21.2 million, which included restructuring charges of $8.7 million, in the third quarter of 2011.
The Boat segment's wholesale shipments were up slightly versus the prior year quarter, which was less than the 5 percent increase in retail demand. The increase in wholesale shipments reflected strong growth in demand for aluminum and outboard powered fiberglass products, which was mostly offset by continued weakness in fiberglass sterndrive boat products. The revenue effect of this shift in boat mix, along with the impact of weak European markets and the absence of sales from the Sealine brand (divested on August 30, 2011), were the main factors contributing to the decline in the segment's sales.
Lower sales, combined with higher restructuring from consolidation actions and impairment charges primarily associated with certain fiberglass brands, contributed to the higher operating losses reported in the quarter versus prior year.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which designs, manufactures, and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment. Fitness segment sales in the third quarter of 2012 totaled $151.9 million, down 3 percent from $157.2 million in the third quarter of 2011. International sales, which represented 48 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 4 percent. For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $23.1 million. This compares with operating earnings of $22.6 million in the third quarter of 2011.
Sales decreased modestly when compared with the prior year's third quarter. Higher sales to North American health club customers and stronger U.S. consumer sales were more than offset by declines in other U.S. distribution channels and in markets outside of North America. Operating earnings were up modestly as a result of improved operating efficiencies, partially offset by lower sales.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers, bowling equipment and products, and billiards tables and accessories. Segment sales in the third quarter of 2012 totaled $74.5 million, down 6 percent compared with $79.5 million in the prior year's third quarter. International sales, which represented 21 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 19 percent. For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $3.2 million, compared with operating earnings of $2.8 million in the third quarter of 2011.
Revenue reductions in the quarter were a function of lower sales in international bowling products and European retail bowling centers, as well as operating fewer U.S. retail bowling centers. These factors were partially offset by an increase in U.S. equivalent retail center sales. The increase in operating earnings in the third quarter of 2012 was the result of improved operating efficiencies, partially offset by lower revenues, when compared with 2011.
Outlook
In the fourth quarter, we anticipate that our end-markets will reflect mixed demand trends comparable to those experienced thus far in 2012, both from a product line and geographical perspective, McCoy said. As we continue to execute our strategic growth initiatives, as well as focus on cost reductions and operating efficiencies throughout our organization, we expect to be
able to demonstrate improved sales and operating earnings during the final quarter of the year as compared to 2011, resulting in strong full-year earnings growth.
 
After taking all these factors into consideration, we currently expect our 2012 diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted, to be in the range of $1.65 to $1.75, which is equivalent to $1.08 to $1.18 on a GAAP basis, concluded McCoy. The diluted earnings per common share estimate, on a GAAP basis, includes $0.57 of restructuring items, debt extinguishment losses and special tax items. The Company's previous estimate of full-year diluted earnings per common share on a GAAP basis was $1.45 to $1.60, which is equivalent to $1.60 to $1.75, as adjusted.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president - corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at
www.brunswick.com
H
. To listen to the call, go to the website at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
See Brunswick's website for slides used to supplement conference call remarks at
www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events-presentations.php
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (877) 299-4454 (passcode: Brunswick Q3). Callers outside of North America should call (617) 597-5447 (passcode: Brunswick Q3) to be connected. These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call. A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT on Thursday, Nov. 1, 2012, by calling (888) 286-8010 or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 64212452). The replay will also be available at
H
www.brunswick.com
H
.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release
are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswick's business. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release. These risks include, but are not
limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability of dealers and customers to secure adequate access to financing and the Company's ability to access capital and credit markets; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; credit and collections risks, including the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the strength and protection of the Company's brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the need to meet pension funding obligations; the effect of higher energy and logistics costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Company's results; competitive pricing pressures, including the impact of inflation and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop new and innovative products in response to changing retail demands and expectations that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with the manufacture and sale of products; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, healthcare costs, taxes and employee benefits; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; fluctuations in the Company's stock price due to external factors; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to increase manufacturing operations and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and risks associated with the Company's information technology systems, including the continued use of legacy systems and the risk of a failure of or attacks on the Company's information systems, which could result in data security breaches, lost or stolen assets or information, and associated remediation costs.
Additional factors are included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2011. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Brunswick Commercial and Government Products, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables. For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20121204160649.txt.gz
TIME:20121204160649
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  December 3, 2012
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
N/A
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 5.02.                      Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers.
On December 4, 2012, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced that Peter B. Hamilton will be retiring from his position as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Brunswick effective March 1, 2013. On December 4, 2012, Brunswick also announced that it has appointed William L. Metzger to the position of Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer effective March 1, 2013.
Mr. Metzger, 51, has been Vice President and Treasurer of Brunswick since May 2001. Mr. Metzger joined Brunswick in 1987 as Manager of Special Projects in the Accounting Department. In 1991, he was assigned to Brunswicks internal audit staff as a Manager, and in 1996 was named Director - Corporate Accounting.
In his new role as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, Mr. Metzger will earn an annual base salary of $460,000. He will be entitled to participate in the Brunswick Performance Plan, with a target bonus determined by the Human Resources and Compensation Committee (Committee) and will also be eligible for grants of equity-based awards under Brunswick's 2003 Stock Incentive Plan as determined by the Committee. Mr. Metzger will also be eligible for other benefits to which the executive officers are entitled as described in Brunswick's most recent proxy statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 22, 2012.
A copy of the news release announcing the retirement of Peter B. Hamilton and the appointment of William L. Metzger is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01.                      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
Exhibit No.
                   
Description of Exhibit
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                                                                                            
METZGER APPOINTED CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER
OF BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Dec. 4, 2012 -
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE:BC) announced today its plan of succession for chief financial officer, naming William L. Metzger, 51, to this position. Most recently vice president and treasurer of the Company, Metzger will succeed Peter B. Hamilton, who is retiring in February 2013. Metzger will report to Dustan E. McCoy, Brunswick chairman and chief executive officer. The change will take effect in March.
Metzger joined Brunswick in 1987 as a manager in the accounting department. In 1991, he was assigned to Brunswick's internal audit staff as a manager, and in 1996 was named director - corporate accounting. In 2001, Metzger was named vice president and treasurer.
Bill's skills and talents, his solid record of achievement at Brunswick, and his extensive knowledge of the Company make him a natural choice for this position, McCoy explained. His interaction with rating agencies and the financial community has been exemplary, and his management expertise will ensure a strong adherence to financial, operational and strategic disciplines.
Metzger has a bachelor's of science degree in accounting from Illinois State University and a master's in management from Northwestern University's Kellogg School of Management. Metzger spent four years with Arthur Andersen before joining Brunswick.
We extend our sincere thanks to Peter Hamilton, who returned to Brunswick in 2008 to help guide the Company through a difficult economic environment, McCoy continued. We have benefitted greatly from
Peter's insight and management capability during his 15 years as a critical member of Brunswick's executive team. We are also pleased that these two leaders, who have worked so closely through the years, will continue to do so in carrying out a smooth and effective transition.
Lowe Promoted
In a related action, Alan L. Lowe, 61, vice president and controller, will become vice president - finance and controller and assume responsibility for Brunswick's business development activity. Lowe joined Brunswick in 2003.
As Brunswick's most senior finance leaders, Bill and Alan will work closely together to ensure that the Company is advancing shareholder value through solid financial operating performance and wise capital allocation decisions, McCoy said.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Brunswick Commercial and Government Products, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables. For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20121228084241.txt.gz
TIME:20121228084241
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  December 28, 2012
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
N/A
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 5.02.                      Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers.
On December 28, 2012, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) entered into Amended and Restated Terms and Conditions of Employment (collectively, the Amended Terms and Conditions) with each of Dustan E. McCoy, Brunswick's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, Kristin M. Coleman, Brunswick's Vice President, General Counsel & Secretary, Andrew E. Graves, Brunswick's Vice President and President - Brunswick Boat Group, Mark D. Schwabero, Brunswick's Vice President and President - Mercury Marine, and B. Russell Lockridge, Brunswick's Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer.
Each of the Amended Terms and Conditions (i) eliminated a provision in each executive's prior agreement that had provided an excise tax gross-up on change in control payments (except for Ms. Coleman whose prior agreement did not contain such provision) and (ii) eliminated a provision that had reduced the amount of the executive's severance benefits as the executive approached age 65. In addition, each of the Amended Terms and Conditions includes certain administrative or otherwise immaterial changes to the prior agreements.
The Amended Terms and Conditions entered into with Mr. McCoy also replaced the modified single trigger for receiving change in control severance benefits under his prior agreement with a double trigger (effective upon a qualifying termination of employment by Brunswick following a change in control), as applicable to Brunswick's other senior executives.
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20130103163640.txt.gz
TIME:20130103163640
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  December 31, 2012
 
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
N/A
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 2.05.                  Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
On December 31, 2012, the Board of Directors of Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") authorized the Company to exit its Hatteras and CABO boat businesses as a result of, among other things, a review of the expected future cash flows, market conditions and business trends within those businesses.
The decision to exit will result in these businesses being accounted for as discontinued operations. The Company expects to record charges in the range of $70 million to $80 million, a majority of which will be recorded in the fourth quarter of 2012. The charges primarily relate to a write-down of assets of approximately $45 million, with the remaining charge substantially comprised of other costs associated with operating expenses and liabilities including increases in contingent obligations. The Company expects future net cash expenditures of approximately $18 million related to this charge.
The news release discussing these charges is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01.                      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
Exhibit No.
                   
Description of Exhibit
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                                                                                            
BRUNSWICK ANNOUNCES PLAN TO EXIT HATTERAS AND CABO BRANDS
LAKE FOREST, Ill. Jan. 3, 2013 ---
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that its board of directors has authorized the Company to seek a buyer for its Hatteras and CABO brands of motoryachts and sportfishing convertibles.
This action reflects our decision to exit the sportfishing convertible category and to concentrate our resources in the yacht segment on our remaining brands, Sea Ray and Meridian Yachts. When completed, this action will also contribute to our goal of a break-even or better Boat Segment in 2013, even if the larger sterndrive/inboard fiberglass markets do not improve, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy.
The current plan assumes that the eventual purchaser will retain both the physical plant and the talented workforce of Hatteras/CABO. During the sale process, which we seek to complete in an expeditious manner, Hatteras and CABO will maintain ongoing operations, and we will keep our employees and dealer network informed of our progress.
As a result of this decision, the Company expects to record charges in the range of $70 million to $80 million, a majority of which will be recorded in the fourth quarter of 2012.
Brunswick purchased Hatteras Yachts in 2001 and CABO in 2006. Both are based in New Bern, N.C.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswick's business. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release. Economic, competitive, governmental and other factors that may affect Brunswick's operations are discussed in the Risk Factors section of the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2011 and are incorporated by reference. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Brunswick Commercial and Government Products, Cabo Yachts, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Hatteras, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables. For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20130117085434.txt.gz
TIME:20130117085434
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  January 17, 2013
 
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
N/A
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]          Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 7.01.                  Regulation FD Disclosure
On December 31, 2012, the Board of Directors of Brunswick Corporation (the "Company") authorized the Company to exit its Hatteras and CABO boat businesses.
As a result, these businesses, which were previously reported in the Boat segment, will be reported as discontinued operations beginning with the fourth quarter of 2012.
In advance of the Company filing its 2012 Form 10-K, this Form 8-K provides restated historical Net sales, Operating earnings (loss) and Restructuring segment results for continuing operations for the three months and year-to-date periods ended during each quarterly period for 2011 and the first three quarters of 2012. These changes will be reflected in the earnings release for the fourth quarter of 2012 scheduled for January 24, 2013, and the management discussion and analysis and consolidated financial statements and footnotes in the Form 10-K yet to be issued for the year ended December 31, 2012.
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20130124073750.txt.gz
TIME:20130124073750
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  January 24, 2013
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
N/A
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 24, 2013, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the fourth quarter and full-year 2012. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its fourth quarter and full-year 2012 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statements of operations, balance sheets or statements of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used certain of the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to shareholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "free cash flow" is useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available to fund investments in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash provided by or used for acquisitions, investments, transfers to restricted cash and purchases or sales of marketable securities). The measure "diluted earnings (loss) per common share, as adjusted" is also believed to be useful to investors because it represents a measure of Brunswicks earnings, without the impact of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Brunswick defines diluted earnings (loss) per common share, as adjusted, as diluted earnings (loss) per common share, excluding the earnings per share impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as the loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items.  Additionally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure net debt is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks ability to repay its outstanding debt using its current cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.  Brunswick defines net debt as the sum of short-term and long-term debt, less cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities as presented in its condensed consolidated balance sheets. Finally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure "adjusted operating earnings (loss)" is useful to investors because it provides a necessary and important perspective on Brunswick's operating performance and improves comparability of performance against prior periods. Brunswick defines adjusted operating earnings (loss) as operating earnings (loss), excluding the earnings impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.                      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
Exhibit No.
                   
Description of Exhibit
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                                                                                        
Brunswick Reports Fourth Quarter and Full-Year Results
Full-Year Results Reflect Strong Growth in Operating Earnings and Earnings Per Share
Total Debt Reduced by $121 Million in 2012
2013 Guidance: EPS from Continuing Operations, as adjusted, of $2.20 to $2.45
LAKE FOREST, Ill., Jan. 24, 2013
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the fourth quarter and full-year of 2012. On Jan. 3, 2013, the Company announced its intention to exit its Hatteras and CABO boat businesses. As a result, these businesses are now reported as discontinued operations for all periods presented in this release and all figures reflect continuing operations only, unless otherwise noted.
2012 Full-Year Highlights:
A reconciliation of GAAP to non-GAAP financial measures is provided in the supplemental information sections of the consolidated financial statements accompanying this release.
In 2012, we successfully executed our business strategy despite challenging global economic conditions, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. Our results in 2012 represent the third consecutive year of strong improvements in operating earnings and net earnings. Adjusted operating earnings and diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted, increased by 23 percent and 54 percent, respectively, for the year.
In addition, increased earnings contributed to the continued generation of solid free cash flow. As a result, we made significant progress in improving our balance sheet by reducing debt balances by $121 million, which contributed to a $14 million reduction in interest expense.
Over the past several years, our entire organization has done an excellent job of executing our business plan and transforming our businesses to promote growth and identify operating efficiencies. The 2012 results and the strategic actions taken during the year have strengthened our overall financial profile, providing a solid platform for further improvements in future financial results, McCoy said.
2012 Full-Year Results
For the year ended Dec. 31, 2012, the Company reported net sales of $3,717.6 million, up from $3,670.0 million a year earlier. For the year, operating earnings were $264.1 million, which included $25.8 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges. In 2011, the Company reported operating earnings of $213.7 million, which included $21.3 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
For 2012, the Company reported net earnings of $147.4 million, or $1.59 per diluted share, compared with net earnings of $90.6 million, or $0.98 per diluted share, for 2011. The diluted earnings per share for 2012 included restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $0.28 per diluted share, losses on early extinguishment of debt of $0.18 per diluted share and a $0.04 per diluted share charge from special tax items. The earnings per diluted share for 2011 included $0.24 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, $0.21 per diluted share of losses on early extinguishment of debt and a $0.07 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.
Fourth Quarter Highlights:
        
Fourth Quarter Results
For the fourth quarter of 2012, the Company reported net sales of $829.8 million, up from $761.5 million a year earlier. For the quarter, the Company reported operating earnings of $7.0 million, which included $10.5 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges. In the fourth quarter of 2011, the Company had an operating loss of $13.4 million, which included $4.2 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
For the fourth quarter of 2012, Brunswick reported a net loss of $16.1 million, or $0.18 per diluted share, compared with a net loss of $25.4 million, or $0.28 per diluted share, for the fourth quarter of 2011. The diluted earnings per share for the fourth quarter of 2012 included $0.11 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, a $0.05 per diluted share loss on early extinguishment of debt, and a $0.04 per diluted share charge from special tax items. The diluted earnings per share for the fourth quarter of 2011 included $0.04 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, a $0.03 per diluted share loss on early extinguishment of debt and a $0.05 per diluted share benefit from special tax items.
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and marketable securities totaled $428.7 million at the end of 2012, down $79.1 million from year-end 2011 levels. This decrease primarily reflects the impact of cash used for the retirement of debt, partially offset by $64.1 million of positive free cash flow, including cash used by discontinued operations.
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and marketable securities) at the end of 2012 was $143.1 million, a decrease of $41.9 million from year-end 2011 levels. The decrease in net debt
reflects a $121.0 million reduction in debt levels, partially offset by a decrease in cash and marketable securities.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $404.4 million in the fourth quarter of 2012, up 12 percent from $359.6 million in the fourth quarter of 2011. International sales, which represented 44 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 5 percent. For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported operating earnings of $16.5 million, including restructuring charges of $1.2 million. This compares with operating earnings of $7.0 million in the fourth quarter of 2011, which included restructuring charges of $2.8 million.
Sales in the quarter were higher in each of the segment's major product categories. Higher sales and engine production, cost reduction activities, as well as lower variable compensation expense and a decrease in restructuring charges contributed to the increase in operating earnings in the fourth quarter of 2012. Partially offsetting these factors was the effect of increased investments for long-term growth.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 16 boat brands. The Boat segment reported net sales of $206.7 million for the fourth quarter of 2012, an increase of 17 percent compared with $177.4 million in the fourth quarter of 2011. International sales, which represented 41 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 25 percent during the period. For the fourth quarter of 2012, the Boat segment reported an operating loss of $33.4 million, including restructuring, exit and impairment charges of $8.9 million. This compares with an operating loss of $28.0 million, which included a restructuring gain of $0.2 million in the fourth quarter of 2011.
The Boat segment's wholesale shipments were up strongly versus the prior year quarter. The increase in wholesale shipments reflected continued growth in demand for aluminum and U.S. outboard-powered fiberglass products, which was partially offset by ongoing weakness in global large fiberglass inboard/sterndrive and European fiberglass outboard boat products.
The increase in operating losses resulted from higher restructuring and impairment charges. The operating improvement, excluding restructuring and impairment charges, reflects higher sales, net of greater investments for long-term growth and an unfavorable change in product mix.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which designs, manufactures, and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment. Fitness segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2012 totaled $183.6 million, up 2 percent from $180.0 million in the fourth quarter of 2011. International sales, which represented 47 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 7 percent. For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $36.4 million. This compares with operating earnings of $28.3 million in the fourth quarter of 2011.
The increase in sales for Life Fitness reflected solid growth to domestic health club customers and net gains in international markets, which included continued sales weakness in Europe. The increase in operating earnings in the fourth quarter of 2012 was the result of higher sales, lower warranty and variable compensation expenses and improved operating efficiencies, when compared to 2011.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers, bowling equipment and products, and billiards tables and accessories. Segment sales in the fourth quarter of 2012 totaled $85.3 million, up 5 percent compared with $80.9 million in the prior year's fourth quarter. International sales, which represented 21 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 5 percent. For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $8.5 million, including restructuring charges of $0.4 million. This compares with operating earnings of $4.1 million in the fourth quarter of 2011, which included restructuring charges of $1.6 million.
Revenue growth in the quarter was a function of higher sales in bowling products and an increase in U.S. equivalent retail center sales, partially offset by operating fewer centers. The increase in operating earnings in the fourth quarter of 2012 was the result of higher revenues, improved operating efficiencies and lower restructuring charges, when compared with 2011.
Outlook
In 2013, we are planning a continuation of the sales and earnings growth achieved by the Company for the past three years, McCoy said. Our plans are based on global economic conditions in 2013 that are generally comparable to 2012, with weakness continuing in Europe.
In the global marine sector, we expect to benefit in 2013 from the continuing uneven recovery in the U.S. powerboat market. We plan for our outboard boat and engine products to generate solid growth as they successfully compete in this improving market, as well as our global parts and accessories businesses, as they serve a stable population of boats in use. We do, however, assume that weak market conditions will continue to challenge the large fiberglass boat category, which will affect both fiberglass boat and sterndrive engine production. Positive health and wellness trends, combined with exciting new products, have positioned our fitness business to deliver excellent results, and our bowling business should further leverage its competitive advantages in an evolving market.
Against this background, we are targeting a 3 percent to 5 percent revenue growth rate in 2013, driven by the strength of our global brands and contributions from our growth initiatives.
We are also planning to maintain the strong gross margins achieved in 2012, while exploring opportunities to further expand these margins. Our organic growth platform will benefit from increased investments in capital projects and research and development programs, along with the SG&A to support them. In addition, despite these higher spending levels, we plan to generate positive free cash flow and execute against our ongoing strategic financial objective of further lowering debt levels, thereby reducing interest expense.
After taking all of these factors into consideration, we expect our 2013 diluted earnings per common share, excluding restructuring, exit and impairment charges, debt extinguishment losses and special tax items, to be in the range of $2.20 to $2.45, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CST, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, Peter B. Hamilton, senior vice president and chief financial officer, William L. Metzger, vice president - treasurer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president - corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at
H
www.brunswick.com
H
. To listen to the call, go to the website at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
See Brunswick's website for slides used to supplement conference call remarks at
www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events-presentations.php
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (800) 638-5439 (passcode: Brunswick Q4). Callers outside of North America should call (617) 614-3945 (passcode: Brunswick Q4) to be connected. These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call. A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CST on Thursday, Jan. 31, 2013, by calling (888) 286-8010 or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 72267135). The replay will also be available at
H
www.brunswick.com
H
.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release
are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswick's business. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability of dealers and customers to secure adequate access to financing and the Company's ability to access capital and credit markets; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; credit and collections risks, including the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the strength and protection of the Company's brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the need to meet pension funding obligations; the effect of higher energy and logistics costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Company's results; competitive pricing pressures, including the impact of inflation and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop new and innovative products in response to changing retail demands and expectations that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with
the manufacture and sale of products; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, healthcare costs, taxes and employee benefits; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; fluctuations in the Company's stock price due to external factors; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to increase manufacturing operations and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and risks associated with the Company's information technology systems, including the continued use of legacy systems and the risk of a failure of or attacks on the Company's information systems, which could result in data security breaches, lost or stolen assets or information, and associated remediation costs.
Additional factors are included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2011. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Brunswick Commercial and Government Products, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Trophy, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables.
For more information, visit
http://www.brunswick.com
.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20130425073859.txt.gz
TIME:20130425073859
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  April 25, 2013
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
N/A
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 2.02.                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 25, 2013, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced its financial results for the first quarter 2013. The news release issued by Brunswick announcing its first quarter 2013 earnings is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
In the news release, Brunswick uses non-GAAP financial measures. For purposes of SEC Regulation G, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure of a registrants historical or future financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of excluding amounts, that are included in the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the statements of operations, balance sheets or statements of cash flows of the issuer; or includes amounts, or is subject to adjustments that have the effect of including amounts, that are excluded from the most directly comparable measure so calculated and presented. Operating and statistical measures and certain ratios and other statistical measures are not non-GAAP financial measures. GAAP refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.
Brunswick has used certain of the financial measures that are included in the news release for several years, both in presenting its results to shareholders and the investment community and in its internal evaluation and management of its businesses. Brunswicks management believes that these measures (including those that are non-GAAP financial measures) and the information they provide are useful to investors because they permit investors to view Brunswicks performance using the same tools that Brunswick uses and to better evaluate Brunswicks ongoing business performance. Brunswicks management believes that the non-GAAP financial measure "free cash flow" is useful to investors because it is an indication of cash flow that may be available to fund investments in future growth initiatives. Brunswick defines free cash flow as cash flow from operating and investing activities (excluding cash provided by or used for acquisitions, investments, transfers to restricted cash and purchases or sales of marketable securities). The measure "diluted earnings per common share from continuing operations, as adjusted" is also believed to be useful to investors because it represents a measure of Brunswicks earnings, without the impact of restructuring, exit and impairment charges, loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items and the results of discontinued operations.  Brunswick defines diluted earnings per common share from continuing operations, as adjusted, as diluted earnings per common share, excluding the earnings per share impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges, as well as the loss on early extinguishment of debt and special tax items and the results of discontinued operations.  Additionally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure net debt is useful to investors because it is an indication of Brunswicks ability to repay its outstanding debt using its current cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities.  Brunswick defines net debt as the sum of short-term and long-term debt, less cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments in marketable securities and long-term investments in marketable securities as presented in its condensed consolidated balance sheets. Finally, Brunswicks management believes that the measure "adjusted operating earnings" is useful to investors because it provides a necessary and important perspective on Brunswick's operating performance and improves comparability of performance against prior periods. Brunswick defines adjusted operating earnings as operating earnings, excluding the earnings impact for restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
 
The information in this report and the exhibit attached hereto shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, or incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.                      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
Exhibit No.
                   
Description of Exhibit
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                                                                                        
Brunswick Reports First Quarter Results
Solid Revenue Growth and Improved Operating and Net Earnings
2013 Guidance: EPS from Continuing Operations, as Adjusted, Increased to $2.30 to $2.50
LAKE FOREST, Ill., April 25, 2013
-- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) today reported results for the first quarter of 2013:
Our first quarter results reflected solid top-line growth combined with excellent improvements in operating and net earnings, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. Revenue growth in the quarter was led by U.S. outboard marine products, marine parts and accessories and fitness equipment, partially offset by declines in fiberglass sterndrive/inboard products and in our bowling businesses.
Our first quarter gross margin of 26.3 percent reflected an increase of 150 basis points from the prior year, with the majority of the increase coming from the Marine Engine segment. Operating expenses increased by 2 percent, due to higher research and development and SG&A expenses
primarily associated with company-wide investments in growth initiatives, partially offset by a gain on the sale of real estate. Lower net interest expense and a reduced effective tax rate (excluding the impact of restructuring charges and special tax items) during the quarter contributed to our higher diluted earnings per common share, as adjusted, McCoy said.
On Jan. 3, 2013, the Company announced its intention to exit its Hatteras and CABO boat businesses. As a result, these businesses are reported as discontinued operations for all periods presented in this release and all figures reflect continuing operations only, unless otherwise noted.
A reconciliation of GAAP to non-GAAP financial measures is provided in the supplemental information sections of the consolidated financial statements accompanying this release.
First Quarter Results
For the first quarter of 2013, the Company reported net sales of $995.3 million, up from $959.6 million a year earlier. For the quarter, the Company reported operating earnings of $89.9 million, which included $5.6 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges. In the first quarter of 2012, the Company had operating earnings of $75.3 million, which included $0.2 million of restructuring, exit and impairment charges.
For the first quarter of 2013, Brunswick reported net earnings from continuing operations of $54.9 million, or $0.59 per diluted share, compared with net earnings from continuing operations of $47.0 million, or $0.51 per diluted share, for the first quarter of 2012. The diluted earnings per share for the first quarter of 2013 included $0.05 per diluted share of restructuring, exit and impairment charges and a $0.12 per diluted share charge from special tax items. The diluted earnings per share for the first quarter of 2012 included a $0.01 per diluted share charge from special tax items.
  
Review of Cash Flow and Balance Sheet
Cash and marketable securities totaled $305.2 million at the end of the first quarter, down $123.5 million from year-end 2012 levels. This decrease primarily reflects net cash used for operating activities, including discontinued operations, of $108.2 million. Net cash used for operating activities was affected by changes in working capital during the quarter. These changes in working capital were largely the result of increases in accounts and notes receivable
and inventory to support the seasonal requirements of our marine customers, and decreases in accrued expenses, partially offset by increases in accounts payable.
Net debt (defined as total debt, less cash and marketable securities) at the end of the first quarter was $264.5 million, an increase of $121.4 million from year-end 2012 levels. The increase in net debt primarily reflects the seasonal decrease in total cash and marketable securities.
Marine Engine Segment
The Marine Engine segment, consisting of the Mercury Marine Group, including the marine parts and accessories businesses, reported net sales of $521.8 million in the first quarter of 2013, up 7 percent from $489.4 million in the first quarter of 2012. International sales, which represented 36 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, were flat compared to the prior year. For the quarter, the Marine Engine segment reported operating earnings of $71.5 million. This compares with operating earnings of $47.9 million in the first quarter of 2012, which included $1.7 million of restructuring charges.
Sales were higher in the segment's outboard and parts and accessories businesses, partially offset by global sales declines in the segment's sterndrive engine product category.
Higher sales, the absence of prior year inefficiencies that resulted from sterndrive production ramp-up related to the completion of plant consolidation activities, a gain on a sale of real estate, and a decrease in restructuring charges contributed to the increase in operating earnings in the first quarter of 2013. Partially offsetting these factors was the effect of increased investments for long-term growth.
Boat Segment
The Boat segment is comprised of the Brunswick Boat Group, and includes 15 boat brands. The Boat segment reported net sales of $289.7 million for the first quarter of 2013, a decrease of one percent compared with $291.8 million in the first quarter of 2012. International sales, which represented 34 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 13 percent during the period. For the first quarter of 2013, the Boat segment reported operating earnings of $2.4 million, including restructuring charges of $4.9 million. This compares with operating earnings of $10.5 million in the first quarter of 2012, including a gain of $1.5 million from restructuring activities.
Boat segment wholesale unit shipments increased slightly during the quarter, compared with the first quarter of 2012, as increases in outboard aluminum boats were mostly offset by lower sales of fiberglass sterndrive/inboard boats. The resulting impact on margins from this change in sales mix, along with higher restructuring, exit and impairment charges and investments for long-term growth, had a negative effect on the segment's quarterly results. Partially offsetting these factors were the benefits from successful cost reduction activities.
Fitness Segment
The Fitness segment is comprised of the Life Fitness Division, which designs, manufactures, and sells Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment. Fitness segment sales in the first quarter of 2013 totaled $166.2 million, up 6 percent from $157.1 million in the first quarter of 2012. International sales, which represented 50 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, increased by 11 percent. For the quarter, the Fitness segment reported operating earnings of $24.5 million. This compares with operating earnings of $23.7 million in the first quarter of 2012.
The increase in sales reflected gains in international markets and growth to U.S. health club customers. Operating earnings increased by 3 percent in the first quarter of 2013, when compared with 2012, as a result of higher sales combined with a favorable insurance settlement, partially offset by investments in growth initiatives.
Bowling & Billiards Segment
The Bowling & Billiards segment is comprised of Brunswick retail bowling centers, bowling equipment and products, and billiards tables and accessories. Segment sales in the first quarter of 2013 totaled $85.2 million, down 5 percent compared with $89.9 million in the year-ago quarter. International sales, which represented 19 percent of total segment sales in the quarter, decreased by 4 percent. For the quarter, the segment reported operating earnings of $14.9 million, compared with operating earnings of $14.4 million in the first quarter of 2012.
Sales decreased in the quarter as a result of lower bowling products sales and a reduced retail center count. Partially offsetting the decline was an increase in U.S. equivalent retail center sales. The increase in operating earnings in the first quarter of 2013, when compared with 2012, reflects improved operating efficiencies, partially offset by lower sales in bowling products.
2013 Outlook
As a result of our solid performance in the first quarter and a more favorable anticipated tax rate, we are increasing our 2013 diluted earnings per share from continuing operations, as adjusted, expectation to a range of $2.30 to $2.50 per diluted share, McCoy said.
"Although very early in the selling season, first quarter U.S. marine retail demand was below our expectations as a result of weather conditions in important boating markets and perhaps other economic factors. Our operating plans for the remainder of the year remain consistent with the planning assumptions we communicated at the outset of the year, which reflected global economic conditions generally comparable to 2012, with weakness continuing in Europe.
We expect to continue to experience an uneven recovery in the U.S. powerboat market, with our outboard boat and engine products and global parts and accessories businesses generating solid growth. Our assumptions continue to reflect weak market conditions challenging the large fiberglass boat category, which will affect both fiberglass boat and sterndrive engine sales and production.
Positive health and wellness trends, combined with exciting new products, have positioned our fitness business to deliver excellent results again in 2013, and our bowling business should further leverage its competitive advantages with improving top- line performance expected in the second half of the year.
Against this backdrop, we continue to target 3 percent to 5 percent growth in overall revenue in 2013. Our current plan reflects a modest improvement in gross margin levels, as the strong increase experienced in the first quarter is expected to moderate over the remainder of the year. Our organic growth platform will benefit from increased 2013 investments in capital projects and research and development programs, along with the SG&A to support them. As a result of these initiatives, full-year operating expenses, as a percentage of sales, are expected to be comparable to 2012 levels.
For the full-year, we expect to generate positive free cash flow and execute against our ongoing strategic financial objective of further lowering debt levels, thereby reducing interest expense, McCoy concluded.
Conference Call Scheduled
Brunswick will host a conference call today at 10 a.m. CDT, hosted by Dustan E. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, William L. Metzger, senior vice president and chief financial officer, and Bruce J. Byots, vice president - corporate and investor relations.
The call will be broadcast over the Internet at www
.brunswick.com.
To listen to the call, go to the website at least 15 minutes before the call to register, download and install any needed audio software.
See Brunswick's Website for slides used to supplement conference call remarks at
www.brunswick.com/investors/investorinformation/events-presentations.php
Security analysts and investors wishing to participate via telephone should call (877) 474-9502 (passcode: Brunswick Q1). Callers outside of North America should call (857) 244-7555 (passcode: Brunswick Q1) to be connected. These numbers can be accessed 15 minutes before the call begins, as well as during the call. A replay of the conference call will be available through midnight CDT Thursday, May 2, 2013, by calling (888) 286-8010 or international dial (617) 801-6888 (passcode: 90102614). The replay will also be available at www.brunswick.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release
are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswick's business. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability of dealers and customers to secure adequate access to financing and the Company's ability to access capital and credit markets; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; credit and collections risks, including the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the strength and protection of the Company's brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the need to meet pension funding
obligations; the effect of higher energy and logistics costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Company's results; competitive pricing pressures, including the impact of inflation and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop new and innovative products in response to changing retail demands and expectations that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with the manufacture and sale of products; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, healthcare costs, taxes and employee benefits; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; fluctuations in the Company's stock price due to external factors; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to increase manufacturing operations and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and risks associated with the Company's information technology systems, including the continued use of legacy systems and the risk of a failure of or attacks on the Company's information systems, which could result in data security breaches, lost or stolen assets or information, and associated remediation costs.
Additional risk factors are included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2012. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release, or for changes made to this document by wire services or Internet service providers.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Brunswick Commercial and Government Products, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables. For more information, visit
http://www.brunswick.com
.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20130508174235.txt.gz
TIME:20130508174235
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  May 8, 2013
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
N/A
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
Item 8.01.
    
Other Information.
On May 8, 2013, Brunswick Corporation (Brunswick) announced that it priced its offering of $150 million aggregate principal amount of 4.625% senior notes due 2021 at par, in a private offering to qualified institutional buyers in accordance with Rule 144A and to persons outside the U.S. pursuant to Regulation S under the Securities Act of 1933.
The news release issued by Brunswick is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01.                      Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)           Exhibits:
 
 
Exhibit No.
                   
Description of Exhibit
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

                                                                                                            
Brunswick Corporation Announces Pricing of $150 Million of Senior Notes due 2021
LAKE FOREST, Il., May 8, 2013
- Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) (Brunswick) announced today that it has priced an offering of $150 million aggregate principal amount of 4.625% senior notes due 2021 (the New Notes) at par. The New Notes will be issued in a private offering to qualified institutional buyers in accordance with Rule 144A and to persons outside the U.S. pursuant to Regulation S under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the Securities Act). The New Notes will be guaranteed by Brunswick's domestic subsidiaries that guarantee obligations under its ABL facility.
The sale of the new notes is expected to be consummated on May 13, 2013, subject to customary closing conditions.
Brunswick intends to use the net proceeds from this offering, together with cash on hand, to fund the redemption of all of Brunswick's $250 million aggregate principal amount of 11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016.
The New Notes have not been and will not be registered under the Securities Act or any state securities laws and, unless so registered, may not be offered or sold in the United States except pursuant to an applicable exemption from, or a transaction not subject to, the registration requirements of the Securities Act and applicable state securities laws.
This news release does not and will not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy the New Notes or any other securities, nor shall there be any sale of the New Notes in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswick's business. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability of dealers and customers to secure adequate access to financing and the Company's ability to access capital and credit markets; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; credit and collections risks, including the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the strength and protection of the Company's brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the need to meet pension funding obligations; the effect of higher energy and logistics costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Company's results; competitive pricing pressures, including the impact of inflation and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop new and innovative products in response to changing retail demands and expectations that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with
the manufacture and sale of products; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, healthcare costs, taxes and employee benefits; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; fluctuations in the Company's stock price due to external factors; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to increase manufacturing operations and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and risks associated with the Company's information technology systems, including the continued use of legacy systems and the risk of a failure of or attacks on the Company's information systems, which could result in data security breaches, lost or stolen assets or information, and associated remediation costs.
Additional risk factors are included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2012. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Brunswick Commercial and Government Products, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer
Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables.
SOURCE: Brunswick Corporation


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BC/BC-8K-20130513161939.txt.gz
TIME:20130513161939
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 20549
________________________
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of report (Date of earliest event reported):  May 13, 2013
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
(Exact Name of Registrant Specified in Charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (847) 735-4700
N/A
(Former Name or Former Address, if Changed Since Last Report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
[ ]           Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[ ]           Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 14d-2(b))
[ ]           Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240, 13e-4(c))
On May 13, 2013, Brunswick Corporation (the Company) completed an offering (the Offering) of $150 million aggregate principal amount of 4.625% Senior Notes due 2021 (the Notes) to qualified institutional buyers in accordance with Rule 144A, and to persons outside the U.S. pursuant to Regulation S, under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the Securities Act). The Notes bear interest at a rate of 4.625% per annum and mature on May 15, 2021. Interest on the Notes will be payable semi-annually on May 15 and November 15 of each year, starting on November 15, 2013.
The Notes will be guaranteed by each of the Company's existing and future subsidiaries that guarantee obligations under the Company's revolving credit facility (the ABL Facility) or any other material debt facility. Under certain circumstances, subsidiary guarantors may be released from their guarantees, including if the Notes are assigned a rating equal to or higher than Baa3 by Moody's Investors Service, Inc. and BBB- by Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, Inc., or, with respect to any guarantee, if the applicable subsidiary guarantor ceases to be a guarantor under the ABL Facility or any material debt facility.
The Company intends to use the net proceeds from the Offering, plus cash on hand, to redeem all of the Company's outstanding 11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016 (the Senior Secured Notes) and pay all related fees and expenses. The Company estimates that the total cost of redeeming the Senior Secured Notes will be approximately $277.2 million, including $249.8 million of principal, a redemption premium of approximately $24.2 million and approximately $3.2 million of accrued interest.
The Notes were issued pursuant to an Indenture (the Indenture), dated as of May 13, 2013, between the Company, the subsidiary guarantors party thereto and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee. The Indenture imposes certain limitations on the ability of the Company and its restricted subsidiaries to incur liens, enter into sale and leaseback transactions and to consolidate, merge or sell all or substantially all of their assets. The Indenture does not limit the ability of the Company or its subsidiaries to incur unsecured debt, pay dividends or make other distributions, make loans and investments, sell or otherwise dispose of assets or enter into transactions with affiliates.
Prior to May 15, 2016, the Company may redeem the Notes in whole, but not in part, at a price equal to 100% of the principal amount plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the redemption date, plus a make-whole premium. In addition, at any time prior to May 15, 2016, the Company may redeem up to 35% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes with the net proceeds from certain equity offerings at a redemption price of 104.625% of the principal amount of the Notes to be redeemed, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the redemption date.
On or after May 15, 2016, the Company may redeem some or all of the notes at the following redemption prices (expressed as a percentage of principal amount of the Notes to be redeemed), plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the redemption date, if redeemed during the twelve-month period beginning on May 15 of the years indicated below:
The Company is not required to make mandatory redemption payments or sinking fund payments with respect to the Notes.
The Indenture contains customary events of default. If an event of default occurs and is continuing, the trustee or holders of at least 25% in principal amount of the Notes then outstanding may declare the principal of, premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest, if any, on the Notes to be due and payable. Certain events of bankruptcy or insolvency are events of default which shall result in the Notes being due and payable immediately upon the occurrence of such events of default.
Upon the occurrence of a change of control triggering event (as defined in the Indenture), any holder of Notes will have the right to require the Company to repurchase all or any part of the Notes of such holder at a purchase price equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the repurchase date.
The Notes have not been, and will not be, registered under the Securities Act or any state securities laws and, unless so registered, may not be offered or sold in the United States except pursuant to an applicable exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act and applicable state securities laws.
The Indenture and the form of the Notes are filed as Exhibits 4.1 and 4.2, respectively, to this Current Report on Form 8-K. The foregoing description of the Indenture and the Notes is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Indenture and the Notes, which are incorporated herein by reference.
The information set forth above under Item 1.01 is hereby incorporated by reference into this Item 2.03.
On May 13, 2013, the Company announced the completion of the Offering and the Company's election to redeem the Senior Secured Notes on June 12, 2013.
The news release issued by Brunswick is incorporated herein by reference and is included as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01. 
    
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)     Exhibits:
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX:

Exhibit 4.1
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Page
-i-    
    
-ii-    
    
-iii-    
    
EXHIBITS
-iv-    
INDENTURE, dated as of May 13, 2013 (this 
Indenture
), among BRUNSWICK CORPORATION, a corporation duly organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware (the 
Company
), certain subsidiaries of the Company from time to time parties hereto (the 
Subsidiary Guarantors
) and US BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, a national banking association, as trustee (in such capacity, the 
Trustee
).
Recitals Of The Company
The Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors have duly authorized the execution and delivery of this Indenture to provide for the issuance of (i) $150,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Companys 4.625% Senior Notes due 2021, issued on the date hereof (the 
Initial Notes
), (ii) if and when issued, an unlimited principal amount of additional notes having identical terms and conditions as the Initial Notes other than issue date, issue price and the first interest payment date (the 
Additional Notes
 and, together with the Initial Notes, the 
Securities
), and (iii) the Subsidiary Guarantees.
Each party agrees as follows for the benefit of the other parties and for the equal and ratable benefit of the Holders of the Securities:
ARTICLE I
Definitions and Incorporation by Reference
SECTION 1.1.  
    
Definitions
.
ABL Facility means the Credit Agreement, dated as of March 21, 2011, among the Company, the subsidiary borrowers party thereto, the guarantors party thereto, the lenders parties thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent (or its successor in such capacity), and as it may be amended, supplemented or modified from time to time and any renewal, increase, extension, refunding, restructuring, replacement or refinancing thereof in whole or in part (whether with the original administrative agent and lenders or another administrative agent or agents or one or more other lenders and whether provided under the original ABL Facility or one or more other credit or other agreements or indentures entered into from time to time).
Affiliate of any specified Person means (i) any other Person, directly or indirectly, controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with such specified Person, (ii) any Person who is a director or officer (a) of such Person, (b) of any Subsidiary of such Person or (c) of any Person described in clause (i) above and (iii) any beneficial owner of shares representing 10% or more of the total voting power of the Voting Stock (on a fully diluted basis) of the Company or of rights or warrants to purchase such Voting Stock (whether or not currently exercisable) and any Person who would be an Affiliate of any such beneficial owner pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii). For the purposes of this definition, control when used with respect to any Person means the power to direct the management and policies of such Person, directly or indirectly, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise; and the terms controlling and controlled have meanings
2
correlative to the foregoing. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Person (other than the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company) in whom a Receivables Entity makes an Investment in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction shall be deemed to be an Affiliate of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries solely by reason of such Investment.
Agent means any Registrar, Paying Agent or Securities Custodian.
Applicable Premium means with respect to a Security on any Redemption Date, the greater of:
(1)     1.0% of the principal amount of such Security; and
(2)     the excess, if any, of (a) the present value as of such Redemption Date of (i) the redemption price of such Security on May 15, 2016 plus (ii) all required interest payments due on such Security through May 15, 2016 (excluding accrued but unpaid interest to the date of redemption), computed using a discount rate equal to the Treasury Rate as of such Redemption Date plus 50 basis points, over (b) the then-outstanding principal of such Security, in each case as calculated by the Company or on behalf of the Company by such Person as the Company shall designate; provided that such calculation shall not be a duty or obligation of the Trustee.
Attributable Debt in respect of a Sale and Leaseback Transaction means, as at the time of determination, the present value (discounted at the interest rate implicit in the transaction) of the total obligations of the lessee for rental payments during the remaining term of the lease included in such Sale and Leaseback Transaction (including any period for which such lease has been extended), determined in accordance with GAAP;
provided, however
, that if such Sale and Leaseback Transaction constitutes a Capitalized Lease Obligation, the amount of Indebtedness represented thereby shall be determined in accordance with the definition of Capitalized Lease Obligations. Rental payments shall not include amounts payable by the lessee for maintenance and repairs, insurance, taxes, assessments and similar charges. In case of any lease which is terminable by the lessee upon the payment of a penalty, such rental payments shall also include such penalty, but no rent shall be considered as required to be paid under such lease subsequent to the first date upon which it may be so terminated.
BAC Joint Venture means Brunswick Acceptance Company, LLC, a joint venture company (a majority of the equity interests of which is owned on the Issue Date by General Electric Commercial Finance or one of its Subsidiaries and the remainder thereof by the Company and/or any Subsidiary of the Company). The BAC Joint Venture existing on the Issue Date may be replaced by a joint venture between the Company or one of its Subsidiaries and a financing party without the consent of the Holders if the terms of such joint venture and the related agreements and arrangements shall not materially adversely affect the Companys or any Subsidiary Guarantors ability to make anticipated principal or interest payments on the Securities or Subsidiary Guarantees, as the case may be (as determined in Good Faith by the Company). In such event, then BAC Joint Venture shall mean such replacement joint venture from and after its inception and the term BAC Joint Venture Obligations shall have a correlative meaning in respect of the contractual obligations of such replacement joint venture.
3
BAC Joint Venture Obligations means any and all agreements, undertakings, arrangements and other obligations of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries to make loans or advances, or guarantee the obligations of or purchase or otherwise acquire any Capital Stock, obligations or other securities of, make any capital contribution to, or otherwise invest in, the BAC Joint Venture.
Board of Directors means:
(1)     with respect to a corporation, the Board of Directors of the corporation or (other than for purposes of determining Change of Control) any committee thereof duly authorized to act on behalf of the Board of Directors with respect to the relevant matter;
(2)     with respect to a partnership, the Board of Directors of the general partner of the partnership; and
(3)     with respect to any other Person, the board or committee of such Person serving a similar function.
Board Resolution means a copy of a resolution certified by the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of a company to have been duly adopted by the Board of Directors of such company and to be in full force and effect on the date of such certification, and delivered to the Trustee.
Business Day means each day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banking institutions in New York, New York are authorized or required by law or regulation to close.
Capital Stock of any Person means (i) with respect to any Person that is a corporation, any and all shares, interests, rights to purchase, warrants, options, participations or other equivalents of or interests in (however designated) equity of such Person, including any Common Stock or Preferred Stock, and (ii) with respect to any Person that is not a corporation, any and all partnership, limited liability company, membership or other equity interests of such Person but in each case excluding any debt securities convertible into such equity.
Capitalized Lease Obligation means an obligation that is required to be classified and accounted for as a capitalized lease for financial reporting purposes in accordance with GAAP, and the amount of Indebtedness represented by such obligation shall be the capitalized amount of such obligation at the time any determination thereof is to be made as determined in accordance with GAAP, and the stated maturity thereof shall be the date of the last payment of rent or any other amount due under such lease prior to the first date such lease may be terminated without penalty.
Change of Control means:
(1)    any person or group of related persons (as such terms are used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act) becomes the beneficial owner (as defined
4
in Rules 13d3 and 13d5 under the Exchange Act, except that such person or group shall be deemed to have beneficial ownership of all shares that any such person or group has the right to acquire, whether such right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time), directly or indirectly, of more than 35% of the total voting power of the Voting Stock of the Company or any of its direct or indirect parent entities (or their successors by merger, consolidation or purchase of all or substantially all of their assets);
(2)    the sale, assignment, lease, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as such term is used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act); or
(3)    the adoption by the stockholders of the Company of a plan or proposal for the liquidation or dissolution of the Company.
Change of Control Triggering Event means the Securities are rated below Investment Grade by both Rating Agencies on any date during the period (the 
Trigger Period
) commencing 60 days prior to the first public announcement of the Change of Control or the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control and ending 60 days following consummation of such Change of Control, which Trigger Period will be extended following consummation of a Change of Control for so long as any of the Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering a possible ratings change. Unless at least one Rating Agency is providing a rating for the Securities at the commencement of any Trigger Period, the Securities will be deemed to have ceased to be rated Investment Grade during that Trigger Period. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Change of Control Triggering Event will be deemed to have occurred in connection with any particular Change of Control unless and until such Change of Control has actually been consummated.
Clearstream means Clearstream Banking, socit anonyme, or any successor securities clearing agency.
Code means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Commodity Agreement means any commodity futures contract, commodity option, commodity swap agreement, commodity collar agreement, commodity cap agreement or other similar agreement or arrangement entered into by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary designed to protect the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries against fluctuations in the price of commodities actually used in the ordinary course of business of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries.
Common Stock means with respect to any Person, any and all shares, interest or other participations in, and other equivalents (however designated and whether voting or nonvoting) of such Persons common stock whether or not outstanding on the Issue Date, and includes, without limitation, all series and classes of such common stock.
5
Company means Brunswick Corporation until a successor replaces it and, thereafter, means such successor.
Consolidated Current Liabilities means the aggregate of the Companys and its Restricted Subsidiaries current liabilities appearing on the Companys and its Restricted Subsidiaries most recent available consolidated balance sheet, all in accordance with GAAP, but excluding any of the Companys and its Restricted Subsidiaries obligations under a revolving credit agreement or other similar agreement if the obligation under such agreement matures by its terms within twelve months from the date of such agreement (which exclusion shall not apply to obligations that may be renewed, extended, reborrowed or refunded at the Companys or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries option for a term in excess of twelve months from the date of determination).
Consolidated Net Tangible Assets means Consolidated Tangible Assets after deduction of Consolidated Current Liabilities.
Consolidated Tangible Assets means the aggregate of all of the Companys and its Restricted Subsidiaries assets (including the value of all existing Sale and Leaseback Transactions and any assets resulting from the capitalization of other long-term lease obligations in accordance with GAAP but excluding the value of assets or Investments in any of the Unrestricted Subsidiaries) appearing on the Companys and its Restricted Subsidiaries most recent available consolidated balance sheet at their net book values, after deducting related depreciation, amortization and other valuation reserves and excluding (a) any capital write-up resulting from reappraisals of assets or of other Investments after the Issue Date (other than a write-up of any assets constituting part of the assets and business of another Person made in connection with the acquisition, direct or indirect, of the assets and business of such other Person), except as permitted in accordance with GAAP, (b) treasury stock and (c) patent and trademark rights, goodwill, unamortized discounts and expenses and any other intangible items, all determined in accordance with GAAP.
Corporate Trust Office means the designated office of the Trustee at which, at any particular time, its corporate trust business in respect of this Indenture shall be administered, which office at the date hereof is located at 190 South LaSalle Street, 10th Floor, MK-IL-SLTR, Chicago, IL 60603, Attention: Corporate Trust Services, and for purposes of Section 2.3 and Section 3.7 such office shall also mean the office or agency of the Trustee located at 100 Wall Street, New York, New York 10005, Attn: Corporate Trust Services, or such other address as the Trustee may designate from time to time by notice to the Company or the principal corporate trust office of any successor trustee (or such other address as a successor trustee may designate from time to time by notice to the Company).
Currency Agreement means in respect of a Person any foreign exchange contract, currency swap agreement, futures contract, option contract or other similar agreement as to which such Person is a party or a beneficiary.
Customer Finance Program Obligations means inventory repurchase and recourse obligations, including any obligation of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary to
6
repurchase products of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries or to purchase or repurchase receivables created in connection with the sale of products or related services of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries under any customer finance program, in each case incurred in the ordinary course of business and as described in the Companys annual audited financial statements.
Debt Facility means, with respect to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor, one or more debt facilities or commercial paper facilities with banks or other institutional lenders providing for revolving credit loans, term loans, receivables financing (including through the sale of receivables to such lenders or to special purpose entities formed to borrow from such lenders against such receivables) or letters of credit or issuances of debt securities evidenced by notes, debentures, bonds or similar instruments, in each case, as amended, restated, supplemented, modified, renewed, refunded, replaced or refinanced (including by means of sales of debt securities to institutional investors) in whole or in part from time to time (and whether or not with the original trustee, administrative agent, holders or lenders or another trustee, administrative agent or agent or other holders or lenders and whether provided under this Indenture, the ABL Facility or any other credit agreement or other agreement or indenture).
Default means any event or condition that is, or after notice or passage of time or both would be, an Event of Default.
Defaulted Interest shall have the meaning set forth in
Section 2.13
.
Depositary means DTC, its nominees and their respective successors and assigns, or such other depository institution hereinafter appointed by the Company.
Disqualified Stock means, with respect to any Person, any Capital Stock of such Person that by its terms (or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is exchangeable) or upon the happening of any event: (1) matures or is mandatorily redeemable pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, (2) is convertible into or exchangeable for Indebtedness or Disqualified Stock (excluding Capital Stock which is convertible or exchangeable solely at the option of the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary (it being understood that upon such conversion or exchange it shall be an Incurrence of such Indebtedness or Disqualified Stock)); or (3) is redeemable at the option of the holder of Capital Stock, in whole or in part, in each case on or prior to the date 91 days after the earlier of the final maturity date of the Securities or the date the Securities are no longer outstanding;
provided, however,
that only the portion of Capital Stock that so matures or is mandatorily redeemable, is so convertible or exchangeable or is so redeemable at the option of the holder thereof prior to such date shall be deemed to be Disqualified Stock;
provided, further
, that any Capital Stock that would constitute Disqualified Stock solely because the holders thereof have the right to require the Company to repurchase such Capital Stock upon the occurrence of a Change of Control or Change of Control Triggering Event (defined, in each case, in a substantially identical manner to the corresponding definitions in this Indenture) shall not constitute Disqualified Stock if the terms of such Capital Stock (and all such securities into which it is convertible or for which it is ratable or exchangeable) provide that the Company may not repurchase or redeem any such Capital Stock
7
(and all such securities into which it is convertible or for which it is ratable or exchangeable) pursuant to such provision prior to compliance by the Company with
Section 3.5
.
DTC means the Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation.
Euroclear means Euroclear Bank S.A./N.V. or any successor securities clearing agency.
Equity Offering means a public offering for cash by the Company of its Common Stock, or options, warrants or rights with respect to its Common Stock, other than (x) public offerings with respect to the Companys Common Stock, or options, warrants or rights, registered on Form S-4 or S-8, (y) an issuance to any Subsidiary or (z) any offering of Common Stock issued in connection with a transaction that constitutes a Change of Control.
Exchange Act means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the SEC promulgated thereunder.
Foreign Subsidiary means any Restricted Subsidiary that is not organized under the laws of the United States or any state thereof or the District of Columbia, and any Restricted Subsidiary of such Restricted Subsidiary.
Funded Debt means, with respect to any Person, any Indebtedness created, issued, Incurred, assumed or Guaranteed by such Person, whether secured or unsecured, maturing more than one year after the date of determination or which may by its terms be reborrowed, refunded, renewed or extended to a time more than twelve months after the date of determination.
GAAP means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America as in effect as of the Issue Date, including those set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or in such other statements by such other entity as approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession. All computations based on GAAP contained in this Indenture shall be computed in conformity with GAAP, except that in the event the Company is acquired in a transaction that is accounted for using purchase accounting, the effects of the application of purchase accounting shall be disregarded in such computations.
Good Faith by the Company means the decision in good faith by a responsible financial officer of the Company;
provided
that (a) if such decision involves a determination of fair market value in excess of $5.0 million, the decision is made in good faith by the Senior Management of the Company and (b) if such decision involves a determination of fair market value in excess of $50.0 million, the decision is made in good faith by the Board of Directors of Company
.
8
Guarantee means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of any Person, directly or indirectly, guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other nonfinancial obligations of any other Person and any obligation, direct or indirect, contingent or otherwise, of such Person:
(1)    to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness of such other Person (whether arising by virtue of partnership arrangements, or by agreement to keep-well, to purchase assets, goods, securities or services, to take-or-pay, or to maintain financial statement conditions or otherwise); or
(2)    entered into for purposes of assuring in any other manner the obligee of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof or to protect such obligee against loss in respect thereof (in whole or in part);
provided
,
however
, that the term Guarantee shall not include (a) endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business, (b) Customer Finance Program Obligations or (c) the BAC Joint Venture Obligations. The term Guarantee used as a verb has a corresponding meaning.
Guarantor Subordinated Obligation means, with respect to a Subsidiary Guarantor, any Indebtedness of such Subsidiary Guarantor (whether outstanding on the Issue Date or thereafter Incurred) that is expressly subordinated in right of payment to the obligations of such Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee pursuant to a written agreement.
Hedging Obligations of any Person means the obligations of such Person pursuant to any Interest Rate Agreement, Currency Agreement or Commodity Agreement.
Holder means a Person in whose name a Security is registered on the Registrars books.
Incur means issue, create, assume, Guarantee, incur or otherwise become liable for;
provided, however,
that any Indebtedness or Capital Stock of a Person existing at the time such Person becomes a Restricted Subsidiary (whether by merger, consolidation, acquisition or otherwise) shall be deemed to be Incurred by such Person at the time it becomes a Restricted Subsidiary; and the terms Incurred and Incurrence have meanings correlative to the foregoing. Any Indebtedness issued at a discount (including Indebtedness on which interest is payable through the issuance of additional Indebtedness) shall be deemed incurred at the time of original issuance of the Indebtedness at the initial accreted amount thereof.
Indebtedness means, with respect to any Person on any date of determination (without duplication):
(1)    the principal of and premium (if any) in respect of indebtedness of such Person for borrowed money;
(2)    the principal of and premium (if any) in respect of obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or other similar instruments;
9
(3)    the principal component of all obligations of such Person in respect of letters of credit, bankers acceptances or other similar instruments (including reimbursement obligations with respect thereto except to the extent such reimbursement obligation relates to a Trade Payable or similar obligation to a trade creditor in each case incurred in the ordinary course of business and such obligation is satisfied within 30 days of Incurrence) other than obligations with respect to letters of credit securing obligations (other than obligations described in clauses (1) and (2) above and clause (5) below) entered into in the ordinary course of business of such Person to the extent such letters of credit are not drawn upon or, to the extent drawn upon, such drawing is reimbursed no later than the fifth Business Day following receipt by such Person of a demand for reimbursement following payment on the letter of credit;
(4)    the principal component of all obligations of such Person to pay the deferred and unpaid purchase price of property (except Trade Payables), which purchase price is due more than six months after the date of placing such property in service or taking delivery and title thereto, except (i) any such balance that constitutes a Trade Payable or similar obligation to a trade creditor, in each case accrued in the ordinary course of business and (ii) any earn-out obligation until the amount of such obligation becomes a liability on the balance sheet of such Person in accordance with GAAP;
(5)    Capitalized Lease Obligations and all Attributable Debt of such Person (whether or not such items would appear on the balance sheet of the guarantor or obligor);
(6)    the principal component or liquidation preference of all obligations of such Person with respect to the redemption, repayment or other repurchase of any Disqualified Stock or, with respect to any Subsidiary that is not a Subsidiary Guarantor, any Preferred Stock (but excluding, in each case, any accrued dividends);
(7)    the principal component of all Indebtedness of other Persons secured by a Lien on any asset of such Person, whether or not such Indebtedness is assumed by such Person;
provided
,
however
, that the amount of such Indebtedness shall be the lesser of (a) the fair market value of such asset at such date of determination and (b) the amount of such Indebtedness of such other Persons;
(8)    the principal component of Indebtedness of other Persons to the extent Guaranteed by such Person (whether or not such items would appear on the balance sheet of the guarantor or obligor);
(9)    to the extent not otherwise included in this definition, net Hedging Obligations of such Person (the amount of any such obligations to be equal at any time to the termination value of such agreement or arrangement giving rise to such Hedging Obligation that would be payable by such Person at such time); and
(10)    to the extent not otherwise included in this definition, the Receivables Transaction Amount outstanding relating to a Qualified Receivables Transaction.
10
The amount of Indebtedness of any Person at any date shall be the outstanding balance at such date of all unconditional obligations as described above and the maximum liability, upon the occurrence of the contingency giving rise to the obligation, of any contingent obligations at such date;
provided
that contingent obligations arising in the ordinary course of business and not with respect to borrowed money of such Person or other Persons shall not be deemed to constitute Indebtedness. Notwithstanding the foregoing, money borrowed and set aside at the time of the Incurrence of any Indebtedness in order to pre-fund the payment of interest on such Indebtedness shall not be deemed to be Indebtedness
provided
that such money is held to secure the payment of such interest.
The term Indebtedness shall not include Customer Finance Program Obligations.
Interest Payment Date means May 15 and November 15 of each year to stated maturity beginning November 15, 2013.
Interest Rate Agreement means with respect to any Person any interest rate protection agreement, interest rate future agreement, interest rate option agreement, interest rate swap agreement, interest rate cap agreement, interest rate collar agreement, interest rate hedge agreement or other similar agreement or arrangement as to which such Person is party or a beneficiary.
Investment in any Person means any direct or indirect advance, loan (other than advances or extensions of credit to customers in the ordinary course of business that are in conformity with GAAP recorded as accounts receivable on the balance sheet of the Company or its Restricted Subsidiaries) or other extensions of credit (including by way of Guarantee or similar arrangement, but excluding any debt or extension of credit represented by a bank deposit other than a time deposit) or capital contribution to (by means of any transfer of cash or other property to others or any payment for property or services for the account or use of others), or any purchase or acquisition of Capital Stock, Indebtedness or other similar instruments issued by such Person and all other items that are or would be classified as investments on a balance sheet prepared in accordance with GAAP;
provided
that none of the following shall be deemed to be an Investment:
(1)    Hedging Obligations entered into in the ordinary course of business and in compliance with this Indenture;
(2)    endorsements of negotiable instruments and documents in the ordinary course of business; and
(3)    an acquisition of assets, Capital Stock or other securities by the Company or a Subsidiary for consideration to the extent such consideration consists of Common Stock of the Company.
Investment Grade means a rating equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent) by Moodys Investors Service, Inc. and BBB- (or the equivalent) by Standard &
11
Poors Ratings Group, Inc. (or, in the case of a Substitute Rating Agency, the equivalent rating level of such Substitute Rating Agency), in each case, with a stable or better outlook;
provided
that a change in outlook shall not by itself cause the Company to lose its Investment Grade rating.
Issue Date means May 13, 2013.
Lien means, with respect to any asset, any mortgage, lien (statutory or otherwise), pledge, hypothecation, charge, security interest, preference, priority or encumbrance of any kind in respect of such asset, whether or not filed, recorded or otherwise perfected under applicable law, including any conditional sale or other title retention agreement, any lease in the nature thereof, any option or other agreement to sell or give a security interest in and any filing of or agreement to give any financing statement under the Uniform Commercial Code (or equivalent statutes) of any jurisdiction;
provided
that in no event shall an operating lease be deemed to constitute a Lien.
Material Debt Facility means commitments or Indebtedness under any Debt Facility of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor (or, during a Suspension Period, any Restricted Subsidiary of the Company (other than a Foreign Subsidiary)) in an aggregate principal amount equal to or greater than $50.0 million.
Net Cash Proceeds means, with respect to any issuance or sale of Capital Stock, the cash proceeds of such issuance or sale, net of attorneys fees, accountants fees, underwriters or placement agents fees, listing fees, discounts or commissions and brokerage, consultant and other fees and charges actually Incurred in connection with such issuance or sale and net of taxes paid or payable as a result of such issuance or sale (after taking into account any available tax credit or deductions and any tax sharing arrangements).
Non-Recourse Debt means Indebtedness of a Person:
(1)
as to which neither the Company nor any Restricted Subsidiary (a) provides any Guarantee or credit support of any kind (including any undertaking, Guarantee, indemnity, agreement or instrument that would constitute Indebtedness) or (b) is directly or indirectly liable (as a guarantor or otherwise);
(2)
no default with respect to which (including any rights that the Holders thereof may have to take enforcement action against an Unrestricted Subsidiary) would permit (upon notice, lapse of time or both) any holder of any other Indebtedness of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary to declare a default under such other Indebtedness or cause the payment thereof to be accelerated or payable prior to its Stated Maturity; and
(3)
the explicit terms of which provide there is no recourse against any of the assets of the Company or its Restricted Subsidiaries, except that Standard Securitization Undertakings shall not be considered recourse.
12
Non-U.S. Person means any person that is not a U.S. person under Regulation S under the Securities Act.
Officer means the Chairman of the Board, the Chief Executive Officer, the President, the Chief Financial Officer, any Executive Vice President, Senior Vice President or Vice President, the Treasurer or the Secretary of the Company or, in the event that a Person is a partnership or a limited liability company that has no such officers, a person duly authorized under applicable law by the general partner, managers, members or a similar body to act on behalf of such Person. Officer of any Subsidiary Guarantor has a correlative meaning.
Officers Certificate means a certificate signed by two Officers or by an Officer and either an Assistant Treasurer or an Assistant Secretary of the Company.
Opinion of Counsel means a written opinion from legal counsel who may be an employee of or counsel to the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor or other counsel who is reasonably acceptable to the Trustee.
Permitted Liens means, with respect to any Person:
(1)
Liens securing Indebtedness and other obligations Incurred under Debt Facilities in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $300.0 million and related Hedging Obligations and banking services management obligations;
(2)
Liens for the purpose of securing the payment of all or a part of the purchase price of, or Capitalized Lease Obligations, mortgage financings, purchase money obligations or other payments Incurred to finance assets or property (other than Capital Stock or other Investments) acquired, constructed, improved or leased;
provided
that, in the case of this clause (2):
(a)    the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness secured by such Liens does not exceed the cost of the assets or property so acquired, constructed or improved; and
(b)    such Liens are created prior to, at the time of or within 180 days of construction, acquisition or improvement of such assets or property and do not encumber any other assets or property of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary other than such assets or property and assets affixed or appurtenant thereto;
(3)
Liens on property at the time the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary acquired the property, including any acquisition by means of a merger or consolidation with or into the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary;
provided
that such Liens are not created, Incurred or assumed in connection with, or in contemplation of, such acquisition;
provided
further, that such Liens may not extend to any other property owned by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary;
(4)
Liens on property or shares of Capital Stock or Indebtedness of a Person at the time such Person becomes a Restricted Subsidiary;
provided
that such Liens are not created, Incurred or assumed in connection with, or in contemplation of, such other
13
Person becoming a Restricted Subsidiary;
provided further
, that any such Lien may not extend to any other property owned by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary;
(5)
Liens on the property of the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries in favor or at the request of the United States of America or any state of the United States, or any department, agency or instrumentality or political subdivision of the United States of America or any state of the United States (including Liens to secure indebtedness of the pollution control or industrial revenue bond type), in order to permit the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary to perform any contract or subcontract made by it with or at the request of any of the foregoing, or to secure partial, progress, advance or other payments pursuant to any tender, bid, contract, regulation or statute, or to secure any indebtedness incurred for the purpose of financing all or any part of the purchase price or the cost of constructing or improving the property subject to such Liens;
(6)
Liens securing Indebtedness or other obligations of a Restricted Subsidiary owing to the Company or another Restricted Subsidiary;
(7)
Liens existing on the Issue Date (other than Liens Incurred pursuant to clause (1) of this definition);
(8)
any extension, renewal or replacement (or successive extensions, renewals or replacements) in whole or in part of any Lien permitted by clauses (2) through (7) of this definition;
provided
,
however
, that the principal amount of Indebtedness secured by any such Lien shall not exceed the principal amount of Indebtedness so secured at the time of such extension, renewal or replacement, and that such extension, renewal or replacement shall be limited to the property which secured the Lien so extended, renewed or replaced and additions or improvements to such property;
(9)
Liens imposed by law, including carriers, warehousemens, mechanics, materialmens and repairmens Liens, Incurred in the ordinary course of business;
(10)
Liens for taxes or assessments or governmental charges or levies on property owned by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, if such taxes, assessments (including penalties), governmental charges or levies shall not at the time be due and payable, or if the same thereafter can be paid without penalty, or if the same are being contested in good faith;
(11)
pledges or deposits by such Person under workers compensation laws, unemployment, general insurance and other insurance laws and old age pensions and other social security or retirement benefits or similar legislation, or good faith deposits in connection with bids, tenders, contracts (other than for the payment of Indebtedness) or leases to which such Person is a party, or deposits to secure public or statutory obligations of such Person or deposits of cash or United States government bonds to secure surety or appeal bonds to which such Person is a party, or deposits as security for contested taxes or import or customs duties or for the payment of rent, in each case Incurred in the ordinary course of business;
(12)
Liens created by or resulting from any litigation or legal proceeding which at the time is currently being contested in good faith;
14
(13)
Liens under industrial revenue, municipal, economic development or similar tax-advantaged financings (including bonds and loan agreements);
(14)
Liens securing Hedging Obligations so long as the related Indebtedness is, and is permitted to be under this Indenture, secured by a Lien on the same property securing such Hedging Obligation;
(15)
any interest or title of a lessor under any operating lease;
(16)
any Lien on the Capital Stock of any Receivables Entity and Liens on assets transferred to a Receivables Entity or on assets of a Receivables Entity, in either case Incurred in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction;
(17)
Liens on assets of Foreign Subsidiaries securing Indebtedness Incurred by Foreign Subsidiaries; and
(18)
in addition to Liens (and related Indebtedness) permitted under clauses (1) through (17) of this definition, Liens securing Indebtedness in an aggregate principal amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed 15.0% of Consolidated Net Tangible Assets (measured, for purposes of this clause (18), solely at the time of the Incurrence of the Indebtedness secured by such a Lien).
Person means any individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, association, joint-stock company, trust, unincorporated organization, government or any agency or political subdivision hereof or any other entity.
Preferred Stock means, as applied to the Capital Stock of any corporation, Capital Stock of any class or classes (however designated) that is preferred as to the payment of dividends, or as to the distribution of assets upon any voluntary or involuntary liquidation or dissolution of such Person, over shares of Capital Stock of any other class of such Person.
Principal Property means (i) the following: the Boat Group manufacturing facilities at 100 Sea Ray Drive, Palm Coast, FL, 100 Sea Ray Blvd, Palm Coast, FL, 100 Sea Ray Blvd (Tellico Lake), Vonore, TN and 100 Whaler Way, Edgewater, FL; the Fitness segment manufacturing facility located at 10601 W. Belmont, Franklin Park, IL; and the Marine Engine manufacturing facilities located at 19396250 Pioneer Rd, Fond Du Lac, WI, 660 S. Hickory St, Fond Du Lac, WI, 600 W Pioneer Rd, Fond Du Lac, WI, N7480 County Road UU, Fond Du Lac, WI, 660 S. Hickory St, Fond Du Lac, WI and 560 W Pioneer Rd, Fond Du Lac, WI, unless and until the Board of Directors determines that any such property no longer qualifies as a Principal Property as determined pursuant to clause (ii) of this definition and (ii) any of the Companys and its Restricted Subsidiaries manufacturing plants or other facilities located in the United States of America, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, which, in the opinion of the Board of Directors of the Company, is of material importance to the business conducted by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries as a whole.
Purchase Money Note means a promissory note of a Receivables Entity evidencing the deferred purchase price of Receivables (and related assets) and/or a line of credit, which may be irrevocable, from the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary in connection with a Qualified Receivables Transaction with a Receivables Entity, which deferred purchase price or
15
line is repayable from cash available to the Receivables Entity, other than amounts required to be established as reserves pursuant to agreements, amounts paid to investors in respect of interest, principal and other amounts owing to such investors and amounts owing to such investors and amounts paid in connection with the purchase of newly generated Receivables.
QIB means any qualified institutional buyer (as defined in Rule 144A under the Securities Act).
Qualified Receivables Transaction means any transaction or series of transactions that may be entered into by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries pursuant to which the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries may sell, convey or otherwise transfer to (1) a Receivables Entity (in the case of a transfer by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries) and (2) any other Person (in the case of a transfer by a Receivables Entity), or may grant a security interest in, any Receivables (whether now existing or arising in the future) of the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, and any assets related thereto including, without limitation, all collateral securing such Receivables, all contracts and all Guarantees or other obligations in respect of such accounts receivable, the proceeds of such Receivables and other assets that are customarily transferred, or in respect of which security interests are customarily granted in connection with asset securitization involving Receivables.
Rating Agencies means Standard & Poors Ratings Group, Inc. and Moodys Investors Service, Inc. or if Standard & Poors Ratings Group, Inc. or Moodys Investors Service, Inc. or both shall not make a rating on the Securities publicly available, a nationally recognized statistical Rating Agency or agencies, as the case may be, selected by the Company to be a Substitute Rating Agency.
Receivables means all indebtedness and other obligations owed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or in which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has a security interest or other interest, including, without limitation, any indebtedness, obligation or interest constituting an account, chattel paper, instrument, document or general intangible, arising in connection with the sale of goods or the rendering of services in connection therewith by, or the payment of money to, the Company or such Subsidiary.
Receivables Entity means a Wholly-Owned Subsidiary (or another Person in which the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary makes an Investment and to which the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary transfers Receivables and related assets) that engages in no activities other than in connection with the financing of Receivables and that is designated by the Board of Directors of the Company (as provided below) as a Receivables Entity:
(1)
no portion of the Indebtedness or any other obligations (contingent or otherwise) of which:
(a)
is guaranteed by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary (excluding guarantees of obligations (other than the principal of, and interest on, Indebtedness) pursuant to Standard Securitization Undertakings);
16
(b)
is recourse to or obligates the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary in any way other than pursuant to Standard Securitization Undertakings; or
(c)
subjects any property or asset of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary, directly or indirectly, contingently or otherwise, to the satisfaction thereof, other than pursuant to Standard Securitization Undertakings;
(2)
with which neither the Company nor any Restricted Subsidiary has any material contract, agreement, arrangement or understanding (except in connection with a Purchase Money Note or Qualified Receivables Transaction) other than on terms no less favorable to the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary than those that might be obtained at the time from Persons that are not Affiliates of the Company, other than fees payable in the ordinary course of business in connection with servicing Receivables; and
(3)
to which neither the Company nor any Restricted Subsidiary has any obligation to maintain or preserve such entitys financial condition or cause such entity to achieve certain levels of operating results.
Receivables Transaction Amount means the amount of obligations outstanding under the legal documents entered into as part of such Qualified Receivables Transaction on any date of determination that would be characterized as principal if such Qualified Receivables Transaction were structured as a secured lending transaction rather than as a purchase.
Record Date for the interest and Defaulted Interest, if any, payable on any applicable Interest Payment Date means the May 1 or November 1 (whether or not a Business Day) next preceding such Interest Payment Date.
Restricted Period means, in relation to the Initial Notes that are Regulation S Notes, the 40 consecutive days beginning on and including the later of (A) the day on which the Initial Notes are offered to persons other than distributors (as defined in Regulation S under the Securities Act) and (B) the Issue Date and, in relation to any Additional Notes that are Regulation S Notes that are Restricted Securities, it means the comparable period of 40 consecutive days.
Restricted Securities Legend means the Private Placement Legend set forth in clause (A) of
Section 2.1(d)
or the Regulation S Legend set forth in clause (B) of
Section 2.1(d)
, as applicable.
Restricted Subsidiary means any Subsidiary of the Company other than an Unrestricted Subsidiary.
Sale and Leaseback Transaction means the sale or transfer (except to the Company or one or more Restricted Subsidiaries of the Company) of any Principal Property owned or leased by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary of the Company on a date which is more than 120 days after the later of (a) the date of acquisition of such Principal Property or (b) the date on which construction of such Principal Property shall have been completed and full
17
operation of such Principal Property shall have commenced, with the intention of leasing back such Principal Property (except a lease for a term of no more than three years entered into with the intent that the use by the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary of such Principal Property will be discontinued on or before the expiration of the three-year term).
SEC means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.
Securities Act means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the SEC promulgated thereunder.
Securities Custodian means the custodian with respect to the Global Security (as appointed by the Depositary), or any successor Person thereto and shall initially be the Trustee.
Senior Management means the Chief Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer of the Company.
Significant Subsidiary means any Restricted Subsidiary that would be a Significant Subsidiary of the Company within the meaning of Rule 1-02 under Regulation S-X promulgated by the SEC.
Standard Securitization Undertakings means representations, warranties, covenants and indemnities entered into by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary that are reasonably customary in securitization of accounts receivables transactions.
Stated Maturity means, with respect to any security, the date specified in the agreement governing or certificate relating to such security as the fixed date on which the final payment of principal of such security is due and payable, including pursuant to any mandatory redemption provision, but shall not include any contingent obligations to repay, redeem or repurchase any such principal prior to the date originally scheduled for the payment thereof.
Subordinated Obligation means any Indebtedness of the Company (whether outstanding on the Issue Date or thereafter Incurred) that is subordinated or junior in right of payment to the Securities pursuant to its terms.
Subsidiary of any Person means (a) any corporation, association or other business entity (other than a partnership, joint venture, limited liability company or similar entity) of which more than 50% of the total ordinary voting power of shares of Capital Stock entitled (without regard to the occurrence of any contingency) to vote in the election of directors, managers or trustees thereof (or Persons performing similar functions) or (b) any partnership, joint venture limited liability company or similar entity of which more than 50% of the capital accounts, distribution rights, total equity and voting interests or general or limited partnership interests, as applicable, is, in the case of clauses (a) and (b), at the time owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by (1) such Person, (2) such Person and one or more Subsidiaries of such Person or (3) one or more Subsidiaries of such Person. Unless otherwise specified herein, each reference to a Subsidiary shall refer to a Subsidiary of the Company.
18
Subsidiary Guarantee means, individually, any Guarantee of payment of the Securities by a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to the terms of this Indenture and any supplemental indenture hereto, and, collectively, all such Guarantees.
Subsidiary Guarantor means each Restricted Subsidiary in existence on the Issue Date that provides a Subsidiary Guarantee on the Issue Date (and any other Restricted Subsidiary that provides a Subsidiary Guarantee in accordance with this Indenture); provided that upon release or discharge of such Restricted Subsidiary from its Subsidiary Guarantee in accordance with this Indenture, such Restricted Subsidiary ceases to be a Subsidiary Guarantor.
Substitute Rating Agency means, if Standard & Poors Ratings Group, Inc. or Moodys Investors Service, Inc. or both shall not make a rating on the Securities publicly available, a nationally recognizable statistical Rating Agency or agencies, as the case may be, selected by the Company which shall be substituted for Standard & Poors Ratings Group, Inc. and Moodys Investors Service, Inc. or both, as the case may be.
Trade Payables means, with respect to any Person, any accounts payable to trade creditors created, assumed or Guaranteed by such Person arising in the ordinary course of business in connection with the acquisition of goods or services.
Treasury Rate means the yield to maturity at the time of computation of United States Treasury securities with a constant maturity (as compiled and published in the most recent Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (519) that has become publicly available at least two Business Days prior to the Redemption Date (or, if such Statistical Release is no longer published, any publicly available source or similar market data)) most nearly equal to the period from the Redemption Date to May 15, 2016;
provided, however
, that if the period from the Redemption Date to May 15, 2016 is not equal to the constant maturity of a United States Treasury security for which a weekly average yield is given, the Treasury Rate shall be obtained by linear interpolation (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth of a year) from the weekly average yields of United States Treasury securities for which such yields are given, except that if the period from the Redemption Date to May 15, 2016 is less than one year, the weekly average yield on actually traded United States Treasury securities adjusted to a constant maturity of one year shall be used.
Trust Officer means, when used with respect to the Trustee, any officer within the corporate trust department of the Trustee, including any vice president, assistant vice president, assistant secretary, assistant treasurer, trust officer or any other officer of the Trustee who customarily performs functions similar to those performed by the Persons who at the time shall be such officers, respectively, who shall have direct responsibility for the administration of this Indenture, or any other officer to whom any corporate trust matter is referred because of such persons knowledge of and familiarity with the particular subject.
Trustee means the party named as such in this Indenture until a successor replaces it and, thereafter, means such successor.
19
Uniform Commercial Code means the Uniform Commercial Code, as in effect from time to time, of the State of New York.
Unrestricted Subsidiary means (1) any Subsidiary of the Company that at the time of determination shall be designated an Unrestricted Subsidiary by the Board of Directors of the Company in the manner provided below and (2) any Subsidiary of an Unrestricted Subsidiary.
The Board of Directors of the Company may designate any Subsidiary of the Company (including any newly acquired or newly formed Subsidiary or a Person becoming a Subsidiary through merger or consolidation or Investment therein) to be an Unrestricted Subsidiary only if:
(1)    such Subsidiary or any of its Subsidiaries does not own any Capital Stock or Indebtedness of or have any Investment in, or own or hold any Lien on any property of, any other Subsidiary of the Company that is not a Subsidiary of the Subsidiary to be so designated or otherwise an Unrestricted Subsidiary;
(2)    all the Indebtedness of such Subsidiary and its Subsidiaries shall, at the date of designation, and shall at all times thereafter, consist of Non-Recourse Debt;
(3)    such Subsidiary, either alone or in the aggregate with all other Unrestricted Subsidiaries, does not operate, directly or indirectly, all or substantially all of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries;
(4)    such Subsidiary is a Person with respect to which neither the Company nor any of its Restricted Subsidiaries has any direct or indirect obligation:
(a)    to subscribe for additional Capital Stock of such Person; or
(b)    to maintain or preserve such Persons financial condition or to cause such Person to achieve any specified levels of operating results; and
(5)    on the date such Subsidiary is designated an Unrestricted Subsidiary, such Subsidiary is not a party to any agreement, contract, arrangement or understanding with the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary with terms substantially less favorable to the Company than those that might have been obtained from Persons who are not Affiliates of the Company.
Any such designation by the Board of Directors of the Company shall be evidenced to the Trustee by filing with the Trustee a resolution of the Board of Directors of the Company giving effect to such designation and an Officers Certificate certifying that such designation complies with the foregoing conditions. If, at any time, any Unrestricted Subsidiary would fail to meet the foregoing requirements as an Unrestricted Subsidiary, it shall thereafter cease to be an Unrestricted Subsidiary for purposes of this Indenture and any Indebtedness of such Subsidiary shall be deemed to be Incurred as of such date.
20
The Board of Directors of the Company may designate any Unrestricted Subsidiary to be a Restricted Subsidiary;
provided
that immediately after giving effect to such designation, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would occur as a consequence thereof.
U.S. Government Obligations means securities that are (a) direct obligations of the United States of America for the timely payment of which its full faith and credit is pledged or (b) obligations of a Person controlled or supervised by and acting as an agency or instrumentality of the United States of America the full and timely payment of which is unconditionally guaranteed as a full faith and credit obligation of the United States of America, which, in either case, are not callable or redeemable at the option of the issuer thereof, and shall also include a depositary receipt issued by a bank (as defined in Section 3(a)(2) of the Securities Act), as custodian with respect to any such U.S. Government Obligations or a specific payment of principal of or interest on any such U.S. Government Obligations held by such custodian for the account of the holder of such depositary receipt;
provided
that (except as required by law) such custodian is not authorized to make any deduction from the amount payable to the Holder of such depositary receipt from any amount received by the custodian in respect of the U.S. Government Obligations or the specific payment of principal of or interest on the U.S. Government Obligations evidenced by such depositary receipt.
Voting Stock of a Person means all classes of Capital Stock of such Person then outstanding and normally entitled to vote in the election of directors, managers or trustees, as applicable of such Person.
Wholly-Owned Subsidiary means a Restricted Subsidiary, all of the Capital Stock of which (other than directors qualifying shares) is owned by the Company or another Wholly-Owned Subsidiary.
SECTION 1.2.  
    
Other Definitions
.
21
        
SECTION 1.3.        
Rules of Construction
. Unless the context otherwise requires:
(a)  
    
a term has the meaning assigned to it;
(b)  
    
an accounting term not otherwise defined has the meaning assigned to it in accordance with GAAP;
(c)  
    
or is not exclusive;
22
(d)  
    
including means including without limitation;
(e)  
    
words in the singular include the plural and words in the plural include the singular;
(f)  
    
unsecured Indebtedness shall not be deemed to be subordinate or junior to secured Indebtedness merely by virtue of its nature as unsecured Indebtedness;
(g)  
    
references to sections of, or rules under, the Securities Act shall be deemed to include substitute, replacement or successor sections or rules adopted by the SEC from time to time;
(h)  
    
unless the context otherwise requires, any reference to an Article, Section or clause refers to an Article, Section or clause, as the case may be, of this Indenture; and
(i)  
    
the words herein, hereof and hereunder and any other words of similar import refer to this Indenture as a whole and not any particular Article, Section, clause or other subdivision.
ARTICLE II
The Securities
SECTION 2.1.  
    
Form, Dating and Terms
.
(a) The aggregate principal amount of Securities that may be authenticated and delivered under this Indenture is unlimited. The Initial Notes issued on the date hereof shall be in an aggregate principal amount of $150,000,000. In addition, the Company may issue, from time to time in accordance with the provisions of this Indenture, Additional Notes in the form of
Exhibit A
hereto (together with such changes thereto as the Company and the Trustee may agree to reflect Additional Notes issued in a registered offering under the Securities Act, or that such Securities are Additional Notes). Furthermore, Securities may be authenticated and delivered upon registration or transfer, or in lieu of, other Securities pursuant to
Section 2.6
,
2.9
,
2.11
,
5.4
or
5.8
in connection with a Change of Control Offer pursuant to
Section 3.5
.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, the Company may not issue any Additional Notes, unless immediately after giving effect to such issuance, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
The Initial Notes shall be known and designated as 4.625% Senior Notes due 2021 of the Company. Additional Notes shall be known and designated as 4.625% Senior Notes due 2021 of the Company.
With respect to any Additional Notes, the Company shall set forth in (a) a Board Resolution and (b)(i) an Officers Certificate or (ii) one or more indentures supplemental hereto, the following information:
23
(i)  
    
the aggregate principal amount of such Additional Notes to be authenticated and delivered pursuant to this Indenture; and
(ii)  
    
the issue price and the issue date of such Additional Notes.
In authenticating and delivering Additional Notes, the Trustee shall be entitled to receive and shall be fully protected in relying upon, in addition to the Opinion of Counsel and Officers Certificate required by
Section 11.2
, an Opinion of Counsel as to the due authorization, execution, delivery, validity and enforceability of such Additional Notes.
The Initial Notes and the Additional Notes shall be considered collectively as a single class for all purposes of this Indenture. Holders of the Initial Notes and the Additional Notes shall vote and consent together on all matters to which such Holders are entitled to vote or consent as one class, and none of the Holders of the Initial Notes or the Additional Notes shall have the right to vote or consent as a separate class on any matter to which such Holders are entitled to vote or consent.
(b)  
    
The Initial Notes are being offered and sold by the Company pursuant to a Purchase Agreement, dated May 8, 2013, among the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and the other initial purchasers named therein. The Initial Notes and any Additional Notes shall be resold initially only to (A) QIBs and (B) Persons other than U.S. Persons (as defined in Regulation S under the Securities Act (
Regulation S
)) in reliance on Regulation S. Such Initial Notes and Additional Notes may thereafter be transferred to among others, QIBs, purchasers in reliance on Regulation S and institutional accredited investors (as defined in Rules 501(a)(1), (2), (3) and (7) under the Securities Act) who are not QIBs (
IAIs
) in accordance with Rule 501 of the Securities Act in accordance with the procedure described herein. Additional Notes offered after the date hereof may be offered and sold by the Company from time to time pursuant to one or more purchase or other agreements in accordance with applicable law.
Initial Notes and Additional Notes offered and sold to QIBs in the United States of America in reliance on Rule 144A (the 
Rule 144A Notes
) shall be issued in the form of a permanent global Security substantially in the form of
Exhibit A
, which is hereby incorporated by reference and made a part of this Indenture, including appropriate legends as set forth in
Section 2.1(d)
(the 
Rule 144A Global Note
), deposited with the Securities Custodian for the Depositary, duly executed by the Company and authenticated by the Trustee as hereinafter provided. The Rule 144A Global Note may be represented by more than one certificate, if so required by the Depositarys rules regarding the maximum principal amount to be represented by a single certificate. The aggregate principal amount of the Rule 144A Global Note may from time to time be increased or decreased by adjustments made on the records of the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary or its nominee, as hereinafter provided.
Initial Notes and any Additional Notes offered and sold outside the United States of America (the 
Regulation S Notes
) in reliance on Regulation S shall initially be issued in the form of a permanent global Security substantially in the form of
Exhibit A
including appropriate legends as set forth in
Section 2.1(d)
(the 
Regulation S Global Note
). The Regulation S Global
24
Note shall be deposited upon issuance with the Securities Custodian for the Depositary in the manner described in this
Article II
for credit by the Securities Custodian to the respective accounts of the purchasers (or to such other accounts as they may direct) at Euroclear or Clearstream. During the Restricted Period, interests in the Regulation S Global Note may only be held through Euroclear or Clearstream (as indirect participants in the Depositary) unless exchanged for interests in a Global Security in accordance with the transfer and certification requirements described herein.
Investors may hold their interests in the Regulation S Global Note directly through Euroclear or Clearstream, if they are participants in such systems, or indirectly through organizations which are participants in such systems. After the expiration of the Restricted Period (but not earlier), investors may also hold such interests through organizations other than Euroclear or Clearstream that are participants in the Depositarys system. Euroclear and Clearstream shall hold such interests in the Regulation S Global Note on behalf of their participants through customers securities accounts in their respective names on the books of their respective depositaries. Such depositaries, in turn, shall hold such interests in the applicable Regulation S Global Note in customers securities accounts in the depositaries names on the books of the Depositary. The Regulation S Global Note may be represented by more than one certificate, if so required by the Depositarys rules regarding the maximum principal amount to be represented by a single certificate. The aggregate principal amount of the Regulation S Global Note may from time to time be increased or decreased by adjustments made on the records of the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary or its nominee, as hereinafter provided.
Initial Notes and any Additional Notes resold to IAIs (the 
Institutional Accredited Investor Notes
) in the United States of America shall be issued in the form of a permanent global Security substantially in the form of
Exhibit A
including appropriate legends as set forth in
Section 2.1(d)
(the 
Institutional Accredited Investor Global Note
) deposited with the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary, duly executed by the Company and authenticated by the Trustee as hereinafter provided. The Institutional Accredited Investor Global Note may be represented by more than one certificate, if so required by the Depositarys rules regarding the maximum principal amount to be represented by a single certificate. The aggregate principal amount of the Institutional Accredited Investor Global Note may from time to time be increased or decreased by adjustments made on the records of the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary or its nominee, as hereinafter provided.
The Rule 144A Global Note, the Regulation S Global Note, and the Institutional Accredited Investor Global Note are sometimes collectively herein referred to as the 
Global Securities
.
The principal of (and premium, if any) and interest on the Securities shall be payable at the office or agency of the Company maintained for such purpose in The
City
of
New
York, or at such other office or agency of the Company as may be maintained for such purpose pursuant to
Section 2.3
;
provided, however,
that, at the option of the Company, each installment of interest may be paid by (i) check mailed to addresses of the Persons entitled thereto as such addresses shall appear on the Note Register or (ii) wire transfer to an account located in the
25
United States maintained by the payee. Payments in respect of Securities represented by a Global Security (including principal, premium, if any, and interest) shall be made by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the accounts specified by the Depositary. Payments in respect of Securities represented by Definitive Securities (including principal, premium, if any, and interest) held by a Holder of at least $5,000,000 aggregate principal amount of Securities represented by Definitive Securities shall be made by wire transfer to a U.S. dollar account maintained by the payee with a bank in the United States if such Holder elects payment by wire transfer by giving written notice to the Trustee or the Paying Agent to such effect designating such account no later than 15 days immediately preceding the relevant due date for payment (or such other date as the Trustee may accept in its discretion).
The Securities may have notations, legends or endorsements required by law, stock exchange rule or usage, in addition to those set forth on
Exhibit A
and in
Section 2.1(d)
. The Company and the Trustee shall approve the form of the Securities and any notation, endorsement or legend on them. Each Security shall be dated the date of its authentication. The terms of the Securities set forth in
Exhibit A
are part of the terms of this Indenture and, to the extent applicable, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee, by their execution and delivery of this Indenture, expressly agree to be bound by such terms.
(c)  
    
Denominations
. The Securities shall be issuable only in fully registered form, without coupons, and only in denominations of $2,000 and any integral multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.
(d)  
    
Restrictive Legends
. (A) Each Rule 144A Global Note and the Institutional Accredited Investor Global Note shall bear the following legend (the 
Private Placement Legend
) on the face thereof:
THIS SECURITY HAS NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE SECURITIES ACT), OR THE SECURITIES LAWS OF ANY STATE OR OTHER JURISDICTION. NEITHER THIS SECURITY NOR ANY INTEREST OR PARTICIPATION HEREIN MAY BE REOFFERED, SOLD, ASSIGNED, TRANSFERRED, PLEDGED, ENCUMBERED OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF IN THE ABSENCE OF SUCH REGISTRATION OR UNLESS SUCH TRANSACTION IS EXEMPT FROM, OR NOT SUBJECT TO, SUCH REGISTRATION. THE HOLDER OF THIS SECURITY, BY ITS ACCEPTANCE HEREOF, AGREES ON ITS OWN BEHALF AND ON BEHALF OF ANY INVESTOR ACCOUNT FOR WHICH IT HAS PURCHASED SECURITIES, TO OFFER, SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER SUCH SECURITY, PRIOR TO THE DATE (THE RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE) THAT IS ONE YEAR AFTER THE LATER OF THE ORIGINAL ISSUE DATE HEREOF AND THE LAST DATE ON WHICH THE ISSUER OR ANY AFFILIATE OF THE ISSUER WAS THE OWNER OF THIS SECURITY (OR ANY PREDECESSOR OF SUCH SECURITY), ONLY (A) TO THE ISSUER OR ANY SUBSIDIARY THEREOF, (B) PURSUANT TO A REGISTRATION STATEMENT THAT HAS BEEN DECLARED EFFECTIVE UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, (C) FOR SO LONG AS THE SECURITIES ARE ELIGIBLE FOR
26
RESALE PURSUANT TO RULE 144A UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT (RULE 144A), TO A PERSON IT REASONABLY BELIEVES IS A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER AS DEFINED IN RULE 144A THAT PURCHASES FOR ITS OWN ACCOUNT OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER TO WHOM NOTICE IS GIVEN THAT THE TRANSFER IS BEING MADE IN RELIANCE ON RULE 144A, (D) PURSUANT TO OFFERS AND SALES TO NON-U.S. PERSONS THAT OCCUR OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES WITHIN THE MEANING OF REGULATION S UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, (E) TO AN INSTITUTIONAL ACCREDITED INVESTOR WITHIN THE MEANING OF RULE 501(a)(1), (2), (3) OR (7) UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT THAT IS NOT A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER AND THAT IS PURCHASING FOR ITS OWN ACCOUNT OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF ANOTHER INSTITUTIONAL ACCREDITED INVESTOR, IN EACH CASE IN A TRANSACTION INVOLVING A MINIMUM PRINCIPAL AMOUNT OF THE SECURITIES OF $250,000, FOR INVESTMENT PURPOSES AND NOT WITH A VIEW TO OR FOR OFFER OR SALE IN CONNECTION WITH ANY DISTRIBUTION IN VIOLATION OF THE SECURITIES ACT, OR (F) PURSUANT TO ANOTHER AVAILABLE EXEMPTION FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES ACT, SUBJECT TO THE ISSUERS AND THE TRUSTEES RIGHT PRIOR TO ANY SUCH OFFER, SALE OR TRANSFER PURSUANT TO CLAUSES (D), (E) OR (F) TO REQUIRE THE DELIVERY OF AN OPINION OF COUNSEL, CERTIFICATION AND/ OR OTHER INFORMATION SATISFACTORY TO EACH OF THEM. THIS LEGEND WILL BE REMOVED UPON THE REQUEST OF THE HOLDER AFTER THE RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE.
(B)  each Regulation S Global Note shall bear the following legend (the 
Regulation S Legend
) on the face thereof:
THIS SECURITY HAS NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE SECURITIES ACT), OR THE SECURITIES LAWS OF ANY STATE OR OTHER JURISDICTION. NEITHER THIS SECURITY NOR ANY INTEREST OR PARTICIPATION HEREIN MAY BE REOFFERED, SOLD, ASSIGNED, TRANSFERRED, PLEDGED, ENCUMBERED OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF IN THE ABSENCE OF SUCH REGISTRATION OR UNLESS SUCH TRANSACTION IS EXEMPT FROM, OR NOT SUBJECT TO, SUCH REGISTRATION. THE HOLDER OF THIS SECURITY, BY ITS ACCEPTANCE HEREOF, AGREES ON ITS OWN BEHALF AND ON BEHALF OF ANY INVESTOR ACCOUNT FOR WHICH IT HAS PURCHASED SECURITIES, TO OFFER, SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER SUCH SECURITY, PRIOR TO THE DATE (THE RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE) THAT IS 40 DAYS AFTER THE LATER OF THE ORIGINAL ISSUE DATE HEREOF AND THE LAST DATE ON WHICH THE ISSUER OR ANY AFFILIATE OF THE ISSUER WAS THE OWNER OF THIS SECURITY (OR ANY PREDECESSOR OF SUCH SECURITY), ONLY (A) TO THE ISSUER OR ANY SUBSIDIARY THEREOF, (B) PURSUANT TO A REGISTRATION STATEMENT THAT HAS BEEN DECLARED EFFECTIVE UNDER THE
27
SECURITIES ACT, (C) FOR SO LONG AS THE SECURITIES ARE ELIGIBLE FOR RESALE PURSUANT TO RULE 144A UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT (RULE 144A), TO A PERSON IT REASONABLY BELIEVES IS A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER AS DEFINED IN RULE 144A THAT PURCHASES FOR ITS OWN ACCOUNT OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER TO WHOM NOTICE IS GIVEN THAT THE TRANSFER IS BEING MADE IN RELIANCE ON RULE 144A, (D) PURSUANT TO OFFERS AND SALES TO NON-U.S. PERSONS THAT OCCUR OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES WITHIN THE MEANING OF REGULATION S UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, (E) TO AN INSTITUTIONAL ACCREDITED INVESTOR WITHIN THE MEANING OF RULE 501(a)(1), (2), (3) OR (7) UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT THAT IS NOT A QUALIFIED INSTITUTIONAL BUYER AND THAT IS PURCHASING FOR ITS OWN ACCOUNT OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF ANOTHER INSTITUTIONAL ACCREDITED INVESTOR, IN EACH CASE IN A TRANSACTION INVOLVING A MINIMUM PRINCIPAL AMOUNT OF THE SECURITIES OF $250,000, FOR INVESTMENT PURPOSES AND NOT WITH A VIEW TO OR FOR OFFER OR SALE IN CONNECTION WITH ANY DISTRIBUTION IN VIOLATION OF THE SECURITIES ACT, OR (F) PURSUANT TO ANOTHER AVAILABLE EXEMPTION FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECURITIES ACT, SUBJECT TO THE ISSUERS AND THE TRUSTEES RIGHT PRIOR TO ANY SUCH OFFER, SALE OR TRANSFER PURSUANT TO CLAUSES (D), (E) OR (F) TO REQUIRE THE DELIVERY OF AN OPINION OF COUNSEL, CERTIFICATION AND/ OR OTHER INFORMATION SATISFACTORY TO EACH OF THEM. THIS LEGEND WILL BE REMOVED UPON THE REQUEST OF THE HOLDER AFTER THE RESALE RESTRICTION TERMINATION DATE. BY ITS ACQUISITION HEREOF, THE HOLDER HEREOF REPRESENTS THAT IT IS NOT A U.S. PERSON NOR IS IT PURCHASING FOR THE ACCOUNT OF A U.S. PERSON AND IS ACQUIRING THIS SECURITY IN AN OFFSHORE TRANSACTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATION S UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT.
(C) The Global Securities, whether or not an Initial Note, shall bear the following legend (the 
Depository Legend
) on the face thereof:
UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION (DTC), NEW YORK, NEW YORK, TO THE ISSUER OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER, EXCHANGE OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC (AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL INASMUCH AS THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
28
TRANSFERS OF THIS GLOBAL SECURITY SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS IN WHOLE, BUT NOT IN PART, TO DTC, TO NOMINEES OF DTC OR TO A SUCCESSOR THEREOF OR SUCH SUCCESSORS NOMINEE AND TRANSFERS OF PORTIONS OF THIS GLOBAL SECURITY SHALL BE LIMITED TO TRANSFERS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RESTRICTIONS SET FORTH IN THE INDENTURE REFERRED TO ON THE REVERSE HEREOF.
(D) Each Security issued hereunder that has more than a de minimis amount of original issue discount for U.S. federal income tax purposes shall bear a legend (the 
OID Legend
) in substantially the following form:
THIS NOTE IS ISSUED WITH ORIGINAL ISSUE DISCOUNT FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 1271 ET SEQ. OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE. A HOLDER MAY OBTAIN THE ISSUE PRICE, AMOUNT OF ORIGINAL ISSUE DISCOUNT, ISSUE DATE AND YIELD TO MATURITY FOR SUCH NOTE BY SUBMITTING A WRITTEN REQUEST FOR SUCH INFORMATION TO: CORPORATE SECRETARY, BRUNSWICK CORPORATION, 1 N. FIELD CT., LAKE FOREST, ILLINOIS, 60045-4811, TELEPHONE NUMBER (847) 735-4700.
(E) Each Security shall bear the following legend (the 
ERISA Legend
):
BY ITS ACQUISITION OF THIS SECURITY, THE HOLDER THEREOF WILL BE DEEMED TO HAVE REPRESENTED AND WARRANTED THAT EITHER (1) NO PORTION OF THE ASSETS USED BY SUCH HOLDER TO ACQUIRE OR HOLD THIS SECURITY CONSTITUTES THE ASSETS OF AN EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLAN THAT IS SUBJECT TO TITLE I OF THE U.S. EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT INCOME SECURITY ACT OF 1974, AS AMENDED (ERISA), OF A PLAN, INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT ACCOUNT OR OTHER ARRANGEMENT THAT IS SUBJECT TO SECTION 4975 OF THE U.S. INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OF 1986, AS AMENDED (THE CODE) OR PROVISIONS UNDER ANY OTHER FEDERAL, STATE, LOCAL, NON-U.S. OR OTHER LAWS OR REGULATIONS THAT ARE SIMILAR TO SUCH PROVISIONS OF ERISA OR THE CODE (SIMILAR LAWS), OR OF AN ENTITY WHOSE UNDERLYING ASSETS ARE CONSIDERED TO INCLUDE PLAN ASSETS OF ANY SUCH PLAN, ACCOUNT OR ARRANGEMENT, OR (2) THE ACQUISITION AND HOLDING OF THIS SECURITY WILL NOT CONSTITUTE A NON-EXEMPT PROHIBITED TRANSACTION UNDER SECTION 406 OF ERISA OR SECTION 4975 OF THE CODE OR A SIMILAR VIOLATION UNDER ANY APPLICABLE SIMILAR LAWS.
(e)  
    
Book-Entry Provisions
.
(i)  
    
This
Section 2.1(e)
shall apply only to Global Securities deposited with the Trustee, as custodian for the Depositary.
(ii)  
    
Each Global Security initially shall (x) be registered in the name of the Depositary for such Global Security or the nominee of such Depositary, (y) be delivered
29
to the Trustee as custodian for such Depositary and (z) bear legends as set forth in
Section 2.1(d)
.
(iii)  
    
Members of, or participants in, the Depositary (
Agent Members
) shall have no rights under this Indenture with respect to any Global Security held on their behalf by the Depositary or by the Trustee as the custodian of the Depositary or under such Global Security, and the Depositary may be treated by the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee as the absolute owner of such Global Security for all purposes whatsoever. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing herein shall prevent the Company, the Trustee or any agent of the Company or the Trustee from giving effect to any written certification, proxy or other authorization furnished by the Depositary or impair, as between the Depositary and its Agent Members, the operation of customary practices of the Depositary governing the exercise of the rights of a Holder of a beneficial interest in any Global Security.
(iv)  
    
The registered Holder of a Global Security may grant proxies and otherwise authorize any person, including Agent Members and persons that may hold interests through Agent Members, to take any action which a Holder is entitled to take under this Indenture or the Securities.
(v)  
    
In connection with any transfer of a portion of the beneficial interest in a Global Security pursuant to subsection (f) of this
Section 2.1
to beneficial owners who are required to hold Definitive Securities, the Trustee shall reflect on its books and records the date and a decrease in the principal amount of such Global Security in an amount equal to the principal amount of the beneficial interest in the Global Security to be transferred, and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, one or more Definitive Securities of like tenor and amount.
(vi)  
    
In connection with the transfer of an entire Global Security to beneficial owners pursuant to subsection (f) of this
Section 2.1
, such Global Security shall be deemed to be surrendered to the Trustee for cancellation, and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, to each beneficial owner identified by the Depositary in exchange for its beneficial interest in such Global Security, an equal aggregate principal amount of Definitive Securities of authorized denominations.
(vii)  
    
Any Holder of a Global Security shall, by acceptance of such Global Security, agree that transfers of beneficial interests in such Global Security may be effected only through a book-entry system maintained by (a) the Holder of such Global Security (or its agent) or (b) any Holder of a beneficial interest in such Global Security, and that ownership of a beneficial interest in such Global Security shall be required to be reflected in a book entry.
(f)  
    
Definitive Securities
. Except as provided below, owners of beneficial interests in Global Securities shall not be entitled to receive Definitive Securities. If required to do so pursuant to any applicable law or regulation, beneficial owners may obtain definitive securities (
Definitive Securities
) in exchange for their beneficial interests in a Global
30
Security upon written request in accordance with the Depositarys and the Registrars procedures. In addition, Definitive Securities shall be transferred to all beneficial owners in exchange for their beneficial interests in a Global Security if (i) the Depositary notifies the Company that it is unwilling or unable to continue as depositary for such Global Security or the Depositary ceases to be a clearing agency registered under the Exchange Act, at a time when the Depositary is required to be so registered in order to act as Depositary, and in each case a successor depositary is not appointed by the Company within 90 days of such notice or, (ii) the Company executes and delivers to the Trustee and Registrar an Officers Certificate stating that such Global Security shall be so exchangeable or (iii) an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Registrar has received a request from the Depositary.
(g)  
    
Any Definitive Security delivered in exchange for an interest in a Global Security pursuant to
Section 2.1(e)(v)
or
(vi)
shall, except as otherwise provided by paragraph (c) of
Section 2.6
, bear the applicable legend regarding transfer restrictions applicable to the Definitive Security set forth in
Section 2.1(d)
.
(h)  
    
In connection with the exchange of a portion of a Definitive Security for a beneficial interest in a Global Security, the Trustee shall cancel such Definitive Security, and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, to the transferring Holder a new Definitive Security representing the principal amount not so transferred.
SECTION 2.2.  
    
Execution and Authentication
. Two Officers shall sign the Securities for the Company by manual or facsimile signature. If an Officer whose signature is on a Security no longer holds that office at the time the Trustee authenticates the Security, the Security shall be valid nevertheless.
A Security shall not be valid until an authorized signatory of the Trustee manually authenticates the Security. The signature of the Trustee on a Security shall be conclusive evidence that such Security has been duly and validly authenticated and issued under this Indenture. A Security shall be dated the date of its authentication.
At any time and from time to time after the execution and delivery of this Indenture, the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery: (1) Initial Notes for original issue on the Issue Date in an aggregate principal amount of $150,000,000 and (2) subject to the terms of this Indenture, Additional Notes for original issue in an unlimited principal amount of an equal principal amount, in each case upon a written order of the Company signed by two Officers or by an Officer and either an Assistant Treasurer or an Assistant Secretary of the Company (the 
Company Order
) and, in the case of clause (2), delivery of an Opinion of Counsel. Such Company Order shall specify the amount of the Securities to be authenticated and the date on which the original issue of Securities is to be authenticated and whether the Securities are to be Initial Notes or Additional Notes.
The Trustee may appoint an agent (the 
Authenticating Agent
) reasonably acceptable to the Company to authenticate the Securities. Unless limited by the terms of such appointment, any such Authenticating Agent may authenticate Securities whenever the Trustee
31
may do so. Each reference in this Indenture to authentication by the Trustee includes authentication by such agent.
In case the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor, pursuant to
Article IV
shall be consolidated or merged with or into any other Person or shall convey, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of its properties and assets substantially as an entirety to any Person, and the successor Person resulting from such consolidation, or surviving such merger, or into which the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor shall have been merged, or the Person which shall have received a conveyance, transfer, lease or other disposition as aforesaid, shall have executed an indenture supplemental hereto with the Trustee pursuant to
Article IV
, any of the Securities authenticated or delivered prior to such consolidation, merger, conveyance, transfer, lease or other disposition may, from time to time, at the request of the successor Person, be exchanged for other Securities executed in the name of the successor Person with such changes in phraseology and form as may be appropriate, but otherwise in substance of like tenor as the Securities surrendered for such exchange and of like principal amount; and the Trustee, upon Company Order of the successor Person, shall authenticate and deliver Securities as specified in such order for the purpose of such exchange. If Securities shall at any time be authenticated and delivered in any new name of a successor Person pursuant to this
Section 2.2
in exchange or substitution for or upon registration of transfer of any Securities, such successor Person, at the option of the Holders but without expense to them, shall provide for the exchange of all Securities at the time outstanding for Securities authenticated and delivered in such new name.
SECTION 2.3.  
    
Registrar and Paying Agent
. The Company shall maintain an office or agency where Securities may be presented for registration of transfer or for exchange (the 
Registrar
) and an office or agency where Securities may be presented for payment (the 
Paying Agent
). The Company shall maintain an office or agency in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, which at the Issue Date is the Corporate Trust Office. The Registrar shall keep a register of the Securities and of their transfer and exchange (the 
Note Register
). The Company may have one or more co-registrars and one or more additional paying agents. The term Paying Agent includes any additional paying agent and the term Registrar includes any co-registrar.
The Company shall enter into an appropriate agency agreement with any Registrar or Paying Agent not a party to this Indenture. The agreement shall implement the provisions of this Indenture that relate to such agent. The Company shall notify the Trustee of the name and address of each such agent. If the Company fails to maintain a Registrar or Paying Agent, the Trustee shall act as such and shall be entitled to appropriate compensation therefor pursuant to
Section 7.6
. The Company or any of its domestically incorporated Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries may act as Paying Agent, Registrar or transfer agent.
The Company initially appoints the Trustee as Registrar and Paying Agent for the Securities. The Company may remove any Registrar or Paying Agent upon written notice to such Registrar or Paying Agent and to the Trustee;
provided, however,
that no such removal shall become effective until (i) acceptance of any appointment by a successor as evidenced by an appropriate agreement entered into by the Company and such successor Registrar or Paying
32
Agent, as the case may be, and delivered to the Trustee or (ii) notification to the Trustee that the Trustee shall serve as Registrar or Paying Agent until the appointment of a successor in accordance with clause (i) above. The Registrar or Paying Agent may resign at any time upon written notice to the Company and the Trustee.
The Company shall be responsible for making calculations called for under the Securities, including but not limited to determination of redemption price, premium, if any, and any additional amounts or other amounts payable on the Securities. The Company will make the calculations in good faith. The Company will provide a schedule of its calculations to the Trustee when requested by the Trustee, and the Trustee is entitled to rely conclusively on the accuracy of the Companys calculations without independent verification. The Trustee shall forward the Companys calculations to any Holder upon the written request of such Holder.
SECTION 2.4.  
    
Paying Agent To Hold Money in Trust
. By no later than 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which any principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any Security is due and payable, the Company shall deposit with the Paying Agent a sum sufficient in immediately available funds to pay such principal, premium, if any, or interest when due. The Company shall require each Paying Agent (other than the Trustee) to agree in writing that such Paying Agent shall hold in trust for the benefit of Holders or the Trustee all money held by such Paying Agent for the payment of principal of, premium, if any, or interest on the Securities and shall notify the Trustee in writing of any default by the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor in making any such payment. If the Company or a Subsidiary acts as Paying Agent, it shall segregate the money held by it as Paying Agent and hold it as a separate trust fund. The Company at any time may require a Paying Agent (other than the Trustee) to pay all money held by it to the Trustee and to account for any funds disbursed by such Paying Agent. Upon complying with this Section
2.4
, the Paying Agent (if other than the Company or a Subsidiary) shall have no further liability for the money delivered to the Trustee. Upon any bankruptcy, reorganization or similar proceeding with respect to the Company, the Trustee shall serve as Paying Agent for the Securities.
SECTION 2.5.  
    
Holder Lists
. The Trustee shall preserve in as current a form as is reasonably practicable the most recent list available to it of the names and addresses of Holders. If the Trustee is not the Registrar, the Company, on its own behalf and on behalf of each of the Subsidiary Guarantors, shall furnish to the Trustee, in writing at least five Business Days before each Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date and at such other times as the Trustee may request in writing, a list in such form and as of such date as the Trustee may reasonably require of the names and addresses of Holders.
SECTION 2.6.  
    
Transfer and Exchange
.
(a)  
    
The following provisions shall apply with respect to any proposed transfer of a Rule 144A Note or an Institutional Accredited Investor Note prior to the date which is one year after the later of the date of its original issue and the last date on which the Company or any Affiliate of the Company was the owner of such Securities (or any predecessor thereto) (the 
Resale Restriction Termination Date
):
33
(i)  
    
a transfer of a Rule 144A Note or an Institutional Accredited Investor Note or a beneficial interest therein to a QIB shall be made upon the representation of the transferee in the form as set forth on the reverse of the Security that it is purchasing the Security for its own account or an account with respect to which it exercises sole investment discretion and that it and any such account is a qualified institutional buyer within the meaning of Rule 144A, and is aware that the sale to it is being made in reliance on Rule 144A and acknowledges that it has received such information regarding the Company as it has requested pursuant to Rule 144A or has determined not to request such information and that it is aware that the transferor is relying upon its foregoing representations in order to claim the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144A;
(ii)  
    
a transfer of a Rule 144A Note or an Institutional Accredited Investor Note or a beneficial interest therein to an IAI shall be made upon receipt by the Trustee or its agent of a certificate substantially in the form set forth in
Section 2.7
hereof from the proposed transferee and, if requested by the Company or the Trustee, the delivery of an opinion of counsel, certification and/or other information satisfactory to each of them; and
(iii)  
    
a transfer of a Rule 144A Note or an Institutional Accredited Investor Note or a beneficial interest therein to a Non-U.S. Person shall be made upon receipt by the Trustee or its agent of a certificate substantially in the form set forth in
Section 2.8
hereof from the proposed transferee and, if requested by the Company or the Trustee, the delivery of an opinion of counsel, certification and/or other information satisfactory to each of them.
(b)  
    
The following provisions shall apply with respect to any proposed transfer of a Regulation S Note prior to the expiration of the Restricted Period:
(i)  
    
a transfer of a Regulation S Note or a beneficial interest therein to a QIB shall be made upon the representation of the transferee, in the form of assignment on the reverse of the certificate, that it is purchasing the Security for its own account or an account with respect to which it exercises sole investment discretion and that it and any such account is a qualified institutional buyer within the meaning of Rule 144A, and is aware that the sale to it is being made in reliance on Rule 144A and acknowledges that it has received such information regarding the Company as the undersigned has requested pursuant to Rule 144A or has determined not to request such information and that it is aware that the transferor is relying upon its foregoing representations in order to claim the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144A;
(ii)  
    
a transfer of a Regulation S Note or a beneficial interest therein to an IAI shall be made upon receipt by the Trustee or its agent of a certificate substantially in the form set forth in
Section 2.7
hereof from the proposed transferee and, if requested by the Company or the Trustee, the delivery of an opinion of counsel, certification and/or other information satisfactory to each of them; and
34
(iii)  
    
a transfer of a Regulation S Note or a beneficial interest therein to a Non-U.S. Person shall be made upon receipt by the Trustee or its agent of a certificate substantially in the form set forth in
Section 2.8
hereof from the proposed transferee and, if requested by the Company or the Trustee, receipt by the Trustee or its agent of an opinion of counsel, certification and/or other information satisfactory to each of them.
After the expiration of the Restricted Period, interests in the Regulation S Note may be transferred in accordance with applicable law without requiring the certification set forth in
Section 2.8
or any additional certification.
(c)  
    
Restricted Securities Legend
. Upon the transfer, exchange or replacement of Securities not bearing a Restricted Securities Legend, the Registrar shall deliver Securities that do not bear a Restricted Securities Legend. Upon the transfer, exchange or replacement of Securities bearing a Restricted Securities Legend, the Registrar shall deliver only Securities that bear such Restricted Securities Legend unless there is delivered to the Registrar an Opinion of Counsel to the effect that neither such legend nor the related restrictions on transfer are required in order to maintain compliance with the provisions of the Securities Act. Any Additional Notes sold in a registered offering shall not be required to bear the Restricted Securities Legend.
(d)  
    
The Registrar shall retain copies of all letters, notices and other written communications received pursuant to
Section 2.1
or this
Section 2.6
. The Company shall have the right to inspect and make copies of all such letters, notices or other written communications at any reasonable time upon the giving of reasonable written notice to the Registrar.
(e)  
    
Exchange from Global Note Bearing Restricted Securities Legend to Global Note Not Bearing Restricted Securities Legend.
To the extent permitted by law after the six-month anniversary of the Issue Date and upon compliance with the following procedures and applicable Depositary procedures, beneficial interests in a Global Note bearing the Restricted Securities Legend (a 
Restricted Global Note
) may, at the Companys sole discretion, be exchanged for beneficial interests in a Global Note not bearing the Restricted Securities Legend (an 
Unrestricted Global Note
). In order to effect such exchange, the Company shall provide written notice to the Trustee, together with notices to be delivered to DTC or to the Holders (if any), instructing the Trustee to (1) direct the Depositary to transfer the specified amount of the outstanding beneficial interests in a particular Restricted Global Note to an Unrestricted Global Note and provide the Depositary with all such information as is necessary for the Depositary to appropriately credit and debit the relevant Holder accounts and (2) provide prior written notice to all Holders of such exchange, which notice must include the date such exchange is proposed to occur, the CUSIP number of the relevant Restricted Global Note and the CUSIP number of the Unrestricted Global Note into which such Holders beneficial interests shall be exchanged. As a condition to any such exchange pursuant to this
Section 2.6(e)
, the Trustee shall be entitled to receive from the Company, and rely upon conclusively without any liability, an Officers Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel to the Company, in form and in substance reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee, to the effect that such transfer of beneficial interests to the Unrestricted Global Note shall be effected in compliance with the Securities Act. The Company may request from Holders such information it reasonably determines is required in order to be
35
able to deliver such Officers Certificate and Opinion of Counsel, including certification from Holders that they are not Affiliates of the Company and have not knowingly acquired their beneficial interests in the Restricted Global Note from any Affiliate of the Company. Upon such exchange of beneficial interests pursuant to this
Section 2.6(e)
, the Registrar shall reflect on its books and records the date of such transfer and a decrease and increase, respectively, in the principal amount of the applicable Restricted Global Note and the Unrestricted Global Note, respectively, equal to the principal amount of beneficial interests transferred. Following any such transfer pursuant to this
Section 2.6(e)
of all of the beneficial interests in a Restricted Global Note, such Restricted Global Note shall be cancelled.
(f)  
    
Retention of Written Communications
. The Registrar shall retain copies of all letters, notices and other written communications received pursuant to
Section 2.1
or this
Section 2.6
in accordance with its customary document retention procedures. The Company shall have the right to inspect and make copies of all such letters, notices or other written communications at any reasonable time upon the giving of reasonable prior written notice to the Registrar.
(g)  
    
Obligations with Respect to Transfers and Exchanges of Securities
.
(i)  
    
To permit registrations of transfers and exchanges, the Company shall, subject to the other terms and conditions of this
Article II
, execute and the Trustee shall authenticate Definitive Securities and Global Securities at the Registrars request.
(ii)  
    
No service charge shall be made to a Holder for any registration of transfer or exchange, but the Company may require the Holder to pay a sum sufficient to cover any transfer tax, assessments, or similar governmental charge payable in connection therewith (other than any such transfer taxes, assessments or similar governmental charges payable upon exchange or transfer pursuant to
Sections 3.5
or
9.4
).
(iii)  
    
The Registrar shall not be required to register the transfer of or exchange of any Security for a period beginning (1) 15 Business Days before the mailing of a notice of an offer to repurchase Securities and ending at the close of business on the day of such mailing or (2) 15 Business Days before an Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date and ending on such Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date.
(iv)  
    
Prior to the due presentation for registration of transfer of any Security, the Company, the Trustee, the Paying Agent or the Registrar may deem and treat the person in whose name a Security is registered as the absolute owner of such Security for the purpose of receiving payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on such Security and for all other purposes whatsoever, whether or not such Security is overdue, and none of the Company, the Trustee, the Paying Agent or the Registrar shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
36
(v)  
    
All Securities issued upon any transfer or exchange pursuant to the terms of this Indenture shall evidence the same debt and shall be entitled to the same benefits under this Indenture as the Securities surrendered upon such transfer or exchange.
(h)  
    
No Obligation of the Trustee
. (i) The Trustee shall have no responsibility or obligation to any beneficial owner of a Global Security, a member of, or a participant in, the Depositary or other Person with respect to the accuracy of the records of the Depositary or its nominee or of any participant or member thereof, with respect to any ownership interest in the Securities, or with respect to the delivery to any participant, member, beneficial owner or other Person (other than the Depositary) of any notice or the payment of any amount or delivery of any Securities (or other security or property) under or with respect to such Securities. All notices and communications to be given to the Holders and all payments to be made to Holders in respect of the Securities shall be given or made only to or upon the order of the registered Holders (which shall be the Depositary or its nominee in the case of a Global Security). The rights of beneficial owners in any Global Security shall be exercised only through the Depositary subject to the applicable rules and procedures of the Depositary. The Trustee may rely and shall be fully protected in relying upon information furnished by the Depositary with respect to its members, participants and any beneficial owners. Neither the Trustee nor any Agent shall have the responsibility for any actions taken or not taken by the Depositary
(ii) The Trustee shall have no obligation or duty to monitor, determine or inquire as to compliance with any restrictions on transfer imposed under this Indenture or under applicable law with respect to any transfer of any interest in any Security (including any transfers between or among Depositary participants, members or beneficial owners in any Global Security) other than to require delivery of such certificates and other documentation or evidence as are expressly required by, and to do so if and when expressly required by, the terms of this Indenture, and to examine the same to determine substantial compliance as to form with the express requirements hereof.
(i)  
    
Affiliate Holders
. By accepting a beneficial interest in a Global Security, any Person that is an Affiliate of the Company agrees to give notice to the Company, the Trustee and the Registrar of the acquisition and its Affiliate status.
SECTION 2.7.  
    
Form of Certificate to be Delivered in Connection with Transfers to Institutional Accredited Investors
.
[Date]
Brunswick Corporation c/o U.S. Bank National Association
60 Livingston Avenue, 2nd Floor
St. Paul, MN 55107
Facsimile: (651) 495-8146
Attention: Corporate Trust, DWAC UNIT
Dear Sirs:
37
This certificate is delivered to request a transfer of $         principal amount of the 4.625% Senior Notes due 2021 (the Notes) of Brunswick Corporation (the Company).
Upon transfer, the Notes would be registered in the name of the new beneficial owner as follows:
Name:
    
Address:
    
Taxpayer ID Number:
    
The undersigned represents and warrants to you that:
1.
    
We are an institutional accredited investor (as defined in Rule 501(a)(1), (2), (3) or (7) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the Securities Act)) purchasing for our own account or for the account of such an institutional accredited investor at least $250,000 principal amount of the Notes, and we are acquiring the Notes not with a view to, or for offer or sale in connection with, any distribution in violation of the Securities Act. We have such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters as to be capable of evaluating the merits and risk of our investment in the Notes and we invest in or purchase securities similar to the Notes in the normal course of our business. We and any accounts for which we are acting are each able to bear the economic risk of our or its investment.
2.
    
We understand that the Notes have not been registered under the Securities Act and, unless so registered, may not be sold except as permitted in the following sentence. We agree on our own behalf and on behalf of any investor account for which we are purchasing Notes to offer, sell or otherwise transfer such Notes prior to the date that is one year after the later of the date of original issue and the last date on which the Company or any affiliate of the Company was the owner of such Notes (or any predecessor thereto) (the Resale Restriction Termination Date) only (a) to the Company, (b) pursuant to a registration statement which has been declared effective under the Securities Act (the 
Securities Act
), (c) in a transaction complying with the requirements of Rule 144A under the Securities Act (
Rule 144A
), to a person we reasonably believe is a qualified institutional buyer under Rule 144A (a 
QIB
) that purchases for its own account or for the account of a QIB and to whom notice is given that the transfer is being made in reliance on Rule 144A, (d) pursuant to offers and sales that occur outside the United States within the meaning of Regulation S under the Securities Act, (e) to an institutional accredited investor within the meaning of Rule 501(a)(1), (2), (3) or (7) under the Securities Act that is purchasing for its own account or for the account of such an institutional accredited investor, in each case in a minimum principal amount of Notes of $250,000 or (f) pursuant to any other available exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act, subject in each of the foregoing cases to any requirement of law that the disposition of our property or the property of such investor account or accounts be at all times within our or their control and in compliance with any applicable state securities laws. The foregoing restrictions on resale shall not apply subsequent to the Resale Restriction Termination Date. If any resale or other transfer of the Notes is proposed to be made pursuant to clause (e) above prior to the
38
Resale Restriction Termination Date, the transferor shall deliver a letter from the transferee substantially in the form of this letter to the Company and the Trustee, which shall provide, among other things, that the transferee is an institutional accredited investor (within the meaning of Rule 501(a)(1), (2), (3) or (7) under the Securities Act) and that it is acquiring such Notes for investment purposes and not for distribution in violation of the Securities Act. Each purchaser acknowledges that the Company and the Trustee reserve the right prior to any offer, sale or other transfer prior to the Resale Termination Date of the Notes pursuant to clauses (d), (e) or (f) above to require the delivery of an opinion of counsel, certifications and/or other information satisfactory to the Company and the Trustee.
TRANSFEREE:_____________________
BY______________________________
SECTION 2.8.  
    
Form of Certificate to be Delivered in Connection with Transfers Pursuant to Regulation S
.
[Date]
Brunswick Corporation c/o U.S. Bank National Association
60 Livingston Avenue, 2nd Floor
St. Paul, MN 55107
Facsimile: (651) 495-8146
Attention: Corporate Trust, DWAC UNIT
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In connection with our proposed sale of $________ aggregate principal amount of the Securities, we confirm that such sale has been effected pursuant to and in accordance with Regulation S under the United States Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the Securities Act), and, accordingly, we represent that:
(a)  
    
the offer of the Securities was not made to a person in the United States;
(b)  
    
either (i) at the time the buy order was originated, the transferee was outside the United States or we and any person acting on our behalf reasonably believed that the transferee was outside the United States or (ii) the transaction was executed in, on or through the facilities of a designated off-shore securities market and neither we nor any person acting on our behalf knows that the transaction has been pre-arranged with a buyer in the United States;
39
(c)  
    
no directed selling efforts have been made in the United States in contravention of the requirements of Rule 903(a)(2) or Rule 904(a)(2) of Regulation S, as applicable; and
(d)  
    
the transaction is not part of a plan or scheme to evade the registration requirements of the Securities Act.
In addition, if the sale is made during a restricted period and the provisions of Rule 903(b)(2), Rule 903(b)(3) or Rule 904(b)(1) of Regulation S are applicable thereto, we confirm that such sale has been made in accordance with the applicable provisions of Rule 903(b)(2), Rule 903(b)(3) or Rule 904(b)(1), as the case may be.
We also hereby certify that we [are][are not] an Affiliate of the Company and, to our knowledge, the transferee of the Securities [is][is not] an Affiliate of the Company.
You and the Company are entitled to rely upon this letter and are irrevocably authorized to produce this letter or a copy hereof to any interested party in any administrative or legal proceedings or official inquiry with respect to the matters covered hereby. Terms used in this certificate have the meanings set forth in Regulation S.
SECTION 2.9.  
    
Mutilated, Destroyed, Lost or Stolen Securities
. If a mutilated Security is surrendered to the Registrar or if the Holder of a Security claims that the Security has been lost, destroyed or wrongfully taken, the Company shall issue and the Trustee, upon Company Order, shall authenticate a replacement Security if the requirements of Section 8-405 of the Uniform Commercial Code are met such that the Holder (a) notifies the Company and the Trustee within a reasonable time after such Holder has notice of such loss, destruction or wrongful taking and the Registrar has not registered a transfer prior to receiving such notification, (b) makes such request to the Company prior to the Company having notice that the Security has been acquired by a protected purchaser as defined in Section 8-303 of the Uniform Commercial Code (a protected purchaser) and (c) satisfies any other reasonable requirements of the Company and the Trustee. If required by the Trustee or the Company, such Holder shall furnish an indemnity bond sufficient in the judgment of the Company and the Trustee to protect the Company, the Trustee, the Paying Agent and the Registrar from any loss which any of them may suffer if a Security is replaced, then, in the absence of notice to the Company, any Subsidiary Guarantor or the Trustee that such Security has been acquired by a protected purchaser, the Company shall execute and upon Company Order the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver, in exchange for any such mutilated Security or in lieu of any such destroyed, lost or stolen Security, a new Security of like tenor and principal amount, bearing a number not contemporaneously outstanding.
40
In case any such mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security has become or is about to become due and payable, the Company in its discretion may, instead of issuing a new Security, pay such Security.
Upon the issuance of any new Security under this
Section 2.9
, the Company may require that such Holder pay a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in relation thereto and any other expenses (including the fees and expenses of the Trustee) in connection therewith.
Every new Security issued pursuant to this
Section 2.9
in lieu of any mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall constitute an original additional contractual obligation of the Company, any Subsidiary Guarantor and any other obligor upon the Securities, whether or not the mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall be at any time enforceable by anyone, and shall be entitled to all benefits of this Indenture equally and proportionately with any and all other Securities duly issued hereunder.
The provisions of this
Section 2.9
are exclusive and shall preclude (to the extent lawful) all other rights and remedies with respect to the replacement or payment of mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Securities.
SECTION 2.10.  
    
Outstanding Securities
. Securities outstanding at any time are all Securities authenticated by the Trustee except for those canceled by it, those delivered to it for cancellation and those described in this
Section 2.10
as not outstanding. A Security does not cease to be outstanding in the event the Company or an Affiliate of the Company holds the Security except that the Company or an Affiliate of the Company shall
not
obtain voting rights with respect to such Security.
If a Security is replaced pursuant to
Section 2.9
, it ceases to be outstanding unless the Trustee and the Company receive proof satisfactory to them that the replaced Security is held by a bona fide purchaser.
If the Paying Agent segregates and holds in trust, in accordance with this Indenture, on a Redemption Date or maturity date money sufficient to pay all principal, premium, if any, and interest payable on that date with respect to the Securities (or portions thereof) to be redeemed or maturing, as the case may be, and the Paying Agent is not prohibited from paying such money to the Holders on that date pursuant to the terms of this Indenture, then on and after that date such Securities (or portions thereof) cease to be outstanding and interest on them ceases to accrue.
SECTION 2.11.  
    
Temporary Securities
. In the event that Definitive Securities are to be issued under the terms of this Indenture, until such Definitive Securities are ready for delivery, the Company may prepare and the Trustee shall authenticate temporary Securities. Temporary Securities shall be substantially in the form of Definitive Securities but may have variations that the Company considers appropriate for temporary Securities. Without unreasonable delay, the Company shall prepare and the Trustee shall authenticate Definitive Securities. After the preparation of Definitive Securities, the temporary Securities shall be
41
exchangeable for Definitive Securities upon surrender of the temporary Securities at any office or agency maintained by the Company for that purpose and such exchange shall be without charge to the Holder. Upon surrender for cancellation of any one or more temporary Securities, the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery in exchange therefor, one or more Definitive Securities representing an equal principal amount of Securities. Until so exchanged, the Holder of temporary Securities shall in all respects be entitled to the same benefits under this Indenture as a Holder of Definitive Securities.
SECTION 2.12.  
    
Cancellation
. The Company at any time may deliver Securities to the Trustee for cancellation. The Registrar and the Paying Agent shall forward to the Trustee any Securities surrendered to them for registration of transfer, exchange or payment. The Trustee and no one else shall cancel all Securities surrendered for registration of transfer, exchange, payment or cancellation and deliver a certificate of such cancellation to the Company upon request. The Company may not issue new Securities to replace Securities it has paid or delivered to the Trustee for cancellation. The Trustee shall dispose of canceled Securities in accordance with its procedures for the disposition of canceled securities in effect as of the date of such disposition (subject to the record retention requirements of the Exchange Act).
At such time as all beneficial interests in a Global Security have either been exchanged for Definitive Securities, transferred, redeemed, repurchased or canceled, such Global Security shall be returned by the Depositary to the Trustee for cancellation or retained and canceled by the Trustee. At any time prior to such cancellation, if any beneficial interest in a Global Security is exchanged for Definitive Securities, transferred in exchange for an interest in another Global Security, redeemed, repurchased or canceled, the principal amount of Securities represented by such Global Security shall be reduced and an adjustment shall be made on the Global Security and on the books and records of the Trustee (if it is then the Securities Custodian for such Global Security) with respect to such Global Security, by the Trustee or the Securities Custodian, to reflect such reduction.
SECTION 2.13.  
    
Payment of Interest; Defaulted Interest
. Interest on any Security which is payable, and is punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date shall be paid to the Person in whose name such Security (or one or more predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the regular record date for such interest at the office or agency of the Company maintained for such purpose pursuant to
Section 2.3
.
Any interest on any Security which is payable, but is not paid when the same becomes due and payable and such nonpayment continues for a period of 30 days shall forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on the regular record date by virtue of having been such Holder, and such defaulted interest and (to the extent lawful) interest on such defaulted interest at the rate borne by the Securities (such defaulted interest and interest thereon herein collectively called 
Defaulted Interest
) shall be paid by the Company, at its election in each case, as provided in clause (a) or (b) below:
(a)
The Company may elect to make payment of any Defaulted Interest to the Persons in whose names the Securities (or their respective predecessor Securities) are registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date (as defined below) for the
42
payment of such Defaulted Interest, which shall be fixed in the following manner. The Company shall notify the Trustee in writing of the amount of Defaulted Interest proposed to be paid on each Security and the date (not less than 30 days after such notice) of the proposed payment (the 
Special Interest Payment Date
), and at the same time the Company shall deposit with the Trustee an amount of money equal to the aggregate amount proposed to be paid in respect of such Defaulted Interest or shall make arrangements satisfactory to the Trustee for such deposit prior to the date of the proposed payment, such money when deposited to be held in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled to such Defaulted Interest as in this clause provided. Thereupon the Company shall fix a record date (the 
Special Record Date
) for the payment of such Defaulted Interest which shall be not more than 15 days and not less than 10 days prior to the Special Interest Payment Date and not less than 10 days after the receipt by the Trustee of the notice of the proposed payment. The Company shall promptly notify the Trustee of such Special Record Date, and in the name and at the expense of the Company, the Trustee shall cause notice of the proposed payment of such Defaulted Interest and the Special Record Date and Special Interest Payment Date therefor to be given in the manner provided for in
Section 11.1
, not less than 10 days prior to such Special Record Date. Notice of the proposed payment of such Defaulted Interest and the Special Record Date and Special Interest Payment Date therefor having been so given, such Defaulted Interest shall be paid on the Special Interest Payment Date to the Persons in whose names the Securities (or their respective Predecessor Securities) are registered at the close of business on such Special Record Date and shall no longer be payable pursuant to the following clause (b).
(b)
The Company may make payment of any Defaulted Interest in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Securities may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, if, after notice given by the Company to the Trustee of the proposed payment pursuant to this clause, such manner of payment shall be deemed practicable by the Trustee.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any such Interest Payment Date (other than an Interest Payment Date at maturity) or Special Interest Payment Date would otherwise be a day that is not a Business Day, then the interest payment shall be postponed to the next succeeding Business Day (except if that Business Day falls in the next succeeding calendar month, then interest shall be paid on the immediately preceding Business Day). If the maturity date of the Securities is a day that is not a Business Day, all payments to be made on such day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day, with the same force and effect as if made on the maturity date. In either of such cases, no additional interest shall be payable as a result of such delay in payment.
Subject to the foregoing provisions of this
Section 2.13
, each Security delivered under this Indenture upon registration of transfer of or in exchange for or in lieu of any other Security shall carry the rights to interest accrued and unpaid, and to accrue, which were carried by such other Security.
43
SECTION 2.14.  
    
Computation of Interest
. Interest on the Securities shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months.
SECTION 2.15.  
    
CUSIP and ISIN Numbers
. The Company in issuing the Securities may use CUSIP and ISIN numbers (if then generally in use). The Trustee shall not be responsible for the use of CUSIP or ISIN numbers, and the Trustee makes no representation as to their correctness as printed on any Security or notice to Holders. The Company shall promptly notify the Trustee in writing of any change in the CUSIP or ISIN numbers. The Trustee may use CUSIP and ISIN numbers in notices as a convenience to Holders;
provided
that any such notice may state that no representation is made as to the correctness of such numbers either as printed on the Securities or as contained in any notice and that reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers printed on the Securities, and any such notice shall not be affected by any defect in or omission of such numbers.
ARTICLE III
Covenants
SECTION 3.1.  
    
Payment of Securities
. The Company shall promptly pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Securities on the dates and in the manner provided in the Securities and in this Indenture. Principal, premium, if any, and interest shall be considered paid on the date due if on such date the Trustee or the Paying Agent holds in accordance with this Indenture money sufficient to pay all principal, premium, if any, and interest then due and the Trustee or the Paying Agent, as the case may be, is not prohibited from paying such money to the Holders on that date pursuant to the terms of this Indenture.
The Company shall pay interest on overdue principal at the rate specified therefor in the Securities.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Indenture, the Company may, to the extent it is required to do so by law, deduct or withhold income or other similar taxes imposed by the United States of America from principal or interest payments hereunder.
SECTION 3.2.  
    
SEC Reports
. Notwithstanding that the Company may not be subject to the reporting requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act, if not filed electronically with the SEC through EDGAR (or any successor system), the Company shall provide to the Trustee and the registered Holders of the Securities, within 15 days of the time periods specified in the relevant forms:
(1)    all quarterly and annual financial information that would be required to be contained in a filing with the SEC on Forms 10-Q and 10-K if the Company were required to file such Forms, including a Managements Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations and, with respect to the annual information only, a report on the annual financial statements by the Companys independent registered public accounting firm; and
44
(2)    all current reports that would be required to be filed with the SEC on Form 8-K if the Company were required to file such reports.
The requirement for the Company to provide information may be satisfied by posting such reports, documents and information on its website within the time periods specified by this
Section 3.2
;
provided
,
however
, that the Company shall (upon request) provide one copy of the exhibits of the foregoing to the Trustee and shall (upon request) provide additional copies of such exhibits to any Holder or prospective Holder.
If the Company has designated any of its Subsidiaries as Unrestricted Subsidiaries and such Unrestricted Subsidiaries, either individually or collectively, would otherwise have been a Significant Subsidiary, then the quarterly and annual financial information required by the first paragraph of this
Section 3.2
shall include a reasonably detailed presentation of the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries, either on the face of the financial statements or in the footnotes to the financial statements and in the Managements Discussion and Analysis of Results of Operations and Financial Condition section.
In addition, the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors shall make available to the Holders and to prospective investors, upon the request of such Holders, the information required to be delivered pursuant to Rule 144A(d)(4) under the Securities Act so long as the Securities are not freely transferable under the Securities Act. For purposes of this
Section 3.2
, the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors shall be deemed to have furnished the reports to the Trustee and the Holders of Securities as required by this
Section 3.2
if (i) it has filed such reports with the SEC via the EDGAR filing system (or any successor system) and such reports are publicly available or (ii) it has posted such reports on its website.
Delivery of such reports, information and documents to the Trustee is for informational purposes only and the Trustee's receipt of such shall not constitute constructive notice of any information contained therein or determinable from information contained therein, including the Company's compliance with any of its covenants hereunder (as to which the Trustee is entitled to rely exclusively on Officers' Certificates). The Trustee shall have no duty to search for or obtain any electronic or other filings that the Company makes with the SEC or posts on any website, regardless of whether such filings are periodic, supplemental or otherwise.
SECTION 3.3.  
    
Limitation on Liens.
The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly, create, Incur or suffer to exist any Lien (other than Permitted Liens) upon any Principal Property or any Capital Stock or Indebtedness of any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, which Lien secures obligations under any existing or future Indebtedness, whether such Principal Property or Capital Stock or Indebtedness of any of its Restricted Subsidiaries is owned or outstanding on the Issue Date or acquired or issued after that date, unless contemporaneously with the Incurrence of such a Lien:
45
Any Lien created for the benefit of Holders pursuant to this
Section 3.3
shall be automatically and unconditionally released and discharged upon the release and discharge of each of the Liens described in clauses (1) and (2) above.
SECTION 3.4.  
    
Limitation on Sale and Leaseback Transactions
. The Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, enter into a Sale and Leaseback Transaction unless either (1) the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary would be permitted, pursuant to
Section 3.3
, to incur Liens securing Indebtedness in an amount equal to the Attributable Debt of such Sale and Leaseback Transaction without equally and ratably securing the Securities, or (2) the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary, within 120 days of entering into such Sale and Leaseback Transaction, applies an amount (which amount shall equal the greater of (a) the net proceeds of the sale or transfer of the property leased pursuant to such Sale and Leaseback Transaction or (b) the fair value of such property at the time of entering into such Sale and Leaseback Transaction, as determined by the Board of Directors of the Company) to the retirement (other than any mandatory retirement) of Funded Debt, which Funded Debt does not constitute a Subordinated Obligation or a Guarantor Subordinated Obligation.
SECTION 3.5.  
    
Change of Control Triggering Event.
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem all of the Securities as described under
Section 5.1
, each Holder shall have the right to require the Company to repurchase all or any part (equal to $2,000 or a larger integral multiples of $1,000) of such Holders Securities at a purchase price in cash equal to 101% of the principal amount of the Securities plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date of purchase (subject to the right of Holders of record on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date).
(b)  
    
Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem all of the Securities as described under
Section 5.1
, the Company shall mail (or, with respect to Global Securities, to the extent permitted or required by applicable DTC procedures or regulations, send electronically) a notice (the 
Change of Control Offer
) to each Holder at the address appearing in the security register, with a copy to the Trustee, stating:
(i)    that a Change of Control Offer is being made and such Holder has the right to require the Company to purchase such Holders Securities at a purchase price in cash equal to 101% of the principal amount of such Securities plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date of purchase (subject to the right of Holders of record on a
46
record date to receive interest on the relevant Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date) (the 
Change of Control Payment
);
(ii)    the repurchase date (which shall be no earlier than 30 days nor later than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed or sent) (the 
Change of Control Payment Date
); and
(iii)    the procedures determined by the Company, consistent with this Indenture, that a Holder must follow in order to have its Securities repurchased.
(c)  
    
On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company shall, to the extent lawful:
(i)    accept for payment all Securities or portions of Securities (equal to $2,000 or larger integral multiples of $1,000) properly tendered pursuant to the Change of Control Offer;
(ii)    deposit with the Paying Agent an amount equal to the Change of Control Payment in respect of all Securities or portions of Securities so tendered; and
(iii)    deliver or cause to be delivered to the Trustee the Securities so accepted, together with an Officers Certificate stating the aggregate principal amount of Securities or portions of Securities being purchased by the Company.
(d)  
    
The Paying Agent shall promptly mail to each Holder of Securities so tendered the Change of Control Payment for such Securities, and the Trustee shall promptly authenticate and mail (or cause to be transferred by book entry) to each Holder a new Security equal in principal amount to any unpurchased portion of the Securities surrendered, if any;
provided
that each such new Security shall be in a principal amount of $2,000 or larger integral multiples of $1,000.
(e)  
    
If the Change of Control Payment Date is on or after an interest record date and on or before the related Interest Payment Date, any accrued and unpaid interest, if any, shall be paid to the Person in whose name a Security is registered at the close of business on such Record Date, and no additional interest shall be payable to Holders who tender pursuant to the Change of Control Offer.
(f)  
    
The Company shall publicly announce the results of the Change of Control Offer on or as soon as practicable after the Change of Control Payment Date.
(g)  
    
The Company will not be required to make a Change of Control Offer upon a Change of Control Triggering Event if (i) a third party makes the Change of Control Offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements set forth in this Indenture applicable to a Change of Control Offer made by the Company and purchases all Securities validly tendered and not withdrawn under such Change of Control Offer or (ii) a notice of redemption has been given pursuant to
Article V
of this Indenture, unless and until
47
there has been a default in the payment of the applicable redemption price. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, a Change of Control Offer may be made in advance of a Change of Control Triggering Event, conditional upon such Change of Control Triggering Event, if a definitive agreement is in place for the Change of Control at the time of making the Change of Control Offer.
(h)  
    
The Company shall comply, to the extent applicable, with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws or regulations thereunder in connection with the repurchase of Securities pursuant to this
Section 3.5
. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with provisions of this
Section 3.5
, the Company shall comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and shall not be deemed to have breached its obligations under this Indenture by virtue thereof.
SECTION 3.6.  
    
Future Subsidiary Guarantors.
(a)  
    
The Company shall promptly notify the Trustee and cause each Restricted Subsidiary that, on the Issue Date or any time thereafter, Guarantees any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor under the ABL Facility or any other Material Debt Facility to execute and deliver to the Trustee a supplemental indenture substantially in the form of
Exhibit B
to this Indenture, pursuant to which such Restricted Subsidiary shall become a party to this Indenture as a Subsidiary Guarantor.
(b)  
    
The obligations of each Subsidiary Guarantor shall be limited to the maximum amount as shall, after giving effect to all other contingent and fixed liabilities of such Subsidiary Guarantor (including, without limitation, any Guarantees under the ABL Facility or any Material Debt Facility) and after giving effect to any collections from or payments made by or on behalf of any other Subsidiary Guarantor in respect of the obligations of such other Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee or pursuant to its contribution obligations under this Indenture, result in the obligations of such Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee not constituting a fraudulent conveyance or fraudulent transfer under federal or state law.
(c)  
    
Following the first day (a) the Securities are rated Investment Grade by both of the Rating Agencies, and (b) no Default has occurred and is continuing under this Indenture, the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries will not be subject to the provisions of this
Section 3.6
. If at any time (x)(i) the Securities credit rating is downgraded from an Investment Grade rating by any Rating Agency and (ii) the ABL Facility or any Material Debt Facility is Guaranteed by a Restricted Subsidiary of the Company or (y) if a Default or Event of Default occurs and is continuing, then this
Section 3.6
will thereafter be reinstated as if this
Section 3.6
had never been suspended (the 
Reinstatement Date
) and be applicable pursuant to the terms of this Indenture (including in connection with performing any assessment to determine compliance with the terms of this Indenture), unless and until the Securities subsequently attain an Investment Grade rating from both Rating Agencies and no Default or Event of Default is in existence (in which event this
Section 3.6
shall no longer be in effect for such time that the Securities are rated Investment Grade by both Rating Agencies and no
48
Default or Event of Default is in existence);
provided
,
however
, that no Default, Event of Default or breach of any kind shall be deemed to exist or have occurred under this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees with respect to this
Section 3.6
based on, and none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries shall bear any liability for, any actions taken or events occurring during the Suspension Period, or any actions taken at any time pursuant to any contractual obligation arising prior to the Reinstatement Date, regardless of whether such actions or events would have been permitted if this
Section 3.6
had remained in effect during such period. The period of time between the date of suspension of this
Section 3.6
and the Reinstatement Date is referred to as the 
Suspension Period
. The Company shall provide an Officers Certificate to the Trustee indicating the occurrence of any Suspension Period or Reinstatement Date. The Trustee shall have no obligation to independently determine or verify if such events have occurred or notify the Holders of any Suspension Period or Reinstatement Date. The Trustee may provide a copy of such Officers Certificate to any Holder upon request.
(d)  
    
Each Subsidiary Guarantee shall also be released in accordance with
Article X
subject, in each case, to the other provisions of this Indenture.
SECTION 3.7.  
    
Maintenance of Office or Agency
. The Company shall maintain in The City of New York, an office or agency where the Securities may be presented or surrendered for payment, where, if applicable, the Securities may be surrendered for registration of transfer or exchange and where notices and demands to or upon the Company in respect of the Securities and this Indenture may be served. The corporate trust agency of the Trustee, which initially shall be located at the Corporate Trust Office, shall be such office or agency of the Company, unless the Company shall designate and maintain some other office or agency for one or more of such purposes. The Company shall give prompt written notice to the Trustee of any change in the location of any such office or agency. If at any time the Company shall fail to maintain any such required office or agency or shall fail to furnish the Trustee with the address thereof, such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands may be made or served at the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee, and the Company hereby appoints the Trustee as its agent to receive all such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands.
The Company may also from time to time designate one or more other offices or agencies (in or outside of The City of New York) where the Securities may be presented or surrendered for any or all such purposes and may from time to time rescind any such designation;
provided, however,
that no such designation or rescission shall in any manner relieve the Company of its obligation to maintain an office or agency in The City of New York for such purposes. The Company shall give prompt written notice to the Trustee of any such designation or rescission and any change in the location of any such other office or agency.
SECTION 3.8.  
    
Money for Security Payments to Be Held in Trust
. If the Company shall at any time act as its own Paying Agent, it shall, on or before each due date of the principal of (or premium, if any) or interest on any of the Securities, segregate and hold in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled thereto a sum sufficient to pay the principal of (or premium, if any) or interest so becoming due until such sums shall be paid to such Persons or
49
otherwise disposed of as herein provided and shall promptly notify the Trustee in writing of its action or failure to so act.
Whenever the Company shall have one or more Paying Agents for the Securities, it shall, on or before each due date of the principal of (or premium, if any) or interest on any Securities, deposit with any Paying Agent a sum in same day funds (or New York Clearing House funds if such deposit is made prior to the date on which such deposit is required to be made) that shall be available to the Trustee by 10:00 a.m. New York City time on such due date sufficient to pay the principal (and premium, if any) or interest so becoming due, such sum to be held in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled to such principal, premium or interest, and (unless such Paying Agent is the Trustee) the Company shall promptly notify the Trustee in writing of such action or any failure to so act.
The Company shall cause each Paying Agent (other than the Trustee) to execute and deliver to the Trustee an instrument in which such Paying Agent shall agree with the Trustee, subject to the provisions of this
Section 3.8
, that such Paying Agent shall:
(a)
    
hold all sums held by it for the payment of the principal of (and premium, if any) or interest on Securities in trust for the benefit of the Persons entitled thereto until such sums shall be paid to such Persons or otherwise disposed of as herein provided;
(b)
    
give the Trustee written notice of any default by the Company (or any other obligor upon the Securities) in the making of any payment of principal (and premium, if any) or interest; and
(c)
    
at any time during the continuance of any such default, upon the written request of the Trustee, forthwith pay to the Trustee all sums so held in trust by such Paying Agent.
The Company may at any time, for the purpose of obtaining the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture or for any other purpose, pay, or by Company Order direct any Paying Agent to pay, to the Trustee all sums held in trust by the Company or such Paying Agent, such sums to be held by the Trustee upon the same trusts as those upon which such sums were held by the Company or such Paying Agent; and, upon such payment by any Paying Agent to the Trustee, such Paying Agent shall be released from all further liability with respect to such sums.
Any money deposited with the Trustee or any Paying Agent, or then held by the Company, in trust for the payment of the principal of (or premium, if any) or interest on any Security and remaining unclaimed for two years after such principal, premium or interest has become due and payable shall be paid to the Company on Company Order, or (if then held by the Company) shall be discharged from such trust; and the Holder of such Security shall thereafter, as an unsecured general creditor, look only to the Company for payment thereof, and all liability of the Trustee or such Paying Agent with respect to such trust money, and all liability of the Company as trustee thereof, shall thereupon cease;
provided, however,
that the Trustee or such Paying Agent, before being required to make any such repayment to the Company, may at the expense of the Company cause to be published once, in a leading daily newspaper (if practicable,
50
The Wall Street Journal
(Eastern Edition)) printed in the English language and of general circulation in New York City, notice that such money remains unclaimed and that, after a date specified therein, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of such publication nor shall it be later than two years after such principal (or premium, if any) or interest shall have become due and payable, any unclaimed balance of such money then remaining shall be repaid to the Company.
SECTION 3.9.  
    
Corporate Existence
. Subject to
Article IV
, the Company shall do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve and keep in full force and effect its corporate existence and the corporate, partnership, limited liability company or other existence of each of its Restricted Subsidiaries, in accordance with the respective organizational documents (as the same may be amended from time to time) and the rights (charter and statutory), licenses and franchises of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries;
provided, however,
that the Company shall not be required to preserve any such existence, right, license or franchise, or the corporate, partnership, limited liability company or other existence of any of its Restricted Subsidiaries, if it shall be determined (in Good Faith by the Company) that the preservation thereof is no longer desirable in the conduct of the business of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
SECTION 3.10.  
    
Payment of Taxes
. The Company shall pay or discharge or cause to be paid or discharged, before the same shall become delinquent, all material taxes, assessments and governmental charges levied or imposed upon the Company or any Subsidiary, except such as are being contested in good faith by appropriate negotiations or proceedings or where the failure to effect such payment is not adverse in any material respect to the Holders.
SECTION 3.11.  
    
Compliance Certificate
. The Company shall deliver to the Trustee within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company an Officers Certificate (that need not comply with Section 11.3) stating that in the course of the performance by the signers of their duties as Officers of the Company they would normally have knowledge of any Default or Event of Default and whether or not the signers know of any Default or Event of Default that occurred during such period. If they do, the certificate shall describe the Default or Event of Default, its status and what action the Company is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto. The Officers Certificate shall also notify the Trustee should the then current fiscal year be changed to end on any date other than on the date as herein defined.
SECTION 3.12.  
    
Further Instruments and Acts
. Upon request of the Trustee, the Company shall execute and deliver such further instruments and do such further acts as may be reasonably necessary or proper to carry out more effectively the purpose of this Indenture.
SECTION 3.13.  
    
Statement by Officers as to Default
. The Company shall deliver to the Trustee, within 30 days after the knowledge thereof, written notice in the form of an Officers Certificate of any Event of Default or any event which, with notice or the lapse of time or both, would constitute an Event of Default under
Section 6.1(a)(i)
,
(ii)
,
(iii)
,
(iv)
,
(v)
,
(vi)
,
(ix)
or
(x)
, which shall include their status and what action the Company is taking or proposing to take in respect thereof.
51
ARTICLE IV
Successor Company and Successor Guarantor
SECTION 4.1.  
    
When Company May Merge or Otherwise Dispose of Assets.
The Company shall not consolidate with or merge with or into or wind up into (whether or not the Company is the surviving corporation), or sell, assign, convey, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its properties and assets, in one or more related transactions, to any Person
unless
:
(i)  
    
if other than the Company, the resulting, surviving or transferee Person (the 
Successor Company
) shall be a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America, any State of the United States, the District of Columbia or any territory of the United States;
(ii)  
    
the Successor Company (if other than the Company) assumes pursuant to a supplemental indenture, executed and delivered to the Trustee, in a form reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee, all of the obligations of the Company under the Securities and this Indenture;
(iii)  
    
immediately after giving effect to such transaction (and treating any Indebtedness which becomes an obligation of the Successor Company or any Restricted Subsidiary as a result of such transaction as having been Incurred by the Successor Company or such Restricted Subsidiary at the time of such transaction), no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing;
(iv)  
    
each Subsidiary Guarantor (unless it is the other party to the transactions above, in which case clause (i) shall apply) shall have by the terms of such supplemental indenture confirmed that its Subsidiary Guarantee shall apply to such Persons obligations in respect of this Indenture and the Securities; and
(v)  
    
the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee an Officers Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that such consolidation, merger or transfer and such supplemental indenture (if any) comply with this Indenture and an Opinion of Counsel stating that such supplemental indenture is its legal, valid and binding obligation.
(b)  
    
    Notwithstanding
Section 4.1(a)(iii)
:
(i)  
    
any Restricted Subsidiary may consolidate with, merge with or into or transfer all or part of its properties and assets to the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor so long as no Capital Stock of the Restricted Subsidiary is distributed to any Person other than the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor, and
(ii)  
    
the Company may merge with an Affiliate of the Company solely for the purpose of reincorporating the Company in another jurisdiction to realize tax or other
52
benefits;
provided
that, in the case of a Restricted Subsidiary that merges into the Company, the Company shall not be required to comply with the preceding clause (v).
SECTION 4.2.  
    
When a Subsidiary Guarantor May Merge or Otherwise Dispose of Assets
.
In addition, the Company shall not permit any Subsidiary Guarantor to consolidate with or merge with or into or wind up into (whether or not the Subsidiary Guarantor is the surviving corporation), or sell, assign, convey, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its properties and assets, in one or more related transactions, to any Person (other than to the Company or another Subsidiary Guarantor),
unless
: if such entity remains a Subsidiary Guarantor, (A) the resulting, surviving or transferee Person (the 
Successor Guarantor
) shall be a corporation, partnership, trust or limited liability company organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America, any State of the United States, the District of Columbia or any other territory of the United States; (B) the Successor Guarantor, if other than such Subsidiary Guarantor, expressly assumes in writing by supplemental indenture, executed and delivered to the Trustee, in form satisfactory to the Trustee, all the obligations of such Subsidiary Guarantor under the Subsidiary Guarantee and this Indenture; (C) immediately after giving effect to such transaction (and treating any Indebtedness which becomes an obligation of the Successor Guarantor or any Restricted Subsidiary as a result of such transaction as having been Incurred by the Successor Guarantor or such Restricted Subsidiary at the time of such transaction), no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing; and (D) the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee an Officers Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that such consolidation, merger or transfer and such supplemental indenture (if any) comply with this Indenture and an Opinion of Counsel stating that such supplemental indenture is its legal, valid and binding obligation.
(b)  
    
Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Subsidiary Guarantor may merge with or into or transfer all or part of its properties and assets to another Subsidiary Guarantor or the Company or merge with a Restricted Subsidiary of the Company solely for the purpose of reincorporating the Subsidiary Guarantor in a State of the United States or the District of Columbia.
SECTION 4.3.  
    
Release from Obligations
.
The Company and a Subsidiary Guarantor, as the case may be, shall be released from its obligations under this Indenture and the Successor Company and the Successor Guarantor, as the case may be, shall succeed to, and be substituted for, and may exercise every right and power of, the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor, as the case may be, under this Indenture, but, in the case of a lease of all or substantially all its assets, the predecessor Company will not be released from the obligation to pay the principal of and interest on the Securities and a Subsidiary Guarantor will not be released from its obligations under its Subsidiary Guarantee. The Successor Company will succeed to, and be substituted for, and may exercise every right and power of, the Company under this Indenture.
SECTION 4.4.  
    
Disposition of Subsidiary Properties and Assets
.
53
For purposes of this
Article IV
, the sale, lease, conveyance, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the properties and assets of one or more Subsidiaries of the Company, which properties and assets, if held by the Company instead of such Subsidiaries, would constitute all or substantially all of the properties and assets of the Company on a consolidated basis, shall be deemed to be the transfer of all or substantially all of the properties and assets of the Company.
ARTICLE V
Redemption of Securities
SECTION 5.1.  
    
Optional Redemption
. (a)    Except pursuant to clauses (b) and (c) of this
Section 5.1
, the Securities shall not be redeemable at the Companys option prior to May 15, 2016.
(b)    At any time prior to May 15, 2016, upon not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior written notice, the Company may redeem the Securities, in whole but not in part, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Securities redeemed plus the Applicable Premium plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to, the date of redemption (the 
Redemption Date
), subject to the rights of Holders of Securities on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date.
(c)    Prior to May 15, 2016, the Company may on any one or more occasions redeem up to 35% of the original principal amount of the Securities (calculated after giving effect to any issuance of Additional Notes) with the Net Cash Proceeds of one or more Equity Offerings at a redemption price of 104.625% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the applicable Redemption Date (subject to the right of Holders of Securities on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date);
provided
that:
(i)  
    
at least 65% of the original principal amount of the Securities (calculated after giving effect to any issuance of Additional Notes) remains outstanding after each such redemption; and
(ii)  
    
the redemption occurs within 90 days after the closing of such Equity Offering.
(d)    On and after May 15, 2016, the Company may redeem the Securities, in whole or, from time to time, in part, upon not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior written notice as provided for in
Section 5.5
, at the redemption prices (expressed as percentages of principal amount of the Securities to be redeemed) set forth below, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, if any, to the applicable Redemption Date (subject to the right of Holders of Securities of record on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date) if redeemed during the twelve-month period beginning on May 15 of each of the years indicated below:
54
SECTION 5.2.  
    
Mandatory Redemption
. The Company shall not be required to make mandatory redemption payments or sinking fund payments with respect to the Securities.
SECTION 5.3.  
    
Election to Redeem; Notice to Trustee
. If the Company elects to redeem Securities pursuant to
Section 5.1
, the Company shall furnish to the Trustee, on the date the notice of redemption is required to be mailed or caused to be mailed to Holders pursuant to
Section 5.5
but not more than 60 days before a Redemption Date, an Officers Certificate setting forth (a) the paragraph or subparagraph of such Security and/or Section of this Indenture pursuant to which the redemption shall occur, (b) the Redemption Date, (c) the principal amount of the Securities to be redeemed, (d) the redemption price (or manner of calculation if not then known), (e) that such election has been duly authorized by all requisite corporate action on the part of the Company, (f) any applicable conditions precedent, and (g) that such notice complies with any applicable covenants or conditions precedent set forth in this Indenture. Any redemption may be cancelled by the Company upon written notice to the Trustee at any time prior to notice of redemption being sent to any Holder and thereafter shall be null and void. If the redemption price is not known at the time such notice is to be given, the actual redemption price, calculated as set forth herein, will be set forth in an Officers Certificate delivered to the Trustee no later than two Business Days prior to the Redemption Date. The Company shall deliver to the Trustee such documentation and records as shall enable the Trustee to select the Securities to be redeemed pursuant to
Section 5.4
.
SECTION 5.4.  
    
Selection by Trustee of Securities to Be Redeemed
. In the case of any partial redemption, selection of the Securities for redemption will be made by the Trustee in compliance with the requirements of the principal national securities exchange, if any, on which the Securities are listed or, if the Securities are not listed, then on a
pro
rata
basis, by lot or by such other method as the Trustee in its sole discretion shall deem to be fair and appropriate, subject to applicable DTC procedures with respect to Global Securities, although no Security of $2,000 in original principal amount or less shall be redeemed in part. If any Security is to be redeemed in part only, the notice of redemption relating to such note shall state the portion of the principal amount thereof to be redeemed. A new Security in principal amount equal to the unredeemed portion thereof shall be issued in the name of the Holder thereof upon cancellation of the original Security.
The Trustee shall promptly notify the Company in writing of the Securities selected for redemption and, in the case of any Securities selected for partial redemption, the principal amount thereof to be redeemed.
55
For all purposes of this Indenture, unless the context otherwise requires, all provisions relating to redemption of Securities shall relate, in the case of any Security redeemed or to be redeemed only in part, to the portion of the principal amount of such Security which has been or is to be redeemed.
SECTION 5.5.  
    
Notice of Redemption
. Notice of redemption shall be given by the Company in the manner provided for in
Section 11.1
not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior to the Redemption Date, to each Holder of Securities to be redeemed;
provided
that with respect to Global Securities, to the extent permitted or required by applicable DTC procedures or regulations, such notice may be sent electronically. At the Companys written request, the Trustee shall give notice of redemption in the Companys name and at the Companys expense;
provided, however,
that the Company shall deliver to the Trustee, at least 5 Business Days before the notice of redemption is required to be mailed or sent or caused to be mailed or sent to Holders (unless a shorter notice shall be agreed to by the Trustee), an Officers Certificate requesting that the Trustee give such notice at the Companys expense and setting forth the information to be stated in such notice as provided in the following items;
provided
,
further
, that redemption notices may be mailed or sent more than 60 days prior to a Redemption Date if the notice is issued in connection with
Article VIII
.
All notices of redemption shall state:
(a)  
    
the Redemption Date;
(b)  
    
the redemption price (or manner of calculation if not then known) and the amount of accrued interest to the Redemption Date payable as provided in
Section 5.7
, if any;
(c)  
    
if less than all outstanding Securities are to be redeemed, the identification of the particular Securities (or portion thereof) to be redeemed, as well as the aggregate principal amount of Securities to be redeemed and the aggregate principal amount of Securities to be outstanding after such partial redemption;
(d)  
    
in case any Security is to be redeemed in part only, the notice which relates to such Security shall state that on and after the Redemption Date, upon surrender of such Security, the Holder shall receive, without charge, a new Security or Securities of authorized denominations for the principal amount thereof remaining unredeemed;
(e)  
    
that on the Redemption Date the redemption price (and accrued interest, if any, to the Redemption Date payable as provided in
Section 5.7
) shall become due and payable upon each such Security, or the portion thereof, to be redeemed, and, unless the Company defaults in making the redemption payment, that interest on Securities called for redemption (or the portion thereof) shall cease to accrue on and after said date;
(f)  
    
the place or places where such Securities are to be surrendered for payment of the redemption price and accrued interest, if any;
(g)  
    
the name and address of the Paying Agent;
56
(h)  
    
that Securities called for redemption must be surrendered to the Paying Agent to collect the redemption price;
(i)  
    
the CUSIP number, and that no representation is made as to the accuracy or correctness of the CUSIP number, if any, listed in such notice or printed on the Securities;
(j)  
    
the paragraph or subparagraph of the Securities pursuant to which the Securities are to be redeemed; and
(k)  
    
any conditions precedent described in reasonable detail.
Notice of any redemption may, at the discretion of the Company, be subject to one or more conditions precedent, including, but not limited to, completion of an Equity Offering or other corporate transaction.
If any notice of redemption is subject to one or more conditions precedent, any such redemption may be rescinded in whole and not in part at any time prior to the close of business on the Business Day prior to the proposed Redemption Date if the Company delivers an Officers Certificate to the Trustee describing the failure of the condition in reasonable detail and rescinding the redemption. The Trustee shall promptly provide a copy of such Officers Certificate to the Holders in the same manner in which the notice of redemption was given.
SECTION 5.6.  
    
Deposit of Redemption Price
. Prior to 10:00 a.m. New York City time, on any Redemption Date, the Company shall deposit with the Trustee or with a Paying Agent (or, if the Company is acting as its own Paying Agent, segregate and hold in trust as provided in
Section 2.4
) an amount of money sufficient to pay the redemption price of, and accrued interest on, all the Securities which are to be redeemed on that date.
SECTION 5.7.  
    
Securities Payable on Redemption Date
. Notice of redemption having been given as aforesaid, the Securities so to be redeemed shall, on the Redemption Date, become due and payable at the redemption price therein specified (together with accrued interest, if any, to the Redemption Date), subject to the failure of one or more conditions precedent, and from and after such date (unless the Company shall default in the payment of the redemption price and accrued interest) such Securities shall cease to bear interest. Upon surrender of any such Security for redemption in accordance with said notice, such Security shall be paid by the Company at the redemption price, together with accrued interest, if any, to the Redemption Date (subject to the rights of Holders of record on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date).
If any Security called for redemption shall not be so paid upon surrender thereof for redemption, the principal (and premium, if any) shall, until paid, bear interest from the Redemption Date at the rate borne by the Securities.
If the optional Redemption Date is on or after a record date and on or before the related Interest Payment Date, the accrued and unpaid interest, if any, shall be paid to the Person
57
in whose name the Security is registered at the close of business on such record date, and no additional interest shall be payable to Holders whose Securities shall be subject to redemption by the Company.
SECTION 5.8.  
    
Securities Redeemed in Part
.  Any Security which is to be redeemed only in part (pursuant to the provisions of this Article) shall be surrendered at the office or agency of the Company maintained for such purpose pursuant to
Section 3.7
(with, if the Company so requires, due endorsement by, or a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company duly executed by, the Holder thereof or such Holders attorney duly authorized in writing), and the Company shall execute, and the Trustee shall authenticate (or transfer by book entry) and make available for delivery to the Holder of such Security at the expense of the Company, a new Security or Securities, of any authorized denomination as requested by such Holder, in an aggregate principal amount equal to and in exchange for the unredeemed portion of the principal of the Security so surrendered,
provided,
that each such new Security shall be in a principal amount of $2,000 or integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. It is understood that, notwithstanding anything in this Indenture to the contrary, only a Company Order and not an Opinion of Counsel or Officers Certificate is required for the Trustee to authenticate such new Security.
SECTION 5.9.  
    
Company May Acquire Securities
.  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Indenture, the Company or its Affiliates (or any Person acting on behalf of the Company or its Affiliates) may at any time and from time to time acquire the Securities by means other than redemption, including by tender offer, open market purchases, negotiated transactions or otherwise, so long as such acquisition does not otherwise violate applicable securities laws.
ARTICLE VI
Defaults and Remedies
SECTION 6.1.  
    
Events of Default
.
(a)    Each of the following is an event of default (an "Event of Default"):
(i)  
    
default in any payment of interest on any Security when the same becomes due and payable, and such default continues for a period of 30 days;
(ii)  
    
default in the payment of the principal of or premium, if any, on any Security when the same becomes due and payable at its Stated Maturity, upon optional redemption, upon required repurchase, upon declaration of acceleration or otherwise;
(iii)  
    
the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor fails to comply with its obligations under
Article IV
;
(iv)  
    
the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor fails to comply for 30 days after notice as provided below with (a) any of its obligations under
Section 3.2, 3.3, 3.4,
58
3.5 and 3.6
(in each case, other than a failure to repurchase Securities that shall constitute an Event of Default under
Section 6.1(a)(ii)
and other than a failure to comply with
Article IV
which failure shall constitute an Event of Default under
Section 6.1(a)(iii)
);
(v)  
    
the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor fails to comply for 60 days after notice as provided below with its other agreements contained in this Indenture or under the Securities;
(vi)  
    
the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries defaults under any mortgage, indenture or instrument under which there is issued or by which there is secured or evidenced any Indebtedness for money borrowed by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries (or the payment of which is guaranteed by the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries), other than Indebtedness owed to the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary, whether such Indebtedness or Guarantee now exists, or is created after the Issue Date, which default:
(a)    is caused by a failure to pay principal of, or interest or premium, if any, on such Indebtedness at its Stated Maturity or due date (after giving effect to any applicable grace periods) (payment default); or
(b)    results in the acceleration by the holders of such Indebtedness prior to its stated final, maturity;
and, in each case, the principal amount of any such Indebtedness, together with the principal amount of any other such Indebtedness under which there has been a payment default or the maturity of which has been so accelerated, aggregates $50.0 million or more;
(vii)  
    
the Company or a Significant Subsidiary or group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary pursuant to or within the meaning of any Bankruptcy Law (as defined below):
(A)
commences a voluntary case or proceeding with respect to itself;
(B)
consents to the entry of an order for relief against it in an involuntary case or proceeding;
(C)
consents to the appointment of a Custodian (as defined below) of it or for substantially all of its property; or
(D)
makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors;
or takes any comparable action under any foreign laws relating to insolvency;
(viii)  
    
a court of competent jurisdiction enters an order or decree under any Bankruptcy Law that:
59
(A)
    
is for relief against the Company or any Significant Subsidiary or a group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary, in an involuntary case;
(B)
    
appoints a Custodian of the Company, any Significant Subsidiary or a group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary, for any substantial part of its property; or
(C)
    
orders the winding up or liquidation of the Company, any Significant Subsidiary or a group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary;
or any similar relief is granted under any foreign laws and the order, decree or relief remains unstayed and in effect for 60 days;
(ix)  
    
failure by the Company or any Significant Subsidiary or group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary to pay final and nonappealable judgments aggregating in excess of $50.0 million (net of any amount that is covered by insurance issued by a reputable and creditworthy insurance company (as determined in the Good Faith by the Company) that has not contested coverage), which judgments are not paid, discharged or stayed for a period of 60 days after such judgment becomes final; or
(x)  
    
any Subsidiary Guarantee of a Significant Subsidiary or group of Restricted Subsidiaries that taken together (as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries) would constitute a Significant Subsidiary ceases to be in full force and effect (except as contemplated by the terms of this Indenture and the Subsidiary Guarantees) or is declared null and void in a judicial proceeding or any Subsidiary Guarantor that is a Significant Subsidiary or group of Subsidiary Guarantors that taken together (as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries) would constitute a Significant Subsidiary denies or disaffirms its obligations under this Indenture or its Subsidiary Guarantee and the Company fails to cause the applicable Restricted Subsidiary or Restricted Subsidiaries, as the case may be, to rescind such denials or disaffirmations within 30 days.
The foregoing shall constitute Events of Default whatever the reason for any such Event of Default and whether it is voluntary or involuntary or is effected by operation of law or pursuant to any judgment, decree or order of any court or any order, rule or regulation of any administrative or governmental body.
60
Notwithstanding the foregoing, a Default under clauses (iv) or (v) of this
Section 6.1(a)
shall not constitute an Event of Default until the Trustee or the Holders of 25% in principal amount of the outstanding Securities notify the Company (and the Trustee if given by Holders) of the Default and the Company does not cure such Default within the time specified in clauses (iv) or (v) of this
Section 6.1(a)
after receipt of such notice. Such notice must specify the Default, demand that it be remedied and state that such notice is a 
Notice of Default
.
The term 
Bankruptcy Law
 means Title 11, United States Code, or any similar Federal or state law for the relief of debtors. The term 
Custodian
 means any receiver, trustee, assignee, liquidator, custodian or similar official under any Bankruptcy Law.
SECTION 6.2.  
    
Acceleration
. If an Event of Default (other than an Event of Default described in
Section 6.1(a) (vii)
or
(viii)
) occurs and is continuing, the Trustee by notice in writing specifying the Event of Default may, or the Holders of at least 25% in principal amount of the outstanding Securities by notice to the Company and the Trustee may, declare the principal of, premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest, if any, on all the Securities to be due and payable. Upon such a declaration, such principal, premium and accrued and unpaid interest shall be due and payable immediately.
In the event of a declaration of acceleration of the Securities because an Event of Default described in
Section 6.1(a)(vi)
has occurred and is continuing, the declaration of acceleration of the Securities shall be automatically annulled if the default triggering such Event of Default pursuant to
Section 6.1(a)(vi)
shall be remedied or cured by the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary or waived by the holders of the relevant Indebtedness within 20 days after the declaration of acceleration with respect thereto and if (1) the annulment of the acceleration of the Securities would not conflict with any judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction and (2) all existing Events of Default, except nonpayment of principal, premium or interest on the Securities that became due solely because of the acceleration of the Securities, have been cured or waived. If an Event of Default described
Section 6.1(a)(vii)
or
(viii)
above occurs and is continuing, the principal of, premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on all the Securities shall become and be immediately due and payable without any declaration or other act on the part of the Trustee or any Holders.
SECTION 6.3.  
    
Other Remedies
. If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee may pursue any available remedy to collect the payment of principal of or interest on the Securities or to enforce the performance of any provision of the Securities, this Indenture or the Subsidiary Guarantees.
The Trustee may maintain a proceeding even if it does not possess any of the Securities or does not produce any of them in the proceeding. A delay or omission by the Trustee or any Holder in exercising any right or remedy accruing upon an Event of Default shall not impair the right or remedy or constitute a waiver of or acquiescence in the Event of Default. No remedy is exclusive of any other remedy. All available remedies are cumulative.
SECTION 6.4.  
    
Waiver of Past Defaults
. The Holders of a majority in principal amount outstanding (including without limitation, by consents obtained in connection
61
with a purchase of, or tender offer or exchange offer for the Securities) of the Securities by notice to the Trustee may waive an existing Default or Event of Default and its consequences (except a Default or Event of Default in the payment of the principal of, premium or interest on a Security) and rescind any such acceleration with respect to the Securities and its consequences if (1) rescission would not conflict with any judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction, (2) all existing Events of Default, other than the nonpayment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Securities that have become due solely by such declaration of acceleration, have been cured or waived and (3) all amounts owing to the Trustee pursuant to this Indenture have been paid. When a Default or Event of Default is waived, it is deemed cured, but no such waiver shall extend to any subsequent or other Default or Event of Default or impair any consequent right.
SECTION 6.5.  
    
Control by Majority
. The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the then outstanding Securities may direct the time, method and place of conducting any proceeding for exercising any remedy available to the Trustee or of exercising any trust or power conferred on the Trustee. However, the Trustee may refuse to follow any direction that conflicts with law or this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees, or, subject to
Sections 7.1
and
7.2
, that the Trustee determines is unduly prejudicial to the rights of other Holders or would involve the Trustee in personal liability;
provided, however
, that the Trustee may take any other action deemed proper by the Trustee that is not inconsistent with such direction. Prior to taking any action under this Indenture, the Trustee shall be entitled to indemnification satisfactory to it in its sole discretion against all losses, liabilities and expenses that might be caused by taking or not taking such action.
SECTION 6.6.  
    
Limitation on Suits
. Except to enforce the right to receive payment of principal, premium, if any, or interest when due, no Holder may pursue any remedy with respect to this Indenture or the Securities unless:
(i)  
    
the Holder gives to the Trustee written notice stating that an Event of Default is continuing;
(ii)  
    
the Holders of at least 25% in outstanding principal amount of outstanding Securities make a written request to the Trustee to pursue the remedy;
(iii)  
    
such Holder or Holders offer to the Trustee security or indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it against any loss, liability or expense;
(iv)  
    
the Trustee does not comply with the request within 60 days after receipt of the request and the offer of security or indemnity; and
(v)  
    
the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the outstanding Securities do not give the Trustee a direction that, in the opinion of the Trustee, is inconsistent with the request during such 60 day period.
A Holder may not use this Indenture to prejudice the rights of another Holder or to obtain a preference or priority over another Holder.
62
SECTION 6.7.  
    
Rights of Holders to Receive Payment
. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Indenture, the right of any Holder to receive payment of principal of, premium (if any) or interest on the Securities held by such Holder, on or after the respective due dates expressed in the Securities, or to bring suit for the enforcement of any such payment on or after such respective dates, shall not be impaired or affected without the consent of such Holder.
SECTION 6.8.  
    
Collection Suit by Trustee
. If an Event of Default specified in
Section 6.1(a)(i)
or
(ii)
occurs and is continuing, the Trustee may recover judgment in its own name and as trustee of an express trust against the Company for the whole amount then due and owing (together with interest on any unpaid interest to the extent lawful) and the amounts provided for in
Section 7.6
.
SECTION 6.9.  
    
Trustee May File Proofs of Claim
. The Trustee may file such proofs of claim and other papers or documents as may be necessary or advisable in order to have the claims of the Trustee and the Holders allowed in any judicial proceedings relative to the Company, its Subsidiaries or their respective creditors or properties and, unless prohibited by law or applicable regulations, may vote on behalf of the Holders in any election of a trustee in bankruptcy or other Person performing similar functions, and any Custodian in any such judicial proceeding is hereby authorized by each Holder to make payments to the Trustee and, in the event that the Trustee shall consent to the making of such payments directly to the Holders, to pay to the Trustee any amount due it for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and its counsel, and any other amounts due the Trustee under
Section 7.6
. To the extent that the payment of any such compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and counsel, and any other amounts due the Trustee under
Section 6.7
hereof out of the estate in any such proceeding, shall be denied for any reason, payment of the same shall be secured by a lien on, and shall be paid out of, any and all distributions, dividends, money, securities and other properties that the Holders may be entitled to receive in such proceeding whether in liquidation or under any plan of reorganization or arrangement or otherwise. The Trustee may, on behalf of the Holders, vote for the election of a trustee in bankruptcy or similar official and be a member of a creditors committee or other similar committee. Nothing herein contained shall be deemed to authorize the Trustee to authorize or consent to or accept or adopt on behalf of any Holder any plan of reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition affecting the Securities or the rights of any Holder, or to authorize the Trustee to vote in respect of the claim of any Holder in any such proceeding.
SECTION 6.10.  
    
Priorities
. After an Event of Default, any money or property distributable in respect of the Companys or any Subsidiary Guarantors obligations under this Indenture, or any money or property collected by the Trustee pursuant to this
Article VI
, shall be paid out or distributed in the following order:
(1)    to the Trustee and any predecessor Trustee and its agents and attorneys for amounts due under
Section 7.6
, including payment of all reasonable compensation, expenses and liabilities incurred, and all advances made, by the Trustee and the costs and expenses of collection;
63
(2)    to Holders for amounts due and unpaid on the Securities for principal, premium, if any, and interest ratably, without preference or priority of any kind, according to the amounts due and payable on the Securities for principal, premium, if any, and interest, respectively; and
(3)    to the Company or to such party as a court of competent jurisdiction shall direct, including a Subsidiary Guarantor, if applicable.
The Trustee may fix a record date and payment date for any payment to Holders pursuant to this
Section 6.10
. Promptly after any record date is set pursuant to this
Section 6.10
, the Trustee shall cause notice of such record date and payment date to be given to the Company and to each Holder in the manner set forth in
Section 11.1
.
SECTION 6.11.  
    
Undertaking for Costs
. In any suit for the enforcement of any right or remedy under this Indenture or in any suit against the Trustee for any action taken or omitted by it as Trustee, a court in its discretion may require the filing by any party litigant in the suit of an undertaking to pay the costs of the suit, and the court in its discretion may assess reasonable costs, including reasonable attorneys fees and expenses, against any party litigant in the suit, having due regard to the merits and good faith of the claims or defenses made by the party litigant. This
Section 6.11
does not apply to a suit by the Trustee, a suit by the Company, a suit by a Holder pursuant to
Section 6.7
or a suit by Holders of more than 10% in outstanding principal amount of the Securities.
ARTICLE VII
Trustee
SECTION 7.1.  
    
Duties of Trustee.
If an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Trustee shall exercise the rights and powers vested in it by this Indenture and use the same degree of care and skill in their exercise as a prudent Person would exercise or use under the circumstances in the conduct of such Persons own affairs;
provided
that if an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee shall be under no obligation to exercise any of the rights or powers under this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees at the request or direction of any of the Holders unless such Holders have offered the Trustee indemnity or security reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee against loss, liability or expense it might incur in connection with such request or direction.
(b)  
    
Except during the continuance of an Event of Default:
(i)  
    
the Trustee undertakes to perform such duties and only such duties as are specifically set forth in this Indenture and no implied covenants or obligations shall be read into this Indenture against the Trustee; and
(ii)  
    
in the absence of bad faith on its part, the Trustee may conclusively rely, as to the truth of the statements and the correctness of the opinions expressed therein, upon certificates or opinions furnished to the Trustee and conforming to the requirements
64
of this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees, as applicable. However, in the case of any such certificates or opinions which by any provisions hereof are specifically required to be furnished to the Trustee, the Trustee shall examine such certificates and opinions to determine whether or not they conform to the requirements of this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees, as the case may be (but need not confirm or investigate the accuracy of mathematical calculations or other facts stated therein).
(c)  
    
The Trustee may not be relieved from liability for its own negligent action, its own negligent failure to act or its own willful misconduct, except that:
(i)  
    
this paragraph does not limit the effect of paragraph (b) of this
Section 7.1
;
(ii)  
    
the Trustee shall not be liable for any error of judgment made in good faith by a Trust Officer or Trust Officers unless it is proved that the Trustee was negligent in ascertaining the pertinent facts; and
(iii)  
    
the Trustee shall not be liable with respect to any action it takes or omits to take in good faith in accordance with a direction received by it pursuant to
Section 6.5
.
(d)  
    
The Trustee shall not be liable for interest on any money received by it except as the Trustee may agree in writing with the Company.
(e)  
    
Money held in trust by the Trustee need not be segregated from other funds except to the extent required by law.
(f)  
    
No provision of this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees shall require the Trustee to expend or risk its own funds or otherwise incur any financial liability in the performance of any of its duties hereunder or thereunder or in the exercise of any of its rights or powers, if it shall have reasonable grounds to believe that repayment of such funds or adequate indemnity against such risk or liability is not reasonably assured to it.
(g)  
    
Every provision of this Indenture relating to the conduct or affecting the liability of or affording protection to the Trustee shall be subject to the provisions of this
Section 7.1
. The permissive right of the Trustee to do things enumerated in this Indenture shall not be construed as a duty of the Trustee. The Trustee shall not be required to give any bond or surety in respect of the performance of its powers or duties hereunder.
(h)  
    
The Trustee shall be under no obligation to exercise any of the rights or powers vested in it by this Indenture at the request or direction of any of the Holders unless such Holders shall have offered to the Trustee security or indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it against the costs, expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses) and liabilities that might be incurred by it in compliance with such request or direction.
SECTION 7.2.  
    
Rights of Trustee
. (a) The Trustee may conclusively rely and shall be protected in acting upon any resolution, certificate, statement, instrument, opinion,
65
notice, request, direction, consent, order, bond or any other paper or document (whether in its original or facsimile form) believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or presented by the proper Person or Persons. The Trustee need not investigate any fact or matter stated in the document.
(b)  
    
Before the Trustee acts or refrains from acting, it may require and shall be entitled to receive an Officers Certificate or an Opinion of Counsel or both. The Trustee shall not be liable for any action it takes or omits to take in good faith in reliance on an Officers Certificate or Opinion of Counsel.
(c)  
    
The Trustee may act through its attorneys and agents and shall not be responsible for the misconduct or negligence of any agent appointed with due care.
(d)  
    
The Trustee shall not be liable for any action it takes or omits to take in good faith which it believes to be authorized or within its rights or powers;
provided, however
, that the Trustees conduct does not constitute willful misconduct or negligence.
(e)  
    
The Trustee may consult with counsel of its selection, and the advice or opinion of counsel with respect to legal matters relating to this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees shall be full and complete authorization and protection from liability in respect to any action taken, omitted or suffered by it hereunder or under the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees in good faith and in accordance with the advice or opinion of such counsel.
(f)  
    
The Trustee shall not be bound to make any investigation into the facts or matters stated in any resolution, certificate, statement, instrument, opinion, notice, request, direction, consent, order, bond or other paper or document, or inquire as to the performance by the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors of any of their covenants in this Indenture; but the Trustee, in its discretion, may make such further inquiry or investigation into such facts or matters as it may see fit, and, if the Trustee shall determine to make such further inquiry or investigation, it shall be entitled to examine the books, records and premises of the Company, personally or by agent or attorney at the sole cost of the Company and shall incur no liability or additional liability of any kind by reason of such inquiry or investigation.
(g)  
    
The Trustee shall not be deemed to have knowledge of any Default or Event of Default except during (i) any period it is serving as Registrar and Paying Agent for the Securities, any Event of Default occurring pursuant to
Section 6.1(a)(i)
and
6.1(a)(ii)
, or (ii) any Default or Event of Default of which a Trust Officer shall have (A) received written notification from the Company or from the Holders of at least 25% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities at the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee and such notice references the Securities and this Indenture or (B) obtained actual knowledge. Actual knowledge shall mean the actual fact or statement of knowing by a Trust Officer without independent investigation with respect thereto.
(h)  
    
    In no event shall the Trustee be responsible or liable for special, indirect, punitive or consequential loss or damage of any kind whatsoever (including, but not
66
limited to, loss of profit) irrespective of whether the Trustee has been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage and regardless of the form of action.
(i)  
    
The rights, privileges, protections, immunities and benefits given to the Trustee, including, without limitation, its right to be compensated, reimbursed and indemnified, are extended to, and shall be enforceable by, the Trustee in each of its capacities hereunder, whether as Agent or otherwise, and each agent, custodian and other Person employed to act hereunder.
(j)  
    
The Trustee may request that the Company deliver a certificate setting forth the names of individuals and/or titles of Officers authorized at such time to take specified actions pursuant to this Indenture.
(k)  
    
Any request, demand, notice, or direction of the Company shall be sufficiently evidenced by an Officers' Certificate or by a Company Order, or signed by a Company Officer, and any resolution of the Board of Directors may be sufficiently evidenced by a Board Resolution.
SECTION 7.3.  
    
Individual Rights of Trustee
. The Trustee in its individual or any other capacity may become the owner or pledgee of Securities and may otherwise deal with the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors or their Affiliates with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee. Any Paying Agent, Registrar, co-registrar or co-paying agent may do the same with like rights. In addition, the Trustee shall be permitted to engage in transactions with the Company;
provided, however
, that if the Trustee acquires any conflicting interest (as defined in the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended) the Trustee must (i) eliminate such conflict within 90 days of acquiring such conflicting interest, (ii) apply to the SEC for permission to continue acting as Trustee or (iii) resign. The Trustee shall not be responsible for any statement or recital herein or any statement in the Securities or in the Companys Offering Memorandum dated May 8, 2013 or any other document in connection with the sale of the Securities or pursuant to this Indenture other than its certificate of authentication, and shall not be responsible for any rating on the Securities or any action or omission of any Rating Agency.
SECTION 7.4.  
    
Trustees Disclaimer
. The Trustee shall not be responsible for and makes no representation as to the validity or adequacy of this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees, it shall not be accountable for the Companys use of the Securities or the proceeds from the Securities, and it shall not be responsible for any statement of the Company in this Indenture or in any document issued in connection with the sale of the Securities or in the Securities other than the Trustees certificate of authentication or for the use or application of any funds received by any Paying Agent other than the Trustee.
SECTION 7.5.  
    
Notice of Defaults
. If a Default or Event of Default occurs and is continuing and if a Trust Officer has actual knowledge thereof, the Trustee shall mail to each Holder notice of the Default or Event of Default within 90 days after it occurs. Except in the case of a Default or Event of Default in payment of principal of, premium (if any), or interest on any Security (including payments pursuant to the required repurchase provisions of such Security, if any), the Trustee may withhold the notice of the Default or Event of Default if and so
67
long as its board of directors, a committee of its board of directors or a committee of its Trust Officers in good faith determines that withholding the notice is in the interests of Holders.
SECTION 7.6.  
    
Compensation and Indemnity
. The Company shall pay to the Trustee from time to time such compensation for its services as the parties shall agree in writing from time to time. The Trustees compensation shall not be limited by any law on compensation of a trustee of an express trust. The Company shall reimburse the Trustee upon request for all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred or made by it, including, but not limited to, costs of collection, costs of preparing and reviewing reports, certificates and other documents, costs of preparation and mailing of notices to Holders and reasonable costs of counsel retained by the Trustee in connection with the delivery of an Opinion of Counsel or otherwise, in addition to the compensation for its services. Such expenses shall include the reasonable compensation and expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustees agents, counsel, accountants and experts. The Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors, jointly and severally, shall indemnify the Trustee or any predecessor Trustee in each of its capacities hereunder (including Paying Agent and Registrar), and each of their officers, directors, employees, counsel and agents, against any and all loss, damages, claims, liability or expense (including, but not limited to, reasonable attorneys fees and expenses) incurred by it in connection with the acceptance or the administration of this trust and the performance of its duties or exercise of its rights and powers hereunder and under the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees, including the costs and expenses of enforcing this Indenture (including this
Section 7.6
), the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees and of defending itself against any claims (whether asserted by any Holder, the Company or otherwise). The Trustee shall notify the Company promptly of any claim for which it may seek indemnity. Failure by the Trustee to so notify the Company shall not relieve the Company of its obligations hereunder. The Company shall defend the claim and the Trustee may have separate counsel and the Company shall pay the fees and expenses of such counsel. The Company need not reimburse any expense or indemnify against any loss, liability or expense incurred by the Trustee through its own willful misconduct, negligence or bad faith, subject to the exceptions contained in
Section 7.1(c)
hereof.
To secure the Companys and the Subsidiary Guarantors payment obligations in this
Section 7.6
, the Trustee shall have a lien prior to the Securities on all money or property held or collected by the Trustee other than money or property held in trust to pay principal of and interest on particular Securities. The right of the Trustee to receive payment of any amounts due under this
Section 7.6
shall not be subordinate to any other liability or indebtedness of the Company.
The Companys payment obligations pursuant to this
Section 7.6
and any lien arising hereunder shall survive the discharge of this Indenture and the resignation or removal of the Trustee. When the Trustee incurs expenses after the occurrence of a Default specified in
Section 6.1(a)(vii)
or
(viii)
with respect to the Company, the expenses are intended to constitute expenses of administration under any Bankruptcy Law.
Trustee for the purposes of this Section 7.6 shall include any predecessor Trustee and the Trustee in each of its capacities hereunder and each agent, custodian and other
68
person employed to act hereunder; provided, however, that the negligence, bad faith, or willful misconduct of any Trustee hereunder shall not affect the rights of any other Trustee hereunder.
SECTION 7.7.  
    
Replacement of Trustee
. The Trustee may resign at any time by so notifying the Company. The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities may remove the Trustee by so notifying the Company and the Trustee in writing and may appoint a successor Trustee. The Company shall remove the Trustee if:
(i)  
    
the Trustee fails to comply with
Section 7.9
;
(ii)  
    
the Trustee is adjudged bankrupt or insolvent;
(iii)  
    
a receiver or other public officer takes charge of the Trustee or its property; or
(iv)  
    
the Trustee otherwise becomes incapable of acting.
If the Trustee resigns or is removed by the Company or by the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities and such Holders do not reasonably promptly appoint a successor Trustee, or if a vacancy exists in the office of Trustee for any reason (the Trustee in such event being referred to herein as the retiring Trustee), the Company shall promptly appoint a successor Trustee.
A successor Trustee shall deliver a written acceptance of its appointment to the retiring Trustee and to the Company. Thereupon the resignation or removal of the retiring Trustee shall become effective, and the successor Trustee shall have all the rights, powers and duties of the Trustee under this Indenture. The successor Trustee shall mail a notice of its succession to Holders. The retiring Trustee shall promptly transfer all property held by it as Trustee to the successor Trustee, subject to the lien provided for in
Section 7.6
.
If a successor Trustee does not take office within 60 days after the retiring Trustee resigns or is removed, the retiring Trustee or the Holders of at least 10% in principal amount of the Securities may petition, at the Companys expense, any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor Trustee.
If the Trustee fails to comply with
Section 7.9
, unless the Trustees duty to resign is stayed, any Holder may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the removal of the Trustee and the appointment of a successor Trustee.
Notwithstanding the replacement of the Trustee pursuant to this
Section 7.7
, the Companys and Subsidiary Guarantors obligations under
Section 7.6
shall continue for the benefit of the retiring Trustee.
SECTION 7.8.  
    
Successor Trustee by Merger
. If the Trustee consolidates with, merges or converts into, or transfers all or substantially all its corporate trust business or assets to, another corporation or banking association, the resulting, surviving or transferee corporation without any further act shall be the successor Trustee.
69
In case at the time such successor or successors by merger, conversion or consolidation to the Trustee shall succeed to the trusts created by this Indenture, any of the Securities shall have been authenticated but not delivered, any such successor to the Trustee may adopt the certificate of authentication of any predecessor trustee, and deliver such Securities so authenticated; and in case at that time any of the Securities shall not have been authenticated, any successor to the Trustee may authenticate such Securities either in the name of any predecessor hereunder or in the name of the successor to the Trustee; and in all such cases such certificates shall have the full force which it is anywhere in the Securities or in this Indenture provided that the certificate of the Trustee shall have.
SECTION 7.9.  
    
Eligibility; Disqualification
. The Trustee shall have a combined capital and surplus of at least $50 million as set forth in its most recent filed annual report of condition.
SECTION 7.10.  
    
Limitation on Duty of Trustee
.
The Trustee shall not have any duty to ascertain or inquire as to the performance or observance of any of the terms of this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees by the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors or any other Person.
ARTICLE VIII
Discharge of Indenture; Defeasance
SECTION 8.1.  
    
Discharge of Liability on Securities; Defeasance
. (a) When (i) (x) the Company delivers to the Trustee all outstanding Securities (other than Securities replaced pursuant to
Section 2.9
) for cancellation or (y) all outstanding Securities not theretofore delivered for cancellation have become due and payable whether at maturity or upon redemption pursuant to
Article V
hereof, or will become due and payable within one year or are to be called for redemption within one year under arrangements satisfactory to the Trustee for the giving of a notice of redemption pursuant to
Article V
and the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor irrevocably deposits or causes to be deposited with the Trustee, as trust funds in trust solely for the benefit of the Holders, money in U.S. dollars, U.S. Government Obligations, or a combination thereof, in such amounts as shall be sufficient without consideration of any reinvestment of interest to pay and discharge the entire Indebtedness on such Securities not theretofore delivered to the Trustee for cancellation for principal, premium, if any, and accrued interest to the date of maturity or redemption; (ii) no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing on the date of such deposit or shall occur as a result of such deposit (other than a Default or Event of Default resulting from borrowing of funds to be applied to such deposit and the grant of any Lien securing such borrowing) and such deposit will not result in a breach or violation of, or constitute a default under, any other material instrument (other than this Indenture) to which the Company is a party or by which the Company is bound; (iii) the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor has paid or caused to be paid all sums payable to the Trustee under this Indenture; and (iv) the Company has delivered irrevocable written instructions to the Trustee under this Indenture to apply the deposited money toward the payment of such Securities at maturity or the Redemption Date, as the case may be, then this Indenture shall,
70
subject to
Section 8.1(c)
, cease to be of further effect. The Trustee shall acknowledge satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture on demand of the Company (accompanied by an Officers Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel stating that all conditions precedent specified herein relating to the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture have been complied with) and at the cost and expense of the Company.
(b)  
    
Subject to
Sections 8.1(c)
and
8.2
, the Company at its option and at any time may terminate (i) all the obligations of the Company and any Subsidiary Guarantor under the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees and this Indenture (
legal defeasance option
) or (ii) the obligations of the Company and any Subsidiary Guarantor under
Sections 3.2
,
3.3
,
3.4
,
3.5
, and
3.6
and the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors may omit to comply with and shall have no liability in respect of any term, condition or limitation set forth in any such covenant or provision, whether directly or indirectly, by reason of any reference elsewhere herein to any such covenant or provision or by reason of any reference in any such covenant to any other provision herein or in any other document and such omission to comply with such covenants or provisions shall no longer constitute a Default or an Event of Default under
Section 6.1(a)(iv)
(only with respect to such covenants),
6.1(a)(v)
(only with respect to such covenants),
6.1(a)(vi)
,
6.1(a)(vii)
(only with respect to Significant Subsidiaries or a group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited financial statements of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary),
Section 6.1(a)(viii)
(only with respect to Significant Subsidiaries or a group of Restricted Subsidiaries that, taken together (as of the latest audited financial statements of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary),
6.1(a)(ix)
and
6.1(x)
(clause (ii) being referred to as the 
covenant defeasance option
), but except as specified above, the remainder of this Indenture and the Securities shall be unaffected thereby. The Company may exercise its legal defeasance option notwithstanding its prior exercise of its covenant defeasance option. If the Company exercises its legal defeasance option or covenant defeasance option, the Subsidiary Guarantees in effect at such time shall terminate.
If the Company exercises its legal defeasance option, payment of the Securities may not be accelerated because of an Event of Default. If the Company exercises its covenant defeasance option, payment of the Securities may not be accelerated because of an Event of Default specified in
Section 6.1(a)(iv)
,
6.1(a)(v)
(only with respect to such covenants),
6.1(a)(vi), 6.1(a)(vii)
(but only with respect to a Significant Subsidiary),
6.1(a)(viii)
(but only with respect to a Significant Subsidiary),
6.1(a)(ix)
or
6.1(a)(x)
.
Upon satisfaction of the conditions set forth herein and upon request of the Company, the Trustee shall acknowledge in writing the discharge of those obligations that the Company terminates.
(c)  
    
Notwithstanding the provisions of
Sections 8.1(a)
and
(b)
, the Companys obligations in
Sections 2.2
,
2.3
,
2.4
,
2.5
,
2.6
,
2.9
,
2.10
,
2.11
,
2.12
,
3.1
,
6.7
,
6.8
,
7.1
,
7.2
,
7.6
,
7.7
,
8.1(b)
(with respect to legal defeasance),
8.3
,
8.4
,
8.5
and
8.6
shall survive until the Securities have been paid in full. Thereafter, the Companys obligations in
Sections 6.7
,
7.6
,
8.4
and
8.5
shall survive.
71
SECTION 8.2.  
    
Conditions to Defeasance
. The Company may exercise its legal defeasance option or its covenant defeasance option only if:
(i)  
    
the Company must irrevocably deposit with the Trustee, in trust, for the benefit of the Holders, cash in U.S. dollars, U.S. Government Obligations, or a combination of cash in U.S. dollars and U.S. Government Obligations, in such amounts as shall be sufficient, in the opinion of a nationally recognized firm of independent public accountants, to pay the principal of, or interest and premium, if any, on the outstanding Securities issued hereunder on the Stated Maturity or on the applicable Redemption Date, as the case may be, and the Company must specify whether the notes are being defeased to maturity or to a particular Redemption Date;
(ii)  
    
in the case of legal defeasance, the Company has delivered to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel reasonably acceptable to the Trustee confirming that, subject to customary assumptions and exclusions, (a) the Company has received from, or there has been published by, the Internal Revenue Service a ruling or (b) since the date of this Indenture, there has been a change in the applicable U.S. federal income tax law, in either case to the effect that, and based thereon such Opinion of Counsel shall confirm that, the Holders and beneficial owners of the Securities shall not recognize income, gain or loss for U.S. federal income tax purposes as a result of such legal defeasance and shall be subject to U.S. federal income tax on the same amounts, in the same manner and at the same times as would have been the case if such legal defeasance had not occurred;
(iii)  
    
in the case of covenant defeasance, the Company has delivered to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel reasonably acceptable to the Trustee confirming that, subject to customary assumptions and exclusions, the Holders and beneficial owners of the Securities shall not recognize income, gain or loss for U.S. federal income tax purposes as a result of such covenant defeasance and shall be subject to U.S. federal income tax on the same amounts, in the same manner and at the same times as would have been the case if such covenant defeasance had not occurred;
(iv)  
    
such legal defeasance or covenant defeasance shall not result in a breach or violation of, or constitute a default under any material agreement or instrument (other than this Indenture) to which the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of its Restricted Subsidiaries is bound;
(v)  
    
no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing on the date of such deposit (other than a Default or Event of Default resulting from the borrowing of funds to be applied to such deposit and the grant of any Lien securing such borrowings);
(vi)  
    
the Company must deliver to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel to the effect that, assuming, among other things, no intervening bankruptcy of the Company between the date of deposit and the 91st day following the deposit and assuming that no Holder is an insider of the Company under applicable bankruptcy law, after the 91st day following the deposit, the trust funds shall not be subject to the effect of Section 547 of Title 11 of the United States Code;
72
(vii)  
    
the Company must deliver to the Trustee an Officers Certificate stating that the deposit was not made by the Company with the intent of defeating, hindering, delaying or defrauding creditors of the Company or others; and
(viii)  
    
the Company delivers to the Trustee an Officers Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel (which Opinion of Counsel may be subject to customary assumptions and exclusions), each stating that all conditions precedent to the defeasance and discharge of the Securities and this Indenture as contemplated by this
Article VIII
have been complied with.
SECTION 8.3.  
    
Application of Trust Money
. The Trustee shall hold in trust money or U.S. Government Obligations deposited with it pursuant to this
Article VIII
. It shall apply the deposited money and the money from U.S. Government Obligations through the Paying Agent and in accordance with this Indenture to the payment of principal of and interest on the Securities.
SECTION 8.4.  
    
Repayment to Company
. Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the Trustee shall deliver or pay to the Company from time to time upon Company Order any money or U.S. Government Obligations held by it as provided in this
Article VIII
which, in the opinion of a nationally recognized firm of independent public accountants expressed in a written certification thereof delivered to the Trustee, are in excess of the amount thereof which would then be required to be deposited to effect legal defeasance or covenant defeasance, as applicable,
provided
that the Trustee shall not be required to liquidate any U.S. Government Obligations in order to comply with the provisions of this paragraph.
Subject to any applicable abandoned property law, the Trustee and the Paying Agent shall pay to the Company upon written request any money held by them for the payment of principal of or interest on the Securities that remains unclaimed for two years, and, thereafter, Holders entitled to the money must look to the Company for payment as general creditors.
SECTION 8.5.  
    
Indemnity for U.S. Government Obligations
. The Company shall pay and shall indemnify the Trustee against any tax, fee or other charge imposed on or assessed against deposited U.S. Government Obligations or the principal and interest received on such U.S. Government Obligations.
SECTION 8.6.  
    
Reinstatement
. If the Trustee or Paying Agent is unable to apply any money or U.S. Government Obligations in accordance with this
Article VIII
by reason of any legal proceeding or by reason of any order or judgment of any court or governmental authority enjoining, restraining or otherwise prohibiting such application, the obligations of the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor under this Indenture, the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees shall be revived and reinstated as though no deposit had occurred pursuant to this
Article VIII
until such time as the Trustee or Paying Agent is permitted to apply all such money or U.S. Government Obligations in accordance with this
Article VIII
;
provided, however
, that, if the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors have made any payment of interest on or principal of any Securities because of the reinstatement of its obligations, the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors, as the case may be, shall be subrogated to the rights of the Holders of such Securities
73
to receive such payment from the money or U.S. Government Obligations held by the Trustee or Paying Agent.
ARTICLE IX
Amendments
SECTION 9.1.  
    
Without Consent of Holders
. The Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may supplement or amend this Indenture, the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees without notice to or consent of any Holder to:
(i)  
    
cure any ambiguity, omission, defect or inconsistency;
(ii)  
    
comply with (i)
Article IV
in respect of the assumption by a Successor Company of an obligation of the Company under this Indenture and the Securities and (ii)
Article IV
and
Article X
in respect of the assumption by a Person of the obligations of a Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee and this Indenture;
(iii)  
    
provide for uncertificated Securities in addition to or in place of certificated Securities (
provided,
that the uncertificated Securities are issued in registered form for purposes of Section 163(f) of the Code);
(iv)  
    
add Guarantees with respect to the Securities or to release a Subsidiary Guarantor from its obligations under its Subsidiary Guarantee or this Indenture in accordance with the applicable provisions of this Indenture;
(v)  
    
secure the Securities or any Subsidiary Guarantees;
(vi)  
    
add to the covenants of the Company for the benefit of the Holders or to surrender any right or power herein conferred upon the Company;
(vii)  
    
make any change that does not adversely affect the rights of the Holders in any material respect;
(viii)  
    
comply with any requirement of the SEC in connection with the qualification of this Indenture under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended;
(ix)  
    
provide for the appointment of a successor trustee;
provided
that the successor trustee is otherwise qualified and eligible to act as such under the terms of this Indenture; or
(x)  
    
conform the text of this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees to any provision of the Description of notes Section of the Companys Offering Memorandum dated May 8, 2013, relating to the initial offering of the Securities, to the extent that such provision in the Description of notes is intended to be a verbatim recitation of a provision of this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees.
74
After a supplement or amendment under this
Section 9.1
becomes effective, the Company shall mail to Holders a notice briefly describing such supplement or amendment. The failure to give such notice to all Holders, or any defect therein, shall not impair or affect the validity of a supplement or amendment under this
Section 9.1
.
SECTION 9.2.  
    
With Consent of Holders
. The Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may amend or supplement this Indenture, the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees with the written consent of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Securities then outstanding (including without limitation, consents obtained in connection with a purchase of, or tender offer or exchange offer for, Securities). Any past default, Default or noncompliance with the provisions of this Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees (other than a Default or Event of Default in the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, or interest on a Security (except in accordance with
Section 6.4
)) may be waived with the written consent of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Securities then outstanding (including, without limitation, consents obtained in connection with a purchase of, or tender offer or exchange offer for, Securities).
However, without the consent of each Holder of an outstanding Security affected, an amendment, supplement or waiver may not:
(i)  
    
reduce the principal amount of Securities whose Holders must consent to an amendment;
(ii)  
    
reduce the rate of or extend the time for payment of interest on any Security;
(iii)  
    
reduce the principal of or extend the Stated Maturity of any Security;
(iv)  
    
waive a Default or Event of Default in the payment of principal of, or in the payment of, or interest or premium, if any, on the Securities issued hereunder (except a rescission of acceleration of the Securities issued hereunder by the Holders of at least a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities issued hereunder with respect to a nonpayment default and a waiver of the payment default that resulted from such acceleration):
(v)  
    
reduce the premium payable upon the redemption or repurchase of any Security or change the time at which any Security may or shall be redeemed or repurchased in accordance with
Section 3.5
or
Article V
, whether through an amendment or waiver of provisions in the covenants or otherwise;
provided
that any amendments to the definition of Change of Control shall not require the consent of each Holder affected;
(vi)  
    
make any Security payable in money other than that stated in the Security;
(vii)  
    
impair the right of any Holder to receive payment of principal, premium, if any, and interest on such Holders Securities on or after the due dates therefor or to institute suit for the enforcement of any payment on or with respect to such Holders Securities;
75
(viii)  
    
make any change in the amendment provisions that require each Holders consent or in the waiver provisions;
(ix)  
    
modify the Subsidiary Guarantees of any Significant Subsidiary or group of Subsidiary Guarantors that, taken together (as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries) would constitute a Significant Subsidiary in any manner, taken as a whole, materially adverse to the Holders; or
(x)  
    
release any Subsidiary Guarantor that is a Significant Subsidiary or group of Subsidiary Guarantors that, taken together (as of the latest audited consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries), would constitute a Significant Subsidiary from any of its obligations under its Subsidiary Guarantee or this Indenture, except in compliance with the terms of this Indenture.
It shall not be necessary for the consent of the Holders under this
Section 9.2
to approve the particular form of any proposed amendment or supplement, but it shall be sufficient if such consent approves the substance thereof. A consent to any amendment, supplement or waiver under this Indenture by any Holder given in connection with a tender of such Holders Security shall not be rendered invalid by such tender.
After an amendment or supplement under this
Section 9.2
becomes effective, the Company shall mail to Holders a notice briefly describing such amendment or supplement. The failure to give such notice to all Holders, or any defect therein, shall not impair or affect the validity of an amendment or supplement under this
Section 9.2
.
SECTION 9.3.  
    
Revocation and Effect of Consents and Waivers
. A consent to an amendment, supplement or a waiver by a Holder of a Security shall bind the Holder and every subsequent Holder of that Security or portion of the Security that evidences the same debt as the consenting Holders Security, even if notation of the consent or waiver is not made on the Security. However, any such Holder or subsequent Holder may revoke the consent or waiver as to such Holders Security or portion of the Security if the Trustee receives the notice of revocation before the date the amendment, supplement or waiver becomes effective. After an amendment, supplement or waiver becomes effective, it shall bind every Holder unless it makes a change described in clauses (i) through (x) of
Section 9.2
, in which case the amendment, supplement or waiver or other action shall bind each Holder who has consented to it and every subsequent Holder that evidences the same debt as the consenting Holders Securities. An amendment, supplement or waiver made pursuant to
Section 9.2
shall become effective upon receipt by the Trustee of the requisite number of written consents.
The Company may, but shall not be obligated to, fix a record date for the purpose of determining the Holders entitled to give their consent or take any other action described above or required or permitted to be taken pursuant to this Indenture. If a record date is fixed, then notwithstanding the immediately preceding paragraph, those Persons who were Holders at such record date (or their duly designated proxies), and only those Persons, shall be entitled to give such consent or to revoke any consent previously given or to take any such action, whether or not
76
such Persons continue to be Holders after such record date. No such consent shall become valid or effective more than 120 days after such record date.
SECTION 9.4.  
    
Notation on or Exchange of Securities.
If an amendment or supplement changes the terms of a Security, the Trustee may require the Holder of the Security to deliver it to the Trustee. The Trustee may place an appropriate notation on the Security regarding the changed terms and return it to the Holder. Alternatively, if the Company or the Trustee so determines, the Company in exchange for the Security shall issue and the Trustee shall authenticate a new Security that reflects the changed terms. Failure to make the appropriate notation or to issue a new Security shall not affect the validity of such amendment or supplement.
SECTION 9.5.  
    
Trustee To Sign Amendments.
The Trustee shall sign any amendment, supplement or waiver authorized pursuant to this
Article IX
if the amendment, supplement or waiver does not, in the sole determination of the Trustee, adversely affect the rights, duties, liabilities or immunities of the Trustee. If it does, the Trustee may but need not sign it. In signing any amendment, supplement or waiver pursuant to this
Article IX
, the Trustee shall be entitled to receive, and (subject to
Section 7.1
and
7.2
) shall be fully protected in relying upon, an Officers Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel stating that the execution of such amendment, supplement or waiver is authorized or permitted by this Indenture and that such amendment, supplement or waiver is the legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company and any Subsidiary Guarantors, enforceable against them in accordance with its terms, subject to customary exceptions, and complies with the provisions hereof (including
Section 9.3
).
ARTICLE X
Subsidiary Guarantee
SECTION 10.1.  
    
Subsidiary Guarantee
. Subject to the provisions of this
Article X
, each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby fully, unconditionally and irrevocably guarantees, as primary obligor and not merely as surety, jointly and severally with each other Subsidiary Guarantor, to each Holder of the Securities, to the extent lawful, and the Trustee the full and punctual payment when due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, by redemption or otherwise, of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Securities and all other obligations and liabilities of the Company under this Indenture (including, without limitation, interest accruing after the filing of any petition in bankruptcy, or the commencement of any insolvency, reorganization or like proceeding, relating to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor whether or not a claim for post-filing or post-petition interest is allowed in such proceeding and the obligations under
Section 7.6
) (all the foregoing being hereinafter collectively called the 
Guarantor Obligations
). Each Subsidiary Guarantor agrees (to the extent lawful) that the Guarantor Obligations may be extended or renewed, in whole or in part, without notice or further assent from it, and that it shall remain bound under this
Article X
notwithstanding any extension or renewal of any Guarantor Obligation.
Each Subsidiary Guarantor waives (to the extent lawful) presentation to, demand of, payment from and protest to the Company of any of the Guarantor Obligations and also
77
waives (to the extent lawful) notice of protest for nonpayment. Each Subsidiary Guarantor waives (to the extent lawful) notice of any default under the Securities or the Guarantor Obligations.
Each Subsidiary Guarantor further agrees that its Subsidiary Guarantee herein constitutes a Guarantee of payment when due (and not a Guarantee of collection) and waives any right to require that any resort be had by any Holder to any security held for payment of the Guarantor Obligations.
Except as set forth in
Section 4.3
,
Section 10.2
or
Article VIII
, the obligations of each Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination for any reason (other than payment of the Guarantor Obligations in full), including any claim of waiver, release, surrender, alteration or compromise, and shall not (to the extent lawful) be subject to any defense of setoff, counterclaim, recoupment or termination whatsoever or by reason of the invalidity, illegality or unenforceability of the Guarantor Obligations or otherwise. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the obligations of each Subsidiary Guarantor herein shall not (to the extent lawful) be discharged or impaired or otherwise affected by (a) the failure of any Holder to assert any claim or demand or to enforce any right or remedy against the Company or any other person under this Indenture, the Securities or any other agreement or otherwise; (b) any extension or renewal of any thereof; (c) any rescission, waiver, amendment or modification of any of the terms or provisions of this Indenture, the Securities or any other agreement; (d) the release of any security held by any Holder for the Guarantor Obligations or any of them; (e) the failure of any Holder to exercise any right or remedy against any other Subsidiary Guarantor; (f) any change in the ownership of the Company; (g) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the performance of the Guarantor Obligations, or (h) any other act or thing or omission or delay to do any other act or thing which may or might in any manner or to any extent vary the risk of any Subsidiary Guarantor or would otherwise operate as a discharge of such Subsidiary Guarantor as a matter of law or equity.
Each Subsidiary Guarantor agrees that its Subsidiary Guarantee herein shall remain in full force and effect until payment in full of all the Guarantor Obligations or such Subsidiary Guarantor is released from its Subsidiary Guarantee in compliance with
Section 4.3
,
Section 10.2
or
Article VIII
. Each Subsidiary Guarantor further agrees that its Subsidiary Guarantee herein shall continue to be effective or be reinstated, as the case may be, if at any time payment, or any part thereof, of principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any of the Guarantor Obligations is rescinded or must otherwise be restored by any Holder upon the bankruptcy or reorganization of the Company or otherwise.
In furtherance of the foregoing and not in limitation of any other right which any Holder has at law or in equity against any Subsidiary Guarantor by virtue hereof, upon the failure of the Company to pay any of the Guarantor Obligations when and as the same shall become due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, by redemption or otherwise, each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby promises to and shall forthwith pay, or cause to be paid, in cash, to the Trustee or the Trustee on behalf of the Holders an amount equal to the sum of (i) the unpaid amount of such
78
Guarantor Obligations then due and owing and (ii) accrued and unpaid interest on such Guarantor Obligations then due and owing (but only to the extent not prohibited by law) (including interest accruing after the filing of any petition in bankruptcy or the commencement of any insolvency, reorganization or like proceeding relating to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor whether or not a claim for post-filing or post-petition interest is allowed in such proceeding).
Each Subsidiary Guarantor further agrees that, as between such Subsidiary Guarantor, on the one hand, and the Holders and the Trustee, on the other hand, (x) the maturity of the Guarantor Obligations guaranteed hereby may be accelerated as provided in this Indenture for the purposes of its Subsidiary Guarantee herein, notwithstanding any stay, injunction or other prohibition preventing such acceleration in respect of the Guarantor Obligations guaranteed hereby and (y) in the event of any such declaration of acceleration of such Guarantor Obligations, such Guarantor Obligations (whether or not due and payable) shall forthwith become due and payable by the Subsidiary Guarantor for the purposes of this Subsidiary Guarantee.
Each Subsidiary Guarantor also agrees to pay any and all reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys fees) incurred by the Trustee or the Holders in enforcing any rights under this
Section 10.1
.
Neither the Company nor the Subsidiary Guarantors shall be required to make a notation on the Securities to reflect any Subsidiary Guarantee or any release, termination or discharge thereof and any such notation shall not be a condition to the validity of any Subsidiary Guarantee.
SECTION 10.2.  
    
Limitation on Liability; Termination, Release and Discharge
. Any term or provision of this Indenture to the contrary notwithstanding, the obligations of each Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder shall be limited to the maximum amount as shall, after giving effect to all other contingent and fixed liabilities of such Subsidiary Guarantor (including, without limitation, any guarantees under any Debt Facility) and after giving effect to any collections from or payments made by or on behalf of any other Subsidiary Guarantor in respect of the obligations of such other Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee or pursuant to its contribution obligations under this Indenture, result in the obligations of such Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee not constituting a fraudulent conveyance or fraudulent transfer under federal or state law and not otherwise being void or voidable under any similar laws affecting the rights of creditors generally.
(a)  
    
A Subsidiary Guarantee by a Subsidiary Guarantor will be automatically and unconditionally released and discharged, and each Subsidiary Guarantor and its obligations under the Subsidiary Guarantee will be released and discharged, upon any sale, exchange, transfer or disposition of (whether by merger, consolidation or the sale of) the Capital Stock of such Subsidiary Guarantor after which the applicable Subsidiary Guarantor is no longer a Restricted Subsidiary or the sale of all or substantially all the assets (other than by lease) of such Subsidiary Guarantor, whether or not such Subsidiary Guarantor is the surviving Person in such transaction to a Person which is not the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary;
79
provided
that all the obligations of such Subsidiary Guarantor under the ABL Facility and any other Material Debt Facility terminate upon consummation of such transaction.
(b)  
    
A Subsidiary Guarantor shall be deemed released from all its obligations under this Indenture and its Subsidiary Guarantee and such Subsidiary Guarantee shall terminate, upon the legal defeasance or covenant defeasance of the Securities or upon satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture, in each case pursuant to the provisions of
Article VIII
hereof.
(c)  
    
A Subsidiary Guarantee of a Subsidiary Guarantor shall be automatically and unconditionally released and discharged, and the Subsidiary Guarantor and its obligations under this Indenture shall be released and discharged in the event that such Subsidiary Guarantor is released and discharged from its Guarantee of Indebtedness under the ABL Facility (including by reason of the termination of the ABL Facility) and all other Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries under any Material Debt Facility that resulted in the obligation of such Subsidiary Guarantor to guarantee the Securities, if such Subsidiary Guarantor would not then otherwise be required to guarantee the Securities pursuant to this Indenture, except a discharge or release by or as a result of payment under such Guarantee and this Indenture;
provided
, that any Restricted Subsidiary released from its Subsidiary Guarantee by operation of this
Section 10.2(c)
shall remain subject to the provision of the covenant described in
Section 3.6
.
(d)  
    
A Subsidiary Guarantor shall be released from its obligations under this Indenture and its Subsidiary Guarantee if the Company designates such Subsidiary Guarantor as an Unrestricted Subsidiary and such designation complies with the other applicable provisions of this Indenture.
(e)  
    
A Subsidiary Guarantor shall be automatically released from its Subsidiary Guarantee and its obligations under this Indenture on the first calendar day the Securities are rated Investment Grade by both Rating Agencies,
provided
that any Restricted Subsidiary so released by operation of this
Section 10.2(e)
shall remain subject to the provision of the covenant described in
Section 3.6
.
(f)  
    
In the case of paragraph (a) above, such Subsidiary Guarantor shall deliver to the Trustee an Officers Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that all conditions precedent provided for in this Indenture relating to such transaction have been complied with.
(g)  
    
If the Subsidiary Guarantee of any Subsidiary Guarantor is deemed to be released or is automatically released, and the Company desires the Trustee to execute an instrument evidencing such release, then the Company shall deliver to the Trustee an Officers Certificate stating the identity of the released Subsidiary Guarantor, the basis for release, and that such release complies with this Indenture. At the request of the Company, and upon delivery to the Trustee of an Officers Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel stating that a Subsidiary Guarantor has been released and that execution by the Trustee of an appropriate instrument evidencing the release of such Subsidiary Guarantor from its Subsidiary Guarantee
80
complies with this Indenture, the Trustee shall execute and deliver an appropriate instrument evidencing the release of such Subsidiary Guarantor from its Subsidiary Guarantee (it being understood that the failure to comply with this paragraph (g) shall not impair or have any effect upon any release of any Subsidiary Guarantee pursuant to the provisions of this
Section 10.2
).
SECTION 10.3.  
    
Right of Contribution
. Each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby agrees that to the extent that any Subsidiary Guarantor shall have paid more than its proportionate share of any payment made on the obligations under the Subsidiary Guarantees, such Subsidiary Guarantor shall be entitled to seek and receive contribution from and against the Company or any other Subsidiary Guarantor who has not paid its proportionate share of such payment. The provisions of this
Section 10.3
shall in no respect limit the obligations and liabilities of each Subsidiary Guarantor to the Trustee and the Holders and each Subsidiary Guarantor shall remain liable to the Trustee and the Holders for the full amount guaranteed by such Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder.
SECTION 10.4.  
    
No Subrogation
. Notwithstanding any payment or payments made by each Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder, no Subsidiary Guarantor shall be entitled to be subrogated to any of the rights of the Trustee or any Holder against the Company or any other Subsidiary Guarantor or any collateral security or guarantee or right of offset held by the Trustee or any Holder for the payment of the Guarantor Obligations, nor shall any Subsidiary Guarantor seek or be entitled to seek any contribution or reimbursement from the Company or any other Subsidiary Guarantor in respect of payments made by such Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder, until all amounts owing to the Trustee and the Holders by the Company on account of the Guarantor Obligations are paid in full. If any amount shall be paid to any Subsidiary Guarantor on account of such subrogation rights at any time when all of the Guarantor Obligations shall not have been paid in full, such amount shall be held by such Subsidiary Guarantor in trust for the Trustee and the Holders, segregated from other funds of such Subsidiary Guarantor, and shall, forthwith upon receipt by such Subsidiary Guarantor, be turned over to the Trustee in the exact form received by such Subsidiary Guarantor (duly indorsed by such Subsidiary Guarantor to the Trustee, if required), to be applied against the Guarantor Obligations.
SECTION 10.5.  
    
Benefits Acknowledged
. Each Subsidiary Guarantor acknowledges that it will receive direct and indirect benefits from the financing arrangements contemplated by this Indenture and that the guarantee and waivers made by it pursuant to its Subsidiary Guarantee are knowingly made in contemplation of such benefits.
ARTICLE XI
Miscellaneous
SECTION 11.1.  
    
Notices
. Notices given by publication shall be deemed given on the first date on which publication is made, and notices given by first-class mail, postage prepaid, shall be deemed given five calendar days after mailing. Any notice or
81
communication shall be in writing and delivered in person, by nationally recognized courier guaranteeing next day delivery, or mailed by first-class mail addressed as follows:
if to the Company or to any Subsidiary Guarantor:
Brunswick Corporation 1 N. Field Ct., Lake Forest,
Illinois 60045-4811 Attention: William Metzger, Chief Financial Officer Facsimile No.: (847) 735-4359
With a copy to:
Sidley Austin LLP One South Dearborn Street
Chicago
Illinois 60603 Attention: Kevin Blatchford Facsimile No.: (312) 853-7036
if to the Trustee:
U.S. Bank National Association
190 South LaSalle Street
10
th
Floor, MK-IL-SLTR
Chicago, IL 60603
Attention: Corporate Trust Services
Fax No.: (312) 332-8008
The Company or the Trustee by notice to the other may designate additional or different addresses for subsequent notices or communications.
Any notice or communication mailed to a Holder shall be mailed to the Holder at the Holders address as it appears on the registration books of the Registrar and shall be sufficiently given if so mailed within the time prescribed.
Failure to mail a notice or communication to a Holder or any defect in it shall not affect its sufficiency with respect to other Holders. If a notice or communication is mailed in the manner provided above, it is duly given, whether or not the addressee receives it.
Any notices required to be given to the Holders of Global Securities will be given to DTC in accordance with applicable DTC procedures.
SECTION 11.2.  
    
Certificate and Opinion as to Conditions Precedent
. Upon any request or application by the Company to the Trustee to take or refrain from taking any
82
action under this Indenture (except in connection with the original issuance of Securities on the date hereof), the Company shall furnish to the Trustee:
(i)  
    
an Officers Certificate in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee stating that, in the opinion of the signers, all conditions precedent, if any, provided for in this Indenture relating to the proposed action have been complied with; and
(ii)  
    
an Opinion of Counsel in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee stating that, in the opinion of such counsel, all such conditions precedent have been complied with.
SECTION 11.3.  
    
Statements Required in Certificate or Opinion
. Each certificate or opinion with respect to compliance with a covenant or condition provided for in this Indenture shall include:
(i)  
    
a statement that the individual making such certificate or opinion has read such covenant or condition;
(ii)  
    
a brief statement as to the nature and scope of the examination or investigation upon which the statements or opinions contained in such certificate or opinion are based;
(iii)  
    
a statement that, in the opinion of such individual, he has made such examination or investigation as is necessary to enable him to express an informed opinion as to whether or not such covenant or condition has been complied with; and
(iv)  
    
a statement as to whether or not, in the opinion of such individual, such covenant or condition has been complied with.
In giving such Opinion of Counsel, counsel may rely as to factual matters on an Officers Certificate or on certificates of public officials.
SECTION 11.4.  
    
When Securities Disregarded
. In determining whether the Holders of the required principal amount of Securities have concurred in any direction, waiver or consent, Securities owned by the Company, any Subsidiary Guarantor or by any Person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with the Company shall be disregarded and deemed not to be outstanding, except that, for the purpose of determining whether the Trustee shall be protected in relying on any such direction, waiver or consent, only Securities which a Trust Officer of the Trustee knows are so owned shall be so disregarded. Also, subject to the foregoing, only Securities outstanding at the time shall be considered in any such determination.
SECTION 11.5.  
    
Rules by Trustee, Paying Agent and Registrar
. The Trustee may make reasonable rules for action by, or a meeting of, Holders. The Registrar and the Paying Agent may make reasonable rules for their functions.
83
SECTION 11.6.  
    
Days Other than Business Days.
If a payment date is not a Business Day, payment shall be made on the next succeeding day that is not a Business Day, and no interest shall accrue for the intervening period. If a regular Record Date or Special Record Date is not a Business Day, such Record Date or Special Record Date shall not be affected.
SECTION 11.7.  
    
Governing Law; Waiver of Jury Trial
. This Indenture, the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York. The Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee, and each Holder of a Security irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any and all right to trial by jury in any legal proceeding arising out of or relating to this Indenture, the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees or any transaction contemplated thereby.
SECTION 11.8.  
    
No Recourse Against Others
. An incorporator, director, officer, employee, stockholder or controlling person, as such, of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor shall not have any liability for any obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor under the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees or this Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of or by reason of such obligations or their creation. By accepting a Security, each Holder shall waive and release all such liability. The waiver and release shall be part of the consideration for the issue of the Securities.
SECTION 11.9.  
    
Successors
. All agreements of the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor in this Indenture and the Securities shall bind their respective successors. All agreements of the Trustee in this Indenture shall bind its successors.
SECTION 11.10.  
    
Multiple Originals
. The parties may sign any number of copies of this Indenture. Each signed copy shall be an original, but all of them together represent the same agreement. One signed copy is enough to prove this Indenture. The exchange of copies of this Indenture and of signature pages by facsimile or PDF transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this Indenture as to the parties hereto and may be used in lieu of the original Indenture for all purposes. Signatures of the parties hereto transmitted by facsimile or PDF shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes.
SECTION 11.11.  
    
Variable Provisions
. The Company initially appoints the Trustee as Paying Agent and Registrar and Securities Custodian with respect to any Global Securities.
SECTION 11.12.  
    
Table of Contents; Headings
. The table of contents and headings of the Articles and Sections of this Indenture have been inserted for convenience of reference only, are not intended to be considered a part hereof and shall not modify or restrict any of the terms or provisions hereof.
SECTION 11.13.  
    
Force Majeure
. In no event shall the Trustee be responsible or liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder arising out of or caused by, directly or indirectly, forces beyond its control, including, without limitation, strikes, work stoppages, accidents, acts of war or terrorism, civil or military disturbances, nuclear or
84
natural catastrophes or acts of God, and interruptions, loss or malfunctions of utilities, communications or computer (software and hardware) services; it being understood that the Trustee shall use reasonable efforts which are consistent with accepted practices in the banking industry to resume performance as soon as practicable under the circumstances.
SECTION 11.14.  
    
U.S.A. Patriot Act
. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor acknowledge that in accordance with Section 326 of the U.S.A. PATRIOT Act, the Trustee, like all financial institutions and in order to help fight the funding of terrorism and money laundering, is required to obtain, verify, and record information that identifies each person or legal entity that establishes a relationship or opens an account with the Trustee. The parties to this Indenture agree that they will provide the Trustee with such information as it may reasonably request in order for the Trustee to satisfy the requirements of the U.S.A. PATRIOT Act.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this Indenture to be duly executed as of the date first written above.
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman
Title: Vice President and Treasurer
ATTWOOD CORPORATION
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
BOSTON WHALER, INC.
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
BRUNSWICK COMMERCIAL & GOVERNMENT PRODUCTS, INC.
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
BRUNSWICK FAMILY BOAT CO. INC.
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
BRUNSWICK LEISURE BOAT COMPANY, LLC
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
[Signature Page to Indenture]
LAND N SEA CORPORATION
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
LAND N SEA DISTRIBUTING, INC.
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
LUND BOAT COMPANY
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
SEA RAY BOATS, INC.
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
BRUNSWICK BOWLING & BILLIARDS CORPORATION
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
LEISERV, INC.
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: President
[Signature Page to Indenture
LIFE FITNESS, INC.
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Vice President and Treasurer
LIFE FITNESS INTERNATIONAL SALES, INC.
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Vice President and Treasurer
MARINE POWER INTERNATIONAL PTY. LIMITED
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
MARINE POWER INTERNATIONAL LIMITED
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Treasurer
BRUNSWICK MARINE IN EMEA, INC.
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
BRUNSWICK INTERNATIONAL LIMITED
as Subsidiary Guarantor
By:_
/s/ Randall S. Altman
_____
Name: Randall S. Altman Title: Assistant Treasurer
[Signature Page to Indenture
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
as Trustee
By:__
/s/ Grace Gorka
_________
Name: Grace Gorka
Title: Vice President
[Signature Page to Indenture]
EXHIBIT A
[FORM OF FACE OF NOTE]
[Applicable Restricted Securities Legend] [Depository Legend, if applicable] [OID Legend, if applicable] [ERISA Legend]
No. [___]    Principal Amount $[______________],
    as revised by the Schedule of Increases and Decreases in the Global Security attached hereto
CUSIP NO. ____________
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
4.625% Senior Note due 2021
Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation, promises to pay to [___________], or registered assigns, the principal sum of [__________________] Dollars, as revised by the Schedule of Increases and Decreases in the Global Security attached hereto, on May 15, 2021.
Interest Payment Dates: May 15 and November 15.
Record Dates: May 1 and November 1.
Additional provisions of this Security are set forth on the other side of this Security.
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
By:
                    
By:
                    
TRUSTEES CERTIFICATE OF
AUTHENTICATION
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
as Trustee, certifies that this is one of the Securities referred to in the Indenture.
By
                    
Authorized Signatory                        Date:
[FORM OF REVERSE SIDE OF NOTE]
4.625% Senior Note due 2021
Brunswick Corporation, a Delaware corporation (such corporation, and its successors and assigns under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, being herein called the Company), promises to pay interest on the principal amount of this Security at the rate per annum shown above.
The Company shall pay interest semiannually on May 15 and November 15 of each year, with the first interest payment to be made on November 15, 2013. Interest on the Securities shall accrue from the most recent date to which interest has been paid on the Securities or, if no interest has been paid, from May 13, 2013. The Company shall pay interest on overdue principal or premium, if any (plus interest on such interest to the extent lawful), at the rate borne by the Securities to the extent lawful. Interest shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months. The Company shall pay interest on overdue principal at the rate borne by the Securities plus 2.0% per annum.
Interest shall accrue (in addition to the interest rate borne by the Securities) from and including the date on which an Event of Default under
Section 6.1(a)(vii)
or
6.1(a)(viii)
shall occur to but excluding the date on which such Event of Default shall have been cured, at a rate per annum equal to 2.0% of the principal amount of the Securities.
By no later than 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the date on which any principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any Security is due and payable, the Company shall irrevocably deposit with the Trustee or the Paying Agent money sufficient to pay such principal, premium, if any, and/or interest. The Company shall pay interest (except Defaulted Interest) to the Persons who are registered Holders of Securities at the close of business on the May 1 and November 1 next preceding the Interest Payment Date even if Securities are cancelled, repurchased or redeemed after the record date and on or before the Interest Payment Date. Holders must surrender Securities to a Paying Agent to collect principal payments. The Company shall pay principal, premium, if any, and interest in money of the United States that at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts. Payments in respect of Securities represented by a Global Security (including principal, premium, if any, and interest) shall be made by the transfer of immediately available funds to the accounts specified by the Depositary. The Company shall make all payments in respect of a Definitive Security (including principal, premium, if any, and interest) by mailing a check to the registered address of each Holder thereof;
provided
,
however
, that payments on the Securities may also be made, in the case of a Holder of at least $5,000,000 aggregate principal amount of Securities, by wire transfer to a U.S. dollar account maintained by the payee with a bank in the United States if such Holder elects payment by wire transfer by giving written notice to the Trustee or the Paying Agent to
such effect designating such account no later than 15 days immediately preceding the relevant due date for payment (or such other date as the Trustee may accept in its discretion).
Initially, U.S. Bank National Association, duly organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America and having a corporate trust office in 190 South LaSalle Street, 10th Floor, MK-IL-STR, Chicago IL 60603 (Trustee), shall act as Paying Agent and Registrar. The Company may appoint and change any Paying Agent, Registrar or co-registrar without notice to any Holder. The Company or any of its domestically incorporated Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries may act as Paying Agent, Registrar or co-registrar.
The Company issued the Securities under an Indenture dated as of May 13, 2013 (as it may be amended or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the terms thereof, the Indenture), among the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee. The terms of the Securities include those stated in the Indenture. Capitalized terms used herein and not defined herein have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Indenture. The Securities are subject to all such terms, and Holders are referred to the Indenture for a statement of those terms. To the extent any provision of this Security conflicts with the express provisions of the Indenture, the provisions of the Indenture shall govern and be controlling.
The Securities are senior unsecured obligations of the Company. The aggregate principal amount of Securities which may be authenticated and delivered under the Indenture is unlimited. This Security is one of the 4.625% Senior Notes due 2021 referred to in the Indenture. The Securities include (i) $150,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Companys 4.625% Senior Notes due 2021 issued under the Indenture on May 13, 2013 (herein called Initial Notes) and (ii) if and when issued, additional 4.625% Senior Notes due 2021 of the Company that may be issued from time to time under the Indenture subsequent to May 13, 2013 (herein called Additional Notes), subject to the provisions of the Indenture. The Indenture, among other things, imposes certain limitations on certain Sale and Leaseback Transactions involving the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary and the incurrence of certain Liens and requirements regarding future Subsidiary Guarantors,
provided
,
however
, that the requirements regarding future Subsidiary Guarantors shall be suspended (subject to reinstatement under certain circumstances) if the Securities are rated Investment Grade by both of the Rating Agencies and no Default has occurred and is continuing under the Indenture. In addition, the Indenture imposes requirements with respect to the provision of financial information.
To guarantee the due and punctual payment of the principal, premium, if any, and interest (including post-filing or post-petition interest) on the Securities and all other amounts payable by the Company under the Indenture and the Securities when and as the same shall be due and payable, whether at maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, according to the terms of the Securities and the Indenture, the Subsidiary Guarantors have unconditionally guaranteed (and
future guarantors, together with the Subsidiary Guarantors, shall unconditionally Guarantee), jointly and severally, such obligations on a senior, unsecured basis pursuant to the terms of the Indenture,
provided
,
however
, that such Guarantees shall be released under certain conditions, including if the Securities are rated Investment Grade by both of the Rating Agencies or, with respect to any Guarantee, the applicable Subsidiary Guarantor under the ABL Facility or any Material Debt Facility.
(a)    Except as described below under clauses 6(b) and 6(c) hereof, the Securities shall not be redeemable at the Issuers option prior to May 15, 2016.
(b)    At any time prior to May 15, 2016, upon not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior written notice, the Company may redeem the Securities, in whole but not in part, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Securities redeemed plus the Applicable Premium plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to, the date of redemption (the 
Redemption Date
), subject to the rights of Holders of Securities on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date.
Applicable Premium means with respect to any Redemption Date, the greater of:
(1)    1.0% of the principal amount of such Security; and
(2)    the excess, if any, of (a) the present value as of such Redemption Date of (i) the redemption price of such Security on May 15, 2016 plus (ii) all required interest payments due on such Security through May 15, 2016 (excluding accrued but unpaid interest to the date of redemption), computed using a discount rate equal to the Treasury Rate as of such Redemption Date plus 50 basis points, over (b) the then-outstanding principal of such Security, in each case as calculated by the Company or on behalf of the Company by such Person as the Company shall designate; provided that such calculation shall not be a duty or obligation of the Trustee.
Treasury Rate means the yield to maturity at the time of computation of United States Treasury securities with a constant maturity (as compiled and published in the most recent Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (519) that has become publicly available at least two Business Days prior to the Redemption Date (or, if such Statistical Release is no longer published, any publicly available source or similar market data)) most nearly equal to the period from the Redemption Date to May 15, 2016;
provided, however
, that if the period from the Redemption Date to May 15, 2016 is not equal to the constant maturity of a United States Treasury security for which a weekly average yield is given, the Treasury Rate shall be obtained by linear interpolation (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth of a year) from the weekly average yields of United States Treasury securities for which such yields are given, except that if the period from the Redemption Date to May 15, 2016 is less than one year, the weekly average yield on actually traded United States Treasury securities adjusted to a constant maturity of one year shall be used.
(c)    Prior to May 15, 2016, the Company may on any one or more occasions redeem up to 35% of the original principal amount of the Securities (calculated after giving effect to any issuance of Additional Notes) with the Net Cash Proceeds of one or more Equity Offerings at a redemption price of 104.625% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the applicable Redemption Date (subject to the right of Holders of Securities on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date);
provided
that (i) at least 65% of the original principal amount of the Securities (calculated after giving effect to any issuance of Additional Notes) remains outstanding after each such redemption, and (ii) the redemption occurs within 90 days after the closing of such Equity Offering.
(d)    On and after May 15, 2016, the Company may redeem the Securities, in whole or, from time to time, in part, upon not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior written notice, at the redemption prices (expressed as percentages of principal amount of the Securities to be redeemed) set forth below, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, if any, to the applicable Redemption Date (subject to the right of Holders of Securities of record on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date) if redeemed during the twelve-month period beginning on May 15 of each of the years indicated below:
(e)    Notice of any redemption may, at the discretion of the Company, be subject to one or more conditions precedent, including, but not limited to, completion of an Equity Offering or other corporate transaction.
(f)    Any redemption pursuant to this paragraph 6 shall be made pursuant to the provisions of Section 5.2 through 5.8 of the Indenture.
The Company shall not be required to make mandatory redemption payments or sinking fund payments with respect to the Securities.
Upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem all of the Securities as described in paragraph 6, above, each Holder shall have the right to require the Company to repurchase all or any part (equal to $2,000 or a larger integral multiples of $1,000) of such Holders Securities at a
purchase price in cash equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the date of repurchase (subject to the right of Holders of record on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant Interest Payment Date or Special Interest Payment Date) as provided in, and subject to the terms of, the Indenture.
The Securities are in registered form without coupons in denominations of principal amount of $2,000 and whole multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. A Holder may transfer or exchange Securities in accordance with the Indenture. The Registrar may require a Holder, among other things, to furnish appropriate endorsements or transfer documents to the Company and the Trustee and to pay any taxes and fees required by law or permitted by the Indenture. The Registrar need not register the transfer of or exchange any Securities for a period beginning 15 Business Days before an Interest Payment Date and ending on such Interest Payment Date.
The registered Holder of this Security may be treated as the owner of it for all purposes.
If money for the payment of the principal of or premium, if any, or interest remains unclaimed for two years, the Trustee or Paying Agent shall pay the money back to the Company at its request unless an abandoned property law designates another person. After any such payment, Holders entitled to the money must look only to the Company and not to the Trustee for payment.
Subject to certain conditions set forth in the Indenture, the Company at any time may terminate some or all of its obligations under the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantees and the Indenture if the Company deposits with the Trustee money or U.S. Government Obligations for the payment of principal and interest on the Securities to redemption or maturity, as the case may be.
Subject to certain exceptions set forth in the Indenture, (i) the Indenture, the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees may be amended with the written consent of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Securities then outstanding (including without limitation, consents obtained in connection with a purchase of, or tender offer or exchange offer for Securities) and (ii) any Default or Event of Default (other than (x) with respect to nonpayment or (y) in respect of a provision that cannot be amended without the written consent of each Holder affected) or noncompliance with any provision may be waived
with the written consent of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities then outstanding (including without limitation, consents obtained in connection with a purchase of, or tender offer or exchange offer for Securities). Subject to certain exceptions set forth in the Indenture, without the consent of any Holder, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may supplement or amend the Indenture, the Securities and the Subsidiary Guarantees to, among other things, cure any ambiguity, omission, defect or inconsistency, or to comply with Article IV or Article X of the Indenture in respect of the assumption by a Successor Company of an obligation of the Company under the Indenture or by a Successor Guarantor of obligations under a Subsidiary Guarantee, or to provide for uncertificated Securities in addition to or in place of certificated Securities, or to add Guarantees with respect to the Securities or to secure the Securities, or to release a Subsidiary Guarantor upon its designation as an Unrestricted Subsidiary or otherwise in accordance with the Indenture, or to add additional covenants or surrender rights and powers conferred on the Company, or to make any change that does not adversely affect the rights of the Holders in any material respect or to conform the text of the Indenture, the Securities or the Subsidiary Guarantees to the Description of notes section of the Offering Memorandum dated May 8, 2013 in certain cases.
Under the Indenture, Events of Default include, without limitation: (i) default for 30 days in payment of interest when due on the Securities; (ii) default in payment of the principal of or premium, if any, on the Securities at Stated Maturity, upon optional redemption, upon required repurchase, upon declaration or otherwise; (iii) failure by the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor to comply with its obligations under Article IV of the Indenture, (iv) failure by the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor to comply with certain other provisions or agreements in the Indenture and the Securities, in certain cases subject to notice and lapse of time; (v) certain accelerations (including failure to pay within any grace period after final maturity) of other Indebtedness of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary if the amount accelerated (or so unpaid) exceeds $50.0 million; (vi) certain events of bankruptcy or insolvency with respect to the Company or any Significant Subsidiary; (vii) certain final judgments or decrees for the payment of money in excess of $50.0 million and (viii) the failure of any Subsidiary Guarantee entered into by a Subsidiary Guarantor which is a Significant Subsidiary or group of Restricted Subsidiaries that taken together would constitute a Significant Subsidiary, to be in full force and effect (except as contemplated thereby) or any denial or disaffirmation thereof.
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee or Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Securities then outstanding may declare all the Securities to be due and payable immediately. Certain events of bankruptcy or insolvency are Events of Default which shall result in the Securities being due and payable immediately upon the occurrence of such Events of Default.
Holders may not enforce the Indenture or the Securities except as provided in the Indenture. The Trustee may refuse to enforce the Indenture or the Securities unless it receives indemnity or security reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee. Subject to certain limitations,
Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities may direct the Trustee in its exercise of any trust or power. The Trustee may withhold from Holders notice of any continuing Default or Event of Default (except a Default or Event of Default in payment of principal or interest) if it determines that withholding notice is in their interest.
Subject to certain limitations set forth in the Indenture, the Trustee under the Indenture, in its individual or any other capacity, may become the owner or pledgee of Securities and may otherwise deal with and collect obligations owed to it by the Company or its Affiliates and may otherwise deal with the Company or its Affiliates with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee.
A director, officer, employee, incorporator or stockholder of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor shall not have any liability for any obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor under the Securities, the Indenture, the Subsidiary Guarantees or for any claim based on, in respect of, or by reason of, such obligations or their creation. By accepting a Security, each Holder waives and releases all such liability. The waiver and release shall be part of the consideration for the issue of the Securities.
This Security shall not be valid until an authorized signatory of the Trustee (or an authenticating agent acting on its behalf) manually signs the certificate of authentication on the other side of this Security.
Customary abbreviations may be used in the name of a Holder or an assignee, such as TEN COM (=tenants in common), TEN ENT (=tenants by the entirety), JT TEN (=joint tenants with rights of survivorship and not as tenants in common), CUST (=custodian) and U/G/M/A (=Uniform Gift to Minors Act).
Pursuant to a recommendation promulgated by the Committee on Uniform Security Identification Procedures the Company has caused CUSIP numbers to be printed on the Securities. No representation is made as to the accuracy of such numbers as printed on the Securities and reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers placed thereon.
This Security shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
The Company shall furnish to any Holder upon written request and without charge to the Holder a copy of the Indenture which has in it the text of this Security in larger type. Requests may be made to:
Brunswick Corporation
1 N. Field Ct.
Lake Forest, Illinois 60045-4811 Attention: William Metzger
ASSIGNMENT FORM
To assign this Security, fill in the form below:
I or we assign and transfer this Security to
___________________________________________________ (Print or type assignees name, address and zip code)
________________________________________ (Insert assignees soc. sec. or tax I.D. No.)
and irrevocably appoint ___________agent to transfer this Security on the books of the Company. The agent may substitute another to act for him.
                                                    
Date:____________________        Your Signature:___________________
Signature Guarantee:______________________________
    
        (Signature must be guaranteed)
Sign exactly as your name appears on the other side of this Security.
The signature(s) should be guaranteed by an eligible guarantor institution (banks, stockbrokers, savings and loan associations and credit unions with membership in an approved signature guarantee medallion program), pursuant to S.E.C. Rule 17Ad-15.
The undersigned hereby certifies that it
o
is /
o
is not an Affiliate of the Company and that, to its knowledge, the proposed transferee
o
is /
o
is not an Affiliate of the Company.
In connection with any transfer or exchange of any of the Securities evidenced by this certificate occurring prior to the date that is one year after the later of the date of original issuance of such Securities and the last date, if any, on which such Securities were owned by the Company or any Affiliate of the Company, the undersigned confirms that such Securities are being:
CHECK ONE BOX BELOW:
Unless one of the boxes is checked, the Trustee will refuse to register any of the Securities evidenced by this certificate in the name of any person other than the registered Holder thereof;
provided, however
, that if box (4), (5) or (6) is checked, the Trustee or the Company may require, prior to registering any such transfer of the Securities, in their sole discretion, such legal opinions, certifications and other information as the Trustee or the Company may reasonably request to confirm that such transfer is being made pursuant to an exemption from, or in a transaction not subject to, the registration requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, such as the exemption provided by Rule 144 under such Act.
___________________________
Signature
Signature Guarantee:
_________________________            ______________________________
(Signature must be guaranteed)            Signature
____________________________________________________________
The signature(s) should be guaranteed by an eligible guarantor institution (banks, stockbrokers, savings and loan associations and credit unions with membership in an approved signature guarantee medallion program), pursuant to S.E.C. Rule 17Ad-15.
TO BE COMPLETED BY PURCHASER IF (1) OR (3) ABOVE IS CHECKED.
The undersigned represents and warrants that it is purchasing this Security for its own account or an account with respect to which it exercises sole investment discretion and that it and any such account is a qualified institutional buyer within the meaning of Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and is aware that the sale to it is being made in reliance on Rule 144A and acknowledges that it has received such information regarding the Company as the undersigned has requested pursuant to Rule 144A or has determined not to request such information and that it is aware that the transferor is relying upon the undersigneds foregoing representations in order to claim the exemption from registration provided by Rule 144A.
Dated:                    NOTICE: To be executed by an executive officer
[TO BE ATTACHED TO GLOBAL SECURITIES]
SCHEDULE OF INCREASES OR DECREASES IN GLOBAL SECURITY
The following increases or decreases in this Global Security have been made:
[OPTION OF HOLDER TO ELECT PURCHASE]
If you want to elect to have this Security purchased by the Company pursuant to
Section 3.5
of the Indenture, check the box:
If you want to elect to have only part of this Security purchased by the Company pursuant to
3.5
of the Indenture, state the amount in principal amount (must be in denominations of $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof): $
Date: _______________     Your Signature: _________________________
(Sign exactly as your name appears on the other side of the Security)
Signature Guarantee: _______________________________________
(Signature must be guaranteed)
The signature(s) should be guaranteed by an eligible guarantor institution (banks, stockbrokers, savings and loan associations and credit unions with membership in an approved signature guarantee medallion program), pursuant to S.E.C. Rule 17Ad-15.
EXHIBIT B
FORM OF INDENTURE SUPPLEMENT TO ADD SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS TO GUARANTEE NOTES
This Supplemental Indenture, dated as of [_______ __], 20__ (this 
Supplemental Indenture
), among [
name of future Subsidiary Guarantor
] (the 
Guarantor
), Brunswick Corporation (together with its successors and assigns, the 
Company
), each other then existing Subsidiary Guarantor under the Indenture referred to below, and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee under the Indenture referred to below.
W I T N E S S E T H:
WHEREAS, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee have heretofore executed and delivered an Indenture, dated as of May 13, 2013 (as amended, supplemented, waived or otherwise modified, the 
Indenture
), providing for the issuance of an unlimited aggregate principal amount of 4.625% Senior Notes due 2021 of the Company (the 
Securities
);
WHEREAS,
Section 3.6
of the Indenture provides that the Company is required to cause each Restricted Subsidiary that Guarantees or borrows under, on the Issue Date or any time thereafter, the ABL Facility or any other Material Debt Facility to execute and deliver to the Trustee a supplemental indenture pursuant to which such Restricted Subsidiary shall become party to the Indenture as a Subsidiary Guarantor on the terms and conditions set forth in the Indenture.
WHEREAS, pursuant to
Section 9.1
of the Indenture, the Trustee and the Company are authorized to execute and deliver this Supplemental Indenture to supplement the Indenture to add any Guarantee, without the consent of any Holder;
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, the Guarantor, the Company, the other Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee mutually covenant and agree for the equal and ratable benefit of the Holders as follows:
ARTICLE I
Definitions
SECTION 1.1 
    
Defined Terms
. As used in this Supplemental Indenture, terms defined in the Indenture or in the preamble or recital hereto are used herein as therein defined. The words herein, hereof and hereby and other words of similar import used in this Supplemental Indenture refer to this Supplemental Indenture as a whole and not to any particular section hereof.
ARTICLE II
Agreement to be Bound; Guarantee
SECTION 2.1 
    
Agreement to be Bound
. The Guarantor hereby becomes a party to the Indenture as a Subsidiary Guarantor and as such shall have all of the rights and be subject to all of the obligations and agreements of a Subsidiary Guarantor under the Indenture, including Section 3.6, Article IV and Article X of the Indenture. The Guarantor agrees to be bound by all of the provisions of the Indenture applicable to a Subsidiary Guarantor and to perform all of the obligations and agreements of a Subsidiary Guarantor under the Indenture.
ARTICLE III
Miscellaneous
SECTION 3.1 
    
Notices
. All notices and other communications to the Guarantor shall be given as provided in the Indenture to the Guarantor, at its address set forth in the Indenture, with a copy to the Company as provided in the Indenture for notices to the Company.
SECTION 3.2 
    
Parties
. Nothing expressed or mentioned herein is intended or shall be construed to give any Person, other than the parties hereto, any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Supplemental Indenture or the Indenture or any provision herein or therein contained.
SECTION 3.3 
    
Governing Law
. This Supplemental Indenture shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
SECTION 3.4 
    
Severability Clause
. In case any provision in this Supplemental Indenture shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby and such provision shall be ineffective only to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability.
SECTION 3.5 
    
Ratification of Indenture; Supplemental Indentures Part of Indenture
. Except as expressly amended hereby, the Indenture is in all respects ratified and confirmed and all the terms, conditions and provisions thereof shall remain in full force and
effect. This Supplemental Indenture shall form a part of the Indenture for all purposes, and every Holder of Securities heretofore or hereafter authenticated and delivered shall be bound hereby. The recitals contained herein shall be taken as the statements of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantor and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for their correctness. The Trustee makes no representation or warranty as to the validity or sufficiency of this Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.6 
    
Counterparts
. The parties hereto may sign one or more copies of this Supplemental Indenture in counterparts, all of which together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
SECTION 3.7 
    
Headings
. The headings of the Articles and the sections in this Supplemental Indenture are for convenience of reference only and shall not be deemed to alter or affect the meaning or interpretation of any provisions hereof.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed as of the date first above written.
[SUBSIDIARY GUARANTOR],
as a Guarantor
By:_______________________________________
Name:
Title:
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Trustee
By:_______________________________________
Name:
Title:
BRUNSWICK CORPORATION
By:_______________________________________
Name:
Title:

Exhibit 99.1
                                                                                                            
Brunswick Corporation Announces Completion of 4.625% Senior Notes Offering and Election to Redeem Remaining 11.250% Senior Secured Notes Due 2016
Company Anticipates Greater Net Interest Expense Savings in 2013
LAKE FOREST, Il., May 13, 2013 -
Brunswick Corporation (NYSE: BC) announced today that it has completed its previously announced private offering of $150 million aggregate principal amount of 4.625% Senior Notes due 2021, and that it will redeem its remaining $250 million aggregate principal amount of 11.250% Senior Secured Notes due 2016 on June 12, 2013.
As a result of these financing activities, the Company's current estimate for its full-year, 2013 net interest expense, excluding debt extinguishment losses, will be approximately $43 million to $45 million. The Company's previous estimate for net interest expense was in the range of $48 million to $52 million.
In addition, the Company estimates that its full-year, 2013 debt extinguishment losses will be approximately $33 million. The Company's previous estimate for such losses was in the range of $25 million to $30 million.
These financing activities substantially complete our multi-year debt reduction plan, although we may continue to opportunistically repurchase additional debt, said Brunswick Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Dustan E. McCoy. As a result of the successful execution of our operational and financial strategies, we have made outstanding progress towards strengthening our overall capital structure and significantly reducing our net interest expense.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements in this news release are forward-looking as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Brunswick's business. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve
certain risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from expectations as of the date of this news release. These risks include, but are not limited to: the effect of adverse general economic conditions, including the amount of disposable income available to consumers for discretionary purchases, tight consumer credit markets, and the level of consumer confidence on the demand for marine, fitness, billiards and bowling equipment, products and services; the ability of dealers and customers to secure adequate access to financing and the Company's ability to access capital and credit markets; the ability to maintain strong relationships with dealers, distributors and independent boat builders; the ability to maintain effective distribution and develop alternative distribution channels without disrupting incumbent distribution partners; the ability to successfully manage pipeline inventories and respond to any excess supply of repossessed and aged boats in the market; credit and collections risks, including the potential obligation to repurchase dealer inventory; the risk of losing a key account or a critical supplier; the strength and protection of the Company's brands and other intellectual property; the ability to spread fixed costs while establishing a smaller manufacturing footprint; the ability to successfully complete restructuring efforts in accordance with projected timeframes and costs; the ability to obtain components, parts and raw materials from suppliers in a timely manner and for a reasonable price; the need to meet pension funding obligations; the effect of higher energy and logistics costs, interest rates and fuel prices on the Company's results; competitive pricing pressures, including the impact of inflation and increased competition from Asian competitors; the ability to develop new and innovative products in response to changing retail demands and expectations that are differentiated for the global marketplace at a competitive price and in compliance with applicable laws; the effect of competition from other leisure pursuits on the level of participation in boating, fitness, bowling and billiards activities; the risk of product liability, warranty and other claims in connection with the manufacture and sale of products; the ability to respond to and minimize the negative financial impact of legislative and regulatory developments, including those related to environmental restrictions, climate change, healthcare costs, taxes and employee benefits; the ability to maintain market share, particularly in high-margin products; fluctuations in the Company's stock price due to external factors; the ability to maintain product quality and service standards expected by customers; the ability to increase manufacturing operations and meet production targets within time and budgets allowed; negative currency trends, including shifts in exchange rates; competition from new technologies; the ability to complete environmental remediation efforts and resolve claims and litigation at the cost estimated; the uncertainty and risks of doing business in international locations, including international political instability, civil unrest and other risks associated with operations in emerging markets; the risk of having to record an impairment to the value of goodwill and other assets; the effect that catastrophic events may have on consumer demand and the ability to manufacture products, including hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, and environmental spills; the effect of weather conditions on demand for marine products and retail bowling center revenues; the risk of losing individuals who are key contributors to the organization; and risks associated with the Company's information technology systems, including the continued use of legacy systems and the risk of a failure of or attacks on the Company's information systems, which could result in data security breaches, lost or stolen assets or information, and associated remediation costs.
Additional risk factors are included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for 2012. Such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date on which they are made and Brunswick does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this news release.
About Brunswick
Headquartered in Lake Forest, Ill., Brunswick Corporation endeavors to instill "Genuine Ingenuity"(TM) in all its leading consumer brands, including Mercury and Mariner outboard engines; Mercury MerCruiser sterndrives and inboard engines; MotorGuide trolling motors; Attwood marine parts and accessories; Land 'N' Sea, Kellogg Marine, and Diversified Marine parts and accessories distributors; Bayliner, Boston Whaler, Brunswick Commercial and Government Products, Crestliner, Cypress Cay, Harris FloteBote, Lowe, Lund, Meridian, Princecraft, Quicksilver, Rayglass, Sea Ray, Uttern and Valiant boats; Life Fitness and Hammer Strength fitness equipment; Brunswick bowling centers, equipment and consumer products; Brunswick billiards tables and foosball tables. For more information, visit http://www.brunswick.com.


</DOCUMENT>
